<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12271</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / The Coal Crisis: Credibility of unions revives
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Trades Union Congress has enjoyed a strong revival in its credibility,
not least among its own member unions, during the pits crisis, according to
senior TUC officials. Mr John Monks, the TUC's deputy general secretary,
yesterday said recent events showed that 'if we did not exist we would have
needed to be invented'.
An immediate consequence is likely to be a clear recommendation for a 'yes'
vote from the executive of the electricians' section of the AEEU craft union
in next year's ballot on whether the merged union should be in the TUC.
The electricians' union remains outside the TUC after disputes about
poaching of members, but after its merger with the AEU engineering union, a
TUC member, members of both unions are being balloted.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12272</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Second quarter outflow curbed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
South African Finance Minister Derek Keys yesterday said foreign investors
withdrew R2bn (Dollars 715m) in the second quarter of 1992 but the outflow
had since been curbed, Reuter reports from Johannesburg.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12273</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of Management Consultants (4): Forward thinking -
Profile of Andersen Consulting
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RHYS DAVID
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN TODAY'S bleak business climate, it is not just the big corporation that
needs to ensure it is thinking well ahead but also the management
consultancies that advise them.
Which is why consultants at Andersen Consulting, the Chicago-based firm,
with a fee income of more than Dollars 2bn, will shortly be mulling over
proposals due to emerge in November from a one year study in which 250 of
the firm's 800 partners have been directly involved.
Set in train by Mr George Shaheen, the 48-year-old managing partner who took
over at Andersen shortly after the consultancy's emergence as a separate
business from accountants Arthur Andersen, it will look at the industrial,
marketplace and geopolitical changes likely to take place in the years up to
2000. Its conclusions will not, however, be set in stone: under Mr Shaheen
the firm is committed to a new look, every three years, at the world it
inhabits.
Since it first moved into consultancy in 1954 when it was commissioned to
help General Electric of the US implement the first commercial computer
application, Andersen has grown into a strong force in technical consultancy
in the US and a number of other world markets, including the UK, France,
Spain and Italy.
With growth accelerating in the 1980s, a decision to split from the audit
side was taken in 1988. 'We realised information technology had become
'mission critical' in a number of sectors from airlines to utilities and it
seemed illogical that a business with its core in accountancy should be
significant in this field,' Mr Shaheen says. 'We believed we had to define
where the business was going and claim ownership of the concepts we were
pioneering.'
In the period since the division - both parts of the company continue to be
ultimately owned by a private Swiss holding company Arthur Andersen and
Company SC - consulting revenues have grown rapidly, as big companies, many
of them multinationals, have sought help in using IT to pull together
international operations and to improve their response to customer demand
and market conditions.
In Europe, Andersen expertise in putting together the right systems and
software was seen at the 1992 Winter Olympics, while in Britain the company
has been working on a large scheme for the Department of Social Security in
which IT is being used to improve service delivery by unifying the often
bewildering range of details surrounding each client and their benefit
entitlements.
The backbone around which Andersen's efforts in the consultancy field has
been built is its impressive training programme on which it spends around
Dollars 160m a year or roughly Dollars 7,200 per consultant. New recruits to
consulting are for the most part taken on straight from universities around
the world and brought over early in their careers to probably the biggest
private educational campus in the world at St Charles, 25 miles outside
Chicago.
There they spend time learning the company's strictly laid-down methodology
for handling computer projects. At regular intervals during their careers
they will return to the classrooms at the 150 acre St Charles site, teaching
new classes themselves or undergoing further training.
The result is that the firm can apply a consistent approach and methodology
to problem-solving around the world and can easily assemble
English-speaking, multi-disciplinary specialists from a variety of countries
and backgrounds to tackle projects. 'You cannot fight a war with different
systems. Clients can expect to receive the same level of service wherever
they get it, ' Mr Shaheen says.
The danger, as some critics have been quick to point out, is that the firm
produces clones whose ability to think creatively will be lost, and that by
using raw recruits it deprives itself of the wider experience more seasoned
outsiders would bring.
Andersen's 20 per cent worldwide and 37 per cent European growth in 1991, at
a time when some other consultancies have been beginning to experience
recessionary downturn, suggests clients are not taking this view, but the
review now in place is intended to guard against the kind of problems which
have affected other big groups holding a strong position in their sectors,
such as IBM and General Motors.
Among the challenges which Andersen has already had to face have been
continued rapid technological developments, including the shift from
mainframe computing systems, in which it had built up years of expertise, to
client-server systems, in which high powered desktop systems are networked
with each other.
This shift, which has set the new computer paradigm for the 1990s, has meant
that Andersen itself has had to mount a big exercise to retrain its own
personnel in a completely new set of skills, centred on networking. Without
such a re-education exercise, Andersen was in danger of being left behind,
with more than two thirds of Fortune 1000 companies either planning or
implementing a move to client-server computing.
Externally, the worldwide business environment in which the consultancy and
its clients operates is in the midst, too, of not only economic but also
structural change with the great corporations that have dominated world
business being forced to operate in much more entrepreneurial ways, and
increasingly in need of advice on how to achieve new patterns of
organisation. These developments and recent dramatic world geopolitical
changes have provided another big test for consultants' skills.
At the same time, competition has intensified as new competitors have
emerged. In technical consulting Andersen comes up against computer hardware
and software companies such as IBM and EDS, and a host of other smaller
companies, with aggressive new entrants such as the French company CAP
Gemini Sogeti also building market share through acquisitions.
In strategy consulting, where it is seeking to grow further, Andersen meets
established names such as McKinsey, Booz Allen, and Bain. Competition also
comes from other members of the Big Six accountancy firms, all of which are
trying to build up their position in IT consulting.
Although the results of the consultancy's internal review are not yet known,
the direction in which Andersen has already travelled since its early days
is from systems building to a much broader range of activities, involving
systems integration, systems management, strategic consulting and change
management across the six broad sectors in which it operates.
The next moves are likely to see greater emphasis on what it can offer in
business integration and re-engineering, a process whereby businesses are
helped to look at their strategies, their organisational structure and their
technology in the round, and at how to make the best use of IT in achieving
any restructuring required.
It is a concept which is difficult to describe fully to clients, which is
why Andersen has set up in the US a number of centres which business
executives can visit to see just how the integration of technology and
innovative business thinking can reshape an industry.
In Chicago itself, Andersen has created a model specialist retailer and
supermarket of the future. Other centres elsewhere demonstrate new ways of
thinking about logistics and process manufacturing, and about the delivery
of medical care, all involving greatly increased use of IT.
The aim is to impress clients that Andersen is more than just an IT
consultancy that has bolted on a strategic capability, but a partner that
can bring together and implement all the elements that can help businesses
succeed. As Mr Shaheen says: 'We want to be the firm that makes technology
succeed in the marketplace.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12274</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of Management Consultants (5): Under pressure - The
Strategy Boutiques
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM SAUNDERSON-MEYER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOWNTURN has put pressure on all management consultancies, but perhaps
more vulnerable than most are the small 'strategy boutiques'. Recession has
found them competing with both the consulting arms of the international
accounting firms and with a plethora of new one-man consultancies, and faced
with clients determined to get more for their money.
Leaving aside the fashionable jargon with which consultants adorn their
profession and confound their clients, strategy consultants basically help
formulate strategies at the corporate or business unit level. This may be
through an analysis of growth opportunities, potential acquisitions,
markets, organisational structure or product competitiveness.
Over the past decade the move has been away from 'pure' strategy analysis to
training and hands-on involvement in the implementation of the strategies.
The initial impetus for the strategic boutiques came from a perceived
failure by the multinational accountancy companies to provide specialised
services. Although most agree that the boutiques - because of competitive
pricing, niche-marketing and personal service - will ride the storm, the
empire has now struck back.
'The boutiques are now under pressure from the multinationals, who have
substantial support networks for research, as well as the advantage of
international experience and resources,' says Mr Brian O'Rorke, executive
director of the Management Consultants Association. 'Also, the
multinationals have moved from being generalists to being multi-boutiques -
trying to set up under one roof a raft of specialist operations.'
The downturn and management de-layering has also shaken loose many a senior
executive, either through redundancy or early retirement. These have been
tempted to supplement income by setting up small one-man consultancies,
increasing the pressure on fees and hence margins.
Mr John Mitchell of Mitchell Phoenix who works in the high technology sector
with the likes of Microsoft, is more worried about the effect of
one-man-bands on the quality of consultancy offered: 'It is becoming more
and more difficult to attract clients because of the bad experiences they
have had with consultants who charge them tens of thousands of pounds and
leave them with a bound document and very little else.'
This raises a more serious problem for the strategy boutiques of whether the
bottom line effect of the specialised and sometimes esoteric service they
offer is sufficiently clear. A critic is Mr James Irwin, chairman of Impac,
an international consultancy specialising in 'productivity and quality
engineering', very much a hands-on consultancy which guarantees savings
greater than the project fee.
He is a great believer in quantifiable analysis, and is scathing of 'fuzzy'
programmes where no one in the company is afterwards able to pin down the
benefits to the bottom line. 'A lot of consultants are selling ego stroking
rather than anything that provides a lasting effect.'
Not surprisingly, this is a view rejected by most consultants. Mr Mitchell
is critical of strategy consultants who encourage a culture of 'client
dependency' by projecting themselves as gurus with patented solutions and
while he would probably agree with Mr Irwin's scepticism of faddism, he
insists that strategy boutiques need to go beyond the purely analytical.
'Straight line projection of the past into the future is not enough. What is
needed is innovation; companies need an adherence to vision at the top and
an organisational ability to translate this into action.
'What has often happened is that a major consultancy of the Price Waterhouse
ilk will design a strategy costing Pounds 250,000 to Pounds 500,000 and then
wash its hands of whether there is in place in the business the
infrastructure to make the change. What the boutiques can and are having to
do is to modify that infrastructure through an ongoing involvement with the
company.'
Mr James Thorne, managing director of Strat*X, a consultancy which is
building a reputation for 'action-oriented' training with multinationals,
traces the demand for greater consultancy involvement directly to the
harsher economic climate of the past few years: 'On the demand side, because
of the drive for tangible results, there is less and less training for
training's sake taking place,' he says.
'However, the processes of management de-layering and employee empowerment
have been continuing, which has opened an area of huge potential for
strategy consultants. If control from the top is to be reduced and to be
successfully replaced by a system where responsibility and involvement
bubbles from the bottom up, it is no longer just a few managers who need
sophisticated training: all key employees need that exposure.'
If employee empowerment is an ideal to which British commerce and industry
pay more than lip-service, there will be a need for a massive commitment to
restructuring to meet the 'challenges of change', but the jury is still out
on this.
Mr Jon Morgan, managing director of Executive Information Solutions admits
to a missionary zeal over the short-termism of British industry: 'More
serious than trimmed margins is the fact that training, marketing and
consultancy work are considered expendable by management and are the first
to be cut in a recession.'
Mr O'Rorke identifies eastern Europe, along with Information Technology as
the two growth areas for consultancies: 'As much as 45 per cent of MCA
members' revenue comes by way of work in IT - but one needs to be
circumspect: nowadays everything has an element of IT in it.'
'Eastern Europe is providing a fair amount of work, with encouraging growth
signs. The problem is that it is entirely dependent on funding from
international agencies such as the World Bank and the European Community's
Phare programme - the eastern businesses don't have the money at the moment.
'Although fee rates are not good, it is useful in the sense of establishing
a beachhead for the future and, of course, it is a way of keeping
consultants who might otherwise be sitting doing nothing in the UK,
occupied.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12275</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of Management Consultants (6): Numbers crunch - The
Accountants
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DIGITS '2' and '0' are cropping up frequently among the accountancy
firms at the moment as they restructure their businesses for the coming
millenium.
Emblazoned on glossy brochures and heading internal memos, KPMG Peat Marwick
boasts proudly of '20/20 Vision'. For Coopers &amp; Lybrand, it is 'Vision
2000'. For Price Waterhouse, there is 'MCS 2000'.
Other firms are more sceptical of such public statements of change, arguing
that the best strategies are those which are kept concealed from their
competitors.
But all are indulging in organisational and numerical change of sorts, not
least in shedding staff. Earlier this month, KPMG Peat Marwick made 28 of
its 800-odd consulting staff redundant. Late last year, Price Waterhouse got
rid of 150 of its 1,000 consulting staff.
One other thing that the firms have in common is a marketing drive to call
themselves consultants - and not simply accountants. There is considerable
justification to the claim. Much of the explosive growth during the 1980s
did not come from audit work but from consulting. In the UK alone, the Big
Six accounting firms generated Pounds 624m from consultancy in the 12 months
to this spring.
Some Pounds 136m, or nearly one quarter of last year's total fee income from
Coopers &amp; Lybrand, the UK's largest firm, was from consulting. That was a
larger contribution than came from either the tax or insolvency divisions,
and more than half of the total from auditing.
Nearly Pounds 175m - or more than half of total income for Arthur Andersen -
came from the firm's semi-autonomous consulting division, Andersen
Consulting. Its growth dominates the firm and swamped the impressive
expansion even in Andersen's audit department.
Andersen also dominates the overall market for consultants. A survey by
Alpha Publications showed that billings from the firm throughout western
Europe were Dollars 908m last year. Next came KPMG and Coopers &amp; Lybrand.
Only then came non-accountants: McKinsey and PA Consulting. The remaining
Big Six firms were all represented among the top 10.
Accountants, in short, continue to dominate much of the market for
consultancy. That reflects the degree to which they have wanted to provide
the widest range of services as a 'one-stop' shop to clients.
In particular, it shows the extent to which they have wanted to - and been
able to - achieve considerable 'leverage' by cross-selling other services to
existing audit clients. That ratio hovers between 20 and 40 per cent for
many of the firms.
This leverage has been one of the factors bringing the firms under growing
scrutiny over potential conflicts of interest. Can auditors really exercise
objective, critical judgement when examining work carried out by consultants
from the same firm? Will the size of the total bill to a particular client
sway independence when harsh comments could lead to loss of revenue?
These charges are dismissed by accountants. But Mr Malcolm Coster, head of
consulting at Coopers &amp; Lybrand, concedes there is at least a perceived
conflict of interest, and that the position is likely to get tougher in the
next few years.
Most of the firms see their biggest challenge as bringing greater focus to
their work. In their desire to offer clients every possible service, they
have expanded into activities well beyond the traditional preserve of the
accountant.
Mr Brian Pomeroy at Touche Ross says that for his firm, these will include
information technology, operations consulting and human resource management.
Yet he also admits to tension, because he still wants the firm to respond to
clients as 'full-range suppliers'.
On the other hand, Coopers &amp; Lybrand recently announced publicly that it
would not participate in tenders for schools inspector work. Mr Coster says
that where competition has cut into the margins on some government work, he
is no longer interested in tendering.
All this change is happening against a backdrop of fierce price competition,
both from other accountancy firms and from niche consultants with far lower
overheads. At the same time, the firms are having to face a very different
type of client. Mr Michael Grunberg, managing director of the consulting arm
of Stoy Hayward, says that on one recent tender, the potential customer
asked the consultant to complete a written test.
'Buyers are becoming much more mature,' he says. 'They look at the CVs of
the individuals who are going to be working on the team, not the salesmen.
It's getting to the point where the cost of all bidders preparing is greater
than the value of the contract.'
It is also having an effect on the type of staff hired. Mr Clive Williams,
head of consulting at Ernst &amp; Young, says many firms took on too many
inexperienced staff in the 1980s which they are now having to shed.
He believes the optimum size for a practice is 500 to 600 professionals.
Further growth will come through a series of strategic alliances with
specialist consultants. He negotiated his first with a boutique called
Kalchas earlier this year and says he is discussing a further three.
Mr Bob Simm, head of consulting at KPMG Peat Marwick, says: 'The consultant
of the future will be a specialist not a generalist, hungrier than ever
before, better able to operate at boardroom level, more able to articulate
the skills he has to other business units and better able to price jobs
sensibly.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12276</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of European Business Locations (11): It's been bad
news for investors - Events this year have exposed Italy's threadbare fabric
of maladministration
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LANE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CONVINCING foreigners that Italy is the right location for their companies
has become even harder over the past six months. In a year that has probably
seen as much bad publicity as any since the war, the lira's abandonment of
the exchange rate mechanism in September was only one of several events that
exposed a threadbare fabric of maladministration.
Revelations of widespread and large-scale corruption in public sector
contracts have been making news since the spring, as businessmen, civil
servants and politicians have been brought into the investigators' net. The
assassinations of leading anti-Mafia magistrates in Sicily in the summer
highlighted the state's weakness in tackling organised crime.
Such news can only have discouraged foreign companies evaluating potential
locations for their operations to look at Italy before making their choice.
Why opt for Italy when its problems seem so numerous and apparently so
intractable?
Earlier this year the Institute for Southern Development (Istituto per
l'Assistenza allo Sviluppo del Mezzogiorno - IASM) published the results of
a study it had commissioned into international corporate attitudes to
investment in the mezzogiorno. There were worrying findings for politicians
and regional planners. Business sentiment is extremely cautious about
southern Italy.
Crime is an important factor that discourages foreign companies from
venturing south. There has been little interest in the bottom part of the
Italian boot and the islands; the Calabrian toe has attracted less than 0.5
per cent of foreign investment in Italy, and Sicily only 1 per cent.
Italy's justice and home affairs ministers often speak about a state of war
in much of the south, and this summer's despatch of army troops to Sicily
and Sardinia underlined their concern. Large areas of Sicily are dominated
by the Mafia, and its cousins the 'ndrangheta hold sway in Calabria and the
Camorra in Campania. Even Apulia is now the territory of organised crime.
When foreign companies have decided to take advantage of incentives to
invest in the south, they have overwhelmingly decided to stay as far north
as possible in the eligible area. In this they follow the example of Italy's
largest private sector company. Fiat's three main factories in the
mezzogiorno are in the northern part; the Termoli engine plant, the assembly
operation at Cassino and the integrated plant being built at Melfi.
Political interference is another deterrent to foreign investment in Italy,
both north and south. The scandals reported this year have exposed the
tangled party political web within which business must operate. Easing a
relocation operation may require contributions to party representatives or
the recruitment on to the payroll of people recommended by local
politicians.
Slow payment of grants is a recurring complaint of companies in the
mezzogiorno, with delays being measured in years rather than months. And
this spotlights the uncertainty of rights; the gap between what legislation
lays down and what actually happens. Many companies have found, however,
that unofficial procedures exist for accelerating grant payments.
For companies in the south, distance from markets (Reggio Calabria is nearly
800 miles from Milan) is exacerbated by weaknesses in infrastructure. Few
companies in the south have remained unscathed by bad roads, electricity
black-outs, poor signposting, telecommunications difficulties, inadequate
public waste disposal systems or the like. Northern businessmen also
complain about the handicap of poor infrastructure, but it is considerably
worse in the south.
Yet prospects of significant improvements seem slender in the present
economic climate. The need to put public sector accounts in order means
fewer resources for infrastructure projects throughout the country, as well
as further delays in receiving grants for investment in the south.
However, in addition to being affected by shortcomings in physical
infrastructure, companies in Italy suffer from inefficient services.
'National and local utilities, the banking system, distribution, government
offices and local authorities provide services with a poor quality-cost
ratio,' said Stefano Micossi, head of the research department at the
industrialists' confederation Confindustria.
This complaint wins support from the Bank of Italy. Addressing its annual
meeting at the end of May, the governor repeated observations that he had
made on other occasions about unsatisfactory productivity and price rises in
the tertiary sector.
The choice of an Italian location for manufacturing plant poses challenges
to foreign companies, not least regarding the productivity and costs of
their own workforces. The IASM study on business attitudes to investment in
the mezzogiorno reported that labour costs in Spain and Ireland were about
25 per cent less than in southern Italy, in spite of the large reductions in
social security charges that business enjoys in the south compared to
northern Italy.
But it is not only a question of payroll costs. Italy's industrial relations
system places obstacles to part-time working, job mobility and other forms
of flexibility. And Italy has not benefitted from encountering and absorbing
the working practices that other more competitive industrial countries,
particularly Japan have adopted. This is pronounced in the south, where
foreign companies complain about the absence of an industrial culture.
Italy expresses interest in attracting foreign investment, yet often seems
closed to outsiders. 'It is a cultural matter. There are few businessmen who
genuinely want more investment in Italy by foreign companies,' said Mr
Micossi.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
WORKING TIME REGULATIONS
                   Maximum                 Maximum
                 working week              overtime
                    hours                  allowed
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Austria             40                    60 hours a year
Belgium             40                    65 hours a quarter
Denmark       no legislation                 no legislation
Finland             40                    20 hours per two week period
France              39                   130 hours a year
Germany             40                    60 hours a year
Greece              40                   150 hours a year
Ireland             48                   240 hours a year
Italy               40                       no legislation
Luxembourg          40                     2 hours a day
Netherlands         48                    12 hours a week
Norway              40                   200 hours a year
Portugal            44                   160 hours a year
Spain               40                    80 hours a year
Sweden              40                   200 hours a year
Switzerland      45-50                   350 hours a year
UK            no legislation                 no legislation
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Comparitive study on rules governing working conditions in the
member states, 1989, European Commission/ National Governments
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12277</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of European Business Locations (10): The open-door
policy continues - Spain is no longer cheap, nor is the future for large
investments clear
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TOM BURNS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR A SMALL army of big international corporations Spain was the business
location during the past decade. On the back of entry into the European
Community midway through the 1980s Spain hung a 'come in, look around and
buy' notice on its frontiers and there was no shortage of customers.
Basing itself on 1988 figures, the economy ministry estimated last year that
50 per cent of Spain's industrial capacity was in foreign hands. The present
figure is considerably higher because foreign acquisitions of domestic
business climbed steeply in the past two years.
The latest corporation to move into Spain has been the Mexican cement group
Cemex which in summer bought two local companies and became the dominant
domestic producer. Cemex singled out Spain for its investment to establish a
European bridgehead.
Highlights of the buy-up of Spain include British Petroleum's outright
acquisition last year of the domestic refinery and distributor Petromed, a
move that bought it some 10 per cent of Spain's petrol retail outlets, and
the 1990 acquisition by Guinness of Cruzcampo which earned the UK drinks
group around 25 per cent of Spain's brewing market.
In the 1980s, General Motors opened a large manufacturing plant near
Zaragoza and Volkswagen acquired the state-owned Seat group, the largest
domestic car producer. In both cases the investments were geared to the
export market and together they helped establish Spain as the third-ranked
car producer in Europe.
Such developments consolidated a foreign presence that stretches across the
board. The domestic car sector is now foreign-owned and foreign companies
own some 75 per cent of the large components and accessories business that
has been built up around it.
Foreign interests control eight of the top 10 domestic companies in the
chemical sector, an industry which accounts for 12 per cent of Spain's
exports and 8 per cent of its GDP, and as much as 18 per cent of the food
producing business is controlled by non-Spaniards. Even the exclusive, and
highly protectionist, banking sector has been penetrated, for more than 16
per cent of the total shareholding of the top six banks is estimated to be
in foreign hands.
The reasons for locating and investing in Spain came under three main
headings. Foreign business was alternatively attracted by cheap labour
costs, by the strength of the internal market and by the strategic
possibilities, vis-a-vis Europe, Latin America or North Africa, that Spain
represented.
All such reasons require reassessment. Spain is no longer cheap, nor is it
expanding and nor is the future for large cross-border strategic investments
as clear as it once was.
Average industrial wages in Spain stood at 62 per cent of the average of
Germany, France and the UK in 1985 but had risen to 74 per cent in 1990.
Those in Portugal, by comparison, changed from 21 per cent to just 22 per
cent against the same average over the period.
The buoyancy of the internal market has stopped short in its tracks. The
growth of domestic consumption which grew at close to 6 per cent in the late
1980s was halved with the onset of the 1990s. Spain with a forecast GDP of
0.7 per cent next year is living in a pre-recessionary environment.
The currency turmoil that overtook Europe in September has meanwhile made a
strong impact on Spain and may leave scars that will take time to heal. A
devaluation, followed by the temporary introduction of exchange controls and
continued pressure on the peseta, created an alarming picture for
multinational finance directors.
Yet, however much the furniture may have been rearranged, Spain remains an
important location for multinational business as, indeed, it could not fail
to be after the massive inflow of investments in the past years.
The likelihood is that the foreigners will continue coming. Long-terms
players looking at Spain in the context of a global recovery take into
account the following features:
The domestic political stability under the leadership of prime minister
Felipe Gonzalez together with the determination by the government to correct
spending overshoots and restore budgetary imbalances.
The large public investment in infrastructure, much of it linked to the
Barcelona Olympic games and to Seville's Ezpo '92 world fair, and the
existence of generous subsidies across huge swathes of Spain that are
classified as underdeveloped in EC terms.
The onset of wage moderation, decreasing union militancy and greater
flexibility in the labour market.
Foreign players who have seen the domestic market grow so strongly in the
very recent past also know that whole sectors of Spanish business remain
fragmented and offer interesting investment opportunities. Much of Spanish
business, moreover, is at rock bottom prices.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12278</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of Management Consultants (7): Management sees the
benefits - Recession finds more and more companies farming out their
'non-core' activities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE OF the effects of the recession has been to focus management attention
more closely on corporate strategy. As a result many companies have decided
to concentrate on their 'core competencies' and turn other activities over
to external specialist contractors.
The concept of facilities management (FM) or contracting out non-core
activities, is not new. Services such as catering, cleaning, transport and
security have long been managed externally. One recent estimate put the size
of the existing UK market alone at Pounds 4bn a year, dominated by giant
business services companies such as BET.
But in the past few years many large companies and public sector
organisations have begun to take a more radical approach, handing over or
'out-sourcing' higher level headquarters functions such as accounting,
telecommunications and corporate computer networks to outside contractors to
run and manage.
Some draw a distinction between FM and out-sourcing, arguing that the
old-fashioned FM function is at the commodity-end of the business with
simple and well-defined tasks and the choice of contractor based solely on
price.
In contrast, they argue, out-sourcing has emerged during the past five years
and involves contracts based less on price than on a range of more
intangible benefits, with a strong relationship between the client and
contractor.
But whatever the definitions, use of FM and out-sourcing, particularly for
IT functions, is growing rapidly. According to a recent survey of the FM
market in the UK conducted by Computer Management Group (CMG), the
privately-held consultancy, software and computer services group, a quarter
of respondents were using third party FM services. Of the respondents who
were using FM, 60 per cent were using hardware operations and application
system maintenance services.
Sometimes FM users also transfer assets and staff to the service company
which then manages the operation for a fee and operates much like a business
partner.
US corporations pioneered the use of FM in the information technology (IT)
field, using software and computer services companies such as Electronic
Data Systems (EDS), now part of General Motors, and Computer Sciences
Corporation (CSM).
Mr Paul Hopkins, sales and marketing director for Sema Group's facilities
management operations in the UK, reckons the British market is 'about four
or five years behind the US', but says use of facilities management or
out-sourcing in Europe is now growing rapidly, particularly in markets such
as Germany, Spain and Italy.
Frost &amp; Sullivan, the market research group, estimates that the total
European FM market is worth about Dollars 3.6bn and will be worth more than
Dollars 8bn by the mid-1990s.
In spite of the growth on the continent, the UK is still by far the largest
European market accounting for more than a third of the total. However, the
UK is by no means a saturated market with penetration only a quarter of that
in the US.
There are several reasons for the rapid recent growth in the FM and
out-sourcing market. Most of the leading suppliers of IT out-sourcing argue
that its growth stems primarily from companies deciding how they want to run
their businesses, what resources they need in house and where they can gain
from complementing their business with skills and services brought in from
outside.
Thus the CMG survey confirms that, for most FM users, the motivating issue
is the ability to concentrate on core business but, as Sema's Mr Hopkins
notes, there are many other benefits claimed for FM.
These include cost savings and better value for money because FM specialists
can bring economies of scale to bear on IT operations while providing
customers with greater control over budgets and performance. Other
attractions are less tangible, such as the expertise that a specialist
contractor can bring to an operation, and the ability to release management
time for more important issues.
FM can also be useful for organisations undertaking significant change, for
example those reorganising their IT operations or moving from proprietary
systems to open systems. Sema describes these 'bridging services' as one of
four broad types of FM, the others being on-site management, where the FM
company takes over the entire computer operation in situ and runs it,
transferred facilities where the entire computer operation is transferred to
the FM company's data centre, and first-time users who employ the FM company
to set up a computer operations.
Predictably, the rapid growth in demand for FM and out-sourcing services has
led to a proliferation of suppliers, ranging from the software and computer
service companies, such as EDS and CSC of the US, the Anglo-French Sema
Group and Cap Gemini Sogeti (CGS) of France, to the consulting arms of the
big accounting firms such as Andersen Consulting and specialist
consultancies such as CMG.
In addition, companies, such as the Capita group and ICL's 75 per cent-owned
CFM subsidiary, have developed strong positions in the fast growing public
sector market for FM while other companies such as Cadbury-Schweppes and
Barclays Bank have set their internal IT operations up as semi-autonomous FM
suppliers.
Fierce competition and a rapidly changing marketplace have also encouraged
hardware vendors such as IBM and DEC to enter the market for FM. Indeed Mr
John Rogers, director of Dataquest's European Systems, Software and
Service's group, predicted in a recent report on the European FM market that
'within five years, FM revenue will exceed mainframe revenue in the UK. The
inclination to buy-in as opposed to do in-house will be unstoppable'.
The Dataquest report suggested that the use of FM is probably the most
important change taking place in the computer industry and that the main
customers for mainframe machines in the future will be the FM suppliers
themselves. The report also predicts that entry into the FM market by
systems vendors will have a great effect on prices for FM in Europe.
Indeed, as the UK market for FM matures there is already evidence of tighter
margins for FM suppliers. In the UK, over 100 members in the Computer
Services Association would claim to be FM suppliers. Some consolidation has
already taken place, but Sema's Mr Hopkins believes this will accelerate in
next four or five years and lead eventually to perhaps as few as seven or
eight leading FM suppliers emerging.
Other changes evident in the maturing UK market include the trend towards
longer term and more variable contracts. Instead of fixed price contracts
customers are insisting on contracts which vary according to IT demand. But
perhaps most significantly Sema's Mr Hopkins says: 'People are also
beginning to see out-sourcing as a partnership arrangement and FM suppliers
are getting closer to their customers.' As a result he says more contracts
are based upon 'open book policy' with agreed mark-ups and an element of
risk sharing.
Mr Ranald Bain of EDS-Scicon, EDS' UK subsidiary, also sees demand for FM
and out-sourcing evolving rapidly in the UK. He says those in charge of
business operations will concentrate on building alliances and partnerships,
whether internal or external, which bring specific skills and solutions to
support their plans.
'They will become less tolerant of generalists and more demanding of
meaningful delivery commitments,' he says. 'This is already moving FM beyond
IT-centred deals to relationships with third party suppliers to provide and
support specific processes.'
One example of the new style 'process management out-sourcing' contract
comes from Andersen Consulting' Process Management unit, which earlier this
year signed an initial five-year Dollars 89m contract with BP to run all the
financial and accounting services - including the related IT function - for
BP's North Sea oil joint venture operations. As part of the deal, 250 BP
staff have been transferred to Andersen Consulting which has consolidated
the operation from five BP sites to one in Aberdeen.
Mr David Andrews, a partner with Andersen Consulting, says the market in
Europe is 'exploding with opportunity' for process management as European
companies seek to introduce rapid change. He argues that a new out-sourcing
model is being developed in Europe - a vertical cut of business process
rather than the horizontal cut of IT.
FM and out-sourcing also have applications outside industry and commercial
business.
In the US, the Federal Aviation Administration recently awarded EDS a
five-year Dollars 508m computer operations contract - believed to be one of
the largest US government out-sourcing agreements.
In the UK, public sector organisations such as local authorities and
government departments are also turning to FM. For example, Berkshire County
Council has contracted out its printing to Kodak facilities management and
cut costs by about 15 per cent. In the IT field many district and county
councils have already contracted out their computer operations.
But the biggest public sector FM contracts are likely to come from the
introduction of 'market testing' in central government which could lead to
the award of huge FM contracts. The Inland revenue is talking to most of the
leading FM suppliers about a seven-year Pounds 300m contract to run its
computer operations from September next year.
Britain's government departments spend about Pounds 2bn a year on IT and
employ between 20,000 to 22,000 IT staff, giving some indication of the
possible scale of future central government out-sourcing contracts in the IT
field alone.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12279</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of Management Consultants (8): Job hunters line up -
Executive search is becoming more difficult
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE past two years have been tough for the executive search industry
particularly those operating in the recession-hit US and UK markets.
According to Mr Ed Kelly, chief executive of Korn/Ferry International's
London office, 1991 was 'like a cold shower for the head hunting business',
and there has been little improvement since then.
Across the US and the UK, two of the most developed markets for executive
search, companies have been laying off middle and senior managers, sometimes
by the thousands, in an effort to cut costs and improve competitiveness.
'Historically, recessions have not affected middle management, but for the
first time an enormous number of middle and and even some top managers have
been put out of work,' says Mr Chuck Sweet, President of Chicago-based A T
Kearney Executive Search.
Many employment consultants both sides of the Atlantic believe this marks
more than a cyclical 'cull'. In many cases companies, including those in the
service sector, appear to have decided to remove whole layers of management.
If this is indeed the case, there are many implications, not just for the
executive search firms, but for educationists, management training
organisations and others. However, the most immediate effect has been on the
volume of out-of-work executives seeking new positions. Almost all the large
executive search firms report a surge in 'fan mail' - write-in applications
from job hunters.
Unfortunately the headhunters also confirm that employers' 'prejudice'
against unemployed job candidates has, if anything, hardened. As a result
they report that the quality of unemployed managers has improved
dramatically. Nevertheless the executive search firms say they still cannot
risk providing a client with a panel of candidates, all of whom are
unemployed.
The recessionary climate has also forced other marked changes in the
business. In good times clients use headhunters to find candidates for what
Mr Gary Gibbons, a director in A T Kearney's London office calls 'positive
reasons' - perhaps an expansion programme or a new marketing initiative.
But in recessions most clients are looking at their cost base, and sometimes
that means they are looking for a 'stronger' candidate to replace an
existing executive who is 'not up to snuff'.
As Mr Paul Buchanan-Barrow, managing partner of Korn/Ferry says, 'any
competent executive can make money for his company in a rising market.
Recession needs and has bred a different type of manager'.
He adds: 'Companies are looking for individuals who can help turn the
fortunes of a company around in the midst of an economic downturn.
Candidates with a track record of this nature are much in demand.'
But for search firms, finding this ideal candidate has probably never been
more difficult. Not only will they often have to keep the client's name
secret, but a far higher proportion of those they approach who are still in
employment will weigh the risks of switching jobs and decide against a move.
'Those who are in work are much more circumspect and cautious about moving,'
says Mr Buchanan-Barrow. 'They take a lot of persuading and are less
confident in the health of the job market as a whole.'
Ironically the downturn in the UK executive search market appears to have
come just as the headhunters were winning wider acknowledgement of their
skills. Most large UK organisations have now used executive search firms to
help fill senior or specialist positions.
In its year end report Korn/Ferry said 70 per cent of human resource
directors in leading UK enterprises said they had used search firms for
senior management appointments. However, usage in the past two years was
down by 40 per cent, and only 7 per cent of respondents said they planned to
make more use of search.
Employers who have replaced headhunting with internal promotion and job
advertising to cut their recruitment costs said they were well satisfied
with the results and had no immediate plans to return to the headhunters. As
a result Korn/Ferry concluded that 'UK search firms will be fighting for a
small share of a smaller cake and some will not survive'.
According to Mr Stephen Fletcher, head of KPMG Executive Selection and
Search, the executive recruitment market is now at its lowest point since
1959. He says the search market has reduced, but not at the same rate as the
drop in advertised vacancies, mainly as a result of good quality candidates
writing directly to prospective employers.
He adds that there is growing evidence of search firms trading down market
and taking on projects at salaries 'well below Pounds 60,000', and predicts
that competitors' aggressive market tactics will continue and that price
discounting will become more widespread while pressure on costs remain.
Not surprisingly with the UK search market in the doldrums many of the big
US/UK search firms have looked increasingly overseas for their growth. Most,
such as Mr Fletcher of KPMG, expect demand for UK executives from overseas
clients to increase significantly.
Indeed, the executive search business is increasingly international and
firms without a network of European offices are at a serious disadvantage.
So most headhunters, including market leaders in London, such as Russell
Reynolds, have been rushing to open offices abroad, or at least to establish
links with firms in other countries.
As companies have built up transnational operations, cross-border searches
have also grown and continue to grow in spite of the recession. What is more
clients will often pay up to a 20 per cent premium for a cross-border
search.
A T Kearney is one of the firms that has been actively building up a string
of European offices. Mr Gibbons says the majority of the work in the London
office this year 'has had at least one international element to the job'.
In one case that meant finding a managing director for an overseas client
setting up a UK subsidiary, and in another case finding an English-speaking
candidate to work in Denmark as the European marketing director for a
Denver-based high technology medical company. (In the last case the
successful candidate was actually living in Switzerland.)
The changes in eastern Europe have also highlighted the growing
international dimension to executive search. A T Kearney's Mr Gibbons says
that with a growing number of western companies now beginning to set up
operations in eastern Europe, many of them are looking for east European
emigres, preferably with some experience of western management, to return to
their native countries.
Most of the big firms have found other ways to bolster flagging search fee
income. For example, many have branched out to provide 'selection services',
where advertisements are used to draw up shortlists. Among those firms which
now have selection groups are Whitehead Mann which has Whitehead Selection,
Korn/Ferry with K/F Associates and GKR which has St James Associates.
In addition Korn/Ferry owns Strategic Compensation Associates, a consultancy
which specialises in advice on executive pay, while several other firms
including GKR, offer clients a management 'audit', an assessment of the
strengths and weaknesses of an existing management team - in competition
with mainstream management consultancies.
Providing interim management is another diversification which has helped
some search firms weather the recession. High level Interim managers are
often hired by companies undergoing a change or a crisis, and it is a
growing business. Often they are employed for a matter of months, perhaps
until permanent staff are found, or until a particular problem is resolved.
Several of the leading search firms have established specialist interim
management arms including Egon Zehnder, which is a joint venture partner in
Executive Interim Management (EIM), Heidrick Struggles with Protem, and
Spencer Stuart with Stream Resources.
A review of the market for interim managers conducted by EIM earlier this
year revealed a 25 per cent increase in the number of interim manager
assignments carried out across Europe between 1990 and 1991 and forecast a
similar rise this year.
Experienced chief executives and finance directors are particularly in
demand, especially in the manufacturing and commercial sectors.
Mr Derek Mortimer, managing partner of Triple A, a UK-based interim
management specialist, says that in spite of interim management's high added
value, there is little doubt that the sector is more buoyant in an expanding
market. 'Nevertheless there have been a number of potentially powerful new
entrants this year, more than replacing departures.'
He says the demand for interim managers usually stems from a sense of
urgency. 'The urgency is in getting from point A to point B more speedily
and efficiently than internal resources will allow. At present, companies
are experiencing indecision and a lack of confidence brought about by
uncertainty - a type of introspection which creates its own vicious circle.
'While understandable, for survival's sake the circle needs to be broken and
positive movement forward made. This is exactly the situation where the
extra momentum and objectivity of the interim manager can be used to kick
start and deliver the required result in record time.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12280</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of Management Consultants (3): Faith in the religion
of quality is starting to waver - Despite its successes, not everyone is
convinced by TQM theory
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Management theories come and go. But since the early 1980s one of the most
enduring in the industrialised west has been the search for Total Quality.
In fact the origins of the Total Quality Management (TQM) movement date back
almost four decades. The founding fathers of modern TQM theory include the
three Americans, W Edwards Deming, Joseph Juran and Armand Feigenbaum, who
in the early 1950s introduced Japanese managers to the principles of quality
control and are thus widely credited with helping to create Japan's post-war
industrial powerhouse.
But is was not until the early 1980s that pioneer companies in the west,
such as Xerox, which had watched the Japanese steal a large chunk of a
copier market it had invented, began to wake up to quality theory.
Xerox responded first by undertaking a series of 'benchmarking' studies to
determine the scope and specifics of the competitive challenge. As a result
Xerox in the US and Rank Xerox in Europe launched a comprehensive quality
strategy, dubbed 'Leadership Through Quality' in 1983.
Since then Xerox has managed to reverse the decline in its market share and,
in the process, has won numerous quality prizes including the coveted
Baldrige award in the US in 1989. Like many of its Japanese counterparts,
Xerox sees its quality programme as just 'a way of doing business', but one
that is entirely focused on providing customer satisfaction.
Other companies such as Motorola, the US electronics group, claim that they
have saved millions by adopting quality programmes in their manufacturing
operations.
Ms Sharon Studer, a partner at KPMG, the international management
consultancy, describes quality as 'the ticket to play' for western
companies. The Japanese, she argues, established quality as an entry point
to whole industries. 'If one is going to be a world competitor you benchmark
against the best, and that is often the Japanese.'
Among the basic tenets of all quality programmes are some fairly
straight-forward concepts. These include recognising that it is important to
get things right first time, and that almost any thing or process can be
measured or benchmarked.
Perhaps most important of all is the realisation that the driving force
behind any process, whether manufacturing or service, must be to provide the
customer with what the customer wants.
Quality, and TQM in particular, has become a big business in its own right.
Around three-quarters of all US and British companies claim to have some
form of quality programme and converts to the total quality movement
sometimes treat it almost like a religion.
Increasingly, large companies and other organisations which have applied for
and achieved certification under one of the national or international
quality standards expect their suppliers and contractors to have also
achieved quality certification.
Meanwhile hundreds of books have been written on the subject of quality, and
companies often pay thousands of pounds to send their executives to seminars
where management consultants and corporate disciples sing TQM's praises.
Some specialist management consultancies, such as Philip Crosby Associates
in Florida, have even built up a worldwide business dealing specifically
with quality management issues. Since it was formed in 1979 PCA, which has
offices in 23 locations in 14 countries, says it has trained more than 1m
people in various facets of quality management.
But not everyone is convinced. Although some marked successes are claimed
for TQM there is evidence that the quality programmes of many companies are
failing. Among the staunchest critics are some of the management firms which
have helped fuel the TQM bandwagon.
Some research in the past year has cast doubt on TQM as a panacea for all
competitive ills. A survey by Arthur D Little of 500 US manufacturing and
service companies, found that only a third felt their TQM programmes were
having a 'significant impact' on their competitiveness.
A similar study undertaken by AT Kearney of over 100 British companies
suggested that 80 per cent of quality programmes fail to produce any
tangible benefit. However, the study also suggested that most quality
programmes failed because the management had not set realistic goals or
defined measurable benefits at the outset.
The AT Kearney study suggested that successful TQM programmes typically have
a greater focus on the customer and aim to give employees more authority to
make decisions. It suggested that companies which have successfully
introduced TQM are twice as likely to have made an objective study of their
competitors through 'benchmarking'. It also revealed that, where TQM has
failed to generate tangible results, the quality manager, rather than a
director, was often responsible for the programme.
Companies which practise TQM successfully appear to share four common
characteristics: An emphasis on tangible results; insistence on performance
measurement; an integrated programme; and a clear commitment from top
management. In addition they ensure that they 'retain ownership of the
programme' instead of relying on outside consultants.
But often it seems the real problem for western companies is that the TQM
programme becomes a bureaucratic end in itself, rather than a means to the
end, namely serving the customer. And executives, and shareholders, often
expect quick results rather than acknowledging that quality programmes take
time to develop - and that they never really finish.
One often-quoted example of a quality programme that went wrong is that of
Florida Power Light (FPL). During the 1980s the utility built up a huge
quality programme in an effort to become the first non-Japanese winner of
the Deming prize for quality. In 1989 it won the prize but the improvement
in customer service was insignificant compared to the effort and cost
involved in its quality programme. Since then a new management team has
down-scaled the quality programme and made it much less rigid.
Even the four-year-old Baldrige award has managed to generate controversy.
Some supporters such as Mr Robert Galvin, Motorola's chairman have called it
'the most important catalyst for transforming American business' methods.
But its critics have suggested that it is seriously flawed on a number of
counts, complaining variously about its methodology, focus and philosophy.
The debate which raged in the US earlier this year, mostly on the pages of
the Harvard Business Review, may even find an echo in Europe, where the
Dutch-based European Foundation for Quality Management handed out its first
award for TQM earlier this month.
The guiding principle behind the EFQM award is that it is not sufficient for
western European companies to survive, they must prosper, and in order to
prosper they must be competitive. They must be seen as offering 'quality'
goods and services that customers find attractive and good value for money.
Its promoters argue that, 'companies attaining total quality excellence will
have that all-important competitive advantage and will play a vital role in
Europe's future and success.' Like their US counterparts they believe that
TQM holds the key to competing with the Japanese and that 'through TQM
western Europe will become a leading force in the world market."
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12281</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of Management Consultants (2): Life still tough for
the IT consultant - Growth is slow in the industry's richest sector
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER CARTY, Accountancy Magazines
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INFORMATION technology (IT) consultants are 'finding life a little
difficult,' says Mr Patrick Whale, president of the Computing Services
Association and senior IT consultancy partner at KPMG. Rapid growth in IT
consultancy has slowed and the fight for market share is fierce.
A survey conducted by industry magazine Management Consultancy shows the
average growth projection by IT consultancies for this year is 6.8 per cent
 -a big drop from the halcyon days of the 1980s when it was often above 30
per cent - and even this figure may prove over optimistic. With the
exception of the continuing success story of Andersen Consulting, the market
leader, business is tough.
IT is management consultancy's richest sector, but establishing the size of
the market is not easy. Boundaries are blurred between IT consultancy and
other areas of management consultancy, and between consultancy and other
computer services. And as well as big consultancies, myriad small operators
need to be tracked.
Calculations based on figures supplied by the Computing Services Association
would give a market size at the end of last year of around Pounds 400m, down
from Pounds 460m in 1990. However, corresponding estimates based on figures
from the Management Consultancies Association give an increase from Pounds
485m in 1990 to Pounds 520m last year.
More significant than market size is the slackening off of business in
certain areas. According to Mr Whale, the IT strategy consulting market is
far from booming. 'There aren't the number of large contracts in that arena
that there were.'
The picture is not much better in generalist IT consulting. Work is still
being undertaken, but the number of big turnkey consultancy projects has
declined, says Mr Whale, although he says work from the public sector is
bolstering the marketplace. Health is one public sector area he sees as
offering promise, although competition in this sector is fierce, he adds.
Large scale job losses in IT consultancy have slowed. Staff are still
trickling away, but are also being recruited in dribbles. Andersen
Consulting is the notable exception. This year it is taking on 250 graduates
and 50 to 100 professional staff, most of them in IT or IT-related
consultancy.
'Last year was a disaster,' says Mr Christopher Sale of recruiters Michael
Page Technology. 'This year things are distinctly more buoyant. I'd put more
emphasis on recruiting in the current market than I would on losing people.'
Systems and software houses continue to restructure their consultancy
activities. In spite of the fact that Logica abandoned a separate
consultancy arm over two years ago - although consultancy still represents
20 per cent of turnover - this year Hoskyns has redeployed its consultants
into a new division and Sema Group has also launched an independent
consultancy.
Meanwhile SD-Scicon, now known as EDS-Scicon, has been radically
restructured by its acquirer, Electronic Data Systems.
'I don't think that the systems houses in these times have been able to
sustain the image that they held of also being consultants,' says KPMG's Mr
Whale. He says the systems houses have been unable to match the development
of the big accounting firms' IT consultancy divisions as 'one stop shops'
offering a complete solution from strategy to design and implementation with
subsequent support.
Corporates continue setting up their IT departments as consultancies selling
expertise to other businesses. Recent entrants include Lucas Industries, the
Post Office and British Rail.
At present these operators do not constitute a big presence in the market.
More of a force for established IT consultancies to reckon with are the
hardware manufacturers. Among others, IBM, Digital, Bull and Unisys are
beefing up their efforts in the services sector.
IBM has substantial numbers of consultants in action. In the past two years
the number of staff deployed in its services division has grown from around
400 to 2,000. Mr John Clyde, IBM's manager for IT strategy consulting,
estimates that, on a broad definition, about two-thirds of these are IT
consultants.
He bullishly says competitors 'have reason to be nervous as we're growing
faster than the industry. That means we're gaining share and that has to
come from somewhere'. According to Mr Clyde, revenue growth is 'dramatic',
although he declines to give actual figures.
The standard criticism from the rest of the industry of hardware
manufacturers' consultants is lack of independence - they recommend their
own hardware first.
Mr Clyde's response is threefold. He estimates that around 20 per cent of
fee income comes from projects that do not involve IBM products. The fact
that the remaining bulk of his clients use IBM hardware he sees as hardly
surprising, since most large corporates buy some of IBM's products.
Finally, he says important consultancy areas, such as strategy, are
independent of products. 'It's only really at the bottom level, which is
help with implementation, that you're down to the specifics of products,' he
explains.
Many IT consultants have left the larger firms and set up small niche
consultancies. What is life like for the smaller IT consultancy in the midst
of recession?
Mr Bob Cossey is a consultant at Parkwell Management Consultants, whose
particular niche is the selection and implementation of accounting systems.
Parkwell has six staff, down from nine at the beginning of the recession,
and Mr Cossey says that business is better than last year.
In Mr Cossey's view, Parkwell can offer the same service as a big
consultancy at a lower cost, since it doesn't carry the same level of
overheads.
Mr Cossey has noticed significant fall-out: 'Surprisingly, a lot of the
small consultancies set up by staff from the big consultancies have gone out
of business. It's difficult to see why, because in theory they can control
their costs much quicker.'
This is leading to atomisation of consultancies. 'They don't actually go out
of business because the individuals start as independent consultants,' he
says.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
TOP 20 FIRMS SUPPLYING MANAGEMENT CONSULTANCY SERVICES 1991
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
      Firm                 European     Professionals/
                            Revenue      Consultants
                           Dollars M        No.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
1     Andersen Consulting     908          7,750
2     KPMG                    420          2,800
3     Coopers &amp; Lybrand       400          2,800
4     McKinsey &amp; Co           336          1,110
5     PA Consulting Group     267          1,450
6     Price Waterhouse        260          2,297
7     Cap Gemini Sogeti       232          1,740
8     Ernst &amp; Young           227          1,300
9     Alexander Proudfoot     175            600
10    DRT                     150          1,070
11    Gemini Consulting       150            450
12    Bossard Consultants     126            800
13    Boston Consulting Group 120            400
14    P-E International       119            465
15    IBM                     117          1,000
16    Digital Equipment       115          1,000
17    Roland Berger           113            375
18    Towers Perrin           105            600
19    Hay Group                96            411
20    CMG                      93            650
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Alpha Publications
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12282</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of Management Consultants (1): Focus has to sharpen -
Consulting remains big business, but the recession has caused firms to
rethink strategies and expand their range of services and specialisms. In
the face of intensified competition, profitability has been hit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AFTER the boom of the 1980s and the collapse of the early 1990s, management
consultants are beginning to change gear in order to cope with the difficult
challenges which they face during the next few years.
They have witnessed and participated in powerful shifts in the nature of the
services provided, the relationship of consultants with clients and savage
competition with their rivals. Meanwhile, their reputation as professionals
remains hazy.
'Consulting is a tough industry,' says Mr John Moynihan, chief executive of
PA Consulting. 'It wasn't 20 years ago, but now the industry is saturated.
I'm sure there will be casualties.'
The tone of the quarterly survey from the Management Consultancy
Association, the leading UK trade association, has certainly changed
markedly in the past few months. In April, it heralded some signs of the
start of an economic upturn after 15 months of flat business.
In July, it said that the upturn was still awaited, with some signs that
consultants would be hiring more staff within six months.
By early October, it warned that its members saw 'little scope for
optimism', with a continued reduction in general business consultancy,
offset by a slightly larger increase in the amount of information technology
work.
Consulting remains big business. It continues to live on an enormous
expansion that has taken place over the past decade.
A survey produced earlier this year by Alpha Publications showed that the
top 30 firms alone billed Dollars 5.5bn in western Europe during 1991.
The UK market has been hit by the recession and is also highly mature.
Prospects are a little more promising overseas and many consultancies have
sustained their income with work from across Europe, particularly from
business in the former Communist bloc.
However, while nominal growth in many regions is now static, profitability
is still less certain. Getting at the truth is not easy.
Secrecy is nowhere more pervasive than at McKinsey &amp; Co, which refuses to
say anything about itself, but is ranked in the survey as fourth largest
consultant in western Europe with more than 1,100 consultants and fee income
of Dollars 336m last year.
Most other firms echo that philosophy almost as strongly. They are as
subdued about their own financial position as they are vocal about their
ability to improve that of their customers.
To this end, they are able to take advantage of their private corporate or
partnership status in order to reveal as little as possible about profits or
losses to clients and competitors.
One of the few large players which does present more detailed internal
information - by virtue of its public listing in London - is P-E
International, the management and computer consultancy.
Last month the company reported half-year pre-tax profits down 72 per cent
to Pounds 514,000 on a turnover of Pounds 35.5m and halved its interim
dividend to 1p.
Redundancies have also been on the rise. Last November, Price Waterhouse
dispensed with 150 of its 1,000 staff in the management consultancy services
division as part of a wider restructuring which raised questions over its
future.
Other firms have been shedding staff in small, less noticeable groups.
In an effort to survive, firms have extended enormously the range of
services and specialist areas on offer. 'Change management', 'empowerment',
'quality' and 'the environment' are among the words tripping off management
consultancy tongues at present, in keeping with the latest management
theories.
Firms have also started to talk more about the growing degree of focus
needed to pinpoint target industries or specialist areas which they believe
are profitable or growing rapidly, such as the public sector and health
care.
One of the more intriguing developments has been the recent emergence of
'out-sourcing'. Proponents - such as Andersen Consulting which has recently
won lucrative contracts with BP and the Stock Exchange - flag it as a
radical way to improve the efficiency of what were previously regarded as
core headquarters functions.
Critics label it a repackaging of facilities management which they consider
to be low-grade, low-margin work.
Whatever the truth, out-sourcing is providing a rapid growth area and one
which a number of competitors have tried to emulate.
However, it also raises profound questions over the management of
consultancy firms, shifting them from their traditional role as external
professionals into a wider position as providers of permanent services.
All the firms are questioning their existing recruitment policies as they
look for consultants with a broader range of skills and a greater ability to
work with more discriminating clients.
At the same time, there has been an explosion in the number and range of
consultants in the marketplace. The giants of consulting continue to spawn
spin-off boutiques with niche specialisms.
Even more significantly, in the past two years prolonged recession has
turfed many senior executives unexpectedly out of their jobs and large
numbers of them have turned to consultancy in order to make ends meet.
These two types of consultant pose severe problems for their larger
brethren. Their cost base is lower and they are often willing to work for a
much lower level of profitability. Their specialist skills may well also
give them the edge on particular contracts.
On the other hand, their expertise is limited, they cannot compete
internationally and the range of skills they offer is far more restricted
than that which is available in the larger firms. The quality of service
they deliver may also be open to question.
That raises a final point: the reputation of consultants. A survey of
company directors in Scotland earlier this year suggested that management
consultants were rated lowest of any profession for their contribution to
business success, ability to understand the company's requirements and value
for money.
Figures such as these fuel the arguments of Mr Adrian Williams, president of
the Institute of Management Consultants which has nearly 4,000 out of an
estimated 18,000 consultants in the UK as members.
Consultants have to pass an interview to gain entrance and members can be
disciplined and dismissed. But while the Institute received 10 complaints
last year about the conduct of consultants, eight of these could not be
pursued because they referred to individuals who were not members of the
institute.
Some executives in the larger firms shake their heads sadly at the mention
of greater involvement in professional associations. They see them as a
threat to their own competitive position, a waste of time or simply
something for the smaller consultants with whom they have little in common.
But Mr Williams is persistent. He is working on a code of ethics and
training modules which might be adopted by the firms.
'A body which is hard to get into and you can be chucked out of
distinguishes a profession from merely an occupation,' he says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12283</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Australian wheat harvest could
be up 30 per cent
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMILIA TAGAZA
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CANBERRA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TIMELY RAINFALL in Australia's main wheat growing regions will help increase
production to 13.8m tonnes for the current 1992-3 season, up 30 per cent on
last year. The 13.8m tonnes of harvest is from an area of 9.1m hectares
(22.5m acres).
The Australian Bureau of Agricultural and Resource Economics, the official
forecasting agency, said, however, that continuation of the cooler weather
conditions that prevailed in the spring could lead to a higher proportion of
low protein wheat being produced.
Abare said the forecast of the Queensland wheat crop had been increased to
650,000 tonnes from the September forecast of 550,000 tonnes. That would be
about 90 per cent higher than the drought affected crop of 1991-92.
Wheat production in New South Wales is forecast to be 2.9m tonnes, up 27 per
cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12284</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Setback for Dutch hopes on
organic fertiliser
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DUTCH LIVESTOCK farmers, facing calls for a forced reduction in their herds
to cut back on manure-based pollution, have heard this week that
manure-processing plants will probably not turn out to be the long-awaited
solution to their dung surplus problem.
But there was also good news for one of the most successful sectors in Dutch
agriculture: the dung 'mountain' may not prove to be as big as once feared.
In a provisional and confidential report, the country's applied science
research body TNO and Heidemij, a consultancy group, said the combined
capacity of the Netherlands' manure-processing plants will not exceed 1m
tonnes a year by the end of 1994, well below the government's target of 6m
tonnes a year.
At the same time, the draft report, which was prepared for the government
ahead of a definitive version due later this year, noted that processing
manure into pellets for export was expensive, suggesting that the operations
will be uneconomical. Until now, supporters of manure processing had said
that the factories for converting surplus manure into exportable fertiliser
would, at best, break even.
However, leaked extracts from the report also show that the manure surplus,
which is defined as the amount of extra dung which cannot safely be absorbed
by farmland, will be closer to 2m at end-1994 rather than the projected 6m.
Dutch farming organisations are pursuing a number of methods to reduce the
manure surplus by making it less harmful. Among these are special equipment
to inject manure into the soil rather than spreading it on top, reducing the
amount of ammonia taken up into the air. Also specially-designed animal
sheds that cut down on ammonia seepage are coming on to the market and Dutch
farmers are experimenting with the composition of animal feed so that fewer
undigested minerals and heavy metals remain in the manure.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12285</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Missing prices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
We apologise for the omission of some commodity prices in later editions of
yesterday's Financial Times. This was caused by technical problems on Monday
night.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12286</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Argentina to boost squid catch
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BARHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUENOS AIRES
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARGENTINA PLANS sharply to increase its catches in the South Atlantic of the
lucrative Illex squid, in direct competition with the Falkland Islands,
which rely heavily on the sale of fishing licences.
Mr Fernando Gutierrez, fisheries undersecretary, said yesterday that new
regulations would allow up to 40 foreign-owned, special squid fishing
vessels, known as jiggers, to operate in Argentine waters and catch up to
100,000 tonnes a year.
The decision is an important step towards liberalising Argentina's fishing
industry. By law, only locally-registered vessels may fish in its
territorial waters. However, the new regulations will allow foreign ships to
operate on a 'temporary charter' basis in association with Argentine
nationals. Argentina lacks jigger capacity of its own and hopes to increase
its share of Illex catches by attracting Asian-owned vessels to its waters.
Argentina expects to catch only 60,000 tonnes of squid this year, up from
40,000 tonnes in 1991. In comparison, the Falklands expects to catch about
160,000 tonnes of Illex this year, 8.6 per cent less than in 1991.
The Falklands introduced a successful licensing regime after the 1982
conflict with Argentina. Squid licences - sold largely to Japanese,
Taiwanese and South Korean companies - account for 75 per cent of the
Falklands' annual licence revenue of Pounds 24m.
Mr John Barton, the Falklands' director of fisheries, warned that
Argentina's decision would further depress already low Illex prices, and he
added that increased fishing effort by Argentina could damage Illex stocks.
The squid are very sensitive to environmental factors and over-fishing.
Falling prices and the risk to the resource have led the Falklands to
curtail fishing every year since 1989. Argentina, Britain and Falkland
officials will hold a new round of their biannual fishery talks in London
next month.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12287</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Malaysia urges rationalisation
of cocoa output
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUALA LUMPUR
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MALAYSIA HAS called on cocoa producing countries to rationalise output as
part of a collective effort to shore up world prices.
Mr Lim Keng Yaik, Malaysia's primary industries minister, speaking at
meeting of the Cocoa Producers Alliance in the Malaysian capital, said
measures must be taken to bring down world cocoa stocks, which at present
stand at 1.4m tonnes, equivalent to about seven months' consumption. 'Based
on Malaysia's experience in natural rubber and tin, and now in cocoa, it is
evident that we cannot rely on the consumers to support prices,' said Mr
Lim. 'We have to tighten our belts.'
Mr Lim said stocks should be brought down to around 600,000 tonnes.
The CPA groups 13 countries together accounting for more than 90 per cent of
world cocoa output. Weak demand and high stock levels have caused world
cocoa prices to drop from about Dollars 2,222 a tonne 10 years ago to less
than Dollars 1,000 a tonne now.
Mr Lim said that cocoa production in Malaysia, the world's fourth largest
producer, had been falling in recent years because of low prices. Mr Lim
said the present supply surplus problem could be solved if there was
goodwill and determination among all cocoa producers. Malaysian claims that
the Ivory Coast, Ghana and Nigeria had already voiced support for cutting
back on output could not be confirmed.
The CPA meeting here is a preliminary to further talks in Geneva next month
between cocoa producers and consumers on a new International Cocoa
Agreement.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12288</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Commodities Prices: Cotton and Jute
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
COTTON
Spot and shipment sales in Liverpool for the week ending 9 October 1992
ammounted to 360 tonnes in the previous week. Sales were moderate and
occured mainly in American growths.
JUTE
October/November: c and f Dundee; BTC USDollars 370, BWC USDollars 385, BTD
USDollars 335, BWD USDollars 345; c and f Antwerp BTC USDollars 345, BWC
USDollars 345, BTD USDollars 325, BWD USDollars 325.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12289</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Minor Metals Prices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Prices from Metal Bulletin (last week's in brackets).
ANTIMONY: European free market 99.6 per cent, Dollars per tonne, in
warehouse, 1,700-1,750 (1,650-1,720).
BISMUTH: European free market, min. 99.99 per cent, Dollars per lb, tonne
lots in warehouse, 2.30-2.50 (same).
CADMIUM: European free market, min. 99.5 per cent, Dollars per lb, in
warehouse, 0.65-0.75 (0.60-0.70).
COBALT: European free market, 99.5 per cent, Dollars per lb, in warehouse,
13.50-14.50 (14.50-15.50).
MERCURY: European free market, min. 99.99 per cent, Dollars per 76 lb flask,
in warehouse, 135-150 (same).
MOLYBDENUM: European free market, drummed molybdic oxide, Dollars per lb Mo,
in warehouse, 2.10-2.20 (same).
SELENIUM: European free market, min 99.5 per cent, Dollars per lb, in
warehouse, 4.80-5.50.
TUNGSTEN ORE: European free market, standard min. 65 per cent, Dollars per
tonne unit (10 kg) WO, cif, 48-57 (same).
VANADIUM: European free market, min. 98 per cent, Dollars a lb VO, cif,
1.80-2.00 (same).
URANIUM: Nuexco exchange value, Dollars per lb, UO, 8.75 (same).
 -------------------------------------
LME WAREHOUSE STOCKS
(As at Monday's close)
 -------------------------------------
tonnes
Aluminium  +4,975 to 1,394,700
Copper     +2,625 to   305,075
Lead       +3,825 to   181,775
Nickel       +978 to    53,706
Zinc          -75 to   376,425
Tin           -95 to    14,740
 -------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12290</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Sugar quota cut to cost
Caribbeans Dollars 15m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CANUTE JAMES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KINGSTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CARIBBEAN suppliers of sugar under quota to the US will earn about Dollars
15m less for deliveries in the current US financial year, following an 11
per cent global cut in US imports. Sugar industry officials in the region
say that the latest reduction in US imports will reduce the region's
cumulative quota for the year, which begins this month, to 276,341 tonnes.
Several beneficiaries of the Caribbean Basin Initiative, a US preferential
trade programme, and the Generalised System of Preferences, are allowed to
ship pre-determined quantities of sugar to the US duty-free.
The Caribbean exporters to the US are the Dominican Republic, Belize,
Jamaica, St Kitts-Nevis, Barbados, Trinidad and Tobago and Guyana.
It is the second consecutive cut for the Caribbean holders of US quotas
which were allowed to supply 471,710 in 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12291</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Commodities Prices: Market Report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BASE METALS rallied above the day's lows in late trading on the LME as a
flurry of technical buying and covering brought the recent slippage to a
temporary halt. But although some modest consumer interest is emerging, the
markets are unlikely to sustain much upward momentum. LME warehouse stocks
increased in all but tin and zinc, taking the overall total to a fresh
record of 2.326m tonnes. Three-month COPPER built on support below Dollars
2,250 a tonne, moving higher with New York. ALUMINIUM rose sharply as
technical considerations outweighed IPAI production data showing September's
daily average was 40,800 tonnes, the highest for a year, and 600 tonnes up
on August. London's January robusta COFFEE contract equalled the recent
six-month high of Dollars 868 a tonne before closing with gains fractionally
pared. Dealers said the late rally was led by technical gains in New York
which began when its nearby contract rose above 62.90 cents a lb.
Compiled from Reuters
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12292</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Peru tees off privatisation
with iron shot - Next week's sale will set the tone for mine sector
denationalisation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SALLY BOWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE MOST likely new owner of Peru's state iron monopoly after bid envelopes
are opened on 30 October is a multinational consortium headed by
Chilean-based Compania de Aceros del Pacifico (CAP) along with Japan's
Mitsubishi Corporation and a Mexican steel company owned by the Indian group
Ispat.
CAP, a public company quoted on the Santiago stock exchange, is 30 per cent
owned by the Swiss-based Stephan Schmidheiny group. Mitsubishi is a minority
shareholder.
Next week's Hierro Peru sale marks the kick-off for privatisation of Peru's
major mining concerns. The result will be seen as a barometer for coming
sell-offs.
The Chilean-Japanese-Mexican consortium has been put together by Mr
Pedro-Pablo Kuczynski, a former Peruvian mines minister and more recently a
senior manager and privatisation specialist at First Boston. He is now chief
executive officer at Nueva Management, the Miami-based subsidiary that will
tend Schmid- heiny's construction-related interests in Latin America.
According to Hierro Peru officials, half-a-dozen foreign consortia have
expressed serious interest in bidding for the ailing iron concern which this
year will produce some 2.6m tonnes of blast furnace pellets and sinter,
about a third of its theoretical operative capacity.
Sale conditions require bidders, who have all gone through a prior vetting
process, to come up with a cash minimum of Dollars 22m and commit themselves
to investing Dollars 60m in sorely-needed updating of mine, plant and
equipment. The eventual buyer must also assume undisclosed Hierro Peru
debts, said to be in the region of Dollars 30m.
In its present state, Hierro Peru does not appear a particularly desirable
prospect. The operation, operated by US interests under the name of Marcona
Mining Corporation from first shipment in 1953 until the 1975
nationalisation by General Juan Velasco's government, was once a flourishing
concern. In the early 1970s output peaked at almost 10m tonnes a year.
Since nationalisation, however, the installations have been allowed to
deteriorate and output has slumped. The mine is now all but idle with most
of its 2,000-strong workforce (reduced by 1,400 in the past year) on strike
in protest at lay-offs and, unions claim, non-payment by employers of
redundancy benefits.
Mr Emilio Zuniga, head of the small committee charged with selling Hierro
Peru off to the private sector, says the company chalked up a book loss of
Dollars 60m last year alone - almost the equivalent of this year's projected
Dollars 67m sales.
However, as with most of the country's badly decapitalised mining sector,
Hierro Peru's scrap heap appearance masks potentially rich pickings. The
Marcona mine has some 600m tonnes of proven reserves. 'Probable' reserves
take the total to around 1.5bn tonnes with average grades of 54 per cent
iron. Marcona iron pellets and sinter are internationally known and have
well-established markets in the Far East, Mexico and the US.
Much of Marcona's attraction lies in its favourable geographical location.
Some 265 miles (425 km) south of Lima, the mine is only eight miles from the
deep water, Pacific coast port of San Nicolas, which, with minor
improvements, is capable of handling 250,000-tonne cargo ships. No mine in
the world is closer to a port, Hierro Peru officials claim. The climate too
is favourable. Marcona's open pit mine can and does work 365 days a year.
Unlike the world's major iron deposits, Marcona ore is primarily magnetite
rather than hematite. The high sulphur content associated with magnetite
demands costly processing and plenty of fresh water - a scarce commodity in
Marcona's desert setting. Investment in drilling wells and installing pumps
to improve product quality is essential, say Hierro Peru officials, since
Marcona pellets currently carry hefty penalties on the international market.
Earlier this year, Hierro Peru signed two long-term contracts with Kobe
Steel of Japan and Imexsa of Mexico - the first for Dollars 90m over seven
years, the second for Dollars 70m over three years. Almost half of this
year's output will go to Korea, with 20 per cent to Japan and the remainder
to the US and Argentina.
It is not clear whether the CAP-Schmidheiny-Mitsubishi bid will include a
debt-swap element. Mr Kuczynski is a debt-paper specialist and Mitsubishi
has an undisclosed amount of Peruvian debt-paper pending from construction
of the northern oil pipeline.
In an interview with a Lima economic review, published yesterday, Mr
Kuczynski underlined CAP's eagerness to expand its international interests
in a field that it, along with its Mexican partners and Mitsubishi, knows
well. He admitted that the investment climate in Peru was still uncertain
but noted that 'assets are cheap, reflecting the very high risk that
exists.'
If, as a highly experienced former Marcona manager predicts, production can
swiftly be doubled with profits of 'at least 30 per cent of sales', Hierro
Peru begins to look an attractive option for the bolder investor.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12293</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of European Business Locations (8): Mickey Mouse sets
the pace - France
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THIS spring the chairman and chief executive of one of the biggest US
companies flew into Paris to cut the ceremonial ribbon on his company's
biggest investment project to date.
The project, which is probably also the single largest corporate investment
programme by a foreign company in France, includes suites of corporate
offices for the company's European headquarters, a railway station, a
telecommunications network capable of servicing two small towns, six hotels
with 5,200 rooms, a golf course, several dozen shops, a mock-medieval
castle, a couple of merry-go-rounds, a giant Runaway Mine Train
roller-coaster, a replica of the Swiss Family Robinson's tree house and a
Mad Hatter's Tea Cups waltzer ride.
The project is EuroDisneyland, the giant theme park built by Euro Disney, an
associate of Disney, the US leisure group, at Marne La Vallee on the
outskirts of Paris. EuroDisneyland is the product of years of painstaking
negotiation between Disney and the French government, which fought fiercely,
notably against stiff competition from Spain, to win this particular piece
of corporate investment.
For the French government, the benefits of Euro Disney are obvious. First
there are all the jobs that EuroDisneyland has created, not only its own
12,000 employees (two thirds of whom are French), but also the thousands of
construction workers hired to build the park and the employees of the
'satellite' companies set up in the Marne La Vallee area to service it.
There is also the advantage of EuroDisneyland's allure as a tourist
attraction. Paris was one of the few European capital cities not to have
experienced a fall in tourism this summer. One only has to glance around the
Paris Metro at tourists sporting plastic Mickey Mouse ears to realise that
EuroDisneyland was one of the main attractions.
Pierre Beregovoy, the prime minister, highlighted both benefits earlier this
month when he pinned the Legion d'Honneur, one of France's highest honours,
on Michael Eisner, chairman of Disney. 'Six months after (the park's)
opening, the results for both parties are eloquent,' he said. 'The expected
economic advantages are also there.'
Mr Eisner replied by praising France as 'a particularly hospitable land for
foreign investments'. But Disney has had a rocky ride in France, not least
when, only a few weeks before the opening, EuroDisneyland was lambasted in
the Figaro newspaper by a group of French intellectuals, one of whom called
it a 'cultural Chernobyl'. However idiosyncratic it may seem as a piece of
corporate investment, EuroDisneyland is an apt illustration of the
experience of other companies that have chosen France as a corporate
location.
EuroDisneyland's economic potential was so enormous that Disney was in the
enviable position of being able to take its pick of European locations. It
plumped for France, in spite of the damp climate of Marne La Vallee, for the
same reasons so many other foreign investors have done so; because of its
prime location in the heart of western Europe and its buoyant domestic
market.
The TGV rail network, which the French government has extended to take in
EuroDisneyland as part of its deal with Disney, is one of the fastest and
most efficient in Europe. France also has an ample motorway network and good
air and sea links with other countries.
France is one of Europe's largest economies, with a population of more than
56m and GDP of Dollars 958bn, according to the Organisation of Economic
Co-operation and Development. It has proved much more resilient to the
present economic slowdown than most of its European competitors, being on
course for growth of between 1.5 per cent and 2 per cent this year.
Conversely, the cost of operating in France is high. Property is expensive,
as are wages and employers' social security contributions. This is partly
offset by the low rate of inflation, which has hovered around 3 per cent
since the late 1980s thereby giving French companies, and foreign investors,
a stable financial base from which to operate.
But even low inflation can not compensate for the cost and complexity of
rationalising an operation in France. Once a company has set up in the
country, the process of closing plants or reducing its workforce is both
elaborate and expensive.
Another disadvantage is that, however welcoming the French government may be
to foreign investors, France is such a bureaucratic country that local rules
and regulations, particularly planning laws, can be cumbersome, as
EuroDisneyland has discovered.
The company behind France's most ambitious exercise in foreign corporate
location may, after all, have won the government's permission to press ahead
with the second phase of its theme park development, but it is still
haggling with local officials over how often and for how long it can run its
night-time firework spectaculars.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12294</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of European Business Locations (9): At the heart of
the wealth-belt - Germany
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WESTERN GERMAN business and industry invested more than DM140bn outside its
own borders during the 1980s, while foreigners moving into Germany spent a
mere DM30bn. At the start of the decade the ratio of fixed capital exports
to imports was 3:1 and the position had deteriorated to 6:1 by 1990.
Doomsayers among the industrial elite began warning once again that Standort
Deutschland was in danger.
They argued that potential investors, domestic as well as foreign, were
bypassing western Germany to avoid the highest wage costs in the European
Community, heavy corporate and personal taxes, rigid labour practices,
excessive holidays and environmental charges, and bloody-minded bureaucracy.
Possibly even more seriously, the same factors were now preventing the
recovery of the collapsed east German industry.
Such disincentives to investment were said to be outweighing the established
and recently enhanced advantages: a rich domestic market expanded by
unification to 80m people, political stability, a highly-skilled and
disciplined workforce.
Germany also provides a business base in the centre of the European
Community's wealth-belt ' 40 per cent of European Community consumers live
within a day's drive of Dusseldorf ' and next door to huge potential markets
to the east.
However, the complaints took no account of the fact that in some respects
the investment situation had actually improved. The volume of capital
invested in Germany by other European Community countries more than doubled
during the decade to DM46bn. Meanwhile, the proportion of new German foreign
investments made inside the Community had risen to more than two-thirds.
A large part of the increasing imbalances of recent times can therefore be
accounted for by strategic shifts spurred on by the impending opening of the
European single market and the determination of German industry, relatively
secure in its own markets, to maintain and improve its position
community-wide.
Even so, historical trends tend to support the complainants' fundamental
thesis that Germany's competitiveness is threatened by the factors in their
'hit-list', and the government has at last started to take them seriously.
A special study commissioned by the economics ministry earlier this year
complained that industry's charges were repetitive and often exaggerated.
However, it added, 'the warning signals should be taken seriously' because
they reflected the real fears of German business. At DM40 an hour, labour
costs in west German manufacturing are the highest in the world, and compare
with DM23 in Britain, DM27 in France next door, and DM29 in Japan. The
average working week is heading steadily downwards towards 35 hours. All
industrial workers are entitled to 30 days' paid holiday.
Bonn has duly undertaken to play its part: it has promised to cap state
spending to avoid over-burdening capital markets and avert the need to
increase taxes and social charges. Finance ministry plans to reform
corporate taxation have recently been approved by cabinet, and the first
steps have been taken towards privatising uncompetitive state monopolies
such as Deutsche Telekom and job centres. In addition, the government
proposes to offer compensatory relief to companies hit by Germany's
restrictive environmental policies.
It is now mainly up to employers and unions to find a way through the maze
of rigid pay and conditions deals which are widely acknowledged as the most
telling constraint on industry in the west, and which has emerged as a
severe threat to the attractions of eastern Germany to investors both
foreign and domestic.
Average pay levels in the former GDR are still around 50 per cent of those
in the west, but skilled manufacturing rates are much higher and scheduled
to match those in the west by 1994. Meanwhile, productivity in the east is
less than 40 per cent of the western level and although official
unemployment rates vary between 12 per cent and 14 per cent, around half the
former GDR workforce has no productive job.
Such distortions were probably inevitable as the east rushed to adjust after
40 years locked in the communists' economic dream world, but the process has
been eased by the equally rapid development of the GDR infrastructure. Paid
for by the transfer of DM150bn a year in government funds and heavy
industrial investment, large swathes of the east have already been
transformed in just two years. The cramped road network has been opened up,
rail links improved, telephone, gas and power lines replaced. However, many
old problems remain: potential investors are still hampered by unresolved
questions of ownership of land and buildings, some seized by the Nazis, the
rest by their communist inheritors. The environmental burdens in old
industrial centres blight investment prospects.
But as these obstacles are cleared away, and the new owners of some 7,000
Treuhand companies privatised in the past two years implement pledges to
invest at least DM150bn, new difficulties have emerged.
International recession, now creeping into western Germany, has dampened
industry's will and ability to invest in the five new federal states. The
emergence of extremist violence has depressed it even further.
The full-scale resumption of Bonn's 'Upswing East' project is likely to have
to wait until international economic and domestic social order are restored.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12295</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AF6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of European Business Locations (6): Geographically
handicapped - Ireland
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM COONE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LOCATED on the north-west edge of Europe, the island of Ireland suffers a
geographic disadvantage not shared by most other EC regions. To move
products to the main population centres of Europe requires one, and often
two, sea crossings. Bad weather can disrupt sailing schedules of the ferry
services, and for companies working on 'just-in-time' inventory control,
this can signify unexpected and possibly unacceptable delays in delivery
times.
Nonetheless, this has not prevented more than 1,000 foreign companies
establishing manufacturing bases to service the EC market in the Irish
Republic and scores more in Northern Ireland over the past 20 years. Leading
industrial names in diverse manufacturing sectors such as Coca-Cola, Apple
Computers, Motorola, Intel Corporation, Fruit-of-the-Loom, and Microsoft,
have all chosen to establish continental-scale production facilities in
Ireland.
The shopping list of grants and incentives on offer are those that can be
expected in most regions throughout Europe seeking to attract mobile inward
investment. Capital grants, training, R &amp; D and marketing grants, advance
factory facilities, and tax incentives are available in both parts of the
island, although these vary considerably from project to project. A standard
corporation tax rate of 10 per cent for manufacturing until the year 2010,
is an attraction for many companies to the Republic, as is the government's
commitment to a stable exchange rate policy and the country's earliest
possible inclusion in a single currency area within the EC.
Improvements in telecommunications on both sides of the border have
facilitated the development of service industries especially in
'back-office' data processing in the public and private sectors. Northern
Ireland now claims to have one of the most advanced fibre-optic
telecommunications networks anywhere in Europe, with all trunk routes
converted to the new technology. Practically any location in the province
can have special fibre-optic cable laid to the office or factory door at
reasonable cost, signifying that all present and planned technologies,
including High Definition TV (HDTV), Integrated Services Data Networks
(ISDN) and ultra-high speed data communications will be available through
the network.
Similar developments are taking place in the Republic, although the
fibre-optic network is not yet widespread.
On both sides of the border, schools and universities give a high priority
to training in information technology, resulting in well-trained workforces
with high levels of computer literacy. High-technology and high value-added
industries such as electronics and software development have thus been
attracted to Ireland, as have the 'back-office' service industries looking
for lower-cost locations and lower staff turnovers.
Many employers have found that staff loyalty is much greater in Ireland than
in large urban centres such as London or New York, and that emigration in
search of higher salaries is often not the preferred option for most
employees.
Indeed, the quality of life is widely considered to be an important location
factor for many companies conscious of staff morale. The clean environment
and easy access to the countryside and coastline, offers recreational
opportunities that are not easily matched in other parts of Europe.
The transport infrastructure still shows deficiencies in the Republic in
spite of large infusions of cash from Brussels over the past decade.
Transport planning has the appearance of being piecemeal and overly
influenced by powerful lobby groups at local and national level, leading to
the construction of little-used dual carriageways in locations such as
Shannon on the west coast, while main trunk routes still wind their way
through the high streets of market towns just a few miles outside the
capital.
A motorway ring route around Dublin is unlikely to be completed before the
end of the decade, while planners still appear unable to decide whether to
go ahead with building a light-rail transport system for the capital, in
spite of predictions of an exponential worsening of traffic congestion in
Dublin in the immediate years ahead.
Northern Ireland, in contrast, has a well-developed road and rail network,
and port facilities which are envied in the Republic to the extent that many
road hauliers in the south prefer to use Belfast and Larne rather than
Dublin, as their sea route to the UK mainland.
Northern Ireland, however, continues to suffer from its 'image problem', as
a result of the political violence which this year claimed its 3,000th
victim since 1969. Although only very few people and firms are directly
affected by the violence, the Industrial Development Board (IDB) recognises
it is an uphill task to convince foreign companies to risk their employees
or investments in the province.
Industrial policy is undergoing a thorough reappraisal on both sides of the
border. Economic efficiency is being increasingly stressed in the use of
grant-aid for industrial developments as opposed to simple job-creation
criteria.
The IDB in Northern Ireland spends some Pounds 80-Pounds 100m a year in
financial assistance to industry, but this year 'the rise in unemployment in
July alone exceeded the combined annual job promotions of the IDB and the
Ledu (a small-enterprise promotion body) in 1991-92', according to the
autumn economic review of the Northern Ireland Economic Council (Niec). The
Niec says that the 46 per cent fall in job promotions over the past year, is
largely due to the IDB's new efficiency criteria but notes that the
'implementation of the new strategy was causing a significant degree of
confusion both in local industry and within the development agencies
themselves as to how the 'backing winners' approach was being implemented'.
In the Republic, where IPounds 130m is spent per year in industrial
promotion, the government announced last month that in future it is to give
greater emphasis to the promotion of Irish indigenous industry. This follows
criticisms made in an industrial policy review published earlier this year,
that Ireland has become over-dependent on overseas-owned industrial
enterprises in developing its industrial base. 'The balance needs to be
redressed to achieve greater output and employment growth in the indigenous
sector. Existing policies and promotional arrangements have not succeeded in
doing this,' said Mr Des O'Malley, the industry and commerce minister.
This does not mean that new inward investment will not still be welcomed in
Ireland, but it will have to compete more closely with Irish industry for
grants and may be subject to tighter performance targets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12296</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AF5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of European Business Locations (5): Question mark
over popularity - United Kingdom
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL CASSELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE UK has consistently been attracting more overseas corporate investors
than any other country in the European Community. In world terms, only the
United States attracts more inward investment.
The question is whether it can maintain such an impressive achievement.
However hollow the British government's claims of an 'economic miracle'
might sound in the wake of the recent turmoil, large numbers of foreign
companies - from within and without the EC - have increasingly chosen the UK
as their first choice when deciding to open up overseas.
The reasons for Britain's popularity are diverse but many investors cite
lack of government interference, an open, free-market economy, low tax
rates, recent productivity improvements and a broad range of available
skills.
The alternative, less complimentary, view is that Britain is a relatively
cheap labour base from which business can mount its assault on the more
prosperous EC markets, free of the old trade union 'shackles' and many of
the obligations which bind employers in other countries.
Not that all employers are anxious to avoid establishing relationships with
trade unions. While it may be too early to assess the impact of Japanese
companies on UK industrial relations, many seem quite prepared to strike
recognition agreements with unions as British employers cast them out.
The Trades Union Congress is even studying Japanese labour relations in the
hope of finding common ground and establishing a beneficial, working
partnership.
Whatever the motivating factors for overseas companies, the UK's success in
wooing inward investment has been impressive. In the 12 months to the end of
March 1992, overseas companies gave the go-ahead for 332 projects - creating
or safeguarding 50,000 jobs.
Big projects included a decision by Sony, the Japanese electronics group, to
invest Pounds 144m in Wales and Kimberly Clark, the US consumer products
company, to spend Pounds 100m in south Humberside.
The annual inward investment total represents a minor reduction from the
previous year, which is thought to reflect a general weakening in the
European economies and the existing presence of many of the largest
international companies.
About half the proposed new investment is by foreign companies already
established in the UK. About 37 per cent of all US direct investment and 39
per cent of Japanese direct investment is targeted on the UK. Other big
investors in the British economy are Germany, France, the Netherlands and
Sweden.
The overall figures suggest that, with the impending arrival of the single
market, the UK could be accounting for as much as one-third of all incoming
EC investment.
According to the Invest in Britain Bureau (IBB), the UK's leading agency for
attracting foreign investment and part of the Department of Trade and
Industry, there are wider benefits to the trend.
Inward investors have, over the past three years, bought on average more
than half of all their capital equipment within the UK. Many companies have
moved quickly to increase local sourcing of components and supplies.
Much inward investment is also converted into export sales, with companies
such as Nissan sending 90 per cent of its Sunderland output overseas, some
of it back to Japan. As a further bonus, many overseas companies operating
from Britain are spending increasing volumes of funds on research and
development and on training.
The IBB is stepping up its promotional activities worldwide, given the less
encouraging economic climate now encircling the globe.
It will be concentrating in particular on the Far East, in markets such as
Malaysia, Indonesia, Singapore and Hong Kong.
It might find the going more difficult than it has been in the recent past.
Even before the most recent events which may have severely damaged Britain's
international standing, there were already signs that big inward investors
like the Japanese were not entirely happy with their UK experiences.
A report commissioned at the start of 1992 by the Department of Employment
found that the UK could lose its dominant share of European inward
investment from the Japanese as they begin to produce more sophisticated
products away from their domestic base.
It showed that personnel managers in Japanese companies were often highly
critical of UK skill levels and the poor quality of job candidates.
According to the report, literacy, numeracy and technical skills were
considered to be in short supply.
Such potential weaknesses may, however, pale into insignificance against the
potential fall-out from recent events and the UK's effective abandonment of
the exchange rate mechanism.
The subsequent fall in the value of sterling may provide a useful boost to
any UK-based exporting operation but Mr Michael Heseltine, the trade and
industry secretary, warned recently that there could be an alternative
fall-out.
He asked: 'If it was perceived that we were going to be part of a slow
stream Europe, do you think all those Japanese companies would continue to
invest here on the scale that they are?'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12297</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AF4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of European Business Locations (7): It was love at
first sight - Profile of Bosch
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY MORETON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THREE years ago this week the first contractors moved on to the Pounds 100m
site outside Cardiff chosen by Bosch as its UK home for production of a new
generation of lightweight, compact alternators for the motor industry.
Fifteen months later, just after New Year's day 1991, Bosch, the German
power-tools-to-hydraulics and car parts company that is a world leader as a
motor supplier, pressed the buttons that saw the first alternators come off
the production line.
Gerhard Turner, Bosch's commercial director at the plant, and one of the few
Germans with the company in Wales, says that when the project team first saw
the area it was 'love at first sight'.
Subsequently, production has accelerated smoothly, targets have been met and
the millionth alternator came off the line just eight months after the
factory was officially opened by Mr David Hunt, the secretary of state for
Wales.
Despite the recession and the collapse of sales of cars and lorries across
Europe, Bosch is on target to produce the two-millionth piece of this
specialist equipment before the end of this year and the plant now employs
670 people.
The investment, says Mr Turner, has been money very well spent. By 1995 it
expects to be employing 1,200.
Bosch chose Cardiff as part of a clearly thought-out strategy. 'We have an
imbalance between what we produce in Germany and what we produce in the rest
of the world,' Mr Turner says. 'So the company has been looking for some
years to boost its non-German production.'
Given that strategy, the UK was chosen because of the strength of the
domestic motor industry, boosted in the previous decade by the arrival of
first Nissan in the north-east, then Honda at Swindon and Toyota in
Derbyshire (together with its engine plant in north Wales).
'The renaissance of the British motor industry was very important to us,'
Turner says. 'We had a new product, one that depended on new models for
acceptance. The number of new companies in Britain producing those new
models meant the British market was almost designed for us.'
Britain was not the only location Bosch could have chosen. The
Stuttgart-based company is wary about revealing its detailed thinking but
after a working group had been set up in 1988 to look at expansion Spain was
a clear possibility. So, too, was the US and the Far East, both of which
have subsequently been sites for Bosch investment.
For Bosch the discovery of the commercial delights of Wales has enabled it
to join a large and growing club. The principality has been indelibly linked
with Japanese companies such as Sony, now one of the country's largest
manufacturing employers, Panasonic, Brother and Yuasa Batteries ever since
Takiron pioneered the way in 1972.
If the Japanese have basked in the spotlight other countries have also
chosen Wales. Bosch is only one of 49 German companies now in the
principality and there are more than 100 from the US.
German companies represent 15 per cent of the number of overseas companies
in Wales, with names such as Ina Bearing, Alfred Teves and Rehau in the
manufacturing field recently joined by financial-services group Das.
These companies now employ more than 3,000 people and with Ina having just
completed a Pounds 15m expansion programme at Llanelli and Teves having
undertaken a Pounds 14.3m investment at Ebbw Vale they clearly see the
future as good.
Having decided its strategy, Bosch chose Wales rather than another site in
the UK because of its infrastructure, especially its road links with the
rest of the country, and the availability of good labour.
The plant sits within sight of the M4 motorway half a dozen miles west of
Cardiff, an area where industrial relations have always been good.
Wales was the first part of the UK to accept single-union plant deals and
Bosch quickly settled on a deal with the then electricians, now part of the
engineers.
Within Wales the response was also encouraging. The then secretary of state,
Mr Peter Walker, actively massaged relations at the personal level with top
management in Stuttgart and Mr Turner concedes 'there was great co-operation
not only from the Welsh Office but also from the Welsh Development Agency
and the local authorities.
'What we found was that the authorities had all the necessary permissions on
matters such as planning that we wanted. So we were able to get from plan to
production in the shortest possible time.'
This infrastructure of aid had been honed by co-operative action among all
the bodies concerned with inward investment for some years. Earlier this
month, for instance, Welsh secretary David Hunt completed a swing around the
Far East 'selling' the attractions of Wales. He was accompanied by Dr Gwyn
Jones, chairman of the Welsh Development Agency, and officials.
If there is a downside for the company it is that vocational training in
Wales, like so much of the rest of Britain, is not thought to be as good as
in Germany.
'There is no equivalent to the way in which we undertake vocational
training,' Mr Turner says. 'We had to set up training programmes to match
our needs and were very fortunate in having the greatest co-operation of the
local authorities.'
Bosch is 'not dissatisfied' with what has emerged. Nor is Wales. So far the
company only sources a fifth of its bought-in parts from the UK. Most of the
rest comes from Germany, France, Switzerland, Austria and Belgium. The
devaluation of sterling against the D-Mark could give a push towards greater
local sourcing.
Nissan in the motor industry and companies such Sony and Panasonic in
consumer electronics have shown it is possible to find suppliers in Britain
able to produce the right goods at the right quality standards. Bosch is
confident it will, too, which will do a lot for the local economy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12298</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AF3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Bonds: Investors scramble for UK's first
D-Mark Eurobond issue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   THE UK's first Eurobond offering in D-Marks
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
and the largest to date in the sector by a substantial margin - prompted a
burst of frenzied activity as investors rushed to take part in the
transaction.
The DM5.5bn five-year deal, arranged by Deutsche Bank, was substantially
oversubscribed, underwriters said.
The success of the deal marks a further step in the development of the
D-Mark bond market, which is enjoying a vogue as one of the few bond markets
where large financings can be completed.
The D-Mark sector, benefiting from a flow of funds into a 'safe haven',
seems set to fill the void left by the defunct Ecu bond market, and the
creation of such a liquid benchmark will further the cause.
The only room for potential conflict is the question of where liquidity will
be concentrated. Frankfurt-based German banks are suddenly facing fresh
competition from London-based international investment banks, which are
drafting traders into the D-Mark Eurobond market.
In either case, the competition to dominate the market is likely to help
boost secondary market liquidity, which has been poor in the past.
Last week's DM2.5bn issue for Sweden helped set the tone for the UK
transaction. The five-year deal, launched at a spread of 45 basis points
over the comparable German government bond yield, has tightened by five
basis points. However, the initial pricing was widely seen as quite
generous, in order to take account of Sweden's large funding needs.
The pricing of the UK's five-year deal proved a pleasant surprise for some
market participants, who had been expecting a more aggressive approach. Last
week, as bidding for the mandate intensified, some banks were offering to
launch the deal at a spread of five basis points over the comparable German
government bond yield.
However, the deal was announced yesterday with an indicated yield spread
over the 8 1/4 per cent five-year BOBL - short-dated German government bond
 -of 10 to 12 basis points.
Although the deal is not officially priced until today, the spread will be
fixed at the lower end of the range, at 10 basis points, due to strong
demand. Some dealers said the issue could have been completed a couple of
basis points tighter, but others suggested a double-digit margin was
necessary to ensure the success of a deal of this size.
Of the total issue size of DM5.5bn, DM500m is being kept back by the Bank of
England to lend for repurchase transactions, which help ensure liquidity in
the secondary market.
The DM5.5bn deal forms part of the UK's Ecu10bn multi-currency funding
programme announced in September in a bid to support sterling in the foreign
exchange market. Since sterling has been suspended from the ERM, negating
the original function of the programme, the proceeds will be used to repay
short-term debt incurred through foreign exchange intervention.
The first part of the financing consisted of a multi-currency revolving
credit facility totalling Ecu5bn, drawn down in D-Marks and then sold for
sterling. Following the D-Mark bond offering, a further Ecu2.5bn of funding
remains to be completed by the end of the year. The government is also
likely to refinance the Ecu5bn loan with an interest rate on drawings of
3/32 , in the bond market, where finer terms are available.
The UK is one of a growing band of European countries facing increasing
borrowing needs. As well as needing to replenish foreign exchange reserves
and repay the Bundesbank for its help in foreign exchange intervention,
recession has increased the amount of borrowing required to fund budget
deficits in some countries.
In addition to Sweden's offering last week, Norway, Finland, Belgium, Spain
and Italy are among the countries considering tapping the German market.
Denmark is believed to be preparing a Dollars 300m three-year transaction,
for launch as soon as today.
In the Swiss bond market, the European Investment Bank launched a SFr500m
eight-year issue, which will provide a new benchmark and will be traded in
Zurich and London. The deal was arranged by Swiss Bank Corporation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12299</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AF2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Government Bonds: European markets advance on German rate
cut hopes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS and PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MOST European bond markets advanced strongly yesterday as the Bundesbank
appeared to offer further evidence of its intention to keep German interest
rates falling.
The announcement that the central bank is reverting to variable rate
repurchase agreement tenders, rather than the fixed-rate repos of recent
weeks, was read as a sign that the Bundesbank wants money market rates to
ease further - particularly in view of its clear signal to banks that it did
not want the switch to be interpreted as a sign of higher rates to come.
The result is widely expected to be a lower rate at today's weekly repo
tender, down by 10 or 15 basis points from the previous fixed rate of 8.9
per cent.
In spite of the general euphoria in bond markets around Europe on the news,
some observers cautioned against interpreting the change as a sign that
German rates are set to fall sharply, pulling other European interest rates
down in their wake.
'If they (the Bundesbank) had wanted to signal that, they would have moved
the fixed-rate repo down from 8.9 per cent,' said Mr Klaus Baader of UBS
Phillips &amp; Drew in London.
The Euromark futures contract jumped on the news, rising from 91.78 at the
opening to end the day at 91.90. Longer-dated German bonds failed to hold on
to early gains, however, as investors took profits after the recent advance
in the market.
The bund futures contract on Liffe ended the day much where it began, at
91.54, having touched a high of 91.80 at one stage.
THE French bond market gained confidence from the move in Germany, helping
to push overnight interest rates further down after a sharp fall on Monday.
Overnight rates dropped to nearly 10 1/2 per cent, having slipped below 11
per cent on Monday, as the market sensed the pressure of recent weeks was
lifting from the French franc.
In spite of the fall, however, the French authorities have left the key 5-10
day rate at 13 per cent, where it has been for almost a month in order to
defend the currency.
This interest rate is not likely to come back down to its more normal 10.5
per cent until the overnight rate has stabilised below that level, said Ms
Marie Owens Thomsen, an analyst at Midland Montagu in London.
'They're being very cautious with the franc, and won't move too fast,' she
added.
OATs advanced on the day, with gains of up to half a point. This pushed the
French/ German yield differential down to around 100 basis points, a level
below which it has not broken since the ERM tensions came to a head last
month.
Lingering concern about the danger of a forced devaluation, and an emergency
vote of confidence in the government due early next week, look likely to
hold the yield spread at current levels, though any decisive break below 100
basis points is widely viewed as likely to lead to a tightening back towards
pre-September levels, when it stood at around 60 basis points.
AFTER their sharp drops on Monday, longer-dated gilts bounced back yesterday
on news that the UK money supply is growing less rapidly than expected.
Sentiment was also helped by a bounce in sterling, which jumped back to
above DM2.46.
The market continued to push for another cut in the UK base rate after last
Friday's one point reduction, with the December short sterling contract
leaping from 92.84 to 93.07, suggesting a base rate of 7 per cent.
The steeping in the yield curve was less marked than on Monday, however, as
longer-dated gilts also moved ahead.
Gains of around a point were seen at most maturities, with the long gilt
futures contract on Liffe ending at 99.00, up from 98.06, on moderate volume
of nearly 30,000 lots.
US Treasury investors continued to price a Democratic victory into bond
prices yesterday as President George Bush showed no signs of eating into his
challenger's substantial lead in the opinion polls.
In late trading, the benchmark 30-year government bond was down  29/32 at 95
7/32 , yielding 7.653 per cent. Losses were more pronounced among
intermediate-dated securities, with the 10-year note down 1 11/32 at 96 5/8,
yielding 6.878 per cent, while the two-year note was 13/32 lower at 99
11/32, yielding 4.338 per cent.
Prices weakened after investors judged that the president's performance on
Monday night in the final presidential debate would not be sufficient to
turn around his ailing campaign. Consequently, investors carried on where
they left off last Friday and this Monday - selling bonds in anticipation of
victory for Governor Bill Clinton. If he does win, the market believes the
Democratic nominee will try to pass a growth-oriented fiscal package in the
first few months of his presidency, which could push up interest rates and
widen the budget deficit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12300</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AF1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Capital Markets: Ratings agencies complete
merger
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IBCA and Euronotation, the rating agencies, yesterday announced the
completion of their planned merger, the first step to a possible Europe-wide
agency to compete with US giants Moody's and Standard &amp; Poor's.
The merger, under discussion since early this year, also involves the sale
of 70 per cent in the new group to Centenaire Blanzy, a diversified French
group.
The remaining shares remain with the managers of the two firms.
Centenaire Blanzy intends to sell on part of its shareholding to other
European investors, broadening the base of the group to cover other European
markets, principally Germany. Discussions have been held with Bertelsmann,
the German publishing giant, and other media companies, IBCA said yesterday.
The plan to use IBCA and Euronotation as the base for a Europe-wide agency
has developed in parallel with a separate move within Germany to create a
rival to the US-based agencies.
That project, launched by a series of German banks and commercial companies,
has yet to lead to a hard proposal for a new agency.
IBCA yesterday refused to comment on whether there had been discussions
between the German and Anglo-French groups about the possibility of a
link-up.
Centenaire Blanzy was controlled by the Suez Group and Victoire, the
insurance croup, until 1989, but no formal links remain, IBCA said.
IBCA yesterday downgraded Barclays from AA+ to AA, citing the UK banking
group's high loan loss provisions in the US and UK and exposure to the UK
property and construction sectors.
Last week, Moody's, the US agency, announced that it had put Barclays and
National Westminster under review for a possible downgrade.
Moody's had already cut Barclays from a AAA to AA1 in May this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12301</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Capital Markets: FT-SE Actuaries Indices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The FT-SE 100, FT-SE Mid 250 and FT-SE Actuaries 350 indices and the FT-SE
Actuaries Industry Baskets are calculated by The International Stock
Exchange of the United Kingdom and Republic of Ireland Limited. The
International Stock Exchange of the United Kingdom and Republic of Ireland
Limited 1992. All rights reserved.
The FT-Actuaries All-Share Index is calculated by The Financial Times
Limited in conjunction with the Institute of Actuaries and the Faculty of
Actuaries. The Financial Times Limited 1992. All rights reserved.
The FT-SE 100, FT-SE Mid 250 and FT-SE Actuaries 350 indices, the FT-SE
Actuaries Industry Baskets and the FT-Actuaries All-Share Index are members
of the FT-SE Actuaries Share Indices series which are calculated in
accordance with a standard set of ground rules established by The Financial
Times Limited and London Stock Exchange in conjunction with the Institute of
Actuaries and the Faculty of Actuaries.
'FT-SE' and 'Footsie' are joint trade marks and service marks of the London
Stock Exchange and The Financial Times Limited.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12302</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of European Business Locations (3): Drive for links
with the west - Eastern Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE collapse of Soviet power in eastern and central Europe has been
accompanied by a collapse in trade with the east and a remarkable westward
shift in the focus of eastern European aspirations.
Historically it was the defeat of Napoleon which confirmed Russia as a
European power. Similarly, it was the vacuum at the heart of Europe caused
by the defeat of Nazi Germany 130 years later that brought Soviet power to
the banks of the Elbe and gave Moscow control over half the continent.
That control has now vanished, together with most of the armies which
sustained it. Soon the Red Army will vacate its last bases in eastern
Germany and withdraw from the Baltic states.
Germany has re-emerged as the dominant economic power in the region and is
preparing to move the capital of the newly re-united country back from Bonn,
on the Rhine, to Berlin in the heart of old Prussia.
It is worth dwelling briefly on the historical background to the changes now
taking place in eastern Europe because this helps to underline the aberrant
nature of the region's temporary control from Moscow and the underlying
reasons for the enthusiasm behind the drive for ever closer economic, trade,
financial, political and other links with western Europe.
Some of the strongest supporters of the European Community idea are to be
found in this region and three of the newly-liberated countries -
Czechoslovakia, Hungary and Poland - already have association agreements
with the EC and aspire to full membership by the turn of the century. Others
like Romania and Bulgaria have similar long-term aspirations but are most
distant and economically less advanced.
All three central European associate members of the EC have made rapid
progress towards privatising their economies and shifting their trade to EC
markets. More than 50 per cent of Hungary's exports now go to EC markets,
for example, compared with only 14 per cent in the 1970s and 25 per cent in
the 1980s.
Unsurprisingly, the restored importance of western trade and other links has
placed a premium on proximity to EC markets. Prague, Budapest and Warsaw are
busy building new hotels, office blocks, airports and updating their
antiquated telecommunications.
Within 20 years a network of new motorways and upgraded railways and
telecommunications will have knitted central Europe firmly into the wider
EC, the ultimate shape of which still has to be decided.
Prague, the most westerly of the central European capitals, is 200km further
west than Vienna and this factor, as well as its undisputed charms as a
largely intact renaissance and baroque city on the banks of the Voltava
river, has made the Czech capital one of the preferred locations for western
companies doing business in Czechoslovakia and the region.
Investors looking for bargains from the privatisation process have also been
busy snapping up engineering, glass, cement and other industries in western
and northern Bohemia. This region was the industrial power house of the
former Habsburg empire and borders directly on to Bavaria and the five east
German lander in the throes of a reconstruction boom. Poland, too, has
benefited greatly from its proximity to Germany and easy access to the
European motorway and other infrastructures.
But the Czech case is the best illustration of the general principle that
the prosperity and potential for future growth is highest in the western
part of the region and diminishes as one travels east. The Czech lands of
Bohemia and Moravia were historically wealthier and more advanced than
Hungarian-controlled Slovakia. The gap looks like becoming wider after the
impending divorce between the Czech lands and Slovakia.
In its favour, however, Bratislava, the Slovak capital, does have the
advantage of being less than 80kms from Vienna. It hopes to attract
cross-border investment into new export-orientated factories in the border
area. But an independent Slovakia is expected to find increasing difficulty
in attracting investment to the eastern part of the country which was highly
dependent on the Soviet market and has poor road, rail and air links with
the west.
Uptil now Hungary has been the favourite destination for foreign investors
who have poured in more than Dollars 4bn of equity investment over the past
three years, around 60 per cent of the total into the region. This is due
both to much small investment by private Austrian, German, French and
Italian entrepreneurs and to big investments by General Electric, General
Motors, Suzuki, Ford and other multinationals such as Electrolux as well as
the big food, tobacco and consumer goods companies. All have been looking
for new low-cost production centres and new outlets for their branded
products.
In terms of market potential, however, Poland, with nearly 40m people,
Romania with 23m and the more distant but larger Ukraine with 52m are much
more populous than Hungary, Bulgaria and the Czech lands with around 10m
people each or Slovakia with under 5m.
But decisions on where to locate to serve these new markets could well be
affected by moves underfoot to revive trade between these countries and
especially between the so-called 'Visegrad three' of Hungary, Poland and
both the future Czech and Slovak republics.
The Visegrad three are exploring the feasibility of creating a free trade
area offering a market of nearly 70m people.
For companies such as Electrolux, which made its first big investment in
Hungary, from which it exports 60 per cent of its output to EC markets, such
a development could have important investment and location implications. Mr
Heikki Takanen, the company's senior vice-president for cold products,
believes this would enable the company to source all its refrigerator and
other cold product sales in the area from its existing Hungarian plant. It
would then build new plants for stoves and its other products in Poland or
Czechoslovakia to achieve the advantages of scale.
Despite the collapse of the former Soviet economy, cities such as Prague,
Budapest and Warsaw are full of people with contacts and experience of
trading with the huge potential markets in the 15 newly-independent former
Soviet republics. Once trade and investment picks up these skills will be
worth tapping again.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12303</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of European Business Locations (4): A blueprint for
planners - The view from Brussels
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL CASSELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DESPITE the raging debate over the legitimate parameters of EC institutions
in helping to build the new Europe, their role in assisting balanced
economic development across the community is one of the less controversial
items on the political agenda.
The European Commission readily recognises that its powers to help the
construction of an economic bloc in which all nations and regions share
equally are limited.
But if it is the business community itself which will ultimately prove
decisive in efforts to create a universally prosperous Europe, the
Commission can nevertheless play a critical enabling role, paving the way
for business to do its job.
Armed with a reformed network of structural funds, the Commission is
stepping up efforts to reduce the wide disparities which still exist across
the community.
In the past, EC regional policy was basically confined to providing
financial help for the implementation of national policies. Now, however,
with the completion of the single market, capital and labour can be expected
increasingly to locate where the physical and economic environment proves to
be the most attractive.
As a result, the overall emphasis is to be placed on a balanced and
cohesive, community-wide programme of development which will encourage
economic investment to take place throughout the EC.
Given the growing backlash against the image of a burgeoning, centralised
Brussels bureaucracy and the clarion call for more subsidiarity, Brussels is
going out of its way to emphasise that it has no intention of assuming the
planning functions carried out at member state level.
In the words of Mr Bruce Millan, the EC commissioner for regional policy:
'There is no master plan for Europe'.
Even so, Brussels claims that there is a pressing need for more systematic
co-operation between regional planners at community level and for transport
and energy issues to be considered from a regional development point of
view.
Last year, the Commission published Europe 2000, a blueprint which broke new
ground in considering regional planning at the European level. It said it no
longer made sense for planning to stop artificially at national borders and
that planners needed increasingly to be aware of developments taking place
beyond their immediate territory.
The figures spelling out the yawning gap in EC economic performance between
member states starkly underline the scale of the job to be done before any
claims for a balanced economic profile can be substantiated.
By 1991, three member states - Greece, Portugal and Ireland - had a per
capita gross domestic product below 75 per cent of the EC average. With the
per capita income of the 10 lowest-ranking regions running at less than a
third of that of the 10 highest, the unemployment rate in some areas was
five times higher than in others.
The proportion of young people between the ages of 15 and 19 at school or in
training ranges from under 40 per cent in Portugal to more than 85 per cent
in Germany, Denmark and the Netherlands. Public expenditure on research and
technical development is up to seven times higher in Germany, France and the
UK than in the less-developed member states.
As the commission accepts: 'When considered as a whole, regional differences
remain comparable to the situation in the early 1970s. This, in spite of a
slight improvement due to a more favourable economic climate, more effective
harnessing of national and community efforts and a marked increase in
assistance from the structural funds.'
After a doubling of the structural funds in real terms between 1987 and
1993, the commission admits that, in some respects, the regional disparities
have actually widened and the volumes of investment required to make up for
deficiencies in basic infrastructure are enormous.
The challenge will be all the greater given that the less-favoured regions
will also be faced with increasingly stiff EC competition. The task will be
compounded by new pressures from central and eastern Europe.
The 'economic convergence' objectives set by the Maastricht treaty in the
interests of economic and monetary union will be particularly hard to
achieve in the poorer regions. A widening of regional differences in a
'two-tier' Europe would undoubtedly be harmful to the community as a whole.
The Commission's response to the challenge is outlined in a series of
proposals now under discussion. These include another huge rise in resources
for the structural funds, which will also be simplified.
In those regions lagging in development - such as Greece, Ireland and
Portugal - funds would rise by two-thirds while those for other regions
would increase by half. There will also, post-Maastricht, be a new fund to
help poorer member states with transport infrastructure and environmental
projects.
Beyond the increase in funding, the Commission is now actively pursuing or
considering a number of initiatives intended to help the process of balanced
economic development.
With the decreasing significance of the community's internal frontiers, new
economic opportunities are opening up for the border areas which have long
been isolated from the main centres of economic activity. The Commission
has, accordingly, set up Interreg, a community aid programme intended to
help weld together local economies which have traditionally faced each other
across national boundaries and developed differently.
The Commission is also concerned to help fill in some of the 'missing links'
in EC infrastructure which underline regional differences in wealth and
which will frustrate the community's economic expansion. Transport,
telecommunicationsand energy supply networks are interrupted by pockets of
non-investment which badly need to be filled with the help of EC funds.
Some of the community's most acute problems associated with lack of economic
opportunity, low incomes and poor quality of life are concentrated in some
of Europe's biggest cities. At present, there is no community policy
specifically relating to the problems of urban areas and concern over the
growth in segregation of rich and poor in many cities means that urban
poverty and deprivation could soon figure on the EC's busy agenda.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12304</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of European Business Locations (2): Hot banana
preferred - The factors affecting choice
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL CASSELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE decision on where best to locate a European-based business to achieve
maximum commercial benefit is one which many companies have never had to
make. They, like Topsy, 'just growed' where they began.
But the shifting patterns of political and economic development within an EC
market intended to be barrier-free in a few weeks' time means that the
location of a factory, warehouse or office is critically important.
As new arrivals into the European arena weigh up the respective advantages
and drawbacks of individual nations, regions and cities before making their
choice, so countless numbers of well-established European companies are
reappraising their location strategy.
A process of relocation and consolidation which pays little heed to a
company's original, European roots may well follow.
Each company will have different priorities and requirements and, as
consultants Plant Location International stress, 'to generalise is the
biggest mistake which can be he potential investor in a new location is
confronted with a bewildering mix of statistics and impressions. Glasgow
offers excellent value for money in office floorspace, Lisbon provides low
staffing costs, Stockholm is relatively pollution-free and Munich scores
high when it comes to quality of life.
A new survey conducted among leading businessmen in nine EC countries by the
Harris Research Centre for Healey &amp; Baker, the chartered surveyors, contains
few surprises in terms of the most popular business locations.
London again emerges as the favourite, given its access to markets,
telecommunications and the generally supportive business climate. Paris is
second and Frankfurt third.
Perhaps more interesting are those cities viewed by the business community
as most likely to make an impact in the next five years. Leipzig, in the
former east Germany, comes first, followed by the German cities of Stuttgart
and Dresden. The same survey suggests near unanimity in the belief that
Germany will inevitably become the centre of Europe.
Wherever companies chose to locate, there remain several broad categories of
criteria which any business will need to consider before making a decision.
High on the list is the accessibility of the marketplace to be served,
implying that Europe's peripheral regions will generally tend to be less
attractive candidates. However, any disadvantage of this nature may be
offset by other factors, such as availability of low-cost labour, less
congestion and quality of life issues.
The regions with greatest market access are located in the so-called 'hot
banana', which stretches from south-east Britain through the Benelux
countries, northern France, the Rhine and Rhur, Switzerland and northern
Italy.
According to Ernst &amp; Young Corporate Location, the 'hot banana' accounts for
only 10 per cent of the surface area of the European Economic Area (EC and
EFTA nations combined) but for more than 40 per cent of its total output.
At the other extreme, the most peripheral areas include the Scandinavian
countries, Greece, southern Italy, Spain, Ireland and Scotland. With 60 per
cent of the EEA land area, they account for only 20 per cent of total
output.
Apart from market accessibility, the Harris Research Centre study highlights
several other key factors in the decision-making process, including good
transport links, modern telecommunications, a range of cost issues and, less
specifically, the creation of a climate which is generally supportive of the
business community.
Effective, efficient transport links are universally regarded as essential
and while huge investment projects are under way around the EC - the channel
tunnel, the Rhine-Danube canal and a community-wide network of high-speed
trains - there remain big impediments to the movement of people and goods.
A recent study showed that flight times within Europe have increased because
of increasing congestion while restrictions on the movement of heavy goods
vehicles in some nations is hindering the flow of traffic to others.
According to Ernst &amp; Young: 'While some of these difficulties will
eventually be overcome, congestion on all forms of transport is likely to
become an increasing problem.'
Also high on the list in any decision on preferred locations is the question
of availability of labour. For companies with labour-intensive activities,
the regions of southern Europe offer the most plentiful source of manpower,
as well as the lowest wages, though local skills levels, labour laws and the
climate of industrial relations may not prove so advantageous.
The UK is generally deemed to have the most relaxed employment laws, with
few restrictions on working hours, overtime and holidays - a position likely
to persist as long as the British government withholds its support for the
social chapter of the Maastricht treaty.
In contrast, dismissal and redundancy can be a lengthy and difficult affair
in Spain, Portugal and Italy.
Another critical factor involves national systems of corporate taxation,
which are often highly complex and which vary widely across the community.
Ernst &amp; Young calculates that Germany, Norway and Sweden impose the lowest
tax burden while Spain, France and Portugal impose the highest.
Underlying the list of variables which companies must consider lies the
potential availability of financial incentives on offer to companies from
government agencies and from the EC, particularly in those areas attempting
to reverse industrial decline.
Although the criteria for financial assistance vary, the level of help
normally rests on the applicants' ability to show that the investment will
have a beneficial impact on factors such as jobs and local suppliers.
But, according to Dr Wilfried Vossen, of Plant Location International - part
of Price Waterhouse - 'the availability of incentives can play a crucial
role when all the other technical and financial considerations have been
evaluated. But, in themselves, they can never be decisive'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12305</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Survey of European Business Locations (1): Europe-wide
market lures - The corporate scramble to establish a base within the world's
largest single trading block has been frenetic. Although the pace has been
slowed by the erosion of economic confidence, eyes are now shifting further
east as Europe's enormous potential takes on a new dimension
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL CASSELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPE faces a long, tough struggle if its political ambitions are ever to
bear fruit, but, with 10 weeks to go until the completion of the European
Community's inter-nal market, there can be no such uncertainties over the
potential of its combined, economic power.
The creation of the world's largest single trading block, permitting the
free movement of goods, people, services and capital, though it will not
usher in an overnight revolution in business practices and patterns, will
bring into sharp focus the immense commercial potential which Europe now
presents to an international business community in search of a share of the
action.
Though fears of a protectionist Europe - conspiring to close its doors on
outside competitors - have receded, the corporate scramble to establish a
base within the community has been frenetic, slowed only by the
international turndown in economic confidence.
Global figures on direct foreign investment already demonstrate that Europe
is a prime target for a large slice of the funds which search the world for
a home.
Total inward investment into the EC countries alone during 1991 reached
nearly Dollars 65bn.
The UK, in spite of its national inferiority complex, continues to attract
the lion's share of all EC inward investment.
Last year, it accounted for one-third of the total, involving more than 300
new inward projects and either creating or safeguarding more than 50,000
jobs.
American corporations continue to top the list of big spenders in Europe,
with the Japanese in second place. Contrary to some expectations, many of
the investment decisions do not involve high-tech installations but a range
of basic manufacturing activities offering significant employment
opportunities.
The search is also on for the large parcels of land - 200 acres upwards -
increasingly required by the largest, multinational organisations, as they
recognise that the removal of national barriers within the EC often negates
the need to duplicate plants across the territory. Consolidation at a single
complex, or within two or three regional centres, is often the answer.
Together with the European Free Trade Association (Efta) nations, the
countries of the EC combine to provide a virtually barrier-free market of
around 400m people in 19 countries.
Their economies are more interlinked and inter-dependent than ever before,
and yet they contain within them wide disparities embracing everything from
language to labour laws.
To the immediate east, the political and economic revolution under way adds
another, longer-term dimension to European development.
Many companies in the free market economies will be eyeing up eastern Europe
as a possible production base, while others will see it as a new market in
which to sell.
Most attention has, until now, been focused on the markets of former East
Germany, where the Treuhand-anstalt privatisation agency is planning to
dispose of all saleable businesses by the end of 1993.
Around 8,000 of the 12,000 companies on its books have now gone, securing
nearly 2m jobs and bringing around Pounds 50bn of new investment.
But other, former communist countries also hold out the promise of
commercial success. Czechoslovakia, Poland and Hungary are playing host to
increasing numbers of visitors with en eye to opening up operations. As
author Daniel Burstein remarks in his book Euroquake, which paints Europe as
an economic super-power capable of usurping the position of the US: 'The
cocktail lounge in the Warsaw Marriott has come to resemble the famous
intergalactic space bar from Star Wars'.
Less fancifully, Braxton Associates, the international strategy consultants,
sums up: 'In the next generation, eastern Europe will enter and become a
significant part of the global economy.
'For those companies which have identified how that participation will
impact on their global strategy, and responded to it, the pay-off could be
enormous'.
But while many companies are actively addressing, and acting upon, the
challenge offered by a vast, diverse, rapidly changing European market,
others have yet to recognise the implications, or to take appropriate
action. The failure so far of hundreds of thousands of European companies to
enact radical changes in the way they handle value added tax is only one
example of the work left to be done.
In Britain, as elsewhere, there is considerable ministerial concern that the
political ructions over Europe's development have diverted attention from
the practical problems of preparing for the single market. The danger is
that many companies may quickly find themselves on the losing end of
competition from those businesses which have developed a strategy to match
the European vision.
But there is also room for encouragement. Mr Paul Orchard Lisle, senior
partner of Healey &amp; Baker, the real estate consultancy, says that
businessmen are increasingly thinking as Europeans, able to take a broader
view of comm-ercial opportunities and keen to improve their knowledge of
local markets.
According to Ernst &amp; Young Corporate Location, the location specialists,
there is a growing tendency for companies to discard the notion of the
nation state and instead to think Europe-wide for their markets and
regionally for their facilities.
But where are companies supposed to begin as they construct their European
business strategies?
'You just cannot ask someone to fly to Amsterdam, Paris, London and
Frankfurt, speak to everyone and come back with the right answers about
where to set up. The decisions have become far too complex and critical for
that,' says Dr Wilfried Vossen of Plant Location Internat-ional, the Price
Waterhouse business location consultancy.
Most location experts, and there are now plenty of them prepared to sell the
benefit of their experience to companies on the move, agree that there is no
such place as the perfect location. Most investors have to select a
compromise which comes closest to meeting their requirements.
Each project will have clear technical requirements which will have a direct
bearing on the choice of location, but financing will play an equally
critical role, both in terms of operating costs and the one-off costs of
acquiring land, buildings and equipment.
Operating conditions are also critical. Low wages and a plentiful supply of
labour may appear attractive, until the employer realises skills levels are
poor.
Sweden may have high rates of absenteeism but it boasts one of the lowest
corporate tax burdens; telecommunications costs for multinational companies
are lower in the UK, but the country, in spite of enormous improvements,
still has a higher rate of labour disputes than several other EC states.
When all the technical, financial and operational factors have been
assessed, potential investors can then consider the range of financial
incentives made available in most countries.
They include cash grants, interest-free loans, fast depreciation schemes,
tax credits and training grants - all of which will require the recipient to
put something back into the community, whether it is jobs, new export
business or more research and development activity.
Dr Vossen at PLI says that incentives can play a crucial role in determining
a project's profitability. PLI has researched the impact of incentives on
investment decisions and concluded that net cash investment for the same
project less than 100km apart can vary by nearly 30 per cent because of land
costs and different incentive package combinations.
'The impression is given that investment incentives are being reduced all
over Europe. The reverse is the truth, although the schemes on offer are
increasingly diverse.
'Incentives can be decisive in the final stages of the decision-making
process. But if companies are led into choosing a location primarily because
of what they can get in hand-outs, it is they who will inevitably pay the
price.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12306</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / London Stock Exchange: Rolls hit by broker revisions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PRICE, PETER JOHN and JOEL KIBAZO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AERO ENGINE group Rolls-Royce had a volatile session and ended up as the
worst performer in the FT-SE 100 after several brokers revised their stance
on the stock.
The shares fell to 121p early in the session after Panmure Gordon reduced
its profits estimate for 1993 by Pounds 15m to Pounds 115m, citing cuts in
aircraft manufacturers production levels and continued concerns about
spares. Leaving his current year forecast at Pounds 72m, Mr Charles Donald
at Panmure said next year's dividend will be maintained. Sentiment was
further weakened by a BZW profits downgrading and Smith New Court advising
investors to 'reduce weighting'.
Bargain hunting and the strong market trend helped the shares recover from
the earlier lows to end 3 1/2 p down at 126p, in hefty trade of 7.6m.
Rank hotel hints
A robust defence of its trading performance and disposal strategy was said
to have been mounted by Rank Organisation, with hints also in the market
that the leisure group may be close to selling some of its hotels to
Greenalls, which yesterday announced a rights issue to fund acquisitions.
Rank's move to shore up its defence comes in the wake of negative press
comment and broker downgrades, with criticism focusing on Rank's high debt
level and rumoured sales of some of its core assets.
However, Rank was said to have told institutions at a private dinner that
its cinema business was not up for sale, that its next set of results would
show net debt in retreat and that the dividend would definitely be held. But
it was hints in the market that some of the group's hotels, which have been
up for sale for several months and are expected to raise around Pounds 300m,
may be about to be sold which brought the most cheer. Rank shares jumped 22
to 530p in busy turnover of 2.6m.
Some brewery analysts were sceptical that Greenalls would consider one of
Rank's high-profile London hotels, arguing that the group would more likely
use its Pounds 86m to pick up more smaller offerings. The shares slipped 15
to 344p.
Lasmo active
Oil group Lasmo caught the market's imagination yesterday as a number of
investors decided that worries over the exploration and production group's
dividend were beginning to recede. The shares lifted 9 to 176p on very high
turnover of 9.3m.
A press article on how second-line oil stocks have picked up on the back of
a weaker pound sparked wide interest. Lasmo benefited partly because it is
the most highly leveraged company in the sector and partly because of its
bid attractions.
Some analysts suggested there was also switching from Enterprise following
the latter's less-than-successful share issue at the weekend. The problems
with the issue of American Depositary Shares were highlighted by an
announcement that following the offering, Lehman Brothers has been left with
about 1.8 per cent of Enterprise's enlarged share capital. Enterprise firmed
9 to 419p.
Coats move up
The UK's largest textile group Coats Viyella was heavily traded as one house
repeated a buy recommendation. The shares jumped a net 12 to 199p on heavier
than usual turnover of 4.6m shares.
Smith New Court's textile analyst Mr Mark Puleikis published an internal
note offering reassurance following worries over the tax charge. The worries
were highlighted by a recent ruling by the Financial Review Reporting Panel
on Trafalgar House.
Mr Puleikis also argues that the company is on a 1993 multiple of 12 times
earnings
Builders merchant Wolseley was the strongest performer in the market, as it
turned in very good results sending the shares racing forward in busy
trading of 1.5m. The group showed improvements across the range of its
businesses, but in particular France and the US. The shares surged 64 to
408p.
Mr Gavin Pomeroy at County NatWest said: 'The shares continue to look fair
value and in the long-term the potential for both expansion in the US and
recovery in the UK are good.'
A strong property sector combined with relief over the scope of its proposed
dividend cut lifted Hammerson, the ordinary shares climbing 11 to 201p. The
group reported a 25 per cent fall in interim profits, well below City
expectations, and promised a halved final dividend. However, a cut had been
expected and the removal of uncertainty brought relief to the market,
although the company's warning of tough times ahead held back the shares in
early muted trading. They rose later on the back of hopes for interest rate
cuts which lifted other property stocks.
Mr Graham Stanley at County NatWest said: 'If the property market continues
weak, then the outlook for Hammerson's office rental income when leases
begin to expire is bleak. The dividend could then be under further pressure.
We consider the shares too expensive at this level.'
Other stocks responding to the improved sentiment yesterday included British
Land, up 10 at 173p, Land Securities, 16 ahead at 415p, and MEPC, 9 firmer
at 280p.
Continuing worries over the coal crisis prompted some switching from the
electricity generators into British Gas, up 8 1/2 to 256 1/2 p, and selected
water stocks. Of the latter, Anglian rose 10 to 440p.
Currency factors gave a boost to ICI, which also announced the sale of its
aerospace and defence coatings arm to Courtaulds (up 6 at 460p). ICI bounced
24 to 1027p.
SmithKline Beecham rose 15 to 527p in the 'A's and to 468p in the Units on
news that the pharmaceuticals group had boosted profits for the third
quarter by 8 per cent.
Publishing and leisure conglomerate Pearson gained after encouraging
messages from SG Warburg in its latest media survey. The shares lifted 21 to
364p.
Asda was the top traded stock of the day, with 22m shares changing hands.
Dealers said the good two-way business - the shares edging forward a
half-penny to 40 1/2 p - was a result of investors taking profits on the
rights issue price of 35p a year ago and the positive mood that has
accompanied the share price's slow price in recent months.
In a strong leisure sector, Forte's rise was hindered by news that US rating
agency Standard &amp; Poor's had downgraded some of the group's debt. The shares
closed 5 up at 157p. Thorn EMI rose 20 to 790p, County NatWest continuing
its strong buy stance. New figures on UK compact disc sales also gave the
group a boost.
County NatWest was said to be positive on Tiphook and the shares gained 13
to 232p. BAA jumped 29 to 793p, with some switching from British Airways
reported. BA crept ahead 2 to 296p, in trade of 3.3m shares.
A sell recommendation in IMI from Smith New Court left the shares 9 lighter
at 213p.
More downgrades hit Glynwed International. The shares fell 3 to 205p after
Kleinwort Benson and BZW were reported to have joined the list of brokers
revising forecasts.
Packaging company CMB fell 55 to 2050p following a forecast downgrade by US
investment bank JP Morgan, which cuts its earnings estimates for the group.
Financial services company Gerrard &amp; National rose 26 to 306p after
announcing an unchanged first-half dividend of 6p and good half-year
profits.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (125).
BRITISH FUNDS (48) Tr. 8 1/4 pc '93, Tr. 10pc '93, Tr. 12 1/2 pc '93, Fd.
6pc '93, Tr. 12 3/4 pc '93, Tr. 8 1/2 pc '94, Tr. 14 1/2 pc '94, Ex. 13 1/2
pc '94, Tr. 10pc '94, Ex. 12 1/2 pc '94, Tr. 9pc '94, Ex. 12 1/2 pc '94, Tr.
12pc '95, Ex. 10 1/4 pc '95, Tr. 12 3/4 pc '95, Tr. 14pc '96, Tr. 9pc
'92-96, Tr. 15 1/4 pc '96, Ex. 13 1/4 pc '96, Cv. 10pc '96, Tr. 13 1/4 pc
'97, Ex. 10 1/2 pc '97, Tr. 8 3/4 pc '97, Ex. 15pc '97, Ex. 9 3/4 pc '98,
Tr. 6 3/4 pc '95-98, Tr. 15 1/2 pc '98, Ex. 12pc '98, Tr. 9 1/2 pc '99, Ex.
12 1/4 pc '99, Tr. 10 1/2 pc '99, Cv. 10 1/4 pc '99, Cv. 9pc '00, Tr. 13pc
'00, Tr. 10pc '01, Tr. 14pc '98-01, Tr. 9 3/4 pc '02, Tr. 10pc '03, Tr. 11
1/2 pc '01-04, Tr. 2pc IL '94, Tr. 2pc IL '96, Tr. 4 5/8 pc IL '98, Tr. 2
1/2 pc IL '01, Tr. 2 1/2 pc IL '03, Tr. 2 1/2 pc IL '09, Tr. 2 1/2 pc IL
'11, Tr. 2 1/2 pc IL '16, Tr. 2 1/2 pc IL '24, OTHER FIXED INTEREST (3) Met.
Water 3pc B, N'wide Anglia 3 7/8 pc IL '21, Do. 4 1/4 pc IL '24, AMERICANS
(11) Bankers NY, CPC, Chrysler, Echlin, FPL, Flour, Gen Host, Gillette,
Hasbro, Morgan (JP), Southwestern Bell, CANADIANS (1) Amer. Barrick, BANKS
(4) ABN, Deutsche, HSBC, HSBC (75p Shs), BUSINESS SERVS (2) Rentokil,
Salvesen (C), CHEMS (1) Engelhard, CONGLOMERATES (1) Sime Darby, ELECTRICALS
(2) Johnson, Sony, ELECTRONICS (1) Riva, FOOD MANUF (1) Unilever, FOOD
RETAILING (2) ASDA, Kwik Save, HEALTH &amp; HSEHOLD (3) Amersham, Astra, ML
Labs., HOTELS &amp; LEIS (1) Tanjong, INSCE BROKERS (1) Marsh &amp; McLennan, INSCE
COMPOSITE (4) AEGON, American Intl., CU, Gen Accident, INSCE LIFE (1)
Torchmark, INV TRUSTS (21) Abtrust New Dawn, Flmg. American, Do Cv. '99,
Flmg. Intl. High Zero Pf., Gen Cons. Stppd. Pf., I &amp; S Optimum Inc. Zero
Div., Independent, Indonesia Equity Wts., JF Pacific Wrt., Jupiter Euro.
Zero Pf., Kleinwort High Inc. Zero Pf., Nth. American Gas, RIT Capital, Do.
2 1/2 pc Cv. '00, River &amp; Merc. Stppd. Pf., River Plate Zero Pf., Scot.
Natl. Stppd. Pf., Do Zero Pf., Second Market, TR Far East Inc., World Tst.,
MEDIA (3) Carlton Comms., Metal Bulletin, News Intl., MISC (1) Waste Mngmt.,
OIL &amp; GAS (2) Lasmo 9 5/8 pc Pf., Schlumberger, OTHER FINCL (1) Jardine
Strategic, PROP (1) HK Land, TRANSPORT (1) BAA, WATER (8) Mid Kent,
Northumbrian, Severn Trent, South West, Southern, Thames, Welsh, Wessex.
NEW LOWS (50).
AMERICANS (1) IBM, BREWERS (1) Fuller STA, BLDG MATLS (3) Heywood Williams,
Marshalls, Ramus, BUSINESS SERVS (4) Air London, Christie, Page (M),
Proudfoot, CHEMS (1) Canning, CONTG &amp; CONSTRCN (3) CRP, Jarvis, Tay Homes,
ELECTRICALS (1) BICC, ELECTRONICS (1) Kewill Sys., ENG GEN (3) BM, Fenner,
Victaulic, FOOD MANUF (1) Daniels, FOOD RETAILING (1) Ashley, INV TRUSTS (5)
Archimedes Inc., Eng. &amp; Caledonian, Greyfriars, SPRAIT Wts., Tor Inc., MEDIA
(3) Fitch, Lopex, Radio Clyde, MERCHANT BANKS (1) Wintrust, MTL &amp; MTL
FORMING (2) Barrett (H), Cook (W), MISC (1) Ross, OIL &amp; GAS (5) Fairhaven,
Lasmo Ops., Nth. Sea Assets., Oceonics, Petrofina, OTHER FINCL (2) Baltic,
Do 7pc Pf., PACKG, PAPER &amp; PRINTG (1) Somic, PROP (1) Shaftesbury, STORES
(3) Beattie, Cantors A, Wyevale, TEXTS (3) Beckman, Pepe, Yorklyde,
TRANSPORT (2) Eurotunnel Wts., LOF's, MINES (1) Placer Pacific.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12307</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity futures and options trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOEL KIBAZO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE German Bundesbank's decision to move to a variable repo rate, leading to
strong speculation of further cuts in UK base rates, enlivened a dull
derivatives sector and sent Footsie futures moving sharply ahead, writes
Joel Kibazo.
The opening level in the December contract on the FT-SE 100 index was
recorded at 2,617, which proved to be the day's low as the speculation on
interest rates quickly took hold sending December steadily ahead and pulling
the underlying cash market higher.
The early strength of Wall Street led to renewed buying interest, a factor
which took many dealers by surprise, leading to a squeeze in December and
sending it to the day's peak of 2,668.
The general strength of the market meant that December traded at a healthy
premium to cash of between 30 and 40 points throughout the session with
arbitraging seen at the higher levels.
December closed at 2,657, around 17 points above its estimated cost of carry
of around 23. Turnover reached 9,208 lots.
Traded options were also lively and turnover improved to reach 38,097
contracts of which 10,442 were dealt in the FT-SE 100 option. Asda was the
busiest stock option, with a total of 5,003 contracts traded by the close.
This was followed by HSBC at 2,438 and British Steel at 1,117.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12308</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / London Stock Exchange: Interest rate optimism lifts equities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVE THOMPSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE PROSPECT of an imminent easing in German monetary policy, leading to a
round of interest rate reductions across Europe, provided the impetus for
another major upward move by UK equities.
The Footsie 100 index burst through the 2,600 level, closing 54.8 up at
2,617.0, its best closing point since September 24 when the equity market
peaked after the Government took sterling out of the Exchange Rate
Mechanism.
Adding to a generally bullish mood in the markets was a feeling that the
Conservative government may have ridden out the political storm caused by
its pit closure plan, now much watered down by Mr Michael Heseltine,
president of the Board of Trade.
The hint of cuts in German interest rates were quickly picked up by the
foreign exchange markets where sterling rose sharply against the dollar and
the D-Mark and short sterling was indicating a downward shift to 7 per cent
interest rates.
Many observers are now forecasting an acceleration of interest rate cuts in
the UK after the latest set of economic data pointed to a deepening of the
recession. The smaller than expected rise in the money supply figures for
September, plus the weakest set of building society lending figures since
the recession began, were interpreted as a sign that there is no recovery.
One senior trader expected a re-run in the UK of the Wall Street phenomenon
of the past year; a weak economy to which the Federal Reserve responded with
a series of interest rate cuts, which in turn boosted the US stock market.
The market was on the move from the outset, responding to a good performance
by Wall Street and sterling's strength. The main thrust for the equity
market came from the derivatives markets, where the Footsie future powered
ahead to reach a 60-point premium over the cash market very early in the
day. The future maintained a 40-point premium throughout a very active
session in which heavy index arbitrage activity was a big feature.
Dealers said a growing expectation that the government will emerge intact
from the debate over pit closures was another bull point for the market.
Institutional buying was thin during the morning but picked up sharply
during the afternoon, with dealers reporting considerable interest from
overseas investors.
The Footsie 100 opened over 12 points higher and never looked back, bursting
through 2,600 in mid-session and reaching the day's peak of 2,617.5 before
dipping just before the close. A firm opening by Wall Street after the final
Presidential debate between the three candidates, gave a further fillip to
the market.
After yesterday's rise, even the most aggressive bulls expect the market to
attract profit-taking. More cautious strategists continue to point to the
fundamental weakness of the UK economy, the prospect of disappointing
earnings numbers and more downgrades.
Turnover picked up yesterday, reaching 631.1m shares, but the fragility of
the London market was underlined by news of more job losses in the
securities business; the London arm of Nomura, the Japanese stockbroking
firm, cut around 50 jobs yesterday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12309</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow loses early gains on
easier bond prices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
AFTER opening brightly on good news from the housing sector, US share prices
fell back yesterday in the wake of fresh declines in bond prices and some
program selling, writes Patrick Harverson in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was down 2.43 at 3,186.02,
compared to its morning peak when the index had been up more than 20 points.
The more broadly based Standard &amp; Poor's 500 finished up 0.51 at 415.49,
while the Amex composite ended up 2.86 at 371.40 and the Nasdaq composite
2.03 higher at 592.70. Turnover on the NYSE was heavy for the second
consecutive day at 256m shares.
Prices gained early strength from overnight gains in Tokyo and Europe, where
equities had firmed in anticipation of an interest rate cut by the
Bundesbank.
Wall Street was also cheered by an unexpectedly large 1.4 per cent rise in
September housing starts, a welcome piece of good news from the residential
property market. Sentiment was also helped by the fact that investors are
becoming used to the idea of a Clinton presidency. Monday night's final
presidential debate did little to change the dynamics of the election race,
and the market is increasingly convinced that Mr Bill Clinton will win in
November.
The same confidence in a Democratic victory, however, depressed bond prices,
sending the yield on the 30-year Treasury issue up above 7.6 per cent for
the first time since July. That, together with some program selling,
prompted the gradual decline in stock prices.
The dominant influence on trading was third quarter figures. Chrysler rose
Dollars  5/8 to Dollars 25 1/2 in turnover of 5m shares after reporting a
quarterly profit of Dollars 202m, up from a Dollars 82m loss a year ago and
inclusive of a special Dollars 101m charge to cover the restructuring of its
car rental operations. The figures boosted Ford, up Dollars 1 1/8 to Dollars
38 1/8 and General Motors, up Dollars  3/4 to Dollars 29 7/8 , both in heavy
trading.
Bank stocks were in the limelight. Citicorp firmed Dollars  1/4 to Dollars
15 1/8 in turnover of 1.6m shares after the banking group announced third
quarter profits of Dollars 116m after a restructur ing charge. Wells Fargo
rose Dollars  5/8 to Dollars 64 1/8 in spite of a 72 per cent decline in
quarterly income to Dollars 24m and a big increase in loan loss provisions
to Dollars 400m. Banc One rose Dollars 1 1/8 to Dollars 46 1/4 after
reporting net income of Dollars 186.2m in the third quarter, up sharply from
Dollars 140.4m in the year-ago period.
Compaq rose Dollars 1 1/8 to Dollars 39 5/8 in turnover of 3m shares after
the broking house Alex Brown upgraded the stock to 'buy' from 'neutral' in
the wake of the announcement from the company that it had made a profit of
Dollars 49.4m in the third quarter, a turnround from last year's Dollars
70.2m loss.
Canada
TORONTO stocks ended broadly higher in active dealings. The TSE 300
composite index gained 16.36 points, or 0.51 per cent, to end at 3,241.84.
Advancing issues topped declines 297 to 235.
Volume was 30.7m shares worth CDollars 283 against the previous 25.7m worth
CDollars 208m. Eleven of 14 sub-groups made gains.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12310</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Bundesbank's repo signal lifts
bourses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BOURSES seized on the Bundesbank's signal of a further decline at the short
end of the German fixed-interest market, via today's 'repo' tender, as an
indication of a cut in key interest rates by December, and share prices rose
accordingly, writes Our Markets Staff.
Meanwhile, the long end of the bond market surged again yesterday, with the
Bundesbank's average bond yield down another 10 basis points to 7.26 per
cent, a fall of 28 basis points since Friday.
FRANKFURT also liked the strength in the dollar as the DAX index rose 32.48
or 2.2 per cent to 1,511.55. German market turnover showed its first serious
increase in a fortnight, up from DM4.2bn to DM7.2bn.
Of the 30 shares in the DAX index, only one share declined. Volkswagen fell
DM1.50 to DM271.50 against a rise of DM16.80, or 3.6 per cent to DM482.80 in
BMW. There were reports that DB Research had cut its 1992 EPS forecast for
VW from DM8 to DM3 a share; but there was also a suggestion of profit-taking
since VW has recovered by DM25 or 10 per cent from its low of DM248 earlier
this month on the Warburg downgrading which, apparently, talked about nil
earnings this year.
Chemicals, big exporters, reflected the rise in the dollar. Hoechst which
put on DM9.80 or 4.3 per cent to 236.80. BASF was more sedate with a DM5
gain at DM215.50, and held it after hours although news of a cut in employee
bonuses appeared to substantiate outside forecasts of another dividend cut
this year.
PARIS rose 3.1 per cent in heavy volume of FFr3.2bn, also fanned by
expectations of lower interest rates and by the stronger dollar. The CAC-40
index added 52.20 to 1,731.26.
Three-month money market rates fell below 10 per cent for the first time
since the ERM turmoil to stand at 9 7/8 per cent, signalling a cut in
headline rates. But brokers said that the stock market had already
discounted a  1/4 -point cut and that foreigners were using the market's
strength to sell French holdings.
Interest rate-sensitive stocks benefited the most, with UAP rising FFr21.50
or 5.5 per cent to FFr411.50, Societe Generale FFr13 better at FFr550 and
Paribas up FFr14.90 to FFr325.90.
Trading in Avenir Havas resumed yesterday after the Consob approved Havas's
offer to buy out minorities in its outdoor advertising unit. Avenir Havas
was the day's biggest riser, adding FFr25.80 or 26.5 per cent to FFr123.
MILAN was optimistic on interest rates, and progress in passing the 1993
budget. Activity centred on privatisation stocks and dealers reported the
first evidence of foreign participation in the current rally. The CAC-40
index rose 5.0 or 1.2 per cent to 416.11.
The state-controlled food manufacturer and distributor, Sme, was in demand,
rising L263 or 6.4 per cent to L4,115. Elsewhere, Montedison rose L56 or 5.2
per cent to L1,129 on news that it was withdrawing its sponsorship of
sporting events as part of its cost-cutting exercise.
AMSTERDAM improved in line with neighbouring markets with internationals
assisted by the stronger dollar. The CBS Tendency index closed 1.5 higher at
105.5.
Hoogovens and Oce-van der Grinten continued Monday's declines with falls of
Fl 1.30 and Fl 1.70 respectively to Fl 29.70 and Fl 36.80. DAF, which denied
rumours that VW was interested in its van division, advanced 40 cents to Fl
13.30.
Banks and insurers were strongly traded with ABN Amro up Fl 1.20 to Fl
49.90, while Royal Dutch gained Fl 2.00 to Fl 145.60 and Unilever rose Fl
3.60 to Fl 187.00.
MADRID rose across the board in active trading inspired by hopes of lower
European interest rates. There was also a rumour of a further devaluation in
the peseta before the weekend, some analysts said. The general index closed
4.77 higher at 200.09.
The construction sector was strong, with Cubiertas and FCC each gaining more
than 10 per cent, up Pta360 and Pta650 respectively to Pta3,650 and
Pta6,950.
There was heavy volume in Telefonica, up Pta38 at Pta960 and Endesa, up
Pta180 at Pta3,140.
STOCKHOLM's Affarsvarlden General index rose 23.9 or 3.6 per cent to 684.2
in turnover of SKr308m after SKr503m. Monday's joint bid by Volvo and
Skanska to buy outstanding shares in the investment companies Custos and
Protorp helped Volvo B jump SKr11, or 4.9 per cent to SKr235 while Skanska
advanced SKr5.50, or 11.6 per cent to SKr53. OSLO's all-share index rose
13.48 to 347.24, Norsk Hydro rising NKr9 to NKr139 ahead of Monday's interim
figures.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE ACTUARIES SHARE INDICES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
October 20  THE EUROPEAN SERIES
Hourly changes
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                         Open    11.30     12.00    13.00
FT-SE Eurotrack 100   1018.37  1017.79   1017.90  1017.08
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1085.20  1083.69   1084.84  1083.76
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                       Oct 19    Oct 16   Oct 15
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100   1001.00    996.54    986.39
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1063.18   1066.23   1061.28
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                        14.00    15.00    16.00    Close
FT-SE Eurotrack 100   1022.06  1023.23  1021.00  1021.70
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1087.14  1087.30  1085.51  1090.40
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                       Oct 14    Oct 13
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100    992.09    999.62
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1074.77   1085.38
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90) High/day: 100 - 1023.77; 200 - 1090.40
Low/day: 100 - 1016.72 200 - 1082.42
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12311</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Stock Markets: South Korea tries to woo more foreign
investors - Measures to breathe life into one of Asia's worst performers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SEOUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
South Korea is forging ahead with plans to widen foreign ownership of shares
this autumn, but analysts in Seoul doubt whether the latest moves will be
sufficient to revitalise the stock market - one of the worst performers in
Asia this year.
Since the start of 1992, foreigners have been allowed to invest directly in
companies listed on the Seoul stock exchange. Most companies have a 10 per
cent ceiling on foreign ownership, with individual foreign investors allowed
no more than 3 per cent of the shares.
Although foreigners have not been been allowed to invest in certain
'strategic' companies, the authorities are gradually easing these
restrictions. Last Tuesday, shareholders in Pohang Iron and Steel (Posco),
the world's third largest steel group, voted in favour of allowing foreign
investors to own up to 8 per cent of the company. Next month, Korea Electric
Power (known as Kepco), the state-controlled electricity generator and
supplier, is also expected to allow foreign ownership of its shares.
Stock brokers reported only muted international interest in Posco's shares
last week after the restrictions had been lifted. Foreigners may have been
deterred by the fact that the world steel industry is having a difficult
time, brokers say. However, Kepco is expected to attract more attention from
foreign investors, given its monopoly position and the fact that it is in a
sector which is viewed more favourably by fund managers.
On top of these measures, foreign securities houses in Seoul hope that the
ministry of finance will raise the limits on ownership still further,
allowing foreigners to invest directly in up to 25 per cent of a company's
shares without needing to seek special approval.
Since the opening of the Korean stock market to direct foreign investment in
January this year, there has hardly been a stampede of foreign funds. Net
investment inflow from foreigners amounted to USDollars 997m, according to
the Securities Supervisory Board, well below expectations. International
investors have been deterred by the 10 per cent limit on ownership which
makes it difficult for large investors to buy 'reasonable' amounts - of
Dollars 5m or more.
A further opening of the market could provide a welcome shot in the arm for
Korean equities, which have dropped steadily over the last three-and-a-half
years. The composite index has tumbled from its high of 1,007.77 on April 1,
1989, to a low of 459.07 on August 21 this year. It has recovered slightly
since then, closing at 540.45 yesterday.
The market's doldrums reflect a number of concerns. Economic growth, which
exceeded 12 per cent a year between 1986 and 1988, slowed down considerably
in the late 1980s and is expected to be around 6 or 7 per cent in 1992.
Since the start of the 1990s, investors have been deterred by rising
inflation, high labour costs, high nominal interest rates, sluggish
corporate earnings growth, and deteriorating trade and current account
deficits.
The government has attempted, since the autumn of 1989, to reverse the
market's decline with a series of market-boosting measures. It set up a
market stabilisation fund with the express purpose of buying shares and
supporting stock prices.
In addition, the domestic investment trusts, banks, securities houses,
pension and insurance funds were instructed to buy shares, and according to
the latest package of market support measures - announced in August -
institutional investors must remain net buyers of stock.
The measures have been to almost no avail. With the domestic institutions
now sitting on an estimated Dollars 10-15bn in shares - out of a total stock
market capitalisation of around Dollars 70bn - due to these enforced market
support measures, some analysts predict that the upside to any recovery is
likely to be fairly limited. They fear that investors are likely to dump
shares as soon as the index reaches a threshold of around 800 to 850.
The more optimistic domestic stock brokers believe that the market will pick
up again once the presidential election - due in December - is out of the
way. With the appointment of a new president, the market should have a
clearer picture about the government's medium-term economic policy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12312</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARP gains in De Beers, Anglo American and Minorco contributed to a
58-point gain in the overall index to 3,000 in low volume. The gold index
climbed 50 to 849 and industrials were 31 higher at 3,967. De Beers rose R2
to R48.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12313</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Nikkei fails to close
above the 17,000 level
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SHARE prices ended marginally higher after index-linked buying by investment
trusts overcame selling by arbitrageurs, writes Emiko Terazono in Tokyo.
The Nikkei average closed 83.85 higher at 16,987.66 after a low of 16,821.36
and a high of 17,050.25. Volume rose slightly to 200m shares from 182m.
Declines led advances by 488 to 391 with 194 unchanged, the Topix index of
all first section stocks lost 2.12 to 1,290.87 and, in London, the
ISE/Nikkei 50 index rose 1.29 to 1,040.62.
Hopes of lower interest rates were fanned by lower money market rates. The
overnight uncollateralised call rate fell to 4.03 per cent yesterday, the
lowest since February, 1989.
However, some analysts expect only a limited easing in monetary policy. Mr
Peter Tasker, strategist at Kleinwort Benson, said that negative
fundamentals, such as the stagnant property market and lower corporate
profits, would weigh down share prices even if the official discount rate
were to be lowered. He added that the near-term ceiling for the Nikkei would
be 19,000.
Activity was also constrained by the September money supply figures, which
were announced after the market closed, indicating negative growth for the
first time ever.
Some interest rate-sensitive, large-capital issues were bought on hopes of
lower interest rates. Mitsubishi Heavy Industries, the most active stock of
the day, gained Y3 to Y553 and Nippon Steel gained Y4 to Y293. Power
utilities, also regarded as beneficiaries of lower rates, were in demand,
with Tokyo Electric Power rising Y10 to Y2,630.
Food companies, whose profits have not been affected by the economic
downturn so far, were firm. Kikkoman, the soy sauce maker, gained Y12 to
Y967, and House Food Industrial advanced Y20 to Y2,130.
Hyogo Bank, a regional bank in western Japan, which announced a
restructuring plan to deal with financial problems at its three non-bank
subsidiaries, plunged Y191 from Friday's close to Y559. Hyogo failed to
trade on Monday, due to a flood of sell orders.
In Osaka, the OSE average fell 48.11 to 18,661.56 in volume of 11.4m shares.
Roundup
AFTERNOON profit-taking took a number of markets in the region off their
day's highs yesterday.
HONG KONG's gains on Monday's appearance of the senior Chinese leader, Deng
Xiaoping, at the communist party congress in Beijing were wiped out by
afternoon selling and the Hang Seng index finished 1.40 lower at 6,088.51
after an intraday high of 6,167.02.
Selling began shortly after the Hang Seng broke above the record closing
high of 6,162.53 set in July, although brokers said many local investors
were taking profits ahead of Governor Chris Patten's visit to Beijing, where
he is expected to get a cold reception from Chinese officials angered by his
plans to expand democracy in the colony.
AUSTRALIA also finished off its highs, but still stronger on the day in
light trading led by technical support and futures activity. The All
Ordinaries index closed 9.3 higher at 1,426.9 in relatively low turnover of
ADollars 200.6m.
Despite a small upturn in world bullion prices, the golds index dropped 20.8
to 982.7, hit by political uncertainty and civil unrest in Papua New Guinea.
The joint owners of the Porgera gold mine suffered the most, with Placer
Pacific falling 14 cents to ADollars 1.86, Highland Gold losing 10 to 86
cents, although Renison finished steady at ADollars 3.50.
MANILA slid further on the Philippines power crisis, kidnappings and coup
rumours, the composite index losing 13.20 to 1,344.41. TAIWAN, however,
rescued itself from an earlier slump, the weighted index closing 10.34 lower
at 3,724.17 after a fall of 50 points at one stage.
BANGKOK was cheered by the resumption of trading in Bangkok Bank of
Commerce, which drew buying in other banks as the SET index rose 10.34, or
1.2 per cent to 878.68 in turnover of Bt8.3bn.
Bangkok Bank of Commerce, suspended by its management's request since
October 12, was the most active stock as it gained Bt2.50 to Bt29.50 in
turnover of Bt508m.
BOMBAY fell on arbitrage selling as the market re-opened after Friday's
brokers' boycott and Monday's closure for settlement work.
The BSE index fell 35.55 to 3,050.90 on reports that tax officials had
seized unaccounted assets worth Rs8bn, including shares worth Rs7.6bn, from
14 brokers raided last week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12314</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Money Markets: Focus on Germany
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
HINTS OF an early cut in German money market rates and a slightly stronger
pound influenced the easing of UK inter-bank rates yesterday.
The cash rate for three-month money dropped to 7 3/4 per cent from 8 1/16
per cent on Monday, suggesting further monetary relaxation soon after
Christmas.
The main interest yesterday was in Germany where the Bundesbank announced it
would conduct today's repurchase agreement at a variable, rather than a
fixed rate, to 'test the equilibrium of the market'.
Dealers took this as a sign that the Bundesbank no longer intends to stand
in the way of a market-led move to lower interest rates. Recently the market
has been pushing for easier rates through lower German call money rates
which were yesterday quoted at between 8.85 per cent and 8.95 per cent
compared with 8.95 per cent on Monday.
But for the last two weeks the Bundesbank has offered banks securities
repurchase funds at 8.90 per cent.
Under a variable rate tender, the banks bid the rates themselves, but the
Bundesbank sets a cut-off point, below which it is not prepared to accept
offers. The extent to which the German central bank is happy to see money
rates ease, will be known this morning after the tender is announced.
The rate at which repurchase agreements are tendered should now become the
key figure to watch for enlightenment on German monetary policy.
'In an era of falling rates the ceiling, or Lombard rate, becomes much less
important than the rates on repurchase agreements,' said Mr Nick Parsons of
the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce. 'The Bundesbank prefers a clear gap
between the repo rates and the Lombard rate.'
The sterling futures market moved to discount monetary easing by the UK
authorities, even more aggressively than on Monday. The December contract
closed at 93.07.
The day's shortage was Pounds 1.75bn. Bank of England operations included
three repurchase agreements without which, according to one dealer, the Bank
would have been unable to relieve the shortage. It provided late assistance
of Pounds 655m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12315</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Big gains against D-Mark
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMMA TUCKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE D-MARK weakened against most of the important currencies as speculation
about monetary easing in Germany intensified, writes Emma Tucker.
The announcement by the Bundesbank that it was switching to a variable,
rather than a fixed rate, repurchase tender was taken as a sign that the
German central bank was happy to see money market rates ease.
The news sent the dollar sharply higher in frantic European trading, leading
some traders to suggest that the US currency was finally recovering from its
position as the lowest yielding key international currency.
'The dollar is at long last firmly established on an upward path. It is
likely to make a sustained break above DM1.52,' said Mr Avinash Persaud,
senior currency economist at UBS Phillips &amp; Drew.
Although the main push to the dollar came from the easing of German money
rates, poor economic data from Japan - suggesting rates would ease there too
 -also helped buoy the currency. The view that a victory by Mr Bill Clinton
in the US presidential election might caution the Federal Reserve against
further rate cuts also contributed to the dollar's better performance.
It closed in London at DM1.5195, up 3 1/2 pfennigs on the day. In early New
York trading the currency continued to make gains. It popped above DM2.52
before settling just below that level in mid-day trading.
The move by the Bundesbank to variable repurchase rates also helped boost
the pound. But dealers said the currency's gains would be short lived and
said sterling would continue to fluctuate.
'The D-Mark's weakness was very helpful to the pound but it is still very
volatile. People will continue to find reasons to sell the pound,' said Mr
Mark Brett of Barclays de Zoete Wedd.
Poor money supply data - in particular the news that individuals and
companies made a net repayment of loans to banks and building societies last
month for the time since records started 28 years ago - also reminded the
market of the UK's weak economic outlook and hence the likelihood of further
base rate cuts.
Dealers were, however, a little more sanguine about the political outlook in
the UK. They no longer expect the government to be defeated in today's
debate on the future of the coal industry, following its partial U-turn on
the decision to close 31 pits.
Sterling closed in London at DM2.4700 up five pfennigs on the day. It
slipped  2/3 of a cent against the dollar to close in London at Dollars
1.6255.
Tentative signs of recovery among weaker European currencies were also aided
by the signs of monetary relaxation in Germany.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12316</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Checkland says Hussey is too old to lead the BBC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SIR Michael Checkland, the BBC director-general, yesterday accused his
chairman, Mr Marmaduke Hussey, of being too old to lead the corporation into
the next century.
In an unprecedented public attack, for which he later apologised, Sir
Michael, who leaves the BBC in February, said the government had been wrong
to give the chairman a second five-year term. 'It is a mistake to have a
chairman of this organisation for 10 years. That is a mistake. I believe
that when you are leading the BBC into the next century at the age of 73 it
is bizarre,' Sir Michael told the leaders of the UK broadcasting industry at
a Royal Television Society conference.
Last year Mr Hussey, now 69, became the first BBC chairman to win a second
term. The director-general, who is 56 and who was given only a one-year
extension to his five-year contract, added that at a time of rapid change
younger leadership was needed.
'When we are talking about FM (radio) I want to be talking about frequency
modulation not fuzzy monsters,' Sir Michael said in an interview session at
the conference with broadcaster Jon Snow.
Later Sir Michael said one governor was already over 70 and two others were
approaching it. 'There should be a wider range of governors and a wider age
range,' he added. He wanted governors who had FM radios and satellite
dishes. The row over Radio 4 being broadcast only on FM to make way for a
24-hour news service on long wave has been fuelled by elderly people not
having FM radios.
Sir Michael also criticised Mr Hussey for the way the handover to his
successor, Mr John Birt, the deputy director-general, had been handled.
'It is a most ludicrous way to operate, in my view, to have a 21-month
handover. If the changeover had happened this autumn that would have been
more orderly,' said Sir Michael, who insisted he had no policy differences
with Mr Birt.
Sir Michael, in a later statement apologising for his remarks, said: 'It was
certainly not my intention to make a personal attack. I have apologised to
the chairman and expressed my regret if it was seen as that.'
Mr Michael Grade, the 49-year old chief executive of Channel 4, once
described by Mr Hussey as 'a Bourbon in red braces' commented after the
conference that a 10-year term gave a BBC chairman too much power of
patronage. Mr Grade did not think, however, that Mr Hussey was too old.
'I've got an 85-year old uncle (Lord Lew Grade) who is very active,' he
said.
A green paper on the future of the BBC is expected next month.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12317</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Bonn snubs Eurofighter plan: Defence minister rejects UK
suggestion of cheaper aircraft
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WHITE, Defence Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY stood firm yesterday in its determination to scrap the four-nation
European Fighter Aircraft project in spite of industry estimates that
production costs could be cut by 20 per cent.
Mr Volker Ruhe, German defence minister, dismissed suggestions by his UK
counterpart, Mr Malcolm Rifkind, that Bonn might still opt for a revised
version of the Pounds 20bn EFA. 'The aircraft will not be built,' he said.
Bonn wants the other partners to agree to switch EFA funding to a new
aircraft, and in the meantime to slow down development work. But Mr Ruhe
made clear last night he was not seeking to build an aircraft without
Britain.
Budget pressures in all four countries were working in favour of Germany's
arguments, he said, adding: 'I don't think the streets of Birmingham are
plated with gold and silver.'
He questioned whether Britain's coalminers would understand the need for
continuing the EFA project.
Mr Ruhe and Mr Rifkind avoided the subject when they met for breakfast
before a Nato ministerial meeting yesterday at Gleneagles, in Tayside,
Scotland.
The industrial consortium developing the aircraft sent its confidential
study on possible cost savings to the four governments at the end of last
week.
Mr Rifkind, describing the study as 'most encouraging', said it indicated
that costs could be lowered by some 12 per cent by rationalising production
arrangements. Removing some of the aircraft's capabilities could increase
this to 20 per cent, he said. UK industry representatives said the savings
could go as high as 30 per cent.
Spain, the junior partner alongside Germany, Britain and Italy, indicated it
would support going ahead on the basis of a 30 per cent reduction.
However, Mr Julian Garcia Vargas, its defence minister, said production
would need to be stretched out because of budgetary constraints. Spain said
last week it was committed to keeping a four-nation programme and wanted to
make the most of the Pounds 5bn already invested in EFA. But production
should be delayed 'by some years'.
Defence ministers are expected to decide on the future of the project in
early December.
The German minister said yesterday he had not seen the re-sults of the
industrial study, but
there were 'differences of conception' with Britain, especially over the
need for a fighter to undertake overseas missions. Germany sought 'a
European fighter, not a world fighter', he said.
Mr Rifkind suggested cost cuts might still be possible if Germany and one or
both of the other partners quit the project.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12318</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Ministers relent on town hall tendering
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MINISTERS are preparing to soften their approach to extending compulsory
competitive tendering to local authority white-collar services because of
the difficulty in devising a sensible way of taking account of the quality
of work.
The move will mark an abandonment of the scheme set out in a government
consultation paper last year, which proposed a 'quality threshold' for
tendering in areas such as architectural and engineering services.
That suggestion came in for widespread criticism, not least from the
relevant professional organisations.
Officials now argue that while these services should still be subject to
compulsory tendering, the government should not attempt to impose a
'straitjacket' on how local authorities carry out the process.
'We are moving to a less dirigiste policy,' one Whitehall insider said
yesterday.
The original proposal was a 'double envelope' system, under which unpriced
tenders were initially considered against a pre-set quality threshold,
followed by a further evaluation, so the lowest-priced tender was
automatically accepted from those meeting or exceeding the threshold.
Ministers are keen that the step back from specifying how quality should be
addressed should not be seen as diluting their commitment to extending
competitive tendering.
They are determined that April 1994 will remain the date after which any new
work will be carried out by in-house staff only if it has been won in
competition.
In private, however, officials admit that, unless the government insists on
a detailed procedure, the scope for a council which does not want to
contract out professional services to continue to award work to in-house
tenders is so great that much of the policy's impact will be lost.
The Department of the Environment has already experienced similar problems
with the introduction of compulsory tendering to blue-collar services, where
standards are easier to define.
Mr Michael Howard, the environment secretary, will announce the revised
approach early next month, when MPs have their first chance to debate the
bill dealing with housing reforms and setting up the urban regeneration
agency.
The legislation includes the extension of tendering to local councils'
housing management, which will not be affected by this shift of emphasis.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12319</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / The Lex Column: Hammerson
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
There is nothing much wrong with capitalising interest or booking profits
from property trading in a bull market. But, as dividend cuts from Slough
Estates in August and now Hammerson illustrate, they encourage a false sense
of security when times get tough. Those investors who calculated cover on
the basis of stated earnings in earlier years were, frankly, deluding
themselves. Trading profits are now virtually extinct, and, as Hammerson's
action yesterday effectively acknowledges, the growth in future rental
income (needed to offset the impact of higher financing costs as the
development programme comes to an end) is highly uncertain.
That said, Hammerson deserves credit for following up last year's big New
York write-downs with a realistic approach to the dividend. There are also
signs of efforts to change the portfolio mix. On the face of it, the shares
look cheap at a 60 per cent discount to prospective net assets. Perhaps old
valuation techniques, though, are as dangerous as some traditional
accounting principles.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12320</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / The Lex Column: Wolseley
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The world's biggest plumbing distributor has every right to be considered a
household name. But it may astonish many to learn that Wolseley's market
capitalisation yesterday overtook Blue Circle's, and that it is now second
only in size to Redland in the UK building materials sector.
Last year's 14 per cent surge in pre-tax profits and 13 per cent rise in
earnings per share was a remarkable showing. It left the chairman almost
apologetic as analysts scurried to upgrade their forecasts for the current
year. Far more embarrassing, though, is the position of other companies as
they trot out the old excuses about recession and depressed markets.
Wolseley in its quiet way appears to have demonstrated that a class
management act can buck even the most dreadful trends.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12321</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / The Lex Column: Greenalls
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Since Greenalls has no large acquisition to finance, coming to the market
under current volatile conditions is a little strange. Indeed, the need to
tread gingerly is highlighted by the way its modest one-for-five rights
issue is pitched at an 18 per cent discount to Monday's closing price.
Perhaps the company was unwilling to see gearing rise further and so felt
constrained in its piecemeal pub purchase programme. Or the deal may have as
much to do with restoring interest cover to a more comfortable 3.5 times as
it has with providing ammunition for Greenalls to use against distressed
sellers of hotels and pubs. But shareholders might have liked to know what
they were buying before pulling out their chequebooks.
Whatever the timing considerations, investors have to judge the management's
strategy. The decision to pull out of brewing was sensible, given Greenalls'
lacklustre beers. Improving the quality of the pub estate also seems to have
helped margins, though the capital expenditure involved may continue to
drain cash from the group. But tactics in the hotel chain are more
questionable. Poor conditions in the three-star middle market are scant
justification for expanding in the four- and five-star area during a
recession. The company, and its shareholders, should be cautious.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12322</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / The Lex Column: UK borrowing
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The original objective behind the government's foreign currency borrowing
programme announced in September - the defence of sterling within the ERM -
has long since been abandoned. Still, there are compelling reasons for
yesterday's DM5.5bn bond issue. The Bundesbank has to be repaid for its
intervention before long. Buying that many D-Marks in the market would be
risky. Besides, the intervention would then no longer count towards PSBR
funding - a promise in which the gilts market has invested a great deal of
faith.
September's money supply figures tend to confirm market estimates of
intervention in the region of Pounds 12bn-Pounds 15bn. Since UK foreign
exchange reserves fell by Pounds 4bn in September, the Treasury would thus
appear to owe around Pounds 8bn to foreign central banks - the Bundesbank
chief among them.
Little wonder the Treasury was eager to jump the queue of sovereign
borrowers waiting to take advantage of exceptional demand for DM bonds. The
UK is paying a fractionally lower interest rate on its five-year issue than
in the gilts market. A longer maturity would have resulted in greater
relative saving to the government. But it obviously lacks the courage to
take a long-term bet on the performance of sterling against the D-Mark.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12323</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / The Lex Column: Small mercies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
There can no longer be any doubt that the Bundesbank is interested in an
easier policy. Yesterday's switch to a variable rate tender system for money
market liquidity was accompanied by scarcely-veiled hints that it wants to
nudge short-term rates down a further notch. Events in the real economy
certainly provide some motivation despite double digit money supply growth.
The Bundesbank must know that recession in west Germany would make it even
harder to bail out the east. The risk is that outsiders - including UK
equity investors - will jump to the erroneous conclusion that speedy
official rate cuts are imminent.
The Bundesbank has not entirely recovered from the way it was manipulated
into cutting its Lombard rate last month. For the time being it does not
want to be seen to be taking the initiative by lowering official rates.
Admittedly the anticipation of lower rates next year may continue to weaken
the D-Mark, adding to the scope for non-inflationary rate cuts in the UK and
elsewhere. Yet, one wonders whether the prospect of another 10 to 15 basis
points off German money market rates warranted yesterday's 54.8 jump in the
FT-SE.
Talk of steep cuts in UK rates has, after all, been around for some time.
But it has been inspired by the dismal outlook for growth, underlined again
yesterday by the Pounds 700m September drop in bank lending. Recovery
prospects also depend heavily on how far the authorities avoid offsetting
lower rates with tighter fiscal policy. Insofar as the Bundesbank's stance
underpins sterling, it will make a large PSBR that much easier to finance
with overseas money.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12324</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Observer: How do, pardner?
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A puff of white smoke from the boardroom of Goldman Sachs and one of Wall
Street's most discreet competitions has been decided.
Every two years the world's most profitable private investment bank anoints
another clutch of multi-millionaire partners and the latest batch has just
been announced.
How the 123-year-old partnership chooses its partners is one of Wall
Street's best-kept secrets. Gavyn Davies, the ubiquitous London economist
whose wife has gone to work for shadow chancellor Gordon Brown, is a
partner, as is his side-kick and fellow-economist, David Morrison.
But Bob Hormats, vice chairman of Goldman Sachs International and an even
bigger figure on the international policy circuit, is not.
The current crop of 35 new partners includes a son and a nephew of John
Weinberg, the firm's senior chairman, and two women. But beyond that, the
firm is rather shy about disclosing the age, colour and nationality of its
new partners - who can probably expect to make between Dollars 2m and
Dollars 4m a year after they have bought their way in.
And if they reach the top they can make megabucks. It has been reported, for
example, that Robert Rubin and Stephen Friedman, the bank's two co-chairmen,
earned more than Dollars 15m apiece last year.
Once upon a time there was a 50:50 chance that a hard-working young banker
would become a Goldman partner. Now the firm has 7,000 staff and just 167
general partners.
By contrast S G Warburg, which earns less than a third of Goldman's
estimated Dollars 1bn plus a year, has over 300 directors and a mere 5,000
staff.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12325</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Observer: Bankers' lore
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
It's hard to better a banker when it comes to putting a cheerful gloss on
bad news.
Hence yesterday's press release from Nomura, announcing 50 job losses, was
headed 'Nomura makes strategic adjustments'. Someone answering to the name
Kafka was handling the matter.
Meanwhile, a colleague has just received the following letter from his
NatWest bank manager: 'The Bank has recently completed a study of its
representation locally with a view to improving the quality of service
offered to all its customers in Bexleyheath.
As a result, it has been decided to close this branch on November 13 and
merge the business with our Bexleyheath Clock Tower branch. . .'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12326</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Observer: Nerves of steel
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
It takes quite a lot to disturb the semi-retired former shadow foreign
secretary, Gerald Kaufman, these days. Nonetheless, Michael Heseltine has
pricked him into action. In his desperate efforts to repair the damage of
the biggest industrial U-turn in decades, the president of the Board of
Trade has contrasted his flexible behaviour with the iniquitousness of
Labour at the time of the 1979 shutdown of British Steel's Corby mill.
Why hadn't Labour done something to help the victims of that decision? asked
Hezza.
Kaufman, who was Labour's industry minister in 1979, notes that his party
lost power in May that year, and Corby wasn't shut down until November.
He's awaiting an apology.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12327</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Observer: Picking a new president
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Among the many European decisions that John Major has to make over the next
few months, picking the next president of the European Investment Bank is
unlikely to be high on his agenda. But it would be a pity if the job falls
into the hands of another faceless bureaucrat.
After all, it is not every year that Britain gets to choose the boss of a
leading international financial institution. And since an Italian, Frenchman
and a German have done the EIB job, it is about time that the controls of
the biggest borrower in the Euromarkets were handed over to someone who
knows what it's like to be heavily in debt.
Ernst-Gunther Broder, who took over the EIB presidency from Yves Le Port in
1984, has turned 65 and wants to go as soon as a successor is found. The
front-runner is Sir Brian Unwin, 57, chairman of Britain's Customs and
Excise. He's worked in the Foreign Office and the Treasury, but he doesn't
have Broder's private-sector experience.
No doubt he is an excellent administrator but perhaps the EIB could do with
someone with a bit more charisma. The Americans picked one of their best
bankers, J P Morgan's Lew Preston, to head the World Bank, and the French
chose a man of ideas, Jacques Attali, to run the EBRD.
How about ex-Labour leader Neil Kinnock? It would be a nice consolation
prize for not getting the EC commissioner's job and he would certainly raise
the EIB's profile.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12328</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Letter: Economy that is in need of unorthodox remedies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr CHRISTOPHER DOW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I write out of increasing concern at the economic state of the country.
Day by day it seems clearer that the prospect before us is not economic
recovery, but indefinite, perhaps deepening, recession. So far the
government has hoped that the problem would go away, that recovery would
come of its own accord and that it would not itself be called on seriously
to act. But now, it seems, all of us - government and people  - face a new
situation. Increasing numbers face the debasement of forced idleness, the
hardship of relative poverty and sometimes, it needs to be recognised,
hunger. This trend can be, and should be, reversed.
It is possible that there will be further reductions of interest rates. But
that cannot, I think, prove to be enough. European interest rates are likely
to come down only slowly. That means we cannot go far without undermining
the exchange rate, and accelerating inflation to a prohibitive degree.
Second, low interest rates alone, as experience shows, are unable to revive
a demoralised economy.
I would therefore raise the question whether remedies now unorthodox and out
of fashion should be seriously considered. As examples of the kind of
measures I have in mind, temporary tax reliefs (to be reversed later) might
be made as an immediate step; and plans might be prepared for a large
increase in infrastructure investment, sufficient to add 1 or 2 per cent to
GDP. The mere announcement of such a policy would do good.
Many will call this approach 'jump-starting the economy' (which is what it
needs) or Keynesian (which is also true); and monetarists will deplore it.
(But where has that thinking got us?) The important question is whether it
would work. The arguments against it are untested and ideological; none is
enough to rule it out for use at times when most needed. Now, I suggest, is
one of them. There is no doubt that if we were to be involved in even a
moderate war, there would be full employment within a short while. I am not
of course saying that we want war. But there are many things we do want such
as better roads, better railways and better cities, where we are
progressively falling below European standards. This would equally create
employment.
I am well aware that there are questions about financing. I would advocate
doing everything to reduce the charge on the public budget by choosing mixed
public/private investment programmes, of which toll roads are one example.
Planning would be flexible, capable of maintaining, if needed, a large
expenditure for several years; or, if not, capable of being tapered off. As
and when the economy recovered, the public finances would benefit from a
restored tax base.
I cannot go into detail, but confine myself to urging the need for a new
approach, and for arguing its general practicality. I feel confident that,
undertaken boldly, such a plan - which is not out of line with what other
countries do - would be effective. I am confident, too, that if properly
presented, most of the electorate would welcome it with relief and
gratitude.
Christopher Dow,
The Reform Club,
London SW1
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12329</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Letter: Competition not all in electricity
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Dr SIMON TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Your editorial, 'Mr Major's medium term ' (October 19), again refers to
an 'inadequately competitive electricity industry'. The implication that
competition solves all is perhaps a little optimistic.
While nobody could plausibly claim that the generation industry structure is
optimal, the market power of National Power and PowerGen has been used on
the fuel purchasing side to reduce variable costs. In future the companies
will use their scale to drive a good bargain over imported coal. So long as
these economies are mostly passed on to consumers, which Offer's continuing
monitoring will ensure, then the end user is arguably better off than in an
industry with several smaller generators.
More generally, the experience of the privatised and (partially) deregulated
electricity industry seems to suggest that the system is highly effective in
what one might call static efficiency terms, that is reduced costs and
optimising plant availability, given the existing plant structure.
Where it is rather less successful is in dynamic efficiency - the planning
of new plants in future. The market is not a particularly good instrument
for making co-ordinated decisions in an industry with 15-year time horizons,
environmental constraints, government intervention (nuclear power), and
where the costs of getting it wrong have macroeconomic consequences.
There are limits to what one can expect from a market-based system when it
has to operate so tightly constrained by political considerations.
Simon Taylor,
fellow in economics,
St Catherine's College,
Cambridge CB2 1RL
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12330</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Foreign Affairs: Blind eye to the Balkans - Unless the west
finds the will for stronger action, Serbian gains are likely to be
legitimised
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EDWARD MORTIMER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Back in August, the horror of Yugoslavia seemed to overshadow the whole
European scene.
The European Community's inability to stop it was widely adduced as one of
the reasons for the general disillusionment with European union, reflected
in the rise of the No camp in the French referendum campaign.
In Britain, the situation in Bosnia was given as the official reason why Mr
John Major interrupted his holiday in Spain, returning to London for a
special cabinet meeting. People in the Foreign Office actually worried that
public opinion might force their political masters into military
intervention against their better judgment. (Well, against their judgment,
anyway.)
Those days seem far away. How Mr Major must wish that pressure to intervene
in Bosnia was the only public opinion he had to worry about. The EC in
general, and its British president in particular, have given such ample
proof of their inability to control events much nearer home that their
impotence in Yugoslavia is no longer noticed.
The inattentive newspaper reader might almost imagine that the fighting had
at last died down, or even that the London conference, with its Geneva
follow-up, had succeeded. But the attentive radio listener will have picked
up increasingly desperate complaints from UN officials about the slowness of
the relief operation and the probability, rapidly hardening into certainty,
that thousands of children will die of cold and hunger in Sarajevo this
winter.
The inhabitants of Sarajevo are mostly still without power, water or
telephone links. Power was restored to hospitals and the bakery on Sunday,
but the shelling of the flour mill on the same day meant that by Monday
night the bakery had nothing left to bake.
The news is confusing. Early on Monday morning there was something like a
dress rehearsal for a coup in Belgrade against Yugoslav president Dobrica
Cosic, who on Friday had called for the resignation of Serbian president
Slobodan Milosevic. Serbian police loyal to Mr Milosevic seized control of
the federal Interior Ministry. Senior army commanders are said to be loyal
to Mr Cosic. A showdown between him and Mr Milosevic, his one-time ally, may
well be imminent.
On Monday night in Geneva Mr Cosic reached agreement with the Bosnian
president, Mr Alija Izetbegovic, on a thoroughly sensible solution to the
Bosnian conflict: the siege of Sarajevo would be lifted; the city
demilitarised; the paramilitary units disbanded; and Bosnia and Yugoslavia
would recognise each other, the former adopting a decentralised constitution
but not being divided into ethnically pure cantons. On the contrary, 'ethnic
cleansing' would be reversed and refugees allowed to return to their homes.
The trouble is that the two men are contested leaders of highly problematic
states. Mr Izetbegovic's Bosnia-Hercegovina is recognised by the
international community but his real authority extends at best to Sarajevo
itself and the remaining Moslem-held enclaves. His Serb adversaries, of
course, ignore his authority but so in practice do his nominal Croat allies,
who take their orders from Zagreb.
Mr Cosic's Yugoslavia, composed of Serbia and Montenegro, was invented in
the spring in an attempt by Serbia to claim continuity with the old Yugoslav
federation and so win international legitimacy. In this it has so far
failed. Mr Cosic officially disclaims any role for his country in the
Bosnian fighting, promising only to press the Bosnian Serbs to comply with
earlier agreements. Whether this new agreement turns out to mean anything
more than previous ones depends first on the power struggle within Serbia
and secondly on the degree of leverage the winner of that struggle can exert
over the Bosnian Serbs.
Meanwhile, there have been ominous stirrings in Kosovo, long identified as
the probable next theatre of war. This struggle would pit the Serbian
government against the local Albanian majority, now set on separatism and
likely to be supported by its kith and kin both in Albania proper and in
neighbouring Macedonia. In the most alarming scenario this would lead to a
full internationalisation of the conflict, with Bulgaria and even Greece
being drawn in.
Faced with such complexities, and preoccupied with its own problems, western
Europe is inclined to leave Yugoslavia to Lord Owen and Mr Cyrus Vance to
sort out. But however great the political and diplomatic skills of those two
gentlemen, they can do little other than negotiate a gradual acceptance of
what force has achieved, unless the international community provides
countervailing force on the other side. It is splendid that Mr Cosic has
agreed to the reversal of ethnic cleansing and the return of refugees to
their homes, but does anyone seriously imagine the local Serb militia will
permit this unless forced to do so? What we shall see in practice is the
consolidation of the Serb fait accompli, unless external powers have the
will to impose a Serb retreat.
The right way to deal with Mr Cosic is surely to take him at his word. He
and his prime minister, Mr Milan Panic, say Yugoslavia is not a party to the
war in Bosnia, and that it is willing to observe human and minority rights
in Kosovo as defined by the Conference on Security and Co-operation in
Europe (CSCE). Mr Panic has repeatedly asked for international observers on
the Yugoslav side of the borders with Bosnia and Albania, and at Yugoslav
air bases; and for monitors to verify the treatment of Albanians in Kosovo.
Why does the UN not respond to this request, if only to test the reality of
Mr Panic's authority? If Serbia co-operates with such missions, the
sanctions could be lifted - which would greatly increase Mr Panic's prestige
and strengthen his position vis-a-vis Mr Milosevic. If not, the sanctions
would have to be maintained, and more seriously enforced.
Within Bosnia, the UN must take swifter and more forceful action to ensure
that supplies reach the beleaguered population, not only in Sarajevo but in
Bihac and the other enclaves. That does mean a larger UN force, not confined
by an artificial neutrality but explicitly mandated to fight its way through
if it encounters resistance. No more time should be wasted securing
undertakings from Mr Radovan Karadzic, the Bosnian Serb leader, which
experience has shown are invariably ignored by his forces on the ground. The
no-fly zone should be enforced, and UN troops should be provided with air
cover from Nato countries if they come under artillery fire. Above all, the
Bosnians should be allowed weapons to defend themselves and their homes.
Otherwise, if it is demonstrated that such problems can be 'solved' by
imposed transfers of population, two consequences will follow. First, other
states in central and eastern Europe will resort to the same methods.
Romania and Slovakia will be tempted to expel their Hungarians, Estonia and
Latvia their Russians and so on, until the states receiving the flows of
refugees resort in their turn to force and send troops across the frontier.
Second, the Bosnian Moslems will become the Palestinians of Europe, probably
resorting to terrorism and in any case acting as the focus of anti-European
feeling throughout the Moslem world, where it is already believed that
Europe has acquiesced in their fate because it does not wish to have a
Moslem state on European soil.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12331</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Letter: Intervention needed in construction
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ALLAN F COLLINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I have been reading with growing despair the projections and
assessments made for the construction sector in your newspaper.
The situation may be even more serious than most commentators realise. The
points that are regularly overlooked are the leading roles played by the
specialist engineering sub-contractors and the levels of liability imposed
on them by the rest of the construction industry.
The construction site of today is run by a small management team, the site
skills belong to the sub-contract specialists. Clients should be aware that
these 'providers' are close to collapse.
Using the 'plastic mac' theory clients and contractors pass down onerous
warranties. These are being signed by companies which are unlikely to
survive as recent receiverships prove. Far better properly to select the
specialist and pay a fair rate for the work, thereby protecting the future
integrity of the warranty.
The president of the Board of Trade has confirmed his interventionist
tendency; for the ranks of construction specialists he may be too late. We
urgently need intervention to promote activity. This could be by
reintroducing 100 per cent capital allowances on new industrial buildings,
action on the infrastructure programme and help to building materials
suppliers with export potential.
Allan F Collins,
president,
British Constructional
Steelwork Association,
4 Whitehall Court,
London SW1A 2ES
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12332</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Letter: A strategy for UK that may not be ideal, but is best
alternative
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr CHRISTOPHER HASKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Your leader, 'A government on the run' (October 20), eloquently exposes
the haplessness of the government's position and proclaims the need for an
overall economic strategy.
But what strategy? Like many of us, you supported membership of the ERM.
This failed because Britain's economy, as well as its political leaders,
were weaker than we had thought. Now we are heading for depression or slump.
A radical new strategy is required which should be along the following
lines:
a rejection of Thatcherite economics, whether practised by Lord Howe or
Lawson;
a rapid reduction of interest rates towards the rate of inflation:
the maintenance, if not expansion, of public sector capital programmes;
a freeze on public sector wages;
a target of no more than 2 per cent increases for private sector wages.
This approach might well lead to a further weakening of sterling, with
serious inflationary consequences. To counter this, the government must be
prepared to restore personal taxes to the pre-1988 levels in order to help
finance the public sector borrowing. It must also return to a policy of
industrial consensus, by sitting down with business and union leaders and
agreeing a common approach on wage restraint and the protections of jobs.
Positively, these policies will have several immediate benefits:
the reduction in interest rates will ease the discomfort of heavily borrowed
house owners;
the reduction will encourage industry to invest and create employment;
the weakened currency will create opportunities both for exporters and for
companies such as my own to tackle import substitution;
in the short term the rising trend in unemployment will inhibit inflationary
wage settlements.
These are not ideal policies and are certainly difficult for a Conservative
government to adopt, but in the prevailing atmosphere of despair and
uncertainty there does not appear to be a coherent alternative approach.
Christopher Haskins,
chairman,
Northern Foods,
Beverley House,
St Stephen's Square,
Hull,
E Yorkshire HU1 3XG
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12333</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Observer: Dear me
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
As the hunting season opens in Colorado, 'game processing stations' are
touting for business.
One, near Pagosa Springs, is called The Buck Stops Here.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12334</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Observer: Turmoil analysis
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Having difficulty getting in touch with your favourite investment analyst?
Don't despair. Ring Paris. Likely as not he or she will be attending this
week's biennial congress of the European Federation of Financial Analysts'
Societies.
The last time the French hosted the event was bang in the middle of a
financial crisis - the 1974 oil shock. This time the turmoil on the foreign
exchange markets has pushed French short-term interest rates up to crisis
levels.
However, Jean-Guy de Wael, EFAS chairman and Paribas' research supremo,
denies that Paris is jinxed as a site for such gatherings.
He's confident that more than 700 of Europe's 10,000 analysts will put in an
appearance, including a contingent from Hungary, the first east European
nation to be admitted to membership of the federation.
After all, what self-respecting analyst would turn down the chance of
sitting through presentations by 33 of the 40 constituent companies of the
CAC 40 stock market index.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12335</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Just as the enthusiasm among current affairs producers for programmes about
child sex abuse seems to be waning they have come up with a new horror to
appal us: abuse of the elderly.
Dispatches (9.00 C4) has commissioned a report from the Office Of
Population, Censuses and Surveys which, they claim, 'reveals that as many as
3 million people over the age of 60 are at risk'. We shall have to see what
is meant by 'at risk', but the forms of abuse, we are told, range from
kicking to rape.' I wish I liked the human race, I wish I liked its silly
face ..'
Having watched the first two episodes of BBC2's drama Downtown Lagos and, as
puzzled as everyone else I have spoken to, I shall monitor the final episode
(9.25) to see whether they can tie off all the ends or whether it will all
turn out to be a dream.
Michael Palin seeks to repeat the tremendous success of his 'Around The
World In 80 Days' series with another set of travel documentaries. This time
he goes Pole To Pole in eight programmes, travelling as nearly as possible
down the 30 degrees east line of longitude. The opening episode (9.30) takes
him from the north pole to Russia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12336</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Arts: Breakfast today, peak time tomorrow . . . - Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Only last month I said in this column that, instead of perpetually
condemning television for its worst examples of mass produced rubbish, we
should treat the medium as we do other things, from painting to clothing,
and judge it by its best. I argued that the proportion of good to bad in
television was probably about the same as in the print or prepared food
industries, yet whereas the chattering classes and 'Eating Out' columns
concentrate exclusively on top restaurants, ignoring burger bars and pizza
parlours, and the literary pages disregard tabloid newspapers and pulp
romance to dwell on biography and major novels, television is routinely
condemned for the ghastliness of its game shows and soap operas.
The truth of that argument has surely not changed in the last six weeks, but
the strength of it looks more and more doubtful as British television, and
especially commercial television, scrambles faster and faster down market.
Anyone seeking to defend television's reputation on the grounds that there
is still a remarkable quantity of admirable programming has had his work cut
out as expanding areas of the old schedules succumb to material which is
either cheap and mindless or cheap and imported.
Until yesterday the schedule planned by ITV for London viewers tonight was a
strikingly awful example. The oldest of all the tabloid-telly series, This
Is Your Life at 7.00, is followed by the oldest soap opera on British
television, Coronation Street, and then - between 8.00 pm and 2.45 in the
morning - the idea was to have three old movies filling 5 hours 35 minutes:
Three Days Of The Condor, Amityville II and The Beast In The Cellar. Forty
minutes is devoted to news and weather at 10.00 and, all too fittingly, at
12.35 there is a half-hour programme called Hollywood Report which threatens
'behind the scenes reports and interviews with the stars'. Now they have
dropped the first film in order to show yet another football match .
Of course Thames Television has lost its franchise and may be feeling like
the man forced to work out his notice in a confectionery factory (anyone
want two tons of peppermint rock with 'Sod off' written down the middle?)
But anybody who imagines that the proportion of high quality material on ITV
is likely to go up in January has not been keeping an ear to the industry
grapevine. Anyway, London Weekend has not lost its franchise, yet look at
its Saturday evening schedule: Gladiators, a British copy of a particularly
gormless American game show, followed by no less than three embarrassment
series, end to end: Blind Date, Beadle's About and Dame Edna's Neighbourhood
Watch. Those are followed by an old movie, 20 minutes of news, and a repeat
of the creepy Hale And Pace.
However depressing all this may be for the more demanding viewer, it seems
almost irrelevant when compared with what has just happened on Channel 4 in
the early morning. Experience over the last few years suggests that what is
introduced today at the margins (breakfast time, daytime, and the middle of
the night) may well turn up tomorrow in peak time. Those who have followed
this column on the long marches through the margins may recall reviews of an
American programme which literally chased ambulances, of 'yoof' material
where style usurps content, of American Gladiators, and numberless American
tabloid telly series specialising in prurient interviews. Sure enough, all
this is now moving from the margins into peak time. So it seems worth
looking at Channel 4's Big Breakfast to see what may be next.
Having been unsuccessful with a breakfast programme aimed at intelligent
adult viewers looking for news, C4 has gone to the other extreme and created
a show which appears to be aimed at young and unintelligent children. It is
presented not from a studio but from three cottages knocked together and
painted in the brilliant primary colours and designs of a pantomime kitchen,
or Playschool. Presenters Chris Evans and Gaby Roslin both look well under
30, and talk across one another in the comprehensive school glottal stop
argot which is now as tediously uniform on yoof television as received
pronunciation once was on the BBC.
You would never know from this programme that plenty of children play the
clarinet, belong to the Scout movement, or read books. It is almost entirely
concerned with those subjects - pop music, videos, computer games, American
animated cartoons (cheap old series such as Dennis The Menace and The Banana
Splits appear to be regulars) - which have the blessing of the peculiar
adults who specialise in yoof TV. The garish and overstated look of the show
is matched by its tone of perpetual hysteria: the impression is not of being
spoken to but of being screeched at. Camera crews and sound technicians are
required to whoop and cheer the presenters' 'jokes' in the contrived style
of American studio audiences. The whole approach is typified by a couple of
manic puppets from the Sesame Street mould whose voices never fall below the
level of a scream.
Very occasionally this Beano Comic version of life is punctuated by
something weirdly inconsistent: a report on sexual harassment (what are
eight-year-olds supposed to make of that?) or four minutes of Bob Geldof
talking to Nelson Mandela ('Was the prison experience essentially a very
hard experience? . . . You don't mean you like Abba?') The infrequent news
bulletins are presented, ludicrously, in the abbreviated language used in
newspaper headlines for space reasons: 'Britain on collision course with EC
bureaucrats . . . Horror at Horse of Year Show . . .' The slavish imitation
of a communication medium 500 years older than television speaks volumes
about how much thought went into preparing this show.
Yet again it must be said that the week did, of course, bring impressive
programmes. To an outsider, at least, the first part of C4's Greed And Glory
looked like an astute and credible account of the recent boom years in the
City of London. BBC2's series about fashion and designers, The Look, is
proving greatly superior to television's usual catwalk hagiographies; not
only has it has been thought through, it has a telling and literate script,
a great rarity these days. In the first of the BBC1 series Off The Back Of A
Lorry Mike Scott did a nice calm job of showing up the perfidy of the French
when the British try to put EC theory into practice and sell flame resistant
cloth in France or set up business as auctioneers: free market ideals
promptly disappear behind a wall of protectionism.
Increasingly, however, programmes of this sort are shown either at teatime
or just after most people have gone to bed. In other words they seem to be
moving out towards the margins as the yoof hysteria and associated material
move in. We have our video recorders, of course, and we can, or anyway may,
set them to capture what we want so that we can play it back when we want.
But will we? If television's peak hours fill up with yoof series,
embarrassment shows, and Marks &amp; Spencer drama (Boon, London's Burning,
Civvies and so on) will it become precisely what the chattering classes
always pretended it was: the McDonald's of the mass media? It begins to look
distinctly possible, though a successful BBC under a charismatic leader
might still save the day.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12337</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Arts: The Dutch Courtesan - Theatre
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MALCOLM RUTHERFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Whatever scholars of English literature may tell you, with a few exceptions
there is not a lot to be said for Elizabethan/Jacobean drama outside
Shakespeare, Jonson and Marlowe. So it is a great pleasure to find such a
fine production of John Marston's The Dutch Courtesan at the Orange Tree in
Richmond.
Marston was not a prolific playwright. He had an Italian mother, was
educated at Oxford and wrote a couple of tragedies before turning to a bawdy
kind of comedy. The Dutch Courtesan was first performed around 1605, early
in the reign of King James I. Not long afterwards Marston gave up the stage
for the church - possibly because he was in trouble with court censorship.
He took up the living in Christchurch, Hampshire and died in 1634.
One of the many merits of this production by Sam Walters is that the bawdy
is not played up for its own sake. Another is that there are no gimmicks.
The piece is played absolutely straight: costumes more or less of the time
and nothing extraneous. It reflects the London of the period, a booming,
rather cosmopolitan city with a natural share of knaves, dupes and clever
women. It is possibly slightly xenophobic in that the only real villain is
the Dutch courtesan. The English villains repent and even the English fools
are likeable.
There is no single key character. Indeed there are at least eight parts that
anyone remotely qualified would love to play, plus one or two smaller ones
like Holofernes Reinscure, the barber's boy, acted here with a wonderfully
retarded smile by Vincent Brimble. (Brimble plays other parts as well.)
All the characters have slightly odd names. The bawd is called Mary Faugh.
The principal English villain, sometimes masquerading as a Scot, is known
simply as Cocledemoy. David Timson looks as if he is thoroughly enjoying
himself in this part, but the production never lets the spotlight linger too
long on one person.
Anyway it is Cocledemoy's main dupe - a vintner called Mulligrub - who has
the best opportunities. Mulligrub loses practically everything, including
almost his neck as he finally appears on the gallows. Frank Moorey's
performance is a marvellous study in the frustrated rage of a stupid but
benevolent man.
The women excel. In the early scenes Amanda Royle's courtesan is
devastatingly attractive: butch, gamin, almost no make-up, physically lithe
and with an accent that is foreign without being exaggerated. It is a pity
that she has to turn so nasty afterwards.
The main English women are educated English roses. There is a theatrical
in-joke here that must have seemed obvious at the time. One of them is
called Beatrice; however, it is her sister Crispinella who plays very much
the role of Beatrice in Shakespeare's Much Ado About Nothing. Caroline
Gruber as Crispinella looks ravishingly beautiful; Janine Wood as Beatrice
altogether more earnest.
Other Shakespearean references will come to mind: the nurse Putifer (Auriol
Smith) owes something to Romeo and Juliet; the scene with Mulligrub in the
stocks, and the bumbling inefficiency of the night watchmen. The play is
written in a mixture of prose and verse. It is like a Shakespeare comedy
without the poetry and ultimately without the magic. It also lacks Ben
Jonson's sharpness. But it is still very professional. The prize for putting
it together so convincingly must go to Walters.
The Dutch Courtesan, Orange Tree, Richmond, until November 28. (081) 940
3633
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12338</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Arts: 'Green Table' revisited - Ballet
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLEMENT CRISP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The Green Table was a dance-icon of the 1930s. It won a prize at a
choreographic competition in Paris in 1932, and launched the international
career of Kurt Jooss, its creator. And because of its ever-apt theme - the
sufferings we know in war - it has acquired a spurious sanctity. To attack
it, to declare it a stodgy, albeit well-intentioned, piece is seemingly to
attack its moral worth.
Well, moral rectitude never had anything to do with choreography, and I have
always found Jooss's dances very lumpy going. (When I first saw The Green
Table - with Jooss's own troupe, in the middle of the war - I thought it
singularly unlike what was raging around us. What remains with me still is a
memory of the dramatic weight, the physical density, with which certain of
Jooss's finest artists - Sigurd Leeder, Hans Zullig - imbued their actions).
Jooss's dance language owed everything to his experience as a student of the
movement theorist Rudolf Laban. His quest was for a style in which emotional
expression should find its most direct and essential means. In all of his
dance works that I saw, there was earnestness, simplicity, and these
qualities are clear to see in the revival of The Green Table that entered
the Birmingham Royal Ballet repertory on Monday night. BRB's director, Peter
Wright, appeared as a young dancer with Jooss, and this staging is his
tribute on the 60th anniversary of the ballet's creation.
Scrupulously revived by Anna Markard, Jooss's daughter, The Green Table
wears its years badly - it looks like an old Art Deco poster blowing in the
winds of time. Death (Joseph Cipolla, very good) stamps and stalks; the
Standard Bearer (well done by James Bailey) is heroic; a Mother (Marion
Tait, the best advocate for Jooss's expressivity) grieves. A girl suffers
and becomes a prostitute, and the profiteer (oh, the rubbing of the
white-gloved hands]) does his blatant thing. These are cliches. Behaviour is
sentimentalised, and movement is as predictable as one might expect when
stereotypes are set on stage. The Fritz Cohen score for two pianos is
leaden. And so is much of the choreography. Some groupings are still
theatrically vivid - the frieze of mourning women; the procession of Death's
victims - yet what may have seemed apt or innovatory in 1932, has faded
badly, and the dance (unlike, say, the texts of Massine's symphonic ballets
of the '30s) lacks an imaginative fire that will touch us. The BRB cast work
well, but Jooss's solemnities do nothing interesting for them.
This opening programme of the BRB season also brought another acquisition:
Ashton's Symphonic Variations. It is a serene masterpiece, and one now so
weighed down by its significance - as Ashton's declaration about English
classic dance; as a portrait of its sublime first cast headed by Fonteyn and
Michael Somes - that I sense that new interpreters are over-awed even before
they reach the stage. Monday night's sextet had the anxious and too
reverential air of people late for church, busily making up for their
mistake by rushing their devotions and looking generally harried. Michael
Somes has produced an impeccable text. His dancers, alas, fudged too many
moments - a ravishing backward-curving pirouette for one of the men was
lost; steps were gabbled beneath rigid torsos. Let them relax, and allow the
music to pour through them to shape the dance, and Ashton will look like
Ashton.
The evening was completed with David Bintley's Flowers of the Forest, very
well done. The Hippodrome management, incidentally, deserves its public's
thanks for the re-seating of the stalls: sight lines are much improved.
The Birmingham Royal Ballet season continues at the Birmingham Hippodrome
until October 31.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12339</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Arts: 'Iceman' worth waiting for - Dublin Theatre Festival
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALANNAH HOPKIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
This new version of Tartuffe by the young playwright Michael West is the
Gate's contribution to the Dublin Theatre Festival. It is a lively and
fluent rendering, but the edge of the original is lost by pitching this
satire on hypocrisy somewhere between drawing room comedy and farce. Stephen
Brennan in the title role is a creepy figure in a badly-hemmed black
soutane, his waist encircled by a monster wooden rosary, a whiff of Rasputin
about him. His sinister but rather sexy appearance is the only surprise of
the evening. Catherine Byrne as Elmire, the object of his lust, is
competently regal. Robert Ballagh provides an elegant if rather colourless
set featuring classical French windows and statue-filled alcoves. The
production is consistently played for laughs, and results a tame, safe
evening's theatre with about as much excitement as a television adaptation.
There is nothing tame about the Abbey's Festival offering, the last major
opening of a hitherto unspectacular fortnight. The Iceman Cometh was well
worth waiting for. It is a monster of a play in four acts (with three
intervals), but the long haul goes unnoticed in the presence of a truly
great production of an essential classic.
The way that Eugene O'Neill creates an existential masterpiece from the
ramblings of a crew of drunken has-beens never fails to amaze. John
Conklin's sets give us four different views of the bar and backroom of Harry
Hope's clapped-out rooming house in dark shades of grey, brown and green,
the chairs and tables as tatty and mismatched as their occupants. Michael
Philippi's atmospheric lighting adds sudden new dimensions with precisely
judged effects.
The cast are largely comatose as they are introduced in the early morning
light by the resident 'foolosopher', Larry, and the barman Frank. One by one
they reveal their obsessive 'pipe-dreams' - the alcohol-fuelled illusions
that allow them to believe in tomorrow, as they await the arrival of their
salesman buddy, Hickey, and the ritual celebration of Harry's birthday.
Hickey's entrance, larger than life in an immaculate pinstripe suit with his
dazzling, cajoling salesman's smile, acts like a shot of adrenalin on
Harry's somnolent roomers. But Hickey surprises them: he has turned teetotal
and found 'peace', something that he says they can do too if they will only
face up to reality and abandon all 'pipe-dreams'.
Brian Dennehy who had the role of Hickey in Chicago with the same director,
Robert Falls, is physically reminiscent of Billy Graham in his prime, and
plays Hickey with the outstretched palms, the sincere facial expressions and
the fancy footwork of an evangelical preacher. It is an astonishing
performance in that while he is totally convincing on a realistic level in
his dealings with 'the gang', the audience quickly grasps his evil,
destructive intents: Hickey is 'the iceman'. Only the 'foolosopher', Larry,
a tight and increasingly harrowing performance by Donald Moffat, sees him
for what he is.
Robert Falls has so successfully welded together Irish, English and American
actors that it is impossible to tell the difference. The ensemble playing is
first rate, as are the majority of the individual performances, notably Sean
McGinley who gives dignity and intelligence to the all-important Frank.
If any doubts remain about the judgment of the Abbey's artistic director,
Garry Hynes, this memorable production should kill them dead. It is a
theatre festival in itself, reminding us of what theatre is - or should be -
all about.
Tartuffe, Gate Theatre; The Iceman Cometh, The Abbey Theatre, Dublin
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12340</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Business and the Environment: Aspiring to be an engine for
change - Lord Moore talks to Bronwen Maddox
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRONWEN MADDOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'I HAVE carte blanche to do what I want,' says Lord Moore, the former UK
cabinet minister who was appointed on Monday as head of the new Energy
Saving Trust, one of the main planks in the government's environmental
policy.
Expectations are high, both of him and of the Trust, an independent limited
company which is intended to search out energy-efficiency schemes. Moore is
optimistic that he can fulfil them. 'There is no limit to the areas we can
examine, and if I find that levers are inadequate, doors are closed, then
I'll shout,' he says.
Fighting talk - but he will start his chairmanship with at least two
controversial issues on his desk. The first is the debacle of the coal mine
closures, and the question of whether environmental costs have tipped the
balance between coal and gas.
Moore is adamant that he does not feel under pressure to enter the fray,
although the comments of an independent body dedicated to assessing
efficiency might be welcomed. 'I refuse to be drawn into the political
debate,' he says, with a sensitivity that comes from an abrupt exit from
politics after being tipped briefly as the successor to Lady, then Mrs
Thatcher.
The sensitivity may be understandable, but then the Trust is on the
sidelines of one of the most wide-ranging and controversial energy
efficiency issues faced by the country.
Instead, the Trust is intended to focus on domestic rather than industrial
projects - to search out ways for British Gas and the regional electricity
companies to encourage their customers to use less energy in their homes.
But even on that remit Moore faces an immediate obstacle.
Last week Stephen Littlechild, regulator of the electricity industry,
appeared to veto the possibility of regional electricity companies passing
on the cost of investments in energy-efficiency to their customers. However,
plans for the Trust have always assumed that the cost of almost all its
projects - both gas and electricity - would be passed on. At a stroke,
Littlechild's statement seems to threaten half the Trust's potential
success.
'It is too early to express disappointment. I want to find out what he
thinks in detail,' Moore says cautiously.
Beyond that immediate obstacle, he also needs to solve the conundrum of why
companies should suggest schemes that persuade their customers to use less
energy and so could cost them revenue.
Moore says he has a solution: 'I believe that corporations have a role in
the community and can enhance shareholders' return by being 'good
corporations', not just by short-term profits.' That is a much-debated
position: although he is a director of Credit Suisse's fund management arm,
he may not find his views of corporate governance shared by the mass of
utility shareholders, let alone the companies themselves.
He feels, however, that he has equipped the Trust with enough independence
from the government and the utilities to negotiate these questions. He says
that one of his main conditions in accepting the job was that a majority of
directors on the Trust's board should be independent of the utilities.
He is concerned too that the costs of running the Trust - which with an
eventual staff of between 30 and 40 could amount to several million pounds a
year - must not be paid entirely by the utilities. 'That would be
dangerous,' he says, and he hopes that eventually the Trust can take fee
income from initiating projects. He says he wants the Trust to cover
businesses other than gas and electricity, possibly including the motor
industry.
With much of the scope of the Trust in question, will it really have an
impact? 'I am not interested if it is just going to be small marginal
schemes,' he says. 'What impact we will have as an engine of change I don't
know.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12341</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Business and the Environment: Only time will tell - Clean
coal technology can compete successfully with gas, but not in the immediate
future
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLIVE COOKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The run-down of British Coal is taking place against the background of a
huge effort elsewhere in the world to develop efficient 'clean coal' power
stations which could compete with natural gas on economic and environmental
criteria.
The problem in the UK is that the only coal-fired stations capable of
competing financially with natural gas plants at today's prices are old ones
whose capital costs have been written off. And they produce more pollution -
sulphur dioxide, oxides of nitrogen and carbon dioxide.
But the position may be quite different a decade or two from now, when gas
supplies are running short and new generations of clean coal plants are in
operation.
There is 'a ferment of innovation' in coal burning, says Walter Patterson,
an energy analyst specialising in coal technology. 'The world's engineering
companies and their enlightened clients are spending large sums in a hectic
race to expand the range of advanced coal technologies, improve their
efficiency and enhance their environmental performance. What is more, they
are succeeding.'
Some 38 clean coal plants are operating in the US, where government and
industry are jointly funding a Dollars 5bn (Pounds 2.9bn) clean coal
programme over five years. One demonstration is AES Shady Point, a 320MW
cogeneration (producing both electricity and heat) plant in Oklahoma which
has low emissions not only of sulphur and nitrogen oxides but even of carbon
dioxide.
In Europe and Asia, too, scores of advanced coal burning plants are being
planned and built. But in the UK, where much of the original research into
clean coal technology was carried out, the level of activity is now very low
compared with other countries. The clean coal power stations developed so
far fall into two broad categories:
Fluidised bed combustion (FBC) involves burning powdered coal in a bed of
pulverised limestone or dolomite (which acts as a chemical trap for any
sulphur emitted from the fuel). An upward flow of air keeps the bed in
constant motion like a boiling kettle. One turbine is driven by steam
produced in boiler tubes in the fluidised bed and a second by the hot
exhaust gases.
Integrated gasification combined cycle (IGCC) plants have a gasifier in
which coal reacts with steam and air or oxygen to produce a raw fuel gas
containing carbon monoxide, hydrogen and methane. This gas is cleaned
chemically to remove pollutants before firing in a gas turbine to generate
electricity. The hot exhaust then produces steam to power another turbine.
FBC plants are particularly well suited for burning coal of low or variable
quality and for cogeneration. Their net efficiency is around 41 per cent - a
distinct improvement on the 38 per cent achieved by the best conventional
coal-fired power stations with desulphurisation 'scrubbers' but nowhere near
the 52 per cent of a new natural gas combined cycle plant.
IGCC plants offer better performance than FBC when good-quality coal is
available, though the technology is less well developed. Their net
efficiency is about 43 per cent and emissions of sulphur and nitrogen oxides
are comparable with a natural gas plant. The next important development will
be the opening, scheduled for 1993, of a 285MW IGCC demonstration plant in
the Netherlands designed by Shell.
Further improvements may be possible through combining the best features of
IGCC and FBC. One hybrid is British Coal's proposed topping cycle
technology. Stephen Dawes of the Coal Research Establishment predicts that a
commercial topping cycle plant would achieve 47 per cent efficiency using
current gas turbines and as high as 52 per cent if turbine technology
continues to advance as expected.
British Coal has formed a consortium with PowerGen, the electricity
generator, and GEC Alsthom, the Anglo-French generating equipment
manufacturer, to develop the topping cycle. Chris Buck of GEC Alsthom says
the group is 'enthusiastic' about building a 75MW plant to demonstrate the
technology, which would have great export potential. But it cannot go ahead
until uncertainties about government support for the project and about the
future of British Coal are resolved.
Dawes accepts that no clean coal plant built in the UK today can generate
electricity as cheaply as a new natural gas plant, because the latter is
technically so much simpler that its capital costs and non-fuel operating
expenses are inevitably lower. Early in the next century, however, lower
fuel costs for coal could tip the balance against gas.
One environmental factor on which coal cannot match natural gas is its
impact on the greenhouse effect. It is chemically inevitable that burning
coal produces more CO than natural gas. Even here, however, there is hope in
the very long term.
The idea of large-scale removal of CO from power station flue gases was
regarded until a couple of years ago as too fantastic to contemplate because
of the high costs and the quantities of CO produced by fossil fuel burning.
Recent studies under the International Energy Agency's Greenhouse Gas R&amp;D
Programme suggest, however, that CO capture and disposal at sea may be
technically feasible, environmentally acceptable and economically bearable.
Clean coal technology will not save British Coal from contracting further
during the 1990s but it could lay the ground for a renaissance some time in
the next century.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12342</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Business and the Environment: CFCs on the move
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRONWEN MADDOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The industrial difficulties that could follow international bans on the use
of ozone-depleting chemicals were highlighted in two UK government reports
last week.
The UK is among 70 countries which have signed the 1987 Montreal Protocol,
committing themselves to phasing out the production of CFCs, one of the
substances threatening the ozone layer, by 2000. It is also bound by tighter
EC regulations to phase out CFCs by 1997.
According to a Department of Trade and Industry report by Touche Ross, the
management consultants, UK consumption of CFCs as solvents in electronics
and dry cleaning fell by 75 per cent between 1986-91. But the report said
the main reason was 'a reduction in industrial activity during the
recession'.
While it found that high-technology and precision cleaning companies had
already made plans to find substitutes, small high street dry cleaners could
not afford the new equipment. The report expects 'a sharp distinction
between general and specialist dry cleaners' to emerge as the ban takes
effect.
A second study of the use of CFCs in refrigeration and air conditioning,
carried out for the Department of the Environment by the March Consulting
Group, concluded that consumption in these industries fell by only 15 per
cent between 1986-91, partly because less than 2 per cent of CFCs in
refrigeration are recovered and reused.
Depending on the choice of phase-out dates, it predicted that refrigeration
demand for CFCs will outstrip supply between 1994-2000 unless leakage and
recycling rates improve.
Assessment of likely difficulties is not helped by the lack of up-to-date
figures. A 1990 DTI survey showed that the UK's total consumption of
ozone-depleting substances halved between 1986-89 to 31,000 tonnes due to
the phasing out of CFCs in aerosols. However, more recent figures are not
available.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12343</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / People: 'Clearing of the decks' at Sheldon Jones - Strachan
joins
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Douglas Strachan, former chief executive of ProNed, is joining Sheldon
Jones, the USM-listed pet-foods to timber and DIY company, as non-executive
chairman, replacing Richard Sheldon, who remains on the board. Although the
family holding - represented on the board by Sheldon, 57, and John Jones, 47
 -now stands at 55 per cent, the last year has seen a considerable
management restructuring and capital injection.
David Gwyther, the new chief executive, joined last November, and two
venture capital companies, Murray Ventures and County NatWest Ventures, took
part in a refinancing earlier this year. All this allowed the company to
'clear the decks for future development', as Gwyther puts it. Sheldon had
been non-executive chairman since July 1991.
Gwyther says Strachan possesses a breadth of experience and collection of
contacts that hitherto the company did not have on the board. A director of
Allied Lyons from 1976-1985, and Allied Breweries from 1977-1985, Strachan
ran ProNed for the next four years. He is also currently a non-executive
director of Cheltenham &amp; Gloucester building society. Gwyther, who has known
Strachan for some years, is himself an ex-Allied Lyons man, on the wines and
spirits side.
Sheldon Jones is a former animal feeds specialist that has changed direction
since the imposition of milk quotas in the late 1980s. Gwyther hopes to
develop the fast growing pet foods division, currently under the Pascoe's
brand name, as well as expanding into other branded consumer areas.
*****
Giles Henderson, 50, has been appointed senior partner of City solicitors
Slaughter and May in succession to George Inglis who will retire at the end
of the year after 36 years with the firm, seven of them as senior partner.
Henderson takes over at a time when Slaughters' supremacy as the leading
City law firm is under attack in an increasingly competitive marketplace for
commercial law services.
One of his first tasks will be to resolve the internal debate over whether
the firm should follow the lead of most of its competitors and market its
services or whether it should continue to rest on the strength of its
reputation.
Having read law at Magdalen College, Oxford, he joined Slaughters in 1968,
becoming a partner in 1975.
His practice has been in the firm's core areas of work - general corporate
and corporate finance - and he has spent the past 10 years working on UK
privatisations, leading the firm's team on the privatisation of British
Telecom, British Gas and the electricity industry. He was awarded the CBE in
1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12344</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Jobs: Plan to make executive moves safer - Enterprising
insurance man developing policy to cover against risks of changing employers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL DIXON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TO judge by the times the same disaster is reported by readers, it is a
serious risk to any executive job-changer. Take for instance the finance
manager who generously wishes the offending outfit as well as himself to
remain anonymous.
Rather than move out of London with his existing employer in 1989, he
decided to take advantage of the still active executive market and change
companies. Soon he was signed up as group accountant at the headquarters of
an international group. Whereupon, he says:
'There were two surprises awaiting me on the day I started the job. Firstly,
two thirds of it were being done by someone else who was due to retire at
the end of nine months. Secondly, there was no desk to spare in the whole
office and one had to be bought. This arrived after two months during which
I had use of a small table between two secretaries. I rode out these
difficulties without making any issue of them.
'However it became apparent as time went on that I had been misled, and
after five months I felt compelled to raise the matter with my superior . .
. .'
The upshot, as so often, was that he was asked to resign, which he did only
to find the market cold. And although the group paid for counselling, he's
still jobless. 'I would not wish these experiences on anybody,' he adds,
'except possibly those who bestowed them upon me'
Amen to that] But while I know of many other cases where the employer looks
to be solely at fault, in most the responsibility is less clear. Some were
the result of sudden insolvency which was as much a surprise to the firm's
recruiters as to the recruit. In others, usually attributed to
'irreconcilable differences', the blame is presumably shared.
A knock-on effect is that awareness of such disasters deters underused
talents from moving, especially in a recession. Hence the risk plays a part,
albeit minor, in inhibiting recovery.
So what - except murmuring 'Goodness, how sad' - is anyone doing about it?
Well, one who's trying is Peter Bedford of Fenchurch Insurance Brokers,
thanks to an initiative by headhunter John Courtis. In league with an
underwriter at Lloyd's of London, Mr Bedford is evolving an insurance policy
covering the dangers described.
True, individuals can thrash out their own protection with intending
employers, he says. But that usually entails nit-picking by lawyers for each
side, consuming time as well as money creamed off by the legal fat cats.
By contrast, the 'executive recruit's guarantee option' would have a
standard form. Employers who offered it, either freely or on demand by a
chosen candidate, would pay a premium covering up to two years salary or so.
The current idea is a premium of 2 per cent of salary times years of
contract for each of three types of risk: redundancy, insolvency and the
aforesaid irreconcilable differences. But the insurer could refuse cover for
any one of them, if so minded.
As the scheme is still very much in embryo, Peter Bedford would rather not
be contacted about it as yet (he's on holiday for the next week or two,
anyway). But I promise to report on developments in due course.
AS it happens, besides news of insurance against disaster, I can today offer
a faint sign of hope. It appears in the underlying table which shows the
state of demand for managers and higher-ranked specialists in the United
Kingdom, as gauged by the MSL International consultancy's three-monthly
counts of executive jobs advertised in national journals.
That is not to say there is anything but gloom in the overall figures in the
lower part of the table. The latest total is by far the lowest for any 12
months to September 30, not only since 1987-88, but in all the 33 years MSL
has been keeping check. The quarterly tallies below the total show that the
rate of decline, as measured by the corresponding three months of 1991,
quickened again between April-June and July-September just gone.
Bleakness also prevails in the separate counts, not listed in the table,
which the consultancy makes of advertised openings in four sectors of
industry. All are at their lowest on record for any 12 months to September
30.
High-tech companies' tally fell below four digits for the first time to 967
as against a high of 6,151 in 1984-85. The peak of 4,367 reached by energy
and associated industries in the same year, is down to 1,025. Food, drink
and tobacco companies have fallen to 511 from a 1984-85 high of 1,150, and
retailing to 482 compared with 1,145 four years ago.
But look in the upper part of the table, which shows the 12-monthly counts
for different sorts of executive work. Although seven of the eight
admittedly also show further declines, we do see the first single
year-on-year rise since 1988-89. Moreover, it is in the sales and marketing
category which in ages past has proved a lead indicator of movements in the
market as a whole.
Not too much should be made of it, because it is a category which has been
singularly depressed. But the mere fact that it has rebounded is more reason
for cheer than the Jobs column has seen for a long time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12345</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Importer challenges GM over franchise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IM GROUP, the privately owned UK importer of Isuzu vehicles, has launched a
legal action in the US against General Motors, which holds a substantial
minority stake in the Japanese vehicle maker, in an attempt to prevent GM
taking away its UK franchise.
It is understood that IM Group's Isuzu franchise agreement is due to expire
at the end of 1993. In most other European countries GM, which holds a stake
of more than 30 per cent in Isuzu, has already taken over its Japanese
affiliate's import operations.
GM has rebadged the Isuzu Trooper as the Opel Monterrey in most of Europe
and would like to sell the vehicle under the Vauxhall badge in the UK.
The IM Group is suing GM for wrongful interference in its UK Isuzu business.
Mr Bob Edmiston, IM Group chairman, said: 'GM would like the franchise. We
do not wish them to have it. There are legal proceedings in hand at the
moment.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12346</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Sterling fall forces shift in Ford pricing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FORD, the leader of the UK new car market, announced price changes across
its whole range yesterday in response both to continuing weak sales and the
recent devaluation of the pound.
It is increasing the price of its main imported models but cutting the
prices of a large part of its UK-built cars.
Mr Ian McAllister, chairman of Ford of Britain, was gloomy about the
development of UK new car sales, which he forecast would total no more than
1.55m this year compared with 1.59m last year and 2.3m in the peak year of
1989.
He said: 'There is still no sign of any significant upturn in demand, and I
do not believe we can expect any real growth before the second half of 1994,
as the impact of interest rate cuts and the devaluation work their way
through the economy.'
While overall new car sales have fallen by 2.6 per cent in the first nine
months of the year, retail sales had dropped by 7 per cent, Mr McAllister
said in a speech at the opening of the British motor show in Birmingham.
Fleet sales had 'remained remarkably resilient' with a rise of 4 per cent.
Ford announced an order for 18,800 light commercial vehicles from BT, the UK
telecommunications company, worth Pounds 220m at showroom prices, the
biggest van order it has had in the UK.
The actual value of the order would be much lower, however, taking into
account the large discount available to fleet customers, which can be as
much as 30 per cent or more on large contracts.
The BT order is for 8,300 Transit vans and chassis cabs, 9,000 Escort and
1,500 Fiesta vans.
In spite of the BT contracts, Ford has increased short-time working at its
Transit van plant at Southampton in the face of the continuing weakness of
demand. Ford's Halewood and Dagenham car assembly plants are effectively
working three-day weeks throughout October.
The confusion over car prices in the UK was intensified by Ford's
announcement of price cuts of up to Pounds 520 on some of its Escort/Orion
models and up to Pounds 955 on some of its Fiesta models, only two months
after announcing a general price increase of 1.8 per cent across its range
in mid August.
Ford has been forced to increase the prices of its main imported models, the
Sierra, made in Belgium, and the Granada Scorpio, made in Germany, by an
average of 2 per cent as a 'first response' to the 15 per cent devaluation
of the pound.
Ford said it was developing an inexpensive device to summon emergency
assistance from inside a car, also to track a stolen vehicle, based on a
satellite navigation system.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12347</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Chrysler plans sales drive
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALL future Chrysler vehicles will be engineered for right-hand-drive as well
as left-hand-drive markets, the company said yesterday as it outlined plans
for a big UK sales campaign next year.
Its new UK importer, a subsidiary of the Inchcape-owned TKM vehicle
distribution group, expects to sell 2,000 Chrysler Jeep and other models in
the UK next year.
It plans to raise that to at least 17,000 a year by the end of the decade,
Mr Richard Mackay, managing director of Chrysler Jeep Imports UK, of Dover,
said at the motor show. The first models are to go on sale in January
through a network of 80 dealers.
One will be a variant of the Cherokee four-wheel-drive leisure vehicle,
built in Toledo, Ohio. That, Chrysler said yesterday, is the first
right-hand-drive production vehicle to be built in North America by a
US-owned volume carmaker for export to the UK.
The other will be a right-hand-drive model of the smaller Wrangler, the
latest version of the classic Jeep. Right-hand-drive models versions of
those were first developed through Chrysler's joint venture in China.
Mr Bernard Robertson, vice-president of jeep/truck engineering and
operations, said right-hand-drive models would give the company potential
access to 55 countries that drive on the left, accounting for 23 per cent of
world vehicle sales.
Chrysler's re-entry to the UK market, reversing its withdrawal in the 1970s,
is part of a much wider drive to establish a sales and production presence
in Europe. It sold 44,183 vehicles throughout Europe last year through a
sales and service network that now totals 1,500 outlets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12348</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Patten moves to standardise GCSEs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD EVANS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A MANDATORY code of practice covering all aspects of the GCSE examination is
to be introduced by Mr John Patten, education secretary, to ensure that even
standards are maintained throughout the country.
The move, which endorsed the recommendations of the government's advisers on
exams, follows a highly critical report by schools inspectors last month
warning that standards might be slipping. The proposal is the clearest
indication so far that Mr Patten is determined to raise academic standards.
The code of practice, to be drafted by the end of the year and introduced
before next summer's exams for 16-year-olds, is aimed at combating alleged
differences in the way some GCSE papers are set and marked by the five
examining boards in England and Wales.
Advice from the Schools Examination and Assessment Council, published
yesterday, supported the critical views expressed by inspectors last month.
The council concluded it was necessary to 'increase the transparency of the
examination process' to maintain public confidence in the GCSE.
The Education Department said that meant results should be 'more clearly
defined and more easily understood'.
The new code demands standardised marking and will also cover the setting of
questions, coursework assessment, grading of standards and boundaries, and
assessment of spelling, punctuation and grammar.
Mr Patten will be able to withdraw his approval from any examining board
that infringes the code. Boards are expected to toe the line as they are
businesses and need the support of schools and candidates' fees to survive.
Mr Patten said his purpose was to have an exam that pupils, teachers,
parents and employers could trust.
Lord Griffiths of Fforest-fach, council chairman, said in his report that
because the GCSE was introduced to provide greater motivation for students,
he would have expected an improvement in examination results.
He added: 'We are nevertheless concerned that the sharp increase in the
number of school leavers with five or more GCSE A to C grades in the last
two years raises questions about standards, which we are investigating.'
Mr Patten said he wanted more time to reflect on the council's call for a
wider review of the structure, funding and accountability of examining
groups. Lord Griffiths proposed the appointment by the council of external
GCSE marking and grading assessors, similar to the system of external
examiners used by universities.
The minister also welcomed the council's conclusion that other reforms being
prepared for 1994 - including limits on coursework, different papers to
stretch more able pupils, and marks for spelling, punctuation and grammar -
would strengthen the exam.
The Associated Examining Board, which had more than 800,000 GCSE entries
this summer, said the code of practice offered 'nothing new' and would
change little.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12349</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / NAO queries Pounds 40m Tec funds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LISA WOOD, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE National Audit Office has questioned the accounts of the Department of
Employment for the third consecutive year and found that more than Pounds
21m of payments to Training and Enterprise Councils and the Employment
Service were incorrectly made. There is disagreement over a further Pounds
19m.
The payments in 1991-92 were among those made to employer-led Tecs and the
government's Employment Service. In the previous year, incorrect payments
totalled Pounds 53m.
Tecs are responsible for payments to about 4,000 providers of training for
young people and unemployed adults on the two main national training
programmes, Youth Training and Employment Training. The Employment Service
pays allowances to unemployed adults on ET. The total cost of the two
programmes was Pounds 1.5bn in 1991-92.
Among the lapses of financial control identified by the government's
spending watchdog were: paying youth trainees after their training had
ceased; claiming payments for vocational qualifications not gained in the
appropriate year; and allowing claims that were not adequately
substantiated.
Inadequate documentary evidence to support claims was a chief complaint by
the NAO. Tecs themselves complain about the complexity of audit trails
imposed upon them.
The report says: 'This arose from confusion regarding the evidence required
for qualifications and the problems relating to satisfactory and timely
documentation.'
In addition, there were claims that Tecs thought they had made legitimately
but which appeared to the Internal Audit to be ineligible. One Tec claimed
Pounds 153,000 for vocational qualifications gained by trainees between 1984
and 1989 - before the advent of the Tec.
The department, commenting on the report, said it was implementing a plan
for 100 per cent financial control by the end of March 1993.
Report by the Comptroller and Auditor General. NAO, Buckingham Palace Road,
London SW1W 9SP.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12350</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Zoo rescue plan
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A PLAN to save financially troubled London Zoo by focusing on important
breeding groups was approved yesterday. The Council for the Zoological
Society of London approved it and rejected others including a staff buy-out.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12351</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Jobs boost for west Belfast
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FURTHER details emerged in the US yesterday about one of west Belfast's most
significant employment boosts for years.
Belfast MPs Dr Joe Hendron and Mr Cecil Walker reached a provisional
agreement with senior executives of the National Semi-Conductor Corporation,
one of the top US electronics groups, for it to buy microchips made at the
west Belfast plant of BCO Technologies (Northern Ireland). The project is
being supported by the Industrial Development Board, and offers hopes of 400
new jobs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12352</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Sharp rise in business failures
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BUSINESS failures have soared this year and will continue to rise next year,
according to Britain's leading private credit insurer.
Failures in the first nine months reached 42,000 and are expected to pass
60,000 for the year as a whole - compared with 48,000 for the whole of last
year, according to NCM Credit Insurance, which insures some Pounds 14bn of
UK trade every year from 6,000 UK companies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12353</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / SFO ends probe of Bank link to BCCI
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Serious Fraud Office said yesterday that it had found no evidence to
support allegations of corruption involving three Bank of England officials
and the collapsed Bank of Credit and Commerce International.
Allegations that BCCI managers had been seen 'palm greasing' three Bank of
England officials with suitcases of money were made to Lord Justice
Bingham's inquiry into BCCI and repeated in a parliamentary early-day motion
laid by Mr Brian Sedgemoor, Labour MP for Hackney South and Shoreditch.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12354</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Mitsubishi acts on import quota
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MITSUBISHI, the Japanese carmaker, is to begin exporting cars to Europe from
Australia for the first time, allowing it to circumvent quota limits on
direct vehicle imports from Japan.
Like Honda and Toyota, it is already exporting cars from its US assembly
plant to Europe. The company yesterday displayed its Australian-built Sigma
estate car at the British motor show in Birmingham; a competitor for
vehicles such as the Ford Granada/Scorpio and Opel Omega/Vauxhall Carlton
estate cars.
The Japanese carmaker hopes to export 5,000 vehicles from Australia to
Europe next year, of which about 10 per cent will come to the UK.
Typical of the increasingly complex supply pattern in the world motor
industry, the Sigma estate car was developed by Mitsubishi Motors Australia
in Adelaide, which will become the sole production plant worldwide. The same
vehicle will also be exported by Mitsubishi from Australia to the US with
shipment of 6,000 vehicles planned next year.
The estate car is sold as the Mitsubishi Magna/Verada in Australia. The
export programme to Europe and the US will allow Mitsubishi Motors Australia
to increase output from 29,074 vehicles in 1991 to 38,700 this year and
52,000 in 1993, buoyed by a modest recovery in the Australian domestic
market.
Mitsubishi holds about 12.4 per cent of the total Australian vehicle market,
behind Toyota (20.6 per cent), Ford (19.7 per cent) and General Motors
(Holden) with 17.3 per cent. The company wants to increase the single-shift
capacity at its Adelaide plant from 57,000 to 74,000 by the mid 1990s. The
company claims to have a local Australian content of about 85 per cent for
its vehicles.
Mr Reijiro Kuromizu, a managing director of Mitsubishi Motors, said: 'We
have the problem of the quota system in the European Community (for Japanese
exports), so if we can source products from Australia or the US, that helps
our operations in Europe a great deal. That is the reason we started
shipping products from Australia and the US. You must have sufficient local
content in each location and we have complied with that.'
He said that Mitsubishi would export about 10,000 cars from the US to Europe
this year, chiefly to Germany, Italy, Sweden, Switzerland and Austria. The
company was also studying the shipment of light commercial vehicles to
Europe from Thailand.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12355</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Maxwell paid fund manager Pounds 50,000: Peer rejects claim
that his silence had been bought
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NORMA COHEN, Investments Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LORD DONOUGHUE, a former director of London and Bishopsgate Investment
Management, received Pounds 50,000 from the late Robert Maxwell after
promising not to talk to anyone about the company's affairs after his
departure in July 1991.
The agreement was signed on October 17 1991, just three weeks before
Maxwell's death as he tried to stave off the collapse of his empire.
Lord Donoughue, appearing yesterday before the House of Commons select
committee on social security, was questioned closely by MPs about his role
at the Maxwell-owned fund manager, which managed a portion of the missing
Maxwell company pension funds.
Lord Donoughue had said he became concerned about stock lending activities
at LBI and expressed those concerns to Maxwell, asking for the practice to
stop. When he learned that it had not by June 1991 he had 'a dust-up' with
Maxwell, shortly after which he resigned. He told MPs he had asked that
trustees of the pension schemes be notified of the stock lending - a request
Maxwell denied. He said his decision to resign was made months earlier and
was not connected with stock lending.
Lord Donoughue told MPs he did not report his concerns about stock lending
to regulators or the trustees of the pension funds whose securities were
being loaned because he knew of nothing illegal or improper about the
activities. 'I would have gone if I had known of anything illegal or
improper,' he said, although he conceded that stock lending at LBI was 'not
conventional'.
Mr David Shaw MP asked whether Maxwell had bought his silence. 'In effect,
you were paid Pounds 50,000 hush money, weren't you?' During his three years
at LBI, Lord Donoughue's total remuneration totalled roughly Pounds 1.5m.
Lord Donoughue rejected the suggestion that his silence had been bought,
saying such confidentiality clauses were routine in the City.
Since Maxwell's death, details of the stock lending activities at LBI and
Bishopsgate Investment Management have emerged and have caused consternation
in the City.
Under questioning from MPs, Lord Donoughue insisted that the stock lending
at LBI, later disclosed as the route through which pension fund assets were
stolen, did not violate any regulations and was not inconsistent with City
practice.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12356</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Leyland DAF may cut output
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRODUCTION at Leyland DAF's Birmingham van manufacturing plant is expected
to be halted for up to two weeks because of a continuing slump in the UK's
light commercial vehicles market.
Some 2,000 workers building DAF 200/400 vans, once known as Freight Rover
Sherpas, will be told later this week whether they will be joining market
leader Ford in production cuts.
Ford's Southampton plant, which makes Transit vans, is at a standstill this
week because of the sales decline.
Mr David Gill, Leyland DAF's managing director, marketing and sales,
emphasised at the Birmingham motor show yesterday that a final decision had
yet to be taken.
It is expected that, if production cuts do go ahead, assembly line workers
will be redeployed to other tasks in the plant rather than sent home.
Leyland DAF exports about 40 per cent of its van output, but that no longer
appears sufficient for the company to maintain full-time single-shift
production.
An annual review of the UK motor industry to be presented at the show today
by Albert E. Sharp, Birmingham stockbrokers, takes an optimistic view of
export prospects as a result of sterling's devaluation. The review expects a
Pounds 10bn trade surplus on motor products.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12357</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Leyland DAF may cut production
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRODUCTION at Leyland DAF's Birmingham van manufacturing plant is expected
to be halted for up to two weeks because of a continuing slump in the UK's
light commercial vehicles market.
Some 2,000 workers building DAF 200/400 vans, once known as Freight Rover
Sherpas, will be told later this week whether they will be joining market
leader Ford in production cuts.
Ford's Southampton plant, which makes Transit vans, is at a standstill this
week because of the sales decline.
Mr David Gill, Leyland DAF's managing director, marketing and sales,
emphasised at the Birmingham motor show yesterday that a final decision had
yet to be taken.
It is expected that, if production cuts do go ahead, assembly line workers
will be redeployed to other tasks in the plant rather than sent home.
The Anglo-Dutch company has come under pressure to make the cuts although it
increased its volume sales by 5 per cent this year, in a UK van market down
a further 5 per cent compared with 1991. The industry faces a market that
has fallen by about 40 per cent compared with record 1989 levels.
Leyland DAF exports about 40 per cent of its van output, but that no longer
appears sufficient for the company to maintain full-time single-shift
production.
An annual review of the UK motor industry to be presented at the show today
by Albert E. Sharp, Birmingham stockbrokers, takes an optimistic view of
export prospects for the UK vehicles industry as a result of sterling's
devaluation. The UK's balance-of-trade deficit on motor products is likely
to be transformed from deficit to up to a Pounds 10bn surplus, the review
argues.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12358</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Rebels join Smith in attack over Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVOR OWEN, Parliamentary Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TORY backbenchers opposed to the bill ratifying the Maastricht treaty were
given a blunt reminder of their party's electoral commitments by Mr John
Major, the prime minister, in the Commons yesterday.
Under a barrage of hostile questions about the futility of last week's
European Community summit in Birmingham he rejected demands that the
government should not seek to make any further progress with the remaining
stages of the bill until after the next meeting of EC heads of government in
Edinburgh in mid December.
Mr John Smith, the Labour leader, scoffed at the prime minister's inability
to secure a discussion at Birmingham about the 'fault lines' he had
identified in the EC's exchange rate mechanism.
Mr Smith also condemned the government's failure to use the British
presidency of the EC to produce 'one single initiative' to tackle rising
unemployment, falling investment and low growth.
Mr Major expressed astonishment that Mr Smith, a former shadow chancellor,
had not realised that for 'market reasons' discussions about the ERM had to
be conducted in private.
Dealing with the economic convergence provisions in the Maastricht treaty,
he said it was becoming increasingly unlikely that the proposed timetable
would be achieved.
With the treaty subjected to renewed attack from both sides of the House, Mr
Tony Marlow, MP for Northampton North and a prominent Euro-sceptic,
pointedly underlined the 'present circumstances' confronting the prime
minister.
Mr Marlow asked: 'What is more important to you - the good will of a couple
of elderly European politicians intent on imposing their blueprint on an
increasingly reluctant Europe, or the good will of Conservative MPs?'
He suggested that if it was the latter it would be the 'height of political
wisdom' to delay the bill's return to the Commons until such time as it had
been ratified by the Danes.
Mr Marlow added: 'God willing, they may never do so'.
To ironic laughter from the Labour benches, the prime minister suggested
that he had no reason to doubt Mr Marlow's good will.
He emphasised: 'I look for your support now and in the future on the
programme on which we both jointly contested the general election.'
The prime minister said the government was putting Britain's interests
first, including the need to ensure that it had a 'central say' in the
decisions taken in the EC that affected jobs and industry.
Backed by cheers from Tory loyalists, he said: 'It may be the ambition of
some to see this country isolated as a sour little outpost of western
Europe, but it is not my ambition.'
He believed the way was open for debate on the further stages of the bill to
be resumed at a time convenient to the House, emphasising that he had signed
the Maastricht treaty on behalf of Britain and with the consent of the
Commons.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12359</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Kinnock passed over for EC post
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVO DAWNAY and LIONEL BARBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE tortuous on-off saga of Mr Neil Kinnock's possible appointment as a
Brussels commissioner finally ended last night when it was confirmed that Mr
Bruce Millan will remain in his post for a further two years.
The decision immediately provoked behind-the-scenes charges of bad faith
against Mr John Major from senior Labour officials and fervent
counter-denials from Downing Street that the prime minister had given any
undertakings to the former opposition leader.
Last July, Mr Major held a series of talks with Mr John Smith, Mr Kinnock's
successor, over Labour's nominee for the post of second British
commissioner.
While officials emphasised that the final decision remained firmly in the
prime minister's hands, there were widespread reports that, fresh from his
April election triumph, Mr Major was in magnanimous mood and ready to
approve the posting.
Commentators also pointed out that Mr Smith might have his own reasons for
pressing the appointment as he did not relish Mr Kinnock's declared aim of
fighting a seat on Labour's national executive committee.
However, the reports of the discussions immediately provoked a hostile
reaction from Conservative backbenchers and opposition from the cabinet.
Several argued that Mr Kinnock was not appropriately qualified for the job
and should, anyway, be left in London in the hope that his presence would
undermine Mr Smith's new regime.
When the controversy over the Maastricht treaty deepened in the wake of the
Danish referendum result, Mr Kinnock's prospects faded. Last week, he
publicly claimed he had no interest in the Pounds 100,000-plus post -
signalling that the decision had gone against him.
The reappointment of Mr Millan alongside Sir Leon Brittan as British
commissioner leaves a solid, experienced administrator in place for the next
two years.
Mr Millan, who has been in charge of EC regional policy since 1989, served
in the Labour government as a junior minister in the 1960s and as secretary
of state for Scotland under Lord Callaghan.
Unlike some of his colleagues, Mr Millan has kept a low profile in Brussels.
He has earned a reputation for hard work and skilful bargaining in his
efforts to share out the Ecu60bn (at 1989 prices) allocated to poorer
regions between 1987 and 1992.
Mr Millan has indicated he would like to retain the regional policy
portfolio in the new Commission that is due to take office in January 1993.
He is understood to be pressing for a streamlining of responsibilities for
structural funds.
Observer, Page 19
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12360</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Major in strongest denial yet on ERM
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRIME MINISTER John Major yesterday made his most categorical denial yet
that Britain's European partners had offered a realignment of the exchange
rate mechanism before the suspension of sterling from the system on 16
September.
Responding to a question from Mr Stuart Bell, a Labour trade and industry
spokesman, Mr Major said that no such realignment had been proposed,
'neither formal nor informal'.
Mr Bell referred to statements by senior Bundesbank and Italian central bank
officials 'that there was a general realignment available to the British
government prior to Black Wednesday'.
Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, had failed to answer the same question
when he appeared before the Treasury and Civil Service committee last week,
Mr Bell said.
During prime minister's question time, Mr Major also put the pursuit of
'recovery with low inflation' at the heart of the government's economic
strategy.
His answers underlined the extent to which the strong opposition to
devaluation which he expressed prior to the pound's departure from the ERM
has since been revised.
Emphasising that economic circumstances had worsened in other countries in
recent months, Mr Major highlighted the government's achievement of 'low
inflation both in terms of the retail price index and underlying inflation'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12361</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Labour plans autumn of attrition
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVO DAWNAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TIME and again Labour has been gazumped in the role of opposition by
Conservative backbenchers.
Signs yesterday that the government is now shifting towards a 'go for
growth' policy suggest that Labour's high command may now be overtaken even
by its frontbench opponents.
With the government's autumn rendered a shambles by the Mellor affair, Black
Wednesday and now the coal fiasco, it is hardly surprising that the official
opposition has been absorbed by short-term planning.
Indeed, Labour managers were yesterday concentrating their efforts to ensure
that the political atrophy of three terms on the opposition benches will not
undermine a full turnout to the three-line whip tonight.
Uncomfortable memories linger of opportunities to defeat the government  -
the last being Mr Michael Mates' amendment on the poll tax - missed due to
indiscipline among the troops.
But the attention paid to marshalling the troops to cope with the day-to-day
realities of a government with a 21-seat majority has also left Labour
looking myopic and sluggish.
Last week, for example, some complained that it was outraged public opinion,
not the Labour leadership, that most efficiently exposed the government's
cackhanded management of the pit closures announcement.
'Robin Cook talked about butchery, but it was ritual stuff,' said one Labour
backbench MP. 'In the end as usual, we were caught leading from the back.'
Since then, an impressive performance by the shadow industry secretary at
the despatch box has mollified that criticism. Meanwhile, things have moved
on.
Just as policy moves such as the government's Citizen's Charter initiative
appeared to seize an opportunity missed by Labour, so a clear government
hint that deflation not inflation is now public enemy number one will
inevitably steal fire that could have been Labour's.
In part, that is a consequence of the media's lack of interest in Labour's
policy prescriptions after four election defeats. The party's image brokers
will certainly complain that its advocacy of supply-side policies have shown
it way ahead of government thinking for more than a year.
Yet as the recession has appeared to teeter on the brink of full-blown
slump, there are many Labour backbenchers now claiming that Mr Gordon Brown,
the shadow chancellor, has been too slow to respond with new policy
initiatives.
Critics of the party leadership are currently content to confine their
gripes to whispered remarks in the bars and tea rooms. But there is a
widespread complaint - fuelled by an idea-free annual conference - that
Labour is reactive, not active: tactical not strategic.
Senior party figures insist that that will not be the case for long. But the
deliberate decision not to become engrossed in policymaking so early in a
parliament is now running up against the public's clearly impassioned plea
that 'something must be done' about the recession.
In that context, the shadow cabinet last week broadly agreed that flesh must
be put on the skeleton of Mr Brown's much recited three-point economic plan
 -industrial incentives, employment measures, and a housebuilding programme.
But what? The promise of a Roosevelt-style 'New Deal' is still deemed too
ambitious.
Crypto-monetarist orthodoxy is such that Ms Diane Abbott, the leftwinger
from Hackney, incurred the displeasure of the shadow chancellor for
suggesting in the Treasury committee that Britain had entered the exchange
rate mechanism at the wrong parity.
Nonetheless, Mr Brown is himself under pressure from colleagues to temper
his natural caution in order for the party to have a more comprehensive
recovery plan in place by the time of next month's autumn statement.
Last week, attention in the shadow cabinet returned to two topics.
The first is consideration of reworking the definition of the public-sector
borrowing requirement along the lines of those used by the Organisation for
Economic Co-operation and Development.
Such looser criteria would allow Labour to claim that the raising of finance
in the money markets by state-sector industries and notional spending such
as the government's underwriting of private-sector schemes should escape
inclusion in the PSBR.
Work is also under way on developing a distinction between capital projects
and current spending.
Labour's leaders are also examining the possibility of designating some
specific labour-intensive infrastructural schemes - transport other than
road programmes, for example - as priorities, emphasising the opposition's
claim to be the true party of industry.
Yet, for the time being, the stress on caution remains. Meanwhile, the
government looks poised to occupy at least part of that territory under a
new Growth First banner.
Proud of its pre-Black Wednesday record as the party of sound money,
Labour's Scottish establishment is far from risking the accusation that it
is ready to embrace a little inflation as the necessary price of recovery.
The government appears to be tacitly hinting just that.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12362</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Public-sector pay figures disputed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART, Labour Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PUBLIC-SECTOR employees continue to earn less than their counterparts in the
private sector, even though average public-sector pay was recently reported
to have overtaken that in the private sector, according to a new report.
The study, by Incomes Data Services, the independent pay analysts, says
ministers are using the average pay figures from the government's New
Earnings Survey to justify a public-sector pay freeze for next year.
IDS, however, says the figures - published last month - are seriously
misleading.
The survey showed average pay figures of Pounds 307 a week in the public
sector and Pounds 303 in the private sector. It also said the average
public-sector manual worker earned Pounds 244, lower than the average Pounds
252 in the private sector, while the average non-manual public-sector
employee earned Pounds 328, against Pounds 338 in the private sector.
IDS says the reason for the higher average in the public sector is that
recent privatisations have led to a much higher proportion of non-manual
employees in the public sector, who generally earn more than manual
employees.
Some three quarters of public-sector employees are non-manuals, compared
with just under 60 per cent in the private sector. More than six out of 10
men working in the public sector carry out non-manual work, compared with
just over half of men in the private sector. Nine out of 10 women in the
public sector are non-manual employees, while three quarters in the private
sector are non-manuals.
IDS also says that the survey's figure of an 8.8 per cent rise in
public-sector pay in the year to April this year, compared with 6.3 per cent
in the private sector, is distorted by the inclusion of pay reviews in two
consecutive years for some public-sector workers.
The IDS takes issue with the assumption that pay in the public sector is not
responding to the recession in the same way as in the private sector.
It says: 'So far in 1992, most settlements in the public sector have been in
line with the private sector. Less than 10 per cent of private-sector pay
reviews have been freezes and many sectors have been freeze-free.'
IDS Report No 627. IDS, 193 St John Street, London EC1V 4LS.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12363</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / C&amp;G mortgage rate cut to 9.05%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CHELTENHAM &amp; Gloucester, the seventh-largest building society, undercut the
rest of the market yesterday by moving its standard variable mortgage rate
down by 0.7 of a percentage point to 9.05 per cent from December 1.
Meanwhile, figures released yesterday suggest that societies had one of
their worst months for business ever in September - with activity on savings
and mortgage lending sharply down.
The new Cheltenham &amp; Gloucester rate compares with a standard mortgage
interest rate of about 9.25 per cent for other lenders. It will apply
immediately for new customers and from December 1 for existing borrowers.
Many new borrowers will also be given a discount of 1 percentage point,
bringing their mortgage interest rate down to 8.05 per cent.
Nationwide, the second-largest building society, and National Westminster
Bank have also cut mortgage interest rates. In both cases, the reduced
interest rates apply immediately for new customers and from December 1 for
existing ones.
From today, new borrowers with Nationwide will pay 9.29 per cent interest, a
reduction of 0.66 of a percentage point, although there will be slightly
larger cuts for customers with large loans.
NatWest has cut its mortgage loan rate by 0.74 of a percentage point to 9.25
per cent.
The business figures released yesterday by the Building Societies
Association show a net savings outflow of Pounds 264m in September, compared
with an inflow of Pounds 327m in August.
At the same time, mortgage lending dwindled to Pounds 446m, down from Pounds
1.7bn in each of the previous two months. The figure was the lowest monthly
total since 1982. One of the reasons for the sharp fall was the end of the
stamp-duty holiday in August.
New lending, agreed but not disbursed, dropped from Pounds 2.48bn in August
to Pounds 1.8bn. During the month, the housing market was extremely subdued,
with house prices falling by 3.1 per cent, according to the Halifax
house-price index.
Mr Mark Boleat, director-general of the association, said the market was
still beset with worries about unemployment and economic uncertainty, but
that the latest fall in base rates to 8 per cent might help revive consumer
sentiment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12364</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Loans fall signals deeper gloom
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FURTHER signs that the recession may be deepening came with news yesterday
that individuals and companies made a net repayment of loans to banks and
building societies last month, the first such event since records started 28
years ago.
The repayment, announced by the Bank of England yesterday, came to a
seasonally adjusted Pounds 700m. The news, together with weak figures for
growth of the money supply, adds to pressure for more cuts in interest rates
to expand the economy.
Other data from the Bank indicate that it, together with foreign central
banks, bought about Pounds 12.7bn in sterling on September 16 - Black
Wednesday - in a vain effort to lift the pound before the UK was forced to
leave the European exchange rate mechanism.
That number is consistent with market estimates that total intervention on
Black Wednesday was between Pounds 15bn and Pounds 20bn. Yesterday's numbers
do not include sterling purchases by the Bank using foreign currency
reserves lent to the UK authorities by foreign central banks which have not
yet been repaid.
In the year to September 30, M0, which mainly comprises cash and notes in
circulation, increased by 2.1 per cent compared with the previous 12 months.
The figure is roughly at the centre of the Treasury's target range of 0 per
cent to 4 per cent and underlines the lack of inflationary pressures.
Growth in M4, a broader measure of the money supply, which also takes in
bank and building society deposits, was similarly subdued. Between the same
two 12-month periods, M4 expanded by 5.1 per cent, after growth of a revised
5.5 per cent in the year to the end of August. In the 12 months to the end
of August, M0 expanded by a revised 2.4 per cent.
After changing its methods of making seasonal adjustments, the Bank altered
its previous assertion that individuals and companies made a repayment of
Pounds 500m to banks and building societies in March this year. It is now
recorded as a seasonally adjusted increase in loans of Pounds 974m.
The weak growth in the money supply last month may have been influenced by
the large intervention operations by the Bank of England and other European
central banks on Black Wednesday, draining cash from the UK banking system.
Backing up the indications of low economic demand, the British Bankers'
Association said the big commercial banks received repayments from companies
and consumers in September of nearly Pounds 1bn at an underlying level, the
first such repayment since March.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12365</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Management: Power behind global throne
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN HARGREAVES and BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Black's senior management team combines old friends and carefully-picked
outside managers. Several are self-made men who have not had Black's
privileged upbringing, but share his right-of-centre political views.
Larry Perrotto still runs American Publishing's 217 papers from the small,
coal-mining town of West Frankfort, Illinois. Perrotto, reputed to be among
the wealthiest men in the area, moved there from Pennsylvania in the late
1960s when he and three partners bought the local newspaper. Hollinger
bought them out in 1986.
Besides Perrotto, two of his original partners also remain on AP's payroll.
Most noteworthy among those who have remained at Black's side are David
Radler and Peter White, the friends who joined him in buying the Sherbrooke
Record in Quebec in 1969.
Black, Radler and White between them now own almost all the shares of
Ravelston Corp, Hollinger's holding company. The remaining Ravelston stock
is held by the estate of Black's father, and by Dixon Chant, an old family
friend whom others describe as Conrad's 'father-confessor'.
By all accounts, no one in Hollinger has a greater influence on Black than
Radler, who carries the title of president. From cramped offices in an
inconspicuous, two-storey building on the fringes of downtown Vancouver,
Radler directs all Hollinger's north American operations, as well as the
Jerusalem Post.
The two men are cut from different cloth - perhaps one reason, Radler
observes, why they get on so well. Radler, aged 50, is a scrappy,
no-nonsense manager with his eye firmly on the bottom line. He is as likely
to wear a sports jacket as a suit to the office. An autographed picture in
Hollinger's Vancouver offices of Israeli prime minister, Yitzhak Rabin, is
one of the few concessions he makes to the world of international politics
and business diplomacy in which his partner revels.
Radler says that his background in small-town newspapers has taught him 'how
to do without'. He says that 'all I want to see is efficiency. If I can see
that an operation can be run by two people, and we have six, I want it run
by two.'
Radler's blunt manner and his emphasis on cost-cutting have not endeared him
to senior management at the Telegraph. While he still sits on the Telegraph
board, most of Radler's time is taken up with north America and the
Jerusalem Post; had Hollinger got the New York Daily News, Black and Radler
planned to run it together.
Black's other partner in Ravelston, Peter White, devotes much of his time to
outside interests, from skiing to politics, and has little day-to-day
influence in Hollinger. But White, aged 53, still has a desk at the
company's elegant offices in Toronto. He says he is using his fluency in
Spanish to scout for newspaper acquisitions in Latin America.
Another long-time ally, Dan Colson, aged 45, has become Black's
troubleshooter outside north America. Colson, who met Black at university,
is a partner in the London office of the Canadian law firm Stikeman Elliot.
But as chairman of Fairfax, he spends almost all his time on Hollinger
business.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12366</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Management: Black magic at work around the world - Is
entrepreneur Conrad Black a supreme strategist or a lucky deal-maker? Ian
Hargreaves and Bernard Simon examine both his doggedness and inconsistency
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN HARGREAVES and BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Conrad Black is not a man who excites neutral judgments. For every media
watcher who will tell you that Black, at 48, is the emerging global media
boss of the 1990s, there is another who will say he is a lightweight whose
fortunes rest on one great deal - his purchase and subsequent turnround of
Britain's Daily Telegraph.
Fresh from quitting the battle for the New York Daily News, Black is
certainly the stuff of which tycoon legends are made. Ever since he was
expelled from a posh Canadian boarding school for stealing and selling exam
papers, a mythology has grown around him. Over the years, we have had Black
the historical biographer, Black the student of Napoleon, Black the
military/corporate strategist, Black the deal-maker, Black the establishment
man, Black the Catholic convert, Black the political philosopher, Black the
potential (Canadian) prime minister, Black the press baron.
By the age of 40, he had already built, dismantled and then re-assembled
what he told his biographer in 1982 would be 'a diversified major enterprise
carrying the name of Canada to the four corners of the earth'; his interests
extended from farm machinery to oil. 'I'm proud of that era because I
created a significant amount of wealth legally and fairly,' he says.
'Napoleon said 'force is mass times velocity' and I did demonstrate a rather
high velocity.'
Black's 1982 prediction, however, has not quite worked out. In the last
decade, he has sold most of his non-media interests to pay for the
Telegraph, whose controlling shareholder is Vancouver-based Hollinger,
Black's main quoted company.
Today, Black spends nine months of the year in London, where he has two
houses, one a residence, the other a library. His office high in Canary
Wharf, where the Telegraph is based, looks like a film set for an English
colonial drawing room, dressed with paintings of naval battles.
Hollinger owns or controls more than 100 daily newspapers and about 200
weeklies, most of them tiny, in North America, Britain, the Caribbean,
Australia and Israel. The jewels are the Daily Telegraph, which last year
contributed 80 per cent of group profits, and the Telegraph's 15 per cent
stake in Fairfax, a top Australian publisher. Even with group sales of
CDollars 780m (Pounds 351.3m) in 1991 and paid daily circulation of 2.5m,
however, Hollinger is way behind Rupert Murdoch, whose Sun alone outsells
all of Black's daily titles.
Black is proud of the relative stability of Hollinger's cash flow during the
recession, although revenues and profits have stagnated since 1989 and the
company has had to U-turn on its debt profile. In 1991, Hollinger piled on
debt to buy into Fairfax, to add American titles and to obtain extra
Telegraph shares. This year, Hollinger has floated part of the Telegraph,
raising Pounds 84.5m, and sold at a CDollars 38m loss a stake in United
Newspapers, paying down CDollars 522m of debt and improving its debt to
equity ratio from 1.96:1 to 1.1:1.
This has not prevented Black from maintaining his velocity on the
deal-hunting front. The question is: does Black have anything which can be
described as a strategy? Or is Hollinger a company driven only by deals?
'The common thread is they're all newspapers, highly economically priced
given their potential turnaround,' says Black. 'If we think the franchise is
good and we can make a good deal and manage it up from there and physically
cope with the distance involved, we'll do it.'
The classic execution of this strategy has been at the Telegraph, where
Black's astutely timed purchase of a minority share and pre-emptive rights
on other holdings in 1985, has been followed by a dramatic recovery in the
business.
Under Black, the Telegraph has cut production and distribution costs while
more than doubling the editorial budget to make the newspaper more
attractive to younger readers. At the same time, its cover price has been
shifted from a no man's land between quality and popular titles to price
leadership among the white broadsheets, so reducing exposure to the
advertising market. This has more than offset a continued decline in
circulation, which has fallen from 1.4m in the early 1970s to a whisker
above the 1m mark. With inflation lower, Black says 'a little more caution
is called for' on cover prices.
It is not exactly clear how Black will develop his UK media interests from
this healthy base. His courtship with United Newspapers apparently signalled
interests in popular newspapers. Black now describes as 'a mistake' his
belief that United faced a takeover struggle, leading to a possible 'partial
merger between us or of exchanging shares for some of United's desirable
assets'.
As for the timing of his costly exit, Black absolutely denies pressure from
his bankers, but says he was influenced by poll predictions that Labour
might win the election and further depress the value of his holding. Others
in the Black camp say he received a political warning that the government
could not allow the construction of yet another large, Conservative national
newspaper group in Britain. 'I never heard that and never solicited a view,'
says Black.
It may yet be that Black will test this by bidding for the Mirror group, of
which he says: 'it's possible'. He sees no problem owning a pro-Labour
newspaper, 'so long as it was militating within the labour movement for a
moderate position'.
Even clearer is Black's desire to establish himself in the British regional
newspaper market, although again the way forward is not obvious. He is
excluded from boardroom influence at Trinity International, in which the
Telegraph inherited a 13 per cent stake from Hollinger. Trinity owns
newspapers in Britain and north America, but has a tight share voting
structure established in 1904 to protect the then Liberal publisher from
Tory predators. Black fulminates on cue about this 'antediluvian,
gerrymandered share structure', but claims: 'We're completely passive
investors.' This does not quite fit with his comment that the Trinity shares
were bought as 'a play on the shareholding structure'. Nor is it in full
harmony with Black's generalisation that 'we're rarely long-term minority
shareholders'.
Black's probing manoeuvres at Trinity and United have also characterised his
so far not very successful approach in the UK television industry, where
inter alia he expressed an interest (since withdrawn) in Channel 5, bought a
5 per cent stake in Carlton (winner of the London weekday ITV franchise) but
lost out in manoeuvring over the breakfast television franchise.
The word is that a relationship with Michael Green, the boss of Carlton, has
cooled, as Black implies when he dismisses the Carlton stake as 'just an
afterthought'. He now says: 'The software companies might be better than the
licence holders.' But he concedes that 'no-one can foresee a big increase in
the circulation of our newspapers . . . so it's natural for us to want to
diversify a little'.
There is in all these situations an odd mix of doggedness and inconsistency,
as there has been in north America, where Black and his partner, David
Radler, have been buying newspapers since 1969, while going in and out of
broadcasting, supermarkets and oil wells.
Black is cross that his north American publishing interests received such a
sniffy press during the Telegraph flotation and proclaims them an example of
his ability to break creatively with conventional wisdom, in this case the
view that circulations lower than 25,000 are not worth the bother for a
leading publisher. Computerised data analysis has given the lie to that,
says Black. From the published figures, however, it is difficult to assay
the performance of a big Hollinger division like American Publishing.
Black says his style in running the group is to delegate and 'to monitor
what's going on in as unobtrusive and little irritating a way as possible'.
Newspapers, he says, are 'conceptually very simple. If you watch the
payroll, circulation and the ad revenue you have the picture.' This
surveillance is mostly a weekly task, with figures going to Black and
Radler. Black says he spends a lot of time 'thinking about how to expand
sensibly, working on whether a proposition is sound'. How many deals has he
looked at this year? 'Personally about a dozen, the company dozens.'
Colleagues across the world confirm that he does indeed delegate, seldom
visiting properties. Other features of his management style are: close
attention to costs; heavy borrowings linked to the projected earnings stream
of acquisitions and what might be grandly styled the geopolitical criteria
for investment.
Black says he invested in small town America because he believed in its
potential under Ronald Reagan, just as the election of Margaret Thatcher
made it possible for him to live and work in Britain. He even defends his
most controversial publishing deal, the purchase in 1989 of the Jerusalem
Post, on the grounds that Israel's sclerotic statist economy is due for
improvement.
Hollinger paid Dollars 20m for the Post, more than twice the level of the
nearest bid, and quickly switched its political support from Labour to
Likud, raising suspicions that Black's motives were less commercial than
political. The Post is managed by Yehuda Levy, a former army officer
befriended by David Radler, a fellow Jew, during a stay in Vancouver. Levy
claims that since the purchase, another Dollars 10m has been spent on
modernisation, but that with staff numbers falling by 60 per cent to 210,
the paper is on the road to profitability. Black denies non-commercial
motives and says the switch in editorial line has been exaggerated. 'I have
been accused of devising a form of Jewish fascism, which is just
outrageous,' though he admits some editorials 'get a little carried away on
Jewish issues'.
Black's politics are the subject of much scrutiny as he extends his
interests. His newest editors at Fairfax are especially nervous,
particularly with regard to his plans for the leftish Melbourne Age.
'I am more interested in the professional presentation of information and
the publication of intelligent advocacy than I am in propagating my own
views. I don't try to turn foreign newspapers into organs of what I
believe,' he says. So can he imagine the Melbourne Age backing the Labor
Party in a general election? 'I can conceive of circumstances.' How likely?
'Not likely, but not out of the question.' Will he be changing editors at
Fairfax? 'I think I'll duck that one.'
Black says he has 'a constructive relationship' with Paul Keating,
Australia's Labor prime minister, which is just as well, since he badly
wants to extend the Telegraph's shareholding in Fairfax beyond its current
legal limit, something he concedes is more likely if Keating loses the
election. Without access to a bigger holding, Black has all the management
responsibility at Fairfax for limited reward and security.
Black argues that shareholders get a better deal from companies run by
strong proprietors with clear views and that readers get better newspapers.
'Can anyone imagine that this mighty enterprise built up by Rupert Murdoch
could have been accomplished by people who did not have a significant
financial stake in it?' he asks.
His political views, he says, are not 'far to the right of the general
orthodoxy.' His all-time political hero is Abraham Lincoln, but he also
praises FDR as the president who 'saved the capitalist system' in the 1930s
by preventing the growth of an American hard left. But he prefers Bush to
Clinton. He says that newspaper owners have three choices: like Roy Thomson
to focus only on business performance; like Robert Maxwell to dictate
editorial lines in some detail; or, as he sees it, a middle way.
In practice, says Black, editorial decisions fall into three categories: the
trivial; the moderately important, when he might write a signed letter or
article; and big issues when 'I have a discussion with the editor and we
work out a common policy.' A year ago, Black pursued a category two issue in
the Spectator, which he bought for Pounds 2.5m in 1988, complaining about
'an error-ridden cover piece on the Reichmanns and a gratuitous sketch of
Lord Carrington.' He added that these two gentlemen 'would have the right to
expect to be treated fairly by the Spectator even if they were not directors
of the companies that ultimately owned it and friends of its proprietor.'
'Black doesn't use his papers to attack his enemies, but he doesn't like
them attacking his friends,' says one of his journalists.
Black can recall two occasions when he has insisted upon his personal view
in the Telegraph leader column: that the paper remained loyal to Thatcher
during her leadership crisis and that there be no ambivalence about the
desirability of a Conservative victory at the last election. Two years ago
before giving a Eurosceptical speech to a Tory party fringe meeting, he
ensured in advance that the Telegraph's leader writers were prepared to
support its thesis. 'I was not prepared to give an address which was sharply
contradicted in our own leaders.'
It is, in the end, impossible to separate a judgment of the man and his
companies. Black's taste for financial deal-making, VIP-networking and
public debate combine in the newspaper business in a way they did not when
he was running shops and oil wells. It is easy, for example, to mock Black's
boardroom collections of public figures, but unwise to overlook the
shrewdness of his links with a body like the Canadian Imperial Bank of
Commerce, upon whose board Black sits and whose former chairman, Donald
Fullerton, this year joined the Hollinger board.
But it is also true that on the global media stage, Black has not found
steady partners. His links with Kerry Packer foundered in Australian
politics (and, some add, in mutual rivalry) and in Britain he has yet to
make a solid alliance.
Black admits that he sometimes misjudges public relations. In the early
1980s he was embroiled in a notorious battle over a pensions fund surplus.
It took the intervention of the Ontario courts to force Dominion Stores, a
Hollinger company, to agree with its trades union to divide the disputed
surplus between the company and fund members. 'It has taken some
considerable time and a number of libel suits for me to live down the
reputation attached to me by a left-wing politician in Toronto of being, in
effect, a brigand who helped himself to the pension entitlements of
defenceless people,' says Black
In conversation, Black displays an unpredictable blend of bluster, wordy
explanation, caution and mischief. He's a cross between an investment banker
and a 19th century belletrist.
So it not surprising that there is an impulsive, accidental quality about
the way Hollinger has sometimes surged ahead, to be checked as the boss
becomes distracted or decides to take stock. Everything still stems from the
availability and quality of the individual deal, even if the deals today are
largely confined to the media. Black has not yet had time to prove that he
can sustain high quality management of a global range of media properties.
'The problem with Conrad is that he's always looking to the next deal,' says
Hal Jackman, lieutenant governor of Ontario and a Hollinger director until
last year.
Black counters that he is not known for overbidding and cites the New York
Daily News. His cautious side is, he insists, deeply rooted in his
experience. 'If you want to be an objectively wealthy person, you have to
bet everything once. It was my experience to do that twice and I did not
find that a stimulating experience. If other, more daring or more
imaginative people make more money than we do, then God bless them. I don't
want to wake up every night worried about my borrowings.' Perhaps he really
doesn't want to be Rupert Murdoch.
Additional reporting by: Kevin Brown in Sydney, Hugh Carnegy in Jerusalem
and Alan Friedman in New York
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
KEY FACTS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
1944 - Black born in Montreal
1969 - Black and two partners buy the Sherbrooke Record in Quebec
They later aquire other small papers in Quebec and British Columbia.
1978 - Black gains control of Argus Corp after persuading widows of
company founders to support his bid.
1979 - Black buys control of Norcen, an energy producer.
1980 - Argus donates its 3m Massey-Ferguson shares to Massey's pension
fund.
1982 - Norcen makes abortive bid for Hanna Mining.
1985 - Remaining Argus assets shifted into Hollinger.
1985 - Hollinger buys an initial 14 per cent of the Daily Telegraph.
Later raised to 50 per cent at a price of 50p per share.
1986 - Hollinger aquires American Publishing; sells Norcen stake.
1987 - Stake in Telegraph raised to 57 per cent, later to 83 per cent.
1987 - Last of Dominion Stores' food distribution units sold.
1989 - Hollinger buys 77 per cent of Jerusalem Post, subsequently
increased to almost 100 per cent.
1991 - Telegraph buys a 15 per cent stake in Fairfax.
1992 - Hollinger sells 14 per cent of the Telegraph to the public.
1992 - Black outbid for bankrupt New York Daily News by Mortimer
Zuckerman.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12367</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Management: Unravelling the threads of a complex empire -
From the UK to the Caribbean, taking in Australia, north America and Israel
 -how the net works
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN HARGREAVES and BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Conrad Black has always had a taste for complex corporate webs, multi-tier
debt arrangements and manoeuvrable structures, although his business
interests are organised more simply than they used to be and he says the
structure will become plainer still.
Hollinger began as a mining company, but has become Black's main
Canadian-quoted company for his media interests.
Because of the London stock exchange's anxieties following the collapse of
the Maxwell empire, Black was obliged when floating the Telegraph stake to
give strict undertakings about the separation of Telegraph activities from
those of Hollinger.
The exchange's concerns were heightened when it came to light in the
flotation process that Hollinger had failed to follow correct procedures in
drawing a loan from the Telegraph, an act which some in the city thought
serious enough to warrant abandoning the float, though Black dismisses it as
an oversight by his own staff and by external advisers. 'To have some people
encourage the inference that this had Maxwellian overtones I found somewhat
irritating.'
The upshot is that the Telegraph runs Europe, Australia and New Zealand and
Hollinger runs north America, the Caribbean and Israel. The two companies
are allowed to conduct joint ventures with each other only if the
Telegraph's minority shareholders agree - Black says he was considering just
such a joint venture in New York.
This arrangement also means, much to Black's irritation, that should
Telegraph minority holders decline a joint venture proposal in the
Telegraph's territories, they would also have the right to prevent
Hollinger's participation.
'Can you imagine anything so fatuous, so monstrously ultravires,' he says.
'It's a classic case of regulators setting out to protect shareholders and
succeeding in damaging their interests.'
Since the Telegraph has powerful cash flow and a very strong balance sheet,
there has been concern among some investors that Hollinger will find
unacceptable ways of taking advantage of the Telegraph's financial
resources.
Black says Telegraph cash 'is not available to the group except in the form
of dividends justified in the context of the Telegraph business'.
In 1990, Pounds 28m was paid in dividends on post-tax profits of Pounds
34.7m, contributing heavily to servicing Hollinger's debt; last year, the
dividend was cut to Pounds 12m on profits of Pounds 33.9m. Black stoutly
defends his record over the years in dealing with minority shareholders. 'I
accept that there were concerns about that at the time of the flotation, but
only the passage of time will lay those concerns properly to rest.'
Meanwhile, Hollinger continues to struggle with the fact that the value of
its Telegraph interest is scarcely recognised in its own share price. With
Hollinger's common shares trading at around CDollars 12, the company is
capitalised at about CDollars 680m (Pounds 306.3m) - about CDollars 900m,
says Black, if you include warrants - whereas the Telegraph, of which
Hollinger owns 68 per cent, is valued in the market at about Pounds 400m.
'It's an interesting question that we puzzle over,' says Black of
Hollinger's weak share price. He puts it down to Canadian disenchantment
with media stocks and the fact that only about a third of Hollinger shares
are available in the market as a float.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12368</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / The Coal Crisis: TUC challenges claim of losses at 10 pits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL BUCKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE TRADES UNION Congress yesterday challenged the government's claim that
the 10 pits chosen for closure were loss-making.
Mr Norman Willis, TUC general secretary, wrote to Mr Michael Heseltine,
trade and industry secretary, saying figures obtained from British Coal
suggested that only four of the 10 pits made a loss in the financial year
1991-92.
In at least one case, it was the result of investment expenditure. Overall,
the 10 pits made an operating profit of Pounds 3.3m for the year.
He said the cost of closing the pits was estimated at Pounds 394m. The
figures gave 'sufficient evidence that parliament should not accept Mr
Heseltine's statement at face value'. Mr Willis has sent copies of his
letter to all MPs urging them to examine the figures, and his '10 important
questions' about the pit closures, before the Commons vote today.
British Coal said it did not publish profit-and-loss figures for individual
mines and did not know where the TUC had obtained its numbers. It said it
could not provide a figure for the performance of the 10 pits in 1991-92.
The corporation reiterated that the 10 pits had made a loss of more than
Pounds 31m in the financial year since April, and that none was viable
according to any economic scenario. It refused to give a pit-by-pit
breakdown of performance.
British Coal added that while economic factors determined how much coal
production had to be lost overall, it had not used solely economic criteria
to determine which individual pits should be closed or kept open.
The corporation said it examined a range of factors. They had included:
mining conditions and the geology of each pit; the quality of seams and the
ease of opening new faces; the age of mines and equipment; how long output
could be sustained at certain levels; the quality and chemical composition
of the coal; the geographical position of a mine in relation to customers;
and the size of its reserves.
Having assessed the pits in that way, it then made a list of the 31 pits
most suitable for closure to achieve the necessary reduction in production.
They fell into three categories. Ten pits - those due to close after the
90-day consultation period - were felt not to have a role to play under any
economic scenario, because they were making a loss before the drop in total
revenue that British Coal will suffer when new power contracts come into
force next year.
The remaining 21 fell into two categories: those that were profit-able to
some degree - based on the revenue British Coal was presently receiving -
but that would not be profitable after next year's drop in revenues; and
those that would still be theoretically profitable, even after the drop in
revenues, but which simply did not have a market for their coal.
The corporation would not disclose which pits fell into the second and third
categories - probably to avoid giving any hint of which might be next in the
'phased' closures that are likely at the end of the moratorium in the new
year.
For the 10 pits, there seems little chance of a reprieve. British Coal
emphasised that it was merely fulfilling its obligations under the 1975
Employment Protection Act to give 90 days' notice of redundancies.
Mr John Major, the prime minister, offered a glimmer of hope for the
remaining 21 pits, with his suggestions in the Commons that the pit review
would be more wide-ranging that first thought.
He said that he would give the 'fullest co-operation' for any inquiry
launched by the Commons trade and industry committee, and views 'on all
matters' would be taken into consideration.
Observers suggest that that means power generators and other industries may
be involved.
Mr Major added that Mr Heseltine would also be taking further evidence into
consideration alongside the information already collected. He said a full
report would be submitted to the Commons before any debate.
After last night's defeat in the Lords, Mr Willis said: 'There must be an
official, preferably written, statement now. There will be no stability
until Mr Major announces a full independent review of all the pits and the
whole range of energy policy.
'The moratorium must include all the pits. We still have 10 of them that
appear to be being sacrificed to save face when what we want to do is to
save the pits and get common sense back on the rails.
'This defeat does give him an opportunity to make a clear statement and a
fresh start.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12369</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / The Coal Crisis: UDM leader to stand down
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART, Labour Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ROY LYNK, leader of the breakaway Union of Democratic Mineworkers, said
yesterday he felt so betrayed by the government's pit closure decision that
he would not stand for re-election.
Speaking from the bottom of the Silverhill mine in Nottinghamshire, where he
has spent the past five days and nights protesting at the closure decision,
Mr Lynk said he faced a credibility gap with his members and had decided 'to
jump before I am pushed'.
Members of the UDM, which represents about a third of British Coal's miners,
mainly in Nottinghamshire, worked through the 1984-85 pit strike and
subsequently enjoyed a close relationship with Conservative ministers. The
union remains opposed to privatisation but Mr Lynk has been a keen advocate
of taking an employee stake in the privatised pits.
Mr Lynk, who is 60 next month, said: 'I want to illustrate to the world the
obvious contempt the government and British Coal have got for moderate trade
union leaders.'
Mr Lynk was narrowly re-elected as president two years ago and in next
month's election would probably have lost to Mr Neil Greatrex, leader of the
union's Nottingham section. Mr Greatrex has always been more sceptical of
privatisation and more hostile to the government.
Mr Greatrex still faces Mr Arthur Morehouse, branch secretary at the
Thoresby pit, in the election for president. Even if Mr Greatrex wins, the
chances of swift rapprochement with the National Union of Mineworkers remain
slim.
Mr Greatrex said he hoped there would be a 'better rapport' with the NUM if
he was elected. He emphasised, though, that they would remain separate
organisations.
Mr Arthur Scargill, the NUM leader, will accept rapprochement only on his
terms: individual UDM members rejoining the NUM.
The TUC has enjoyed a strong revival in its credibility, not least among its
own member unions, during the pits crisis, according to senior officials.
An immediate consequence is likely to be a clear recommendation for a 'yes'
vote from the executive of the electricians' section of the AEEU craft union
in next year's ballot on whether the merged union should be in the TUC.
The electricians' union remains outside the TUC after disputes about
poaching of members, but after its merger with the AEU engineering union, a
TUC member, members of both unions are being balloted.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12370</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / The Coal Crisis: Heseltine faces an uphill task to boost
mining industry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES, Resources Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS MR Michael Heseltine begins the task of trying to keep more of the coal
industry alive, he has to find ways of expanding coal's share of the already
crowded energy market.
His task is fraught with practical difficulties. Nearly 50m tonnes of coal
is lying idle in stocks, and the electricity industry has made clear that
its appetite is sharply reduced. In order to sustain more than a few
additional pits, the trade and industry secretary would have to find a home
for several million tonnes of extra coal. Technically, the government has
the power to influence energy producers and consumers - and even to force
the buying of coal. Nevertheless, Mr Heseltine's announcement of the pits
reprieve had barely left his lips before the energy industry had sprung to
the defence of its patch.
The most direct route open to Mr Heseltine is to use the government's 40 per
cent stake in National Power and PowerGen, the two leading generators, as a
lever to persuade them to burn more coal. The next set of long-term
contracts between British Coal and the power industry is still being
negotiated. But sources in the electricity industry yesterday made clear
that they would resist any attempts to make them increase their purchases of
coal-based power.
Mr Bryan Townsend, chairman of Midlands Electricity, said the distribution
companies were determined not to be forced to sign excessive long-term
contracts only two years before regulations were due to be changed to allow
more competition. 'We'd be faced with stranded contracts,' he said.
One option before Mr Heseltine is to delay the next stage of electricity
deregulation.
In 1994 the level of protection in the regional distribution markets is due
to be reduced - which is why regional distributors such as Midlands
Electricity expect their franchise markets to shrink.
Mr Heseltine might also try to limit coal imports. Again, he would risk
angering the generators that have sunk large sums of money in port handling
facilities. Such action would aggravate strained trade relations with the
US, one of the UK's largest coal suppliers. Any curb on electricity imports
from France via the cross-Channel cable would be highly questionable given
the move to an EC single market - although the government might argue that
French electricity is state-subsidised.
In announcing his reprieve, Mr Heseltine said he would consult Professor
Stephen Littlechild, the electricity regulator, who is looking into the
effect that the power generators' switch to gas is having on electricity
prices. Prof Littlechild has the power to penalise electricity companies
that are not buying the cheapest electricity available. He has agreed to
speed up his inquiry if necessary, but he is unlikely to have formed any
conclusions before early next year.
Norweb, the Manchester-based electricity distributor, which is investing in
gas-fired stations, said yesterday it was confident that its gas deals would
stand up to regulatory scrutiny.
Lord Wakeham, leader of the Lords and a former energy secretary, last night
told peers that Mr Heseltine's review would discuss with the generators and
distribution companies whether the market prospects for coal had been
'correctly assessed'.
It would also look at each pit to see whether the case for closure had been
made and consider whether some pits should be mothballed or released to
private operators.
A further sector over which Mr Heseltine will undoubtedly be casting his eye
is the state-owned nuclear power industry, which contributes about 20 per
cent of the electricity in England and Wales. Nuclear Electric reacted
sharply to suggestions that he could bring forward from 1996 the phased
shutdown of ageing Magnox reactors to make room for more coal stations. The
stations are not due to be phased out until 1996.
Any shutdown would, however, entail heavy decommissioning costs, and would
remove the only power source that does not produce harmful emissions at a
time when the UK is trying to clean up its air.
Whichever route Mr Heseltine chooses involves a cost - to subsidise extra
coal production, to compensate companies that have to buy more expensive
electricity, or, with nuclear, to decommission power stations. In some
cases, such as subsidising coal, the cost will fall on the taxpayer. In
others, such as postponing electricity deregulation, it will be the consumer
who ends up paying the bill.
As one electricity industry representative put it: 'Whichever way they move,
they come up against new difficulties.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12371</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / The Coal Crisis: Tower Colliery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TOWER Colliery may become south Wales' sole pit if pressure on the
government proves unsuccessful.
A delegation of Welsh miners was told by Mr Antonio Cardoso e Cunha, the EC
energy commissioner, that he was deeply concerned about the government's pit
closure programme, but the European Commission was all but powerless to
intervene in a member state's domestic energy policy, Andrew Hill in
Brussels writes.
Mr Cardoso e Cunha said in an interview after the meeting - which had been
arranged six months ago - that he was 'not happy to see expensive German
coal burned and at the same time cheap UK coal being discarded'. Germany and
Spain both offer heavy subsidies to their coal-mining industries and the
European Commission has run into considerable political difficulty in
persuading the governments to reduce their state aid.
Mr Wayne David, Labour MEP for south Wales, who was present at the meeting,
said that the commissioner had attacked the situation as 'irrational'.
Mr David added that Mr Cardoso e Cunha had promised to look into claims that
contracts signed with gas producers during the UK electricity privatisation
process were discriminatory and that they infringed EC competition law.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12372</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / The Coal Crisis: Private coal company in rescue bid
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BUDGE Mining, the UK's biggest private coal producer, yesterday said it
wanted to talk to the government about a plan to save 'a significant number'
of the 31 collieries earmarked for closure.
The company, based in Retford, Nottinghamshire, said it had the backing of a
number of leading financial institutions.
Mr Richard Budge, company managing director, said the proposals had already
been put informally to British Coal and the Department of Trade and
Industry.
Mr Budge has been known to be interested in buying into British Coal for
some time and has said he was prepared to buy the whole corporation. His
company - which employs about 1,000 people - is part of the consortium put
together by the Union of Democratic Mineworkers to bid for 25 per cent of
the corporation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12373</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / The Coal Crisis: Anger begins to subside in Tory
constituencies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JIMMY BURNS and BETHAN HUTTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ACCORDING to her agent, Mrs Elizabeth Peacock, Conservative MP for Batley
and Spen, may vote against the government today because 'she is a Yorkshire
woman fighting for Yorkshire men'.
Last night she said she was prepared to resign as parliamentary private
secretary to Mr Nicholas Scott, social security minister, if the
government's coal review did not cover all the condemned pits. 'I am
prepared to go to the wire,' she added.
But emotion in some other constituencies where their Tory MPs have
previously threatened rebellion appeared to be less clear-cut as some party
members closed ranks.
The blunting of rebellious tendencies was shown in the Brent constituency of
Sir Rhodes Boyson, a member of the 1922 committee who had previously been an
outspoken critic of the pit closures.
Last Thursday, 18 Tory loyalists sitting on the local party association
committee unanimously passed a motion expressing their 'fury and dismay' at
the 'incompetent' way the closures had been handled by the government.
By late yesterday afternoon, though, an official for the committee described
the government's latest position on coal as 'much more acceptable'.
At Broxstowe, the constituency of Mr James Lester, another previous critic
of the government, the flood of telephone calls that followed the
government's first announcement on pit closures had by yesterday ground to a
halt.
Mr Barry Thurnell, the local agent said: 'Most of our people were
complaining . . . about the way their closure was being handled. Ninety per
cent of the calls we received before Monday said 'We knew it had to happen,
but not like this'.'
Mr Eric Birnie, party agent for Mr Bill Walker in Tayside North, said his
office had taken 60 phone calls since Thursday, criticising government
handling of the closures and demanding an explanation. Monday's statement by
Mr Heseltine had not reversed the trend: 'There have been one or two phone
calls saying they are now quite satisfied, but not nearly in the numbers
that have said they were appalled.'
Mrs Elizabeth Gilliland, agent for Mr Nicholas Winterton, said the general
tone of calls to the Macclesfield constituency was that Mr Heseltine's
statement had not been enough. There had only been one call supporting him.
In Taunton, party agent Mr Rodney Pilgrim said: 'Coal has touched a raw
nerve. It's a protest that has been building up on the back of other issues
such as Europe and the general financial turmoil.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12374</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / The Coal Crisis: Whips mop up all but last dregs of revolt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A DAY of intensive lobbying by government whips and Mr Michael Heseltine
seemed to have paid off last night as the Tory revolt over pit closures
seemed almost to have disappeared.
Face-to-face meetings between the trade and industry secretary and rebels
took place late into the night - and the private pressure was matched by
public statements from Mr John Major and others expanding on Monday's U-turn
announcement.
Ministers said the shift in emphasis was no more than a clarification of
what Mr Heseltine had originally told the Commons, but erstwhile rebels
hailed the statements as a real change. As Tories dispersed last night there
was a different atmosphere compared with last week, or even Monday.
Tory MPs stamped their feet in approval when Mr Heseltine addressed the
party's backbench trade and industry committee. 'There was an outbreak of
unity,' said one waverer as he left.
One government whip, pausing between arranging for still more doubters to
see Mr Heseltine, claimed the dissenters had been 'dramatically reduced'.
Mr Winston Churchill, MP for Davyhulme and one of the most prominent of the
Tory rebels, last night said he would support the government in tomorrow's
Commons vote 'because of the significant change of policy'.
There are only about half a dozen Tories who say they may still vote against
the government. Together with abstentions, that might yet scare government
business managers - although overturning the 21-strong Tory majority looks
increasingly unlikely.
Labour whips promised a 100 per cent turnout - with none of their MPs having
any hesitation in supporting the miners.
Of the 44 MPs from smaller parties, the three Democratic Unionist party MPs,
led by the Rev Ian Paisley, will vote with Labour. The nine Ulster Unionists
will not decide until today how to vote. The signs are that they will join
Labour, but there is some internal pressure for them to abstain.
One Ulster Unionist - Mr Cecil Walker, MP for Belfast North - is in the US
and will almost certainly not return in time for the vote.
Four Welsh and three Scottish Nationalists and 20 Liberal Democrats will
vote with Labour. So should the four Social Democratic and Labour party MPs
from Northern Ireland. Although Dr Joe Hendron, SDLP MP for West Belfast,
was on the same trip as Mr Walker he was last night considering flying back
to London.
Mr James Kilfedder, the sole Ulster Popular Unionist party MP, who usually
votes with the Tories, is refusing to say how he will vote.
Government whips were assuming a more-or-less complete turnout of Tories.
Sir Donald Thompson, MP for Calder Valley, is recovering from an operation
and may be excused.
Of the rebels, Mr Hugh Dykes (Harrow East), said he was looking for further
'substantial' changes by the government, including a promise of a 'genuinely
independent' review. Mrs Ann Winterton (Congleton) also said she would vote
with Labour unless there was an independent review on all aspects of energy
policy.
Others Tories still believed likely to vote with Labour include Mrs
Elizabeth Peacock (Batley and Spen), Mr Richard Shepherd (Aldridge
Brownhills), Mr Bill Walker (Tayside North) and Mr Nicholas Winterton
(Macclesfield).
Sir Patrick McNair-Wilson (New Forest) continues to oppose the government,
but says he will abstain.
Other possible abstainers include Mr James Cran (Beverley), Sir Teddy
Taylor, (Southend East) and Mr William Cash (Stafford).
The biggest boost for government whips came after Mr Heseltine's meeting
with the executive of the Tory backbench 1922 committee. Sir Marcus Fox,
1922 chairman, announced the executive was now unanimously behind the
government. Mr Heseltine, he said, had promised a 'full and open' review.
One executive member who had privately threatened to defy the whips said Mr
Heseltine had been 'put through the wringer', but was moving all the time on
the scope of the review.
In his meeting with the 1922 committee Mr Heseltine insisted that government
energy policy should not be decided by people outside the party and urged
loyalty, warning of many tough decisions to come on public spending. 'You
can't have a la carte government,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12375</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Trade News: STC awarded Dollars 370m order for sea
cable
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGO DIXON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STC, the UK telecommunications manufacturer bought two years ago by Canada's
Northern Telecom, has won a Dollars 370m (Pounds 215m) contract to build the
first fibre-optic cable linking Canada and Europe.
The undersea cable, due to be completed in 1994, has been commissioned by a
group of international telecommunications carriers led by Teleglobe of
Canada. The other purchasers are British Telecommunications, Germany's
Deutsche Telekom, Telecom Denmark and PTT of Iceland. The cable will land in
each of their countries.
It will enable Teleglobe to send voice, data and video traffic direct to
Europe instead of routing much of it through the US, as now. The cable will
carry the equivalent of 30,000 telephone calls simultaneously down each of
two pairs of optical fibres, four times as much as is carried by the current
generation of technology. Average cost of a transatlantic circuit will be
substantially lower than before.
STC said it was the only manufacturer able to supply this technology. The
cable will be made at STC's plants in Southampton, and Portland, Oregon. The
electronics will be made in Greenwich, London.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12376</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Trade News: UK rejects trade ban on Cuba by US
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN yesterday acted to circumvent US attempts to reinforce a trade
embargo on Cuba, saying that Downing Street and not Capitol Hill would
determine British trade policy with the Caribbean island.
The government invoked an existing law - the Protection of Trading Interests
Act - to prohibit UK companies owned by US interests from complying with
proposed US legislation banning them from trading with Cuba.
The law is designed to enable the government to provide a legal response to
extraterritorial measures such as the offending Cuban Democracy Act, which
is waiting to be approved by President George Bush. The British move follows
an angry reaction from the European Commission which said earlier this month
that the proposed extension of the US embargo had 'the potential to cause
grave damage to the transatlantic relationship'. In a strongly worded
statement, Mr Richard Needham, trade minister, said he would not accept any
attempt to 'superimpose US law on UK companies'.
'The British government, not the US Congress, will determine the UK's policy
on trade with Cuba,' he said. British policy is to encourage companies to
exploit civil market opportunities in Cuba. British exports to the island
were worth Pounds 28.4m in 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12377</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Trade News: US and EC pursue deal on oilseeds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL, World Trade Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
US FARM negotiators yesterday met their European Commission counterparts in
Brussels, aiming to resolve a long-standing dispute on the EC's oilseed
subsidy regime and paving the way for a weekend meeting of Mr Ray MacSharry,
EC farm commis sioner, and Mr Ed Madigan, US agriculture secretary.
In its desire to get a deal, the Bush administration has softened its
demands for EC production limits of subsidised oilseeds. It is now offering
a cap of 9m tonnes a year. This compares with long-standing calls for EC
output to be cut to 7m tonnes. EC farm negotiators want the ceiling at 9.5m
tonnes, down from current 11.4m tonnes.
But the administration's offer has failed to gain the support of the
American Soyabean Association, the injured party in an inflammatory Gatt
dispute over the EC's oilseeds subsidies.
The ASA, which has twice gone to Gatt and won decisions condemning the EC
subsidies, is spurning the Bush administration offer.
Latest developments confirm US and EC claims that negotiators came close
during talks in Brussels last week to resolving the dispute over subsidised
farm trade that has for the past two years stalled progress in the Uruguay
Round.
Mr Joe O'Mara, a senior US farm trade negotiator, flew into Brussels
yesterday for talks with Mr Guy Legras, his EC counterpart. It is uncertain
whether talks will continue today. Mr MacSharry is understood to be keen to
reach agreement with Mr Madigan, if agreement is achievable, before Monday's
meeting of the EC Agriculture Council.
US and EC officials confirmed yesterday that the most recent US proposal for
settling the oilseeds dispute contained the following elements:
EC production capped at 9m tonnes, and accompanied by a strong enforcement
mechanism;
no more than 5.128m hectares sown with subsidised oilseeds;
a 15 per cent set-aside required in the first year for land growing oil
seeds, with any oilseeds grown on set-aside land (for industrial use, for
example) to be included within the 9m tonne limit;
present yields of 2.36 tonnes per hectare to be cut to meet the 9m tonne
limit.
EC officials say reforms of the Common Agriculture Policy agreed in May this
year will ensure cuts in oilseed production to 9.5m tonnes. They have warned
US negotiators that deeper cuts would require the CAP reform package be
opened up, raising the risk that EC member states opposed to the reforms
would unravel other parts of the package.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12378</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Trade News: Malaysia extends telecoms time
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUALA LUMPUR
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Malaysia has granted a six-month extension to three foreign-led
telecommunications groups to comply with the terms of a MDollars 2bn (Pounds
470m) telecommunications contract awarded earlier this year, writes Kieran
Cooke from Kuala Lumpur. The three groups, led by Fujitsu of Japan, Nokia of
Finland and Alcatel/CIT of France, have been granted the extension to ensure
their equipment is fully compatible with each other's systems and with
existing ones installed in Malaysia by NEC of Japan and Ericsson of Sweden.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12379</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Trade News: Indian licensing deal for Britain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Bridgeport Machines, the Leicester-based machine tool builder, has signed an
important collaboration agreement under which Batliboi, the Indian
industrial conglomerate, will make Bridgeport horizontal machining centres
under licence, writes Andrew Baxter. Machining centres are automated,
multi-function machine tools.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12380</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Trade News: Trade fillip for Caracas
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CANUTE JAMES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KINGSTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
VENEZUELA'S efforts to become a member of the Caribbean Economic Community
(Caricom) have been given a fillip with a trade agreement which will open
the Venezuelan market to duty-free imports from members of the community,
writes Canute James from Kingston.
Under the agreement, Venezuela will allow one-way preferential access to its
market for imports from the 13 Caricom countries. Tariffs will be reduced
gradually over five years until a duty-free entry has been agreed for the
imports.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12381</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Trade News: Aircraft industry sees soft landing in
China - Manufacturers scramble for market share in civil aviation's only
area of growth
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CHINA is fast emerging as the latest battle ground for world commercial
aircraft as manufacturers scramble to win new business in the current civil
aviation industry slump.
'This is the only market right now where you can sell aircraft,' says Mr
Werner Hupe, the general manager of Ameco, a joint venture based in Beijing
between Air China and Lufthansa and the biggest aircraft maintenance and
engineering workshop in China.
Other aerospace executives based in China say demand for new aircraft is
growing rapidly with air traffic expanding by 28-30 per cent this year and
expected to continue growing for the rest of the decade.
As part of the modernisation of its economy, which is set to show annual
growth of more than 10 per cent in the next three years, China is seeking to
increase and upgrade its airports, improve passenger and freight handling
facilities and air traffic navigational systems. China has also announced
plans to allow foreign investment in state-owned carriers and airports,
starting with the country's six largest regional airlines.
One example is the Shanghai-based China Eastern Airlines, which recently
announced a Dollars 555m order for five Airbus A340 wide body airliners. The
airline, which has also ordered Airbus A300 and Fokker 100 jets, said it
expected to be free from government control by the end of this year.
Mr Wang Lian, the airline's president, said that the carrier might
recruitforeign expertise into its new, autonomous management and was also
considering an eventual flotation on China's stock market.
The big three western manufacturers - Boeing and McDonnell Douglas of the US
and the European Airbus consortium - are jostling for position in what is
becoming aviation's boom market. But Russian aircraft manufacturers, which
have traditionally supplied China with commercial aircraft, are also seeking
markets for new Russian aircraft equipped with western engines and avionics.
China's requirements span the entire range of commercial aircraft from large
wide body airliners to medium-sized jets and regional aircraft. At the top
end of the market, the orders battle centres on China Southern Airlines, the
Cantonese-based carrier, which is seeking to acquire at least six large wide
body twin-engine airliners. The airline is looking at both the new Boeing
777 wide body and the newly-launched Airbus A330.
'The significance of the China Southern order is that this competition will
be repeated many times in other Chinese regional carriers seeking wide body
aircraft,' an aero-engine official said.
McDonnell Douglas, which has devoted probably more effort that any other
western airframe manufacturer in building up a relationship with China
through an aircraft assembly joint venture in Shanghai, is also attempting
to place additional MD11 three engine wide body airliner with Chinese
carriers.
The US manufacturer reached an agreement this summer to co-produce with
China 40 MD-80 and MD-90 twin engine medium sized airliners. Boeing is now
challenging its US rival in the so-called Chinese 'trunkliner' market with a
proposal to co-produce its 200 seater 757 twin engine airliner in China.
However, the Russian Aviastar aerospace manufacturer is also expected to bid
for Chinese business with its new Tupolev TU-204 airliner powered by
Rolls-Royce engines. The TU-204 is the Russian rival of the Boeing 757 and
made its official debut at the Farnborough air show last month.
Both Aviastar and Rolls-Royce consider the TU-204 has good sales prospects.
China traditionally relied on Russian aircraft until the 1960s when it
ordered six Viscounts. It subsequently acquired Tridents from the UK before
reverting back to Russian-built aircraft, sold by the former Soviet Union
for Chinese commodities.
One of the big problems for the Chinese airlines has been the unreliability
of Russian engines and the rudimentary design of Russian airframes and
cabins. But Aviastar, which appointed UK management consultants Price
Waterhouse to help it develop a strategy to expand in the world market, and
Rolls-Royce believe the TU-204 can challenge western built airliners in
terms of technology, design and cost.
Aviastar says the TU-204 is about 20-25 per cent cheaper than equivalent
western jets. There would also be the possibility for China to acquire
TU-204 on a part barter basis paying for the Russian airframe in commodities
and cash for the Rolls-Royce engines.
The big three western manufacturers are also competing for a slice of the
Chinese regional aircraft market. Demand is increasing for smaller aircraft
to provide inter-city feeder services. But the main battle in this market
segment is between Fokker, the Dutch manufacturer, and British Aerospace
which is hoping its proposed joint regional jet venture with Taiwan will
eventually help open up new opportunities in mainland China.
There are also risks in this strategy. China continues to view with
considerable suspicion the manoeuvres of western aircraft manufacturers in
Taiwan. Mr Jean Pierson, the Airbus managing director, recently claimed that
a French proposal to sell Mirage combat aircraft to Taiwan appeared to be
the main reason why China was delaying the purchase of 12 Airbus wide body
airliners, including A300s and A330s, worth a total of Dollars 1.5bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12382</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Trade News: UK machine-tool maker in Indian licensing
deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRIDGEPORT MACHINES, the Leicester-based machine tool builder, has signed an
important collaboration agreement under which Batliboi, the Indian
industrial conglomerate, will make Bridgeport horizontal machining centres
under licence.
The agreement stems from a Pounds 4m order won earlier this year by Batliboi
from the Ishapore-based Rifle Factory for 16 horizontal machining centres to
manufacture arms. Machining centres are automated, multi-function machine
tools.
Batliboi wanted access to the latest machine-tool technology so that it
could win the military order and subsequent commercial contracts. The deal
has taken four years to negotiate, and is the first such agreement in India
for Bridgeport. The UK company fought off competition from German rivals
that dominate the market for machine tools used in arms manufacture.
Mr Malcolm Taylor, Bridgeport's managing director, said collaboration was
'the key' to the Indian market, which has been very difficult for western
suppliers. 'But there is a general feeling that things are opening up
somewhat.'
Batliboi's Rifle Factory is worth about Pounds 1m in export business to
Bridgeport, which is supplying three complete machines and the key parts
such as spindle assemblies and Siemens controls for the other 13.
Once the contract is fulfilled, production will continue at Batliboi's
factory at Surat, Gujarat State.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12383</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Trade News: STC takes Dollars 370m sea cable order
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
STC, the British telecommunications manufacturer bought two years ago by
Canada's Northern Telecom, has won a Dollars 370m (Pounds 215m) contract to
build the first fibre-optic cable linking Canada and Europe.
The undersea cable, which is due to be completed in 1994, has been
commissioned by a group of international telecommunications carriers led by
Teleglobe of Canada.
The other purchasers are British Telecommunications, Germany's Deutsche
Telekom, Telecom Denmark and PTT of Iceland. The cable will land in each of
their countries.
It will enable Teleglobe to send voice, data and video traffic direct to
Europe instead of routing much of it through the US as happens now.
As a result, Teleglobe will be less dependent on the cable capacity owned by
American Telephone &amp; Telegraph (AT&amp;T), the giant US telecommunications
group.
The new cable will carry the equivalent of 30,000 telephone calls
simultaneously down each of two pairs of optical fibres, four times as much
as is carried by the current generation of technology.
Average cost to the telephone companies of a transatlantic circuit will be
substantially lower than before.
STC made clear yesterday that it was the only manufacturer able to supply
this technology.
It had been chosen by the purchasers on the basis of bids made by itself and
competitors for a different cable which was to have linked the US and the UK
but was eventually scrapped.
The cable will be manufactured at STC's plants in Southampton, and Portland,
Oregon. The electronics will be made in Greenwich, London.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12384</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Trade News: Malaysia extends time for telecoms
contracts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUALA LUMPUR
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MALAYSIA has granted a six-month extension to three foreign-led
telecommunications groups to comply with the terms of a MDollars 2bn (Pounds
470m) telecommunications contract awarded earlier this year.
The three groups, led by Fujitsu of Japan, Nokia of Finland and Alcatel/CIT
of France, have been granted the extension to ensure their equipment is
fully compatible with each other's systems and with existing ones installed
in Malaysia by NEC of Japan and Ericsson of Sweden.
In March, Malaysia's finance ministry signed letters of intent with all five
companies to install 4m digital-exchange lines over the next five years.
Each of the companies, with their local partners, would be responsible for
installing an equal number of lines.
Critics said too many companies were involved and problems of equipment
compatibility would arise. But NEC and Ericsson, which have been supplying
digital-exchange lines in Malaysia for some years, have already signed firm
contracts. It is understood the other three groups have been assured they
too will be given contracts, if they meet the compatibility specifications.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12385</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World Trade News: Caracas' hopes of joining Caricom rise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CANUTE JAMES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KINGSTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
VENEZUELA'S efforts to become a member of the Caribbean Economic Community
(Caricom) have been given a fillip with a trade agreement which will open
the Venezuelan market to duty-free imports from members of the community.
Under the agreement, Venezuela will allow one-way preferential access to its
market for imports from the 13 Caricom countries. Tariffs will be reduced
gradually over five years until a duty-free entry has been agreed for the
imports.
After five years, the Caricom members will start a phased reduction of
tariffs, also over five years. By then, the community and Venezuela will
have totally free trade, except for exclusions to be agreed within the
community.
The agreement, signed in Caracas by Mr Carlos Andres Perez, the president of
Venezuela, and Mr Patrick Manning, prime minister of Trinidad and Tobago,
who is also chairman of Caricom, will come into force on January 1 next
year.
Caricom members have agreed to grant Venezuela Most Favoured Nation status
in the application of customs tariffs and have also agreed not to apply any
new quantitative restrictions on imports from Venezuela.
The products which will be traded duty free between Venezuela and Caricom
include iron and steel, spices, industrial gases and electronic items.
There will be a phased reduction of tariffs on agricultural products,
including livestock, furniture and other consumer durables.
The list of derogations includes beef, milk, rice, cement and television
sets.
Mr Manning said the pact with Venezuela, proposed by President Perez 15
months ago, is the first which Caricom had negotiated and signed as a
community.
The agreement was historic and would test uncharted waters as it involved a
group of developing countries, he added.
Venezuela is currently an observer to the community, but is hoping to become
the first Latin American member of the English speaking group, which has a
combined market of 5.5m people.
The Venezuelan application for full membership was filed a year ago, but the
community's leaders have not yet considered it.
The pact is expected significantly to increase the value and volume of trade
between Venezuela and Caricom. Figures from the Caricom Secretariat value
the community's imports from Venezuela at about Dollars 360m (Pounds 209m) a
year, while Venezuela spends about Dollars 90m on imports from the group.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12386</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Money supply shows first monthly decline
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN BUTLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN'S broad money supply contracted by 0.4 per cent in September - the
first year-on-year decline on record - in a reflection of the severe
slowdown in the Japanese economy, the Bank of Japan said yesterday.
The decline was broadly in line with projections, but nonetheless increased
expectations that the Bank of Japan would move shortly to cut interest rates
again in an effort to stimulate the economy.
Monetary growth has been falling steadily since March, as bank lending has
stagnated.
The Bank of Japan put a brave face on the decline and said that monetary
growth would not interfere with any recovery in the economy.
Growth in broad liquidity, which includes deposits in Japan's postal savings
system, also plunged to a low of 2.8 per cent, compared to 3.2 per cent in
August. The central bank has in recent months placed increased emphasis on
broad liquidity as a more accurate gauge of economic activity.
'I think there will be an interest rate cut on these figures,' said Mr
Geoffrey Barker, economist at Baring Securities. He said that with inflation
running at around 2 per cent, the 2.8 per cent growth in broad liquidity was
insufficient to accommodate economic growth.
Mr Paul Summerville, economist at Jardine Fleming Securities, however, said
that the figures provided no surprises and that money supply had been
contracting in real terms for months.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12387</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / A complex game of consensus: Japanese ruling party's largest
faction tries to pick a new chairman
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HOLED UP in Tokyo hotel rooms, limousines waiting to rush them to the next
closeted gathering, the senior members of the largest faction of Japan's
ruling Liberal Democratic party (LDP) are playing the complex game of
consensus.
For the past week, the 109 members of the faction formerly run by the
disgraced 'godfather' Mr Shin Kanemaru, have attempted to pick a new
chairman, a task made difficult because the faction is itself
faction-ridden.
Today is supposed to be deadline day, but the leading candidates have
modestly denied that they are candidates, and their supporters have denied
that there is division, while then accusing their opponents of not honouring
an LDP agreement to exercise 'factional restraint'.
The unseemly squabble, dominating the television and newspapers, yesterday
prompted Mr Kiichi Miyazawa, the prime minister, whose own future depends on
the outcome, to encourage the three cabinet ministers involved to devote
more time to their portfolios.
Status in the faction, often called the Takeshita faction after the former
prime minister Mr Noboru Takeshita, is generally based on a simple
calculation of how many times a politician has been elected to the
parliament. It is a hierarchy much like that of the average Japanese sushi
restaurant.
Before slicing the fish, the aspiring sushi master must spend about five
years, bucket in hand, swabbing the floor and soaping the sushi bench at the
end of the night. LDP members, regardless of speaking skills or political
vision, are expected to wait patiently in line as they move slowly through
the faction and the party.
Much of the argument has been among two and three-term members of the
faction, who are being courted by the candidates, each of whom has been
elected at least eight times. The two-term faction members have set up camp
in a hotel room, as have the three-termers, while the four-to-six termers
have convened meetings of their 'Isshin-kai', the One Heart Group, as well
as holding separate gatherings.
The three leading contenders are: Mr Ichiro Ozawa, a former LDP
secretary-general and the preferred choice of Mr Kanemaru; Mr Keizo Obuchi,
also a former LDP secretary-general; and Mr Tsutomu Hata, the finance
minister and the likely compromise chairman if the Obuchi and Ozawa factions
cannot reach a consensus.
There is a danger that the Takeshita faction will split if Mr Obuchi and his
supporters suspect that Mr Ozawa has taken permanent control, leaving them
dependent on his goodwill for their future ministerial appointments. After
six terms, an MP can justifiably expect a ministerial job, preferably one
providing corporate contacts able to provide the funds to cultivate a
personal network of younger faction members.
It was with this complex hierarchy in mind that Mr Seiroku Kajiyama (seven
terms) expressed the collective outrage last week that a mere two-termer, Mr
Norio Sugiyama, should be the first to hint to the press that the
'godfather' had resigned. For that serious breach of etiquette, Mr Sugiyama
was publicly called 'stupid' and privately called much worse.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12388</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / De Klerk blocked on amnesty bill
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A MULTI-PARTY committee of the South African parliament yesterday rejected a
controversial draft law that would allow President F W de Klerk to extend
secret pardons to state officials for apartheid crimes.
If the bill is defeated in the full parliament, which is due to sit today,
it would prove a serious embarrassment to Mr de Klerk, who has come under
increasing criticism recently both from within and outside his ruling
National Party.
The African National Congress (ANC) said yesterday it would nullify the
amnesty bill, if it came to power.
The bill was opposed in committee by every parliamentary grouping except the
National Party. Party officials were last night working to persuade
opposition MPs to support the bill, though its chance of being approved
appeared slim.
Mr de Klerk could still force the bill through with the approval of the
multi-party President's Council, which is dominated by the National Party
and thus gives the ruling party final say over all legislation, whether or
not it has gained parliamentary approval. But he has never used this
controversial mechanism to force through legislation against the will of the
parliament, and he may be reluctant to do so now.
He may choose to delay further consideration of the bill until the next full
session of parliament, which begins early next year, or let it lapse.
However he is under pressure from the security forces to provide amnesties
for crimes committed under the policy of apartheid, including torture and
political assassination, before the National Party hands over to a
multiracial interim government, possibly next year.
The ANC yesterday criticised the bill because amnesties would be granted by
a government-appointed board sitting in secret and crimes committed would be
kept secret. However the ANC itself was yesterday criticised for secrecy,
after refusing to release the names of its officials involved in torture in
ANC detention camps.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12389</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Israel has slim chance of separate deal with Syria
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LARA MARLOWE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DAMASCUS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SINCE he agreed to negotiations with Israel last year, Mr Hafez al Assad,
the Syrian president, has repeated his motto, 'Jerusalem before the Golan',
countless times.
As the latest round of bilateral Middle East peace talks opens in Washington
today Syria's solidarity with fellow Arabs will again be tested.
Syria appears unlikely to renounce its insistence on Israeli withdrawal from
all occupied Arab territories, while Israel continues to demand bilateral
peace treaties before the question of territory is addressed.
In these circumstances - further complicated by the US presidential election
 -Syrian officials have little hope of substantial progress in the new round
of peace talks.
At a meeting of Arab delegations to the peace conference in Amman at the
weekend, Mr Farouk al-Shara'a, the Syrian foreign minister, reassured
Palestinian representatives that his country was committed to a
comprehensive peace agreement and that Damascus would not seek to regain its
own Israeli-occupied territory and abandon the Palestinians.
A message conveyed in Amman by Mr Amr Moussa, the Egyptian foreign minister
who has acted as a mediator between the Arab delegations and the Israelis,
to Mr al-Shara'a indicated a small amount of movement: the Israelis wished
to receive a complete explanation of the Syrian phrase 'full peace' and
would be willing to 'expand the territorial discussion'. Israel and Syria
define 'peace' differently and hold incompatible interpretations of Security
Council resolutions 242 and 338, the basis of the talks.
Syrian officials in Damascus denied rumours which emerged during the last
round of bilateral talks that Syria might be prepared to sign a separate
peace treaty with Israel in exchange for a complete Israeli withdrawal from
the Golan Heights.
President Assad was so angered by these allegations that he refused to meet
Mr Yassir Arafat, the PLO chairman, after the latter said he feared the
Syrians would betray the Palestinians in the peace talks.
A separate peace with Israel is anathema to the Syrians: not only would it
contradict two decades of Ba'athist rhetoric, it could destabilise Syria by
reviving popular resentment over the country's participation in the
anti-Iraq coalition during the Gulf war.
Syrian officials say that Mr Assad hopes to mitigate the influence of
fundamentalists by refusing to accept Jerusalem as the Israeli capital and
demanding the return of all occupied territories. If Syria concedes on these
points, says a well-placed Syrian official, 'there will be no containing the
fundamentalists'.
False hopes of progress arose during the last round after the Syrian
delegation submitted a secret, nine-point document to the Israelis. A Syrian
official said the Israelis wanted to discuss Syrian recognition of Israel
while ignoring passages regarding Palestinian rights, the dismantling of
Israeli settlements and Israeli withdrawal from occupied Arab territories.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12390</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / N Korea unveils law on foreign investment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SEOUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NORTH KOREA yesterday appeared to take its first step along the 'capitalist
road' by announcing a new foreign investment law.
The communist state said it would allow foreign companies to set up
wholly-owned facilities in special economic zones.
It also provided details on the taxation of foreign concerns for the first
time, with a corporate tax rate of 14 per cent for companies operating in
the special zones.
Foreign companies will also be given tax concessions during the initial five
years of operation if they are involved in high-technology industries,
resource development and infrastructure construction.
The new law, which was approved by parliament two weeks ago, is a revision
of the country's 1984 joint venture rules.
Most of the joint ventures now in North Korea are small light industrial
enterprises involving pro-Pyongyang Koreans living in Japan.
The total capitalisation of joint ventures is estimated at Dollars 100m.
No western company has invested in North Korea since it defaulted on
international loans in the 1970s.
The move by North Korea to attract foreign investment is meant to revive its
ailing economy which contracted by 5.2 per cent in 1991 due to a shortage of
oil and foreign currency following the deterioration of trade relations with
the former Soviet bloc.
China, Pyongyang's closest ally, has tried to convince the North Koreans
that the adoption of Beijing's market measures, including economic zones,
will help them avoid the fate of their former socialist allies in eastern
Europe.
North Korea announced last December that it was establishing economic zones
in the north-east ports of Sonbong and Najin.
It also held recent talks with South Korean companies about an industrial
park in the western port of Nampo, near Pyongyang.
The new investment law, unlike the joint venture law, will allow foreigners
to remit part of their profits abroad.
It also guarantees property rights, and promises compensation in the case of
'unavoidable' nationalisation.
Foreign companies can lease land for up to 50 years in the zones and they
will be exempt from tariffs on imported goods, except those designated by
North Korea.
However, western companies are likely to remain sceptical of the liberal
terms offered since they are still owed millions of dollars for products
delivered to North Korea two decades ago.
North Korea also has one of the worst credit ratings in the world due to its
loan defaults.
Although Pyongyang announced the new investment law on its overseas news
services, no mention was apparently made to the North Korean public,
according to South Korean officials.
'The Pyongyang regime may not have wanted to shock the public with a report
that could be viewed as an abrupt policy shift to the capitalist line,' said
one official with Naewoe Press, the Seoul agency that monitors the North
Korean media.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12391</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Berri to be Lebanese speaker: Civil war militia leader wins
highest Shia legislative post
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LARA MARLOWE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BEIRUT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Nabih Berri, one of the principal militia leaders in Lebanon's 1975-1990
civil war and a close ally of Syria, became speaker of the Lebanese
parliament yesterday after 105 of 128 deputies voted for him in the first
session of parliament.
Mr Berri, the 54-year-old son of Shia Moslem Lebanese emigrants to Sierra
Leone, joined the legislature for the first time in the controversial August
23 - October 11 general election and has been elevated to the highest
position a Shia may aspire to in Lebanon.
The southern Lebanon district of Nabatieh gave Mr Berri more than 120,000
votes - the highest number received by any candidate in the legislative
poll.
The accession of Mr Berri, like the composition of the first new parliament
in 20 years, symbolises the social revolution caused by the country's civil
war.
Mr Berri's only competitor for the speaker's chair, a wealthy Shia Moslem
from an old Beirut family and an MP since the 1960s, received only 14 votes.
Twelve newly-elected Moslem fundamentalist deputies, including eight members
of the Iranian-backed Hizbollah, also attended yesterday's session, some
wearing robes and turbans. Seventy-six of the 128 members have never served
in parliament before.
'Let bygones be bygones,' Mr Berri told the assembly in his acceptance
speech. The words were especially poignant: his Syrian-armed Amal militia
fought Christian and Druze militias and even its fellow Shia Moslems in the
war. It imprisoned western passengers during the June 1985 TWA hijacking and
from 1985-1988 bombarded Palestinian refugees in Lebanon in the infamous
'camps war'.
Mr Berri recently reversed his opposition to Lebanon's sectarian system of
government, under which political positions are allotted by religious
affiliation. He has vowed to fight the permanent settlement of some half
million Palestinian refugees in Lebanon.
Mr Berri this year resolved his feud with Hizbollah, who fielded
parliamentary candidates on his southern Lebanon list. The fundamentalists
had long scorned Mr Berri, a lawyer by training, for his western dress and
for the Amal militia's lack of fervour in fighting the Israelis in Shia
southern Lebanon. Yet Mr Berri promised yesterday to strive to recover the
Israeli-occupied zone.
A new Lebanese government is to be formed in coming weeks. President Elias
Hrawi has made clear his desire to nominate Mr Rafiq Hariri, the
Lebanese-born Saudi billionaire, as prime minister. Business sources believe
a Hariri premiership would strengthen the Lebanese pound and improve
economic conditions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12392</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / De Klerk blocked on pardons bill
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A MULTI-PARTY committee of the South African parliament yesterday rejected a
controversial draft law that would allow President F W de Klerk to extend
secret pardons to state officials for apartheid crimes.
If the bill is defeated in the full parliament, which is due to sit today,
it would prove a serious embarrassment to Mr de Klerk, who has come under
increasing criticism recently both from within and outside his ruling
National Party.
The African National Congress (ANC) said yesterday it would nullify the
amnesty bill, if it came to power.
The bill was opposed in committee by every parliamentary grouping except the
National Party. Party officials were last night working to persuade
opposition MPs to support the bill, though its chance of being approved
appeared slim.
Mr de Klerk could still force the bill through with the approval of the
multi-party President's Council, which is dominated by the National Party
and thus gives the ruling party final say over all legislation, whether or
not it has gained parliamentary approval. But he has never yet used this
controversial mechanism to force through legislation against the will of the
parliament.
He may choose to delay further consideration of the bill until the next full
session of parliament, which begins early next year, or let it lapse.
However he is under pressure from the security forces to provide amnesties
for crimes committed under apartheid policies.
The ANC yesterday criticised the bill because amnesties would be granted by
a government-appointed board sitting in secret and crimes committed would be
kept secret.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12393</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Brokers admit paying clients for losses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN'S brokers have confessed to providing another Y10bn (Pounds 47m) in
compensation to favoured customers for securities investment losses, and
drawn praise from the Ministry of Finance for their apparent determination
to stop reimbursing their clients.
A survey of 47 larger securities houses by the Japan Securities Dealers'
Association found that 10 brokers, mostly middle-sized firms, had provided
compensation of Y100m or more over the past three fiscal years after demands
from clients.
The Big Four brokers, Nomura Securities, Daiwa Securities, Nikko Securities,
and Yamaichi Securities, told the JSDA that they had not provided
reimbursements other than their share of the Y225bn in compensation already
reported to the finance ministry.
Last year, leading Japanese brokers admitted to compensating a long list of
corporate customers for trading losses in the wake of the Tokyo stock market
crash, and the JSDA survey is part of the attempt to restore public
confidence in the industry.
The finance ministry welcomed the results of the survey and said the
industry appears to have learned from the mistakes of the past.
The ministry, itself criticised last year for lax control over the brokers,
said that it would maintain an extra close watch on their activities for at
least the next three years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12394</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Amnesty pleads for Tunisians
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCIS GHILES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AMNESTY International, the London-based human rights organisation, yesterday
called on Tunisia to order 'a fair retrial or release' of 265 supporters of
an illegal fundamentalist organisation. The 265 were sentenced to prison
terms, including life imprisonment, after mass trials last August on charges
of plotting against the government.
Amnesty says that the prosecution rested its case 'almost entirely on
uncorroborated confessions which defendants, supporters of the al-Nahda
(Renaissance) movement, alleged had been extracted by methods of torture.'
Amnesty also called upon the Tunisian government to establish 'a thorough,
independent and impartial inquiry into pre-trial irregularities, including
deaths in custody of several detainees'.
Amnesty's call comes less than two weeks after a report from the New
York-based Middle East Watch said 'at the trials themselves, evidence of
human rights abuses was ample.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12395</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Johannesburg broker jailed for fraud
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Greg Blank, a Johannes-burg stockbroker, has been sentenced to eight
years in prison after conviction on 48 counts of fraud involving
share-dealing irregularities.
Mr Blank's trial, following crimes which netted him and others about R10m
(Pounds 2.13m) in illegal gains, was the highest profile securities trial in
Johannesburg in many years.
Although many brokers welcomed the sentence, there was shock at its severity
as the state had not called for imprisonment. The courts are determined to
be seen to be taking a stern line against white-collar crime. Reflecting
this, Mr Justice Cloete, the presiding judge, yesterday refused Mr Blank
leave to appeal. Mr Blank's counsel will now seek this from the Chief
Justice.
Because Mr Blank pleaded guilty, no witnesses were called, preventing the
proper airing of stock exchange practices that many had hoped for.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12396</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Mideast negotiators give peace another chance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMMAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARAB and Israeli peace negotiators reassemble in Washington today with two
uncomfortable thoughts in mind: in the year since the process was launched
in Madrid they have achieved no substantive accords and, in the middle of
their latest scheduled round of talks, the US president who brought them
together may be voted out of office.
Syria, Jordan, Lebanon and the Palestinians are returning for their seventh
round of bilateral talks with Israel, apparently no less committed to the
Middle East peace process than before.
Mr Yitzhak Rabin, the Israeli prime minister, has invested much of his
political capital since his election last June in the search for a peace
agreement and cannot afford to have the account slide into deficit so soon.
In the latest round - due to last until November 19 with a break over the US
election on November 3 - much will depend on whether Israel and the
Palestinians can make real progress towards agreement on an interim period
of Palestinian self-government in the West Bank and Gaza. At the Madrid
conference last October, this was set as a target to be achieved within a
year.
In the last session in September, the first since Mr Rabin came to office,
there were signs that the two sides were getting down to business. But there
are still fundamental differences over the scope of the proposed
self-government's authority, for example on the extent to which the
Palestinians will have control of land in the territories.
In the Syrian-Israeli talks, the big obstacle is Israel's occupation of the
Golan Heights. The most Israel is seeking in this round is a joint
'statement of principles' by the two sides which would open the way to
deeper negotiations. But that in itself would be a breakthrough, given the
long history of hostility between them.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12397</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Unions may lose role in wage-fixing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMILIA TAGAZA
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CANBERRA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AUSTRALIA'S powerful trade unions will lose their main tool of influence,
the centralised wage-fixing system, if the conservative opposition wins
federal elections next year.
The coalition of the opposition Liberal and National parties yesterday
unveiled a blueprint of a radical industrial relations policy which, if
implemented, would give employees and employers the right to negotiate
directly with each other, with or without union involvement.
All conditions will be up for negotiation, except for four minimum
guarantees: minimum hourly rates for adult and youth workers, four weeks'
annual leave, two weeks non-cumulative sick leave and 12 months unpaid
maternity leave.
Under the existing centralised wage-fixing system, about 80 per cent of the
Australian work force, whether union members or not, are covered by minimum
employment standards agreed by the unions, the employers and the government
through the Industrial Relations Commission.
The ruling Labor Party considers industrial relations policy as another
major battleground for federal elections set for the middle of next year.
The opposition's intention to introduce a goods and services tax has already
provided fodder for initial campaigning.
Mr Paul Keating, the prime minister, branded the opposition a 'prices up and
wages down' party.
'First they want to tax everything you can shoot with a 15 per cent goods
and services tax, and now they want to cut your pay,' he said.
Reaction by unions and business was predictable. Unions said the policy
would leave workers with only two choices: take the employers' conditions or
take the sack. Business tentatively welcomed the policy as a significant
step towards a more sensible wages system.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12398</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / A business sings the blues: IBM must sharpen its marketing
edge if it is to recover
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Once upon a time, long before the invention of computers, the eager salesmen
of fast-growing International Business Machines would gather of a morning to
sing uplifting company songs before they hit the road. If the tradition
still existed today, they might be chanting laments.
For IBM has just unveiled a dismal set of third-quarter earnings which has
shocked Wall Street, sent its share price plunging, and raised new questions
over the speed and toughness of the cultural revolution supposedly shaking
up the world's largest computer company.
IBM made profits of a mere Dollars 86m, or 15 cents a share, from normal
operations in the three months from July to September, on revenues of
Dollars 14.7bn. And after taking special charges for plant closures and
early retirement programmes it reported a net loss of Dollars 2.78bn.
The figures were below the most pessimistic forecasts of Wall Street
analysts who immediately scrambled to reduce their estimates of IBM's future
profits. They now expect it to report operating earnings of Dollars
4.00-Dollars 4.50 a share in 1992, compared to previous forecasts of Dollars
5-Dollars 6, while 1993 has been lowered from Dollars 7-Dollars 8 to Dollars
6-Dollars 7.
Even more embarrassing for the company has been the performance of its share
price, which has fallen some 12 per cent since last Thursday's earnings
announcement to the level of a decade ago.
So great is the market's distrust that once-mighty IBM, the bluest of blue
chip companies, is having to deny that it plans to cut its Dollars 4.84 a
share annual dividend.
Because of the share price drop, the dividend now yields a hefty and very
attractive 7 per cent - by far the highest pay-out of any of the companies
which make up the Dow Jones Industrial Average and only a little short of
the yield on the safest of investments, long-term US government bonds. The
dividend seems secure - at least for now. The company says its free cash
flow - cash available for distribution to shareholders - will be higher than
last year's Dollars 2.1bn and is expected to cover the dividend, though that
is before the cost of an employee buy-out programme and funding for its
growing finance business.
Even if conditions deteriorated over coming months the company's 14.4 per
cent debt-to-equity ratio on the non-finance side of its business at the end
1991 means it could easily borrow to sustain the dividend. That, however,
might not help its credit rating, which at present retains the top, triple-A
bill of health from the rating agency Standard &amp; Poor's.
IBM would surely pull out all the stops to maintain the dividend. For one
thing, the size of the pay-out is helping prop up the company's share price.
For another, its public commitment to maintaining the dividend means it
could not reverse its position without provoking an even greater loss of
investor confidence.
Yet IBM has had a nasty habit of dashing investors' hopes since the
mid-1980s with a series of much-trumpeted reorganisations which have failed
to improve its financial performance. 'The market is simply fatigued with
the company,' says one observer.
The crucial question for investors now is whether IBM's latest shake-up  -
its most dramatic yet - can finally produce a sustained improvement in
earnings, boosting both the share price and the group's return on equity.
The latter has languished in recent years at 15 per cent or less, but the
company aims to raise it to 18 per cent by 1994.
In short, is IBM an attractive recovery stock, seriously undervalued, or a
flailing bureaucracy, with the wrong product mix, doomed to underperform the
market?
The answer depends partly on a factor beyond the company's control: the
state of the world economy. The US is growing extremely weakly, while Europe
and Asia, which produce more than half the group's revenues, are slowing
down.
IBM has blamed part of its third-quarter difficulties on the general
downturn in Europe and, more specifically, on the wild gyrations in the
region's currencies at the end of September, which should not be a recurrent
event. 'People just stopped buying things,' says Mr Frank Metz, chief
financial officer.
Yet IBM's fate depends largely on the long-term impact of the radical
shake-up unveiled last December by Mr John Akers, the chairman, and designed
to overcome the structural weaknesses revealed by the computer revolution of
the 1980s.
IBM, which has always dominated the market for large, mainframe computers
(it still accounts for over 60 per cent of global sales) was slow to
recognise the implications of micro-processor breakthroughs which greatly
enhanced the power of desktop computers and encouraged companies to
substitute networks of smaller machines for big, central processing units.
And in an era of extremely rapid technological advance, where personal
computer product development cycles can be as little as eight months, its
cumbersome, centralised bureaucracy could not respond fast enough to market
forces.
It also seriously misjudged the economic outlook, expecting a continuation
of its robust sales growth in the 1980s. When the US economy slowed down, it
was left saddled with an extremely expensive cost base and a company
tradition, dating from the days of the singing salesmen, of no redundancies.
The Akers revolution involves replacing the centralised structure with a
looser-knit federation of 13 businesses: nine in manufacturing and four
marketing operations serving different regions of the globe.
The idea is to make the operations more entrepreneurial by pushing power
down the line. The businesses each have their own financial targets, have
more freedom to set their own prices, and compete against rival IBM
operations, while pay is being more closely tied to performance.
The strategy also involves shifting the composition of IBM's business,
making it less dependent on computer hardware, which as an industry the
company expects to grow more slowly over the coming five years than software
and services (in other words, providing solutions to computing problems).
Third, the shake-up means sharply cutting IBM's bloated operating expenses.
Industry observers say the aim is to cut sales, general and administrative
expenses from about 33 per cent of revenues now to about 25 per cent by 1994
through measures such as job cuts and more efficient use of work space.
So far the jury is out on both the cost-cutting and revenue-boosting
efforts. The company now expects to shed 40,000 jobs this year through a
huge employee buy-out programme, double what it expected at the start of the
year. It is the company's largest annual reduction - about 12 per cent of
the labour force - and means it has shed some 25 per cent of its workers
since 1985.
But some observers fear that the market is facing such severe competition
that falling prices could outstrip the impact of this fat-shedding and force
IBM into faster, more brutal job cuts.
The problem is that the group's paternalistic tradition eschews forced
redundancies. It is one of the most cherished parts of the group's inbred
culture, with its laudable emphasis on 'respect for the individual'. Once a
member of the IBM family, always a member.
That policy is already under immense strain. Rival computer companies with
similar ideals, such as Digital Equipment, have already been forced to
abandon them. And at IBM 'no lay-offs' means that formerly high-flying
salesmen might find themselves reassigned to much more menial tasks, albeit
on their former salaries.
What could prove crucial, but remains unclear, is how much freedom the 13
new entrepreneurial businesses will be given to set their own staffing
levels. A recent internal company memo suggests they have been given greater
powers to recommend job cuts, though these would still have to be approved
by the group's four-person management committee.
And the immediate outlook on the sales side of the picture is far from
bright, because of industry-wide weak demand and excess manufacturing
capacity which is putting severe pressure on prices. It is reckoned that
IBM's gross profit margins on sales have dropped from 57 per cent three
years ago to about 44 per cent now, and may fall to 40 per cent next year.
In mainframes, still the company's bread and butter, IBM is now expecting a
small drop in revenues for the year, despite the introduction in 1991 of its
important new ES 9000 range, and rivals Hitachi of Japan and Amdahl of the
US are offering buyers huge discounts. A much larger question hangs over the
long-term future of the mainframe business.
Some analysts argue that the global trend away from mainframes and towards
smaller, cheaper networked systems will accelerate and simply erode the
group's revenue base. Others maintain that the market for big machines will
grow for the foreseeable future, albeit at a slow pace.
IBM's hardware product range can boast some significant successes, such as
its AS-400 mini-computers, which have been steadily gaining market share,
and its RS/6000 work stations. Its software and services businesses are also
enjoying good growth.
But it still has particularly serious problems in personal computers, where
barriers to entry are now extremely low and products have become commodity
items. IBM has been hammered over the past two years by much fast-moving
manufacturers such as Dell Computer, offering inexpensive machines through
innovative sales channels.
IBM sales in the US have fallen sharply,in part because of its relatively
high prices and partly because buyers were waiting for an important roll-out
of new IBM products this autumn. Personal computers accounted for two-thirds
of the company's 6 percentage point drop in hardware gross profit margins
during the third quarter.
Yet IBM is now fighting back. Last month, as part of the entrepreneurial
restructuring, it separated IBM PC from the rest of its personal systems
business. The idea is for the Dollars 7bn turnover company to be as flexible
and aggressive as its rivals.
After a flurry of product launches in September, it yesterday rolled out
some particularly important offerings in the market for low-cost personal
computers, which it is calling ValuePoint.
Customer reactions to these products in the final quarter of this year and
the first half of next will provide an important indicator as to whether IBM
really is becoming entrepreneurial or finding it impossibly hard to break
free of its encrusted corporate culture.
If it proves it can, the potential for profits growth over the medium term
could be substantial.
But success is far from certain. Above all, IBM needs to show that it has
relearned the lesson which made it successful all those years ago, in the
age of the singing salesmen - razor-sharp marketing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12399</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Leading Article: A new policy framework
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BRUTAL exit of sterling from the exchange rate mechanism was a watershed
in the history of Mr John Major's government. On the far side lay a
determined government pursuing a clear, if increasingly costly, goal. On
this side lies a government trying to prevent a series of retreats from
turning into a rout. The unfolding disaster can be halted, but only if the
government enunciates a new framework for economic policy. That is what it
must provide, both for the country and for itself.
Lowering interest rates is not enough. In the absence of a credible
framework, even easing that can be justified on its merits would be
dangerous. The two interest rate cuts that have occurred since sterling left
the ERM have already been judged, reasonably, to be the ploy of petrified
politicians, with each cut expected to be the harbinger of another.
Once a British government is judged to be engaged in a monetary U-turn, the
currency is likely to be dumped, the bonds that the government has to sell
in huge numbers are likely to be spurned, unreasonable wage demands are
likely to be conceded and efforts to cut costs are likely to be slackened.
In short, everything that has been so painfully gained may be lost.
Yet the obvious alternative - retaining relatively high nominal interest
rates - has grown more implausible with each piece of bad economic news. An
early return to the ERM might seem to be one way of keeping interest rates
up. But it would not prove workable. This is not just because other member
countries might prefer not to have the pound back; nor simply because return
to the ERM would create a political uproar; nor because interest rates would
tend to rise above German levels once more, even though the UK needs still
lower interest rates; nor just because the credibility of the ERM has been
dented.
It is for all these reasons together. Investors will doubt the desire of the
authorities to defend a new parity. They will test it. And it will fail.
Such a failure would further damage both the UK's relations with its
continental partners and the credibility of its economic policies. Above
all, the UK needs the flexibility to lower interest rates. But it will also
need to be able to raise them again. This implies the exercise of judgment,
precisely what policymakers have shown themselves to lack. This is why the
government must offer more than lower interest rates. It needs a policy
package.
Thorough investigation
First, it is not good enough for the authorities to pretend that sterling
was put into the ERM at the right time and the right rate; that the right
policy decisions were taken; and that it was forced to leave by
unforeseeable events. What is needed, instead, is a thorough investigation
into the decisions associated with the UK's membership of the ERM. How can
British government improve if the reasons for failure are not even
investigated? More important, the dominance over British government of the
notion that the Treasury knows best must be ended. What is needed is an
independent central bank, with a properly qualified board of directors,
dedicated to the achievement of price stability, subject only to a specific
override from the government. What is also needed is discussion of the
Treasury's fiscal proposals well before the budget and an explicit balancing
of expenditure against revenue.
These are not utopian suggestions. The government should have realised by
now that to be responsible for everything is to be blamed for everything.
Once the British government loses credibility, all economic policy becomes
tainted. But German and US experience shows that this need not happen, if
monetary policy is independently managed.
As a first step, the Treasury should put forward a detailed monthly analysis
of monetary policy, as does the Bundesbank. The Bank of England should
publish its own views independently, thus ending the pretence that all
right-thinking people must agree. This would at least throw some light on
the cosy coterie of officials and ministers.
These institutional changes are important because the persistent failure of
British policies is only partly the failure of a country. It is also the
failure of a system of power without transparency or adequate
responsibility. Without such changes sharply lower interest rates are bound
to look like cutting and running. With such changes, bold policies can be
contemplated.
What should these policies consist of? On monetary policy, the chancellor
should lower base rates to 6 per cent now. He can justify this decision by
reference to the monetary policies that have had to be adopted by other
countries plagued by excessive levels of private debt. He can also justify
the decision by reference to the length and severity of the present
recession and the need to give a boost to confidence.
The alternative to a single cut is a series of smaller ones. That would make
less sense since the consequences of each cut cannot be known until long
after the next one has been made. Rates should be set, instead, at what
seems a reasonable level. Thereafter, the authorities must be prepared to
wait and see. For a country that is in recession, but has a significant
inflation problem, a base rate that gives positive real rates before tax
looks like a reasonable starting point.
With rates of interest down to 6 per cent, increases in interest rates will
become credible once more. Such increases could well be needed if sterling
were to collapse, wage inflation were to stop falling before it has reached
about 4 per cent, or long-term rates of interest were to rise sharply once
more. Pay is particularly important. A country that has had a substantial
devaluation, but does not orient policy towards the control of pay
inflation, is doomed to a self-defeating wage-price spiral.
Lower interest rates
A cut in interest rates to 6 per cent does not preclude return to the ERM
and may even make it easier. Over the next year or so, rates of interest in
continental Europe are likely to fall. A year from now rates may even have
converged. But by then the UK economy should have started to recover. If
rates of interest are expected to converge in future, the sterling exchange
rate should also retrace some of the ground it may lose now.
The change in monetary policy should be presented as an attempt to rebalance
economic policy. The ERM imposed a high exchange rate, an excessively tight
monetary policy and an unsustainably loose fiscal policy. That needs to be
corrected. The chancellor should, therefore, simultaneously announce a start
towards elimination of the structural deficit, partly via tax increases. One
option, in the context of sharply lower short-term interest rates, would be
the reduction or even elimination of mortgage interest relief, worth some
Pounds 6bn.
Meanwhile, properly evaluated infrastructure projects should be carried
through. These are self-limiting expenditures that must be justifiable in
present circumstances. And expenditure restraint should focus on pay rather
than jobs in the public sector or on welfare benefits. The danger is that
any such package will be viewed as another inflationary U-turn. The
government should, therefore, finance as much of its borrowing requirement
as possible through index-linked securities. It should also commit itself to
raising interest rates once more if inflation stops falling. It must eschew
targets for real activity.
There is no good alternative to rebalancing monetary and fiscal policy,
combined with a commitment to institutional change. Merely squeezing the
economy until inflation is first eliminated will cause unacceptable damage
to the economy. But going for growth at all costs would repeat all the
mistakes of the past. It is better to organise a retreat than to flee, to
seize control over events than respond to them. The ERM policy has failed.
The gradualist policy is proving untenable. The government should act across
the board, since a piecemeal approach would not work. And it should act now.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12400</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Brussels' green sprouts: Environment policy is unlikely to
fall victim to European decentralisation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GARDNER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Reports of the death of the European Community's environment policy -
supposedly rolled back and crushed by Europe's new enthusiasm for
'subsidiarity' or decentralised decision-making - look premature.
Yesterday's meeting of EC environment ministers kicked off discussion on the
European Commission's green strategy for 1990s - a programme dubbed 'Towards
Sustainability'. Ministers also decided waste for disposal was not an
ordinary tradeable good, and referred the new right to ban waste imports to
the environmental articles of the EC treaty, rather than those on the
internal market and trade. This was a rare instance of environment needs
taking precedence over the free circulation of goods within the EC's single
market.
The environment council was the first since Danish voters shook the EC to
its foundations by rejecting the Maastricht treaty in June. It was also the
first since the flamboyant Carlo Ripa di Meana's departure as environment
commissioner at the end of the same month, amid rumblings of a bonfire of
the nearly 200 pieces of EC environment law enacted in the past two decades.
Mr Ripa di Meana's successor, Mr Karel Van Miert, says he still fears the
environment could be made 'the sacrificial lamb' in the power struggle
between Brussels and the member states about reining in EC decision-making.
But there are at least four persuasive reasons to suggest environment policy
will be rebalanced rather than gutted: When EC leaders are desperately
trying to recapture public support for European integration, it would be
politically unwise to start by junking a policy which commands overwhelming
public support. The evidence suggests EC citizens look to Europe to protect
their environment from pollution and degradation. So far this year Europeans
have registered more than 500 complaints with Brussels, against 350 in all
of last year. 'It has been a successful policy and perceived as such, and
therefore it should be pursued,' Mr Van Miert insists.
The environment is a policy area especially well-suited to a cross-frontier
approach. The greener-than-thou Nordic and Alpine countries - first in the
queue to join the Community - will strongly reinforce such an approach. The
still nebulous subsidiarity principle, suggesting the EC should act only
when supranational decisions are more appropriate than national or local
action, could have been invented for the environment.
All member states to some degree recognise that if the EC does not maintain
a common environmental policy, standards will diverge between the richer
north and poorer south. Non-tariff barriers to trade will creep into the
single market, holding up the free flow of goods. Companies will be
enveloped in multiple layers of national law, instead of common standards.
The three countries most bruised by the debate over Maastricht - Denmark,
the UK, and France - all back an EC environment policy.
Indeed, Danish voters want more Community involvement; their fear that the
EC would dilute their high environmental standards was part of the
anti-treaty backlash. France, for its part, largely forced yesterday's
decision on waste imports, and its Socialist government faces not only
defeat by the centre-right in next spring's elections, but erosion from the
green parties.
The British government currently holds the EC presidency (to be succeeded in
January by Denmark). It wants the 'Towards Sustainability' programme
approved by December, and a 'greening' of other EC policies from transport
to energy. More intrusively, the UK also supports the formation of an EC
'green police', a Community inspectorate to assure national enforcement of
common standards.
One way Mr Van Miert wants to diffuse the subsidiarity controversy is by
placing greater onus on national courts to enforce implementation of EC law,
removing the Commission from the firing line as a sort of court of appeal.
Rows over implementation of EC law obscure the fact that only three cases of
environment legislation have not been agreed unanimously by the 12.
None the less, the rising cost of environmental standards during recession
is posing a real threat to Europe's green dimension.
Market instruments loom large in the Commission's programme for the 1990s.
These range from the expensive energy tax to limit the carbon dioxide
emissions which cause global warming, to the EC 'Eco-label' endorsing
environment-friendly goods.
Mr Van Miert points out that the energy tax proposal is full of safeguards
for energy intensive industries. He recognises the difficult economic
climate but says: 'As far as I know there is no alternative.'
Mr Jacques Delors, the Commission president, is expected to tear up 10 to 20
'unjustified' Brussels proposals at December's EC summit in Edinburgh. If
the energy tax were among them, the EC's green lobby would rightly think the
tide had turned against them.
But Mr Delors himself believes the jobs and growth of the future lie in
developing energy-efficient, environmentally-friendly technology and
production - an argument passionately advanced by Mr Van Miert. 'It would be
counter-productive at the end of the day to use cost as an argument for
standing still. That will not get us expansion in the long run.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12401</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Suez down 72% in property slump
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SUEZ, the big French financial holding group, announced yesterday that the
country's property slump had caused its profits to plunge by 72 per cent in
the first half of this year to FFr500m (Dollars 104.6m), compared with
FFr1.8bn in the same period of 1991.
Mr Gerard Worms, the group's president, said he saw no prospect of rapid
improvement in the property market this year or next. The group raised its
property provisions from FFr100m in the first half of last year to FFr1.9bn
in the first six months of this year.
Suez also announced restructuring plans involving a bid for the rest of the
capital of Compagnie Fonciere International (CFI), in which Suez holds 54
per cent, and the sale of its FFr40m majority stakes in two investment
companies, Parthena and Astorg. CFI, a property investing and managing
company, showed net profits of FFr194m last year.
Mr Worms claimed his group was facing up 'more openly and more rapidly' to
problems posed by the property slump - a result of persistent high real
interest rates in the French economy - than other financial groups. By
mid-1992, it had set aside adequate provisions to cover 10 per cent of its
exposure in office property.
Before making these provisions, the group's results showed a 60 per cent
rise in operating profit to FFr 3.2bn compared with a year ago.
Suez has had a poor return for several years on its majority stake in
Societe Generale de Belgique. But the Belgian conglomerate gave its French
owners a 47 per cent increase in profit in the first half of this year,
compared to the same period last year.
Suez's poor performance was expected from results already in from its
subsidiary, Banque Indosuez, which Mr Worms said was plagued with property
problems, and from Groupe Victoire, the insurance company in which Suez has
a 52 per cent stake.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12402</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Banks welcome decision to repay
Efim creditors
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FOREIGN bankers reacted positively to the announcement by the Italian
government that it will repay in full creditors to Efim, the state holding
company put into liquidation, and its wholly-owned subsidiaries.
The offer to pay all the debts should satisfy foreign banks, whose exposure
is concentrated on Efim and its wholly-owned Nuova Safim financing
subsidiary. However, one banker said 'I've learned to be careful and I'd
prefer to wait and see the full details.'
Foreign institutions are believed to have lent around L4,000bn (Dollars
3.07bn) of the group's L9,500bn bank borrowings, with the remainder coming
from domestic banks. The new proposal is expected to cost the Italian
government L9,000bn, more than double the previous L4,000bn offer.
Precise terms of the repayment, expected to take place in the form of either
bonds or cash, remain uncertain. 'I want to know when we're going to be
repaid, and in what form,' said the banker.
Yesterday's announcement marks the Italian government's third, and, bankers
hope, final attempt to resolve the affairs of Efim, which was put into
liquidation by a government decree on July 18, when its finances were also
frozen.
A second decree was issued in mid-August in response to bankers' criticism
about the uncertainty surrounding their credits.
However, the amended version, which proposed issuing up to L4,000bn in bonds
to cover Efim's debts, provoked a wave of attacks that interest payments on
the bonds would be at well below market rates.
At a press conference in Rome last night, Mr Giuseppe Guarino, the industry
minister, revealed that Agusta and Oto Melara, Efim's helicopter and
missiles subsidiaries, would be transferred to the IRI state holding
company, whose Finmeccanica subsidiary already controls a clutch of
aerospace and defence interests.
The transfer would be a first step towards a definitive takeover by IRI,
probably by its Finmeccanica aerospace and defence equipment arm, at a price
still to be decided. Debts of the companies changing hands would be assumed
by the government, which gave no indication of payback terms for creditors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12403</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: SA's Anglovaal and JCI show
decline on variable gold price
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LOWER grades and milling rates and a weaker gold price caused taxed profits
to fall sharply during the September quarter at the four gold mines in the
Anglovaal group.
Taxed profits fell to R25.9m (Dollars 9.20m) from R44.6m in the June
quarter, mainly due to a 45 per cent fall in profits at Hartebeestfontein,
the group's largest mine.
Gold production at Hartebeestfontein's main plant fell to 6,502kg from
6,864kg on a fall in ore milled and grade sliding to 8.6 grammes per tonne
from 8.9 grammes.
Although unit revenue rose slightly, unit costs were higher at R28,187 per
kg compared with R25,599 per kg.
This caused profits per kg of gold to fall to R3,137 from R5,298.
The group's troubled Loraine mine incurred another loss of R3.4m, the same
as last quarter. This figure, however included R1.5m flowing from one-off
retrenchment costs.
Meanwhile, the three mines in the Johannesburg Consolidated Investment (JCI)
group produced more gold in the September quarter, but profits after tax and
capital expenditure fell due to problems at the Joel mine.
Total gold production rose to 12.3 tonnes from 12.2 tonnes in the June
quarter. A slightly higher gold price was offset by increased costs
following the annual round of wage negotiations.
Profits after tax and capital expenditure fell by 12.2 per cent to R17.8m
from R20.3m, due to losses of R8.1m at Joel. Randcoal, the South African
coal-mining group, raised sales and profits in the year to September, but
contrary to its April forecast, second-half profits did not match those of
the first. Turnover rose 30 per cent to R1.62bn (Dollars 560m) from R1.24bn,
and operating profits advanced rose 22 per cent to R306.8m from R251.9m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12404</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Proton motors through industry
scepticism - The risky road being travelled by Malaysia's national car
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN Dr Mahathir Mohamad, Malaysia's prime minister, announced more than 10
years ago plans for a car manufacturing plant in the country there were
plenty of sceptics.
Malaysia was at an early stage of industrial development, and the technical
and management skills necessary to run such a project were in short supply.
The question was, how could a relatively poor country with only 18.5m people
sustain such an ambitious and costly enterprise?
On the face of it, the sceptics would appear to have been wrong. Perusahaan
Otomobil Nasional - or Proton for short - produced its first car in 1985.
Last year it produced 102,000.
Proton now has a 65 per cent share of domestic car sales, and exported its
first car in 1987.
Now, according to the company, it is the fastest-selling car in its class in
the UK, with cumulative sales to September 30 of 45,000. Proton's latest
export model, the Catalyst, is on display at this week's Birmingham motor
show.
Company finances appear secure: after a partial privatisation this year
Proton has borrowings of MDollars 592m (USDollars 236m) and cash of MDollars
913m, giving a net cash position of MDollars 381m. In the year to March,
Proton earned taxable profits of MDollars 408m on turnover of MDollars
2.2bn. In the previous year, taxable profits were MDollars 261.5m on
turnover of MDollars 1.8bn.
Driven by its success, Proton recently announced a MDollars 1.2bn expansion
programme aimed at bringing production at its plant outside Kuala Lumpur up
to 120,000 units by the end of next year, 150,000 units by 1995. A large
portion of the new production is planned for export to the UK and elsewhere
in Europe.
Despite its initial achievements, doubts persist about Proton's long-term
prospects.
Proton's success reflects the growth in the Malaysian economy. Sales were
sluggish for the first three years of production but took off as the economy
moved into the fast lane in 1988-89. Since then, domestic sales have
increased by an average 50 per cent per annum.
Sales have been helped considerably by government protection.
As a result the Proton enjoys a cost advantage in the domestic market of
more than 30 per cent against equivalent makes.
While few doubt the basic qualities of the Proton and a certain Malaysian
pride in what is called 'the national car", sales would be lower without
protection.
Proton also has cost advantages in export markets. Under the European
Community's generalised system of preference (GSP), Proton has full
exemption from UK import duties. Continued GSP status is vital for Proton's
UK sales.
Mitsubishi, the Japanese conglomerate, has played a big role in Proton's
success. Initially, Mitsubishi had a 30 per cent stake in the company, the
rest being controlled by Hicom, the Malaysian government's heavy industrial
holding company. With various restructurings and the recent flotation,
Japanese involvement in Proton has dropped to around 20 per cent, with the
government still controlling just under 50 per cent.
Japanese management and technology is central to Proton. Some key management
positions are still held by Japanese. But there are disagreements between
the Malaysians and Japanese.
The Proton is based on Mitsubishi's 1984-88 Lancer model. The Malaysians are
said to be increasingly frustrated by their Japanese partners tardiness in
transferring technology.
Mitsubishi is said to be unhappy with Proton's export drive: it threatens
Mitsubishi's own car sales in some markets. The Malaysian government has
hinted that a big management shake-up is in the offing, with greater local
control.
Some Japanese car plants produce more cars in a month than Proton produces
in a year. Though Proton, with shop floor wages of only about MDollars 500
per month, has labour cost advantages over competitors in Japan or Europe,
sales of mass-produced cars are dictated by economies of scale.
'Proton has more or less reached market saturation at home,' says one
analyst. 'To recoup its huge investment costs and to gain economies of scale
it has to expand - and that means more exports. It's a very big challenge
for a small carmaker."
Mr Ben Yeoh, general manager of Proton's business division, agrees. 'We have
to export. The domestic market alone cannot support our investment and
production.'
Already Proton's margins are being stretched, particularly on exports. Mr
Yeoh admits there are only small returns from UK sales. A Proton is now
cheaper in the UK than in Malaysia, prompting criticism that the Malaysian
taxpayer is subsidising British sales.
Perhaps the most serious challenge to Proton's future is a project for a
second 'national car'. In collaboration with local partners, the Japanese
Daihatsu group will manufacture a small car in the 600cc to 900cc range.
Again, the project is the brainchild of Dr Mahathir. There are worries about
the domestic market's ability to sustain a second car manufacturing concern.
The new car will be much cheaper than the Proton. Once again, the sceptics
are out in force.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12405</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Esselte back in the black
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BROWN-HUMES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ESSELTE, the Swedish office equipment group, returned to profit in the first
eight months, as tighter cost control more than offset the impact of
depressed markets.
The group reported income after financial items of SKr81m (Dollars 14m),
compared with a SKr117m loss a year ago.
Sales fell 14 per cent to SKr8.64bn, although in underlying terms the drop
was just 6 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12406</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Wilhelmsen down sharply
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN FOSSLI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   OSLO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WILHELM Wilhelmsen, one of Norway's biggest shipowners, has reported a sharp
drop in eight-month pre-tax profits to NKr84m (Dollars 14m) from NKr442m.
Turbulence in foreign currency markets, a weak dollar and depressed tanker
market meant group operating profit fell to NKr378m from NKr185m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12407</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: UK shake-up behind sharp
improvement at Stena Line
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BROWN-HUMES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
STENA LINE, the Swedish shipping and ferry group, lifted profits to SKr255m
(Dollars 45m) in the first eight months, a sharp improvement on just SKr28m
a year earlier.
The group said it benefited from the extensive rationalisation of its UK
operation, Sealink Stena Line, which returned to profit. The group also
benefited from higher passenger numbers and freight volumes.
However, recent exchange rate turbulence has forced it to scale down an
earlier prediction that full-year profits would reach SKr250m. It now
expects a 1992 profit of SKr210m, a turnround of more than SKr500m from last
year's SKr302m loss.
Stena Line said passenger numbers climbed by 2 per cent to 10.1m in the
latest eight months, with freight volume 8 per cent higher at 518,000 units.
Passenger numbers on Sealink Stena Line's Dover-Calais route climbed 25 per
cent, while freight volume on Dover-Dunkirk increased 79 per cent. Despite
this, turnover fell 2 per cent to SKr5.38bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12408</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Chrysler follows road to
recovery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CHRYSLER, the smallest of the Big Three US car manufacturers, yesterday
underscored its continued recovery from recession with third-quarter net
earnings of Dollars 202m - which contrasts sharply with expected heavy
losses from rivals General Motors and Ford.
The profits figure, which was struck after a Dollars 101m pre-tax charge for
the restructuring of its car rental operations, compared with a loss of
Dollars 82m in the same period of last year.
Sales and revenues were up 22 per cent at Dollars 9.2bn, and earnings per
share worked through at 62 cents, compared with a loss of 36 cents a year
ago.
Chrysler has been benefiting from a Dollars 3bn programme imposed at the
start of the US recession to slash its manufacturing costs and from good
demand for its trucks and mini-vans.
Mr Lee Iacocca, who is retiring at the end of this year as chairman, said
other factors contributing to the results were lower discounts and a
reduction in less profitable sales to fleet buyers
The company is in the middle of launching a new range of medium-sized cars -
the Dodge Intrepid, Eagle Vision and Chrysler Concorde - which are crucial
to the revitalisation of its tired car range and have won enthusiastic
reviews from the motoring press. Mr Iacocca said orders for these vehicles
were very strong.
Chrysler's combined US and Canadian car and truck market share for the
quarter was 12.5 per cent, compared with 11.3 per cent in the same period of
last year. For the nine months it totalled 13 per cent, up from 12.2 per
cent.
Earnings for the nine months totalled Dollars 367m, or Dollars 1.08 a share,
compared with a net loss of Dollars 892m, or Dollars 3.94 a share, in the
same period of 1991. Sales and revenues totalled Dollars 26.7bn, up from
Dollars 21.2bn.
Chrysler's financial services unit contributed third-quarter earnings of
Dollars 45m, down from Dollars 81m in the same period of last year, due to
lower levels of earning assets and the increased cost of a debt agreement
the company recently struck with its bank lenders.
Mr Iacocca, reporting his last quarterly earnings statement as chairman,
said the July to September results, coming on top of a profitable second
quarter, were particularly satisfying in the middle of the slowest US
economic recovery in decades.
He said it demonstrated the company's achievement in controlling costs,
improving margins and lowering break-even points.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12409</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Citicorp advances despite
Dollars 927m bad debt provision
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CITICORP, the leading US bank that has been trying to boost its capital and
stem losses caused by problem consumer and commercial property loans,
yesterday reported a Dollars 116m third-quarter net profit.
Although much improved on the Dollars 885m loss suffered in the same quarter
last year, Citicorp's performance continues to reflect heavy bad-debt
provisions and loan write-offs.
The bank said third-quarter bad debt provisions totalled Dollars 927m, up
from Dollars 896m a year ago. A Dollars 65m restructuring charge was also
recorded in the quarter.
The bank, as it forecast two weeks ago, wrote off Dollars 860m of consumer
loans, compared to Dollars 786m in write-offs a year ago.
Citicorp also wrote off Dollars 234m of commercial property loans in North
American, compared with Dollars 135m of such write-offs in the third quarter
of 1991. Bad debt provisions for commercial property loans were Dollars
309m, up from Dollars 229m a year ago. The North American commercial
property division suffered a quarterly loss of Dollars 267m, against a
Dollars 185m loss a year ago.
Earnings per share were 17 cents, higher than the bank's forecast of October
5, when it predicted earnings of 8 to 13 cents a share.
Mr John Reed, Citicorp's chairman, termed the results 'encouraging evidence
of Citicorp's steady progress toward rebuilding its earnings capacity and
strengthening its balance sheet despite widespread economic sluggishness'.
He said the bank continued 'on track' to meet its objectives.
Citicorp highlighted its third-quarter operating margin of Dollars 1.9bn,
which compared with Dollars 1.4bn a year ago. The margin reflected strong
results from the bank's foreign exchange activities.
The bank also stressed that its Tier One capital ratio, the main US
regulatory measure of capital against assets, had improved to 4.25 per cent
from 3.67 per cent a year ago.
Citicorp said it had boosted its total regulatory capital by Dollars 1.7bn
in the past 12 months and noted that when a Dollars 1bn preferred stock sale
closes on Thursday the Tier One ratio will increase to 4.50 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12410</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Swedish property group in the
red
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NCC, one of Sweden's leading property and construction groups, made a loss
of SKr109m (Dollars 19m) for the first eight months of the year, compared
with a profit of SKr242m in the same period last year. These figures include
the group's share of profits from associated companies. Its consolidated
sales fell slightly to SKr14.3bn from SKr14.6bn.
Profits (after net financial items), which exclude the associated companies,
were down to SKr165m from SKr321m.
The company said it did not expect to make a profit for the whole of the
year. Mr Torsten Eriksson, NCC's president, said preliminary estimates
suggested a write-down requirement on its property portfolio of between
SKr700m and SKr1bn for the full year. He added that the company would have
negative, but improving, cash-flow through next year, with a positive one by
1994.
The company's real estate sector suffered a SKr187m loss, compared with one
of SKr70m for the same period of 1991, while it also made a SKr144 deficit
in its exchange-listed subsidiaries and associated companies.
The contraction in Sweden's construction sector continues to hit the group's
building activities, but NCC still made a SKr502m profit in that part of its
business compared with SKr506m for the same period of 1991.
The company also pointed out its on-going rationalisation programme as well
as an internal reorganisation had brought SKr500m in savings over the year
and it expected to reduce its balance sheet by SKr4bn this year compared
with 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12411</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Cap Gemini Sogeti slides 20%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FRESH evidence of the deepening gloom in the computer industry came
yesterday with a 20 per cent decline in first-half profits from Cap Gemini
Sogeti (CGS), Europe's leading computer services supplier.
The French group, which saw a 10 per cent profits decline last year, warned
that earnings would be down sharply for 1992 as a whole and that it saw no
end to the crisis before the end of next year or early 1994.
Net profits fell to FFr142.5m (Dollars 28.3m) in the first six months, from
FFr179.2m in the same period of last year on turnover up by 18 per cent from
FFr5bn to FFr5.89bn.
The rise in turnover was entirely due to two acquisitions, of Volmac and
Programmator, the Dutch and Swedish computer services groups. Profits for
the full year would be well below the 6 per cent net return on turnover
achieved in recent years, said CGS.
CGS did not announce any job losses from among its 22,000 staff, but warned
that it would 'lighten its structures' and staff in line with clients'
needs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12412</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: ASG forges link with Danzas
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ASG, Sweden's second largest transport company, is forming an alliance with
Danzas, the Swiss conglomerate, to create a European transport group with a
SKr50bn (Dollars 8.9bn) annual turnover and 20,000-strong workforce.
ASG will concentrate its activities in the Nordic region and take over
Danzas's business in the area while turning over its own affairs elsewhere
in the world to the Basle-based company.
The alliance, which will come into being next year, will co-ordinate the
marketing, product development and electronic data processing operations of
the companies. They will be able to utilise each other's existing warehouse
facilities. Up until now ASG worked with about 15 partners in different
countries involving a variety of administrative regulations.
Mr Bengt Jonsson, ASG's chief executive, said: 'Our own capital base is too
small to carry out large acquisitions in the European market. At the same
time the profit levels in most companies are too low and purchase prices too
high. Our customers have no wish that ASG on principle should own a
subsidiary outside the Nordic region.'
Dr Bernd Menzinger, Danzas president, said that ASG was an 'ideal partner'
in the light of the experience of ten years' co-operation in France. He said
that the proposed alliance would bring together two 'equal' partners in
their respective markets.
ASG's German subsidiary will not be affected and its activities will
continue as now. But the two companies hope to co-operate as much as
possible in markets outside Europe such as the United States, Japan,
Thailand and Australia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12413</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Bouygues edges ahead to FFr108m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BOUYGUES, the world's largest construction company, managed a slight
increase in profits in the first half of the year, but warned of a fall in
sales for the full financial year.
Bouygues, like other French construction companies, has been hit in the past
year by the impact of the economic slowdown on the building sector. It has
also suffered from the problems encountered in the Channel Tunnel project,
on which it is one of the major contractors.
The group, which this summer took advantage of the Paris stock market's
brief rally to stage a FFr1.04bn (Dollars 210m) rights issue, saw net
profits rise by 4 per cent - just above France's annual inflation rate of
around 3 per cent - from FFr104m in the first six months of 1991 to FFr108m
in the same period this year.
Mr Martin Bouygues, chairman, said that he anticipated a slowdown in sales
of 4 per cent to FFr62bn for the full financial year.
However, Mr Bouygues refused to disclose profit projections for 1992.
Bouygues has been building on its core construction interests by investing
in film, through its Ciby 2000 production subsidiary, and television, as
managing shareholder of TF1, France's biggest television channel.
BSN, France's largest food group which was earlier this year embroiled in
the bitter bid battle for Perrier mineral water, yesterday announced a 12.6
per cent increase in sales to FFr54.4bn in the first nine months of 1992.
The increase was largely due to acquisitions, but BSN mustered growth of 3.5
per cent on a comparable basis.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12414</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: NCC turns in SKr109m loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NCC, one of Sweden's leading property and construction groups, made a loss
of SKr109m (Dollars 19m) for the first eight months of the year, compared
with a profit of SKr242m in the same period last year. These figures include
the group's share of profits from associated companies. Its consolidated
sales fell slightly to SKr14.3bn from SKr14.6bn.
Profits (after net financial items), excluding associated companies, were
down to SKr165m from SKr321m. The company does not expect to make a
full-year profit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12415</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: ASG forms alliance with Danzas
for SKr50bn unit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ASG, Sweden's second largest transport company, is forming an alliance with
Danzas, the Swiss conglomerate, to create a European transport group with a
SKr50bn (Dollars 8.9bn) annual turnover and 20,000-strong workforce.
ASG will concentrate its activities in the Nordic region and take over
Danzas's business in the area while turning over its own affairs elsewhere
in the world to the Basle-based company.
The alliance, which will come into being next year, will co-ordinate the
marketing, product development and electronic data processing operations of
the companies. They will be able to utilise each other's existing warehouse
facilities. Until now ASG worked with about 15 partners in different
countries involving a variety of regulations.
Mr Bengt Jonsson, ASG's chief executive, said: 'Our own capital base is too
small to carry out large acquisitions in the European market. At the same
time the profit levels in most companies are too low and purchase prices too
high.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12416</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Greenalls makes Pounds 86m cash call
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP RAWSTORNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GREENALLS GROUP, the pubs and hotels operator, yesterday announced a Pounds
86m rights issue to help finance the expansion of its core businesses.
The cash call is being made through a 1-for-5 issue of 29.95m shares at
295p, a 17.8 per cent discount to Monday's closing price of 359p. The shares
fell 15p yesterday to 344p.
Mr Andrew Thomas, chairman and chief executive, said that the recession
offered opportunities to expand by acquiring quality assets at low prices.
'We believe that the company should have the financial resources to take
full advantage of these opportunities as they arise, while maintaining
prudent debt levels and interest cover.'
The issue will reduce gearing from 27.5 per cent to 14.5 per cent.
A rights issue had been widely expected since the group completed its
transformation from regional brewer to national hotelier and pub operator
earlier this year with the abolition of its two-tier share structure and the
Greenall family's control.
The family now holds a 16.2 per cent stake which will be reduced to 13.5 per
cent if it does not take up its rights.
Now one of the UK's largest independent pub operators with 1,400 outlets,
Greenalls has this year spent Pounds 40m on extending and upgrading its
estate. It has spent a further Pounds 16m in developing its 100 specialist
food and accommodation pubs.
'We intend to focus further investment on the pub business through
hand-picked acquisitions, ' said Mr Thomas. 'We shall exploit the full
retail potential of the estate rather than pursue beer sales alone.'
The group also aims to develop its De Vere hotels operation into a leading
four and five star chain, concentrating on the conference and leisure
market.
This year it has acquired the Belton Woods hotel and golf complex for Pounds
10m, invested Pounds 10m in extensions to the Grand Hotel, Brighton, and
opened another hotel at Swindon. Two more hotels will be opened at Leeds and
Southampton in the next two years.
There are also plans to expand the off-licence chain, strengthened this year
by the Pounds 20m acquisition of 187 Blayneys shops from Vaux.
Greenalls estimates that pre-tax profits for the year to September 25 will
be not less than Pounds 63m, compared with last year's Pounds 64.1m.
Trading profits in the second half had been lower than the corresponding
period last year as the business climate failed to improve, said Mr Thomas.
The fall in hotel profits had slowed as a result of improved occupancies but
room rates remained under pressure. Pub profits had been affected by poor
weather in July and August but showed a slight improvement in September.
The company forecast a final dividend of 6.93p, which will be payable on the
rights shares, lifting the total from 11p to 11.77p.
Cazenove are brokers to the issue, which has been fully underwritten by
Schroders.
See Lex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12417</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: ICI paint side sells defence coatings to
Courtaulds
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IMPERIAL Chemical Industries' paints division is selling its European
aerospace and defence coatings business to Courtaulds, the speciality
materials group.
Terms were not announced. The operations employ a staff of 35 in the UK,
France and Germany, and produced turnover of Pounds 5.5m last year.
ICI said the business represented less than 1 per cent of the group's
assets.
'Bringing Courtaulds and ICI's aerospace and defence coatings businesses
together will give us a presence in the EC's three largest aerospace
coatings markets and enable us to provide a full service to the aerospace
industry throughout Europe,' said Mr Gordon Campbell, Courtaulds director
responsible for the company's aerospace division.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12418</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Malaysian Smaller liquidation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The board of Malaysian Smaller Companies, a closed-end investment company,
is proposing liquidation of the company, writes Philip Coggan.
The move comes in the wake of an alternative liquidation proposal by
Buchanan Partners, a London-based investment firm. Two separate
extraordinary meetings will be held on December 14 to consider the
proposals.
The board says that a possible takeover offer by Credit Lyonnais
International Asset Management had been withdrawn in the wake of the
Buchanan proposal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12419</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Jenner Fenton takes 27.5% of Dutch broker
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JENNER Fenton Slade, the specialist marine and energy insurance and
reinsurance broker, has acquired a 27.5 per cent stake in Kroller, the Dutch
broker. The stake is valued at about Pounds 1m.
Jenner Fenton is co-operating with local Dutch investors in the deal. Halder
Bank, a merchant bank, will own a 25 per cent stake and Bluemers, an
insurance agency, a further 30 per cent. Kroller's existing management will
hold the remaining shares.
The purchase, originally agreed in August, was completed last week.
Jenner Fenton, whose existing overseas operations are concentrated in
Houston, Texas, hopes its involvement in Kroller will increase its
opportunities in Europe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12420</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Guinness sheds weight with sale of
Champneys
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GARY MEAD, Marketing Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GUINNESS decided to shed some weight yesterday by selling Champneys, its
up-market 170 acre health resort near Tring, Hertfordshire, for some Pounds
7m to a consortium led by two former Champneys directors.
Champneys' 1991 turnover was in the region of Pounds 5m.
Guinness, which paid Pounds 3m for the Champneys group, which included at
that time another health spa in Scotland, in November 1984 - when Guinness
was under the management of Mr Ernest Saunders - is selling Champneys to Mr
Allan and Mrs Tanya Wheway, who managed it between 1972 and February 1989.
The Wheways are backed by the Bank of Scotland. Their partners in the
venture are Mr Frank Chapman and Mr Bill Bruce, directors of Bio-Cure, an
Aberdeen company involved in medical research. The Wheways parted company
with Guinness in 1989 after disagreements over managerial policy.
Guinness - whose famous stout packs 200 calories per pint - said yesterday:
'We decided this year we are not really in the health and fitness sector.
But this is probably the last non-drinks business we will get rid of. The
Gleneagles hotel is not for sale.'
First opened in 1925, Champneys was formerly the country home of Baron de
Rothschild. Its daily single occupancy rates start at Pounds 150 for a room
with no bath and reach Pounds 695 for a suite. The resort has numbered among
its past clientele Princess Diana, Demis Roussos and Ringo Starr.
However, occupancy rates have dropped recently, as Champneys, along with
other UK health farms, has suffered from the recession.
The Champneys Club at London's Hotel Meridien and Champneys Spa at the
Guinness-owned Gleneagles Hotel in Tayside will continue to be managed by
Champneys; those contracts will run until the end of the decade.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12421</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: All-round improvement at Gerrard &amp; National
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GERRARD &amp; NATIONAL, the discount house and financial services group,
reported increased interim profits and said all five main subsidiaries
showed improvement.
The group, which does not provide detailed half-year figures, but has
promised to prepare fully disclosed accounts for the current year, said
profits in the six months to October 5 were good and declared an unchanged
interim dividend of 6p.
Mr Brian Williamson, chairman, said Gerrard &amp; National and Gerrard &amp;
National Securities, the marketmaking subsidiaries, faced turbulent
conditions in the money and bond markets but made profits in both quarters.
In broking, GNI Holdings, the futures and options broker, had another
successful six months and profits continued their upward trend.
Mr Williamson said Gerrard Vivian Gray, the stockbroker, also boosted
profits in the six months to the end of July, while LM (Money Brokers) made
good profits.
The improvement in earnings from the broking division in the last two years
had been sustained through the period.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12422</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Costain strikes Pounds 123m deal with
Peabody
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW TAYLOR and ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COSTAIN, the UK construction group, has agreed to sell for Dollars 200m cash
(Pounds 123m) its profitable Australian coal mining business to Peabody
Coal, a subsidiary of Hanson, the Anglo-American conglomerate.
Peabody operates open cast and deep coal mines in the US, and is the second
largest private coal producer in the world. It has been identified by Hanson
as one of the core businesses it wishes to expand.
Peabody will also assume responsibility for borrowings, including
capitalised lease obligations of ADollars 120m (Pounds 53m). The sale price
gives Costain a book profit of Pounds 92m.
The deal will lead to a substantial reduction in Costain's borrowings which,
after the recent slump in the value of sterling, had risen to Pounds 344m.
That included Pounds 52m of off-balance sheet loans due on the Spitalfields
commercial property joint venture in London.
The debt was equivalent to gearing of more than 100 per cent based on
shareholders' funds of Pounds 276m at the end of last year.
Gearing would then fall to about 50 per cent but, after substantial property
write downs in the UK and Australia, it was expected to be about 70 per
cent.
Mr Peter Costain, chief executive, said: 'The deal will improve our
financial position. A book profit of Pounds 92m is very good in the current
market.'
He said the Australian subsidiary made pre-tax profits of ADollars 46m the
12 months to the end of June.
The purchase is the first large acquisition outside the US by Peabody, which
last year made operating profits of Dollars 296m.
Mr David Clarke, chief executive of Hanson Industries, the conglomerate's
North American arm, said: 'This is part of a continuing programme of
expanding our core businesses.
'We will wait and see what happens with British Coal. We will certainly look
at it although privatisation is still a long way down the road.'
There was 'nothing incompatible' in expanding a core business, particularly
in the US, while making opportunistic bids such as its Pounds 780m offer for
Ranks Hovis McDougall.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12423</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Paterson rise restricted by falling naira
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PATERSON ZOCHONIS, the soap and detergents conglomerate, yesterday announced
a 64 per cent advance to Pounds 16.2m in operating profits for the year
ended May 31 as Nigerian authorities stepped up the pace of debt repayments
on foreign exchange transactions made in the early 1980s.
However, the 40 per cent devaluation of the Nigerian naira left Paterson
with pre-tax profits only 5 per cent ahead at Pounds 26.6m on turnover of
Pounds 227.3m (Pounds 215.1m).
Mr Alan Whittaker, finance director, said Nigerian authorities had made
significant progress on repaying debts arising from the foreign exchange
shortage of the early 1980s. The country had been unable to supply hard
currency in exchange for the company's local earnings. Paterson, which wrote
off the total debts of about Pounds 10m at the time, received Pounds 7.3m
last year taken for now into operating profits, against Pounds 2.2m in 1991.
Return from associated companies, largely based in Nigeria, fell from Pounds
4.2m to Pounds 2.7m due to the fall in value of the naira. The devaluation
affected the net asset value, which fell from 384p to 377p per share.
Investment income suffered from lower interest rates and the decline in
equities to fall by Pounds 5m to Pounds 13.3m.
Paterson is still sitting on a cash mountain of Pounds 157m. Mr Whittaker
said the company continued to look for opportunities, although many better
acquisitions had already been snapped up by leading groups. Paterson
intended to stick with soaps and detergents and Mr Whittaker said it was
likely the company would make several smaller acquisitions.
In trading terms, Paterson's businesses had been 'very solid', Mr Whittaker
said. In the UK, where Paterson's Imperial Leather brand of soap leads the
market, Cussons had improved profits. Exports had also continued to advance.
There were some losses in south-east Asia, however. Mr Whittaker said the
company's efforts there would be worthwhile in the longer-term.
The outlook for the first half was encouraging and the company promised that
profits would not be less than last year. Mr Whittaker said Paterson should
be able to regain investment income losses.
The final dividend is raised to 9.2p for a total of 11.45p (10.4p). Earnings
were higher at 33.79p, against 32.19p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12424</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Cost controls help McKechnie gain 21%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BOLGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TIGHT COST controls helped McKechnie, the restructured international plastic
and metal components group, increase pre-tax profits by 21 per cent to
Pounds 24.1m in the year to the end of July.
The West Midlands-based group, which in the previous year sold its European
metals businesses for Pounds 54m, said the result had been achieved in spite
of the recession continuing to affect most of its markets - and deepening in
some areas.
Mr Vanni Treves, chairman, said: 'There is as yet little sign of recovery in
our major markets and we do not anticipate one before our next financial
year at the earliest.'
Turnover fell by 5 per cent to Pounds 286m, although sales by continuing
businesses were constant. Profit before interest rose 3 per cent to Pounds
24.5m, but the underlying improvement from operating sources was a gain of
11 per cent, reflecting increased margins and non-operating gains made in
the prior year.
In spite of higher capital expenditure of Pounds 17.2m (Pounds 14.3m), the
group said strong cashflow had eliminated gearing. Interest payable fell
from Pounds 3.75m to Pounds 415,000.
Sales of plastics increased slightly to Pounds 142.5m, in spite of a 12 per
cent drop in turnover from the vehicle components' division. However,
restructuring and technology costs reduced pre-interest profits from Pounds
10.3m to Pounds 8.5m.
Although sales in consumer products were down 7 per cent to Pounds 48.7m,
profit before interest was up 8 per cent, from Pounds 5m to Pounds 5.4m.
Specialist products saw turnover fall as a result of prior year disposals,
but improved pre-interest profit by 26 per cent, from Pounds 8.4m to Pounds
10.6m. There was a substantial profit recovery by the Pacific metals
companies as a result of cost reductions and better margins, rather than
higher volumes, and this improvement was expected to continue.
Earnings per share rose to 20.7p (17p). An unchanged final dividend of 9.75p
maintains the total at 14.75p.
COMMENT
Having focused on plastics, McKechnie has done well to squeeze costs and
improve margins in adverse trading conditions. The group wants to make
acquisitions in continental Europe and North America, but has been deterred
by the prices asked. Forecast pre-tax profits of Pounds 26m next year put
the shares, up 6p to 326p, on a multiple of 14.5. They seem fairly priced
given the immediate outlook, but investors looking for a longer-term
recovery play might be attracted by the clean balance sheet and deftness the
management has demonstrated in following its stated strategy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12425</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Farnell buoyed by ESD buy and organic
growth
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FARNELL ELECTRONICS, the electronic equipment distributor, reported a 16 per
cent increase in profits in the six months to July 31.
However, the sale of a non-trading subsidiary - taken as a non-recurring
item - lifted profits by another Pounds 6.37m and pushed the pre-tax
increase up to 64 per cent.
Profits, before the exceptional item, rose from Pounds 13.3m to Pounds 15.4m
on the back of last year's acquisition of STC's distribution business, ESD
Distribution, and a strong performance from Farnell Electronics Components,
the group's main division.
Sales, helped by recent acquisitions, rose to Pounds 126.8m (Pounds 81.8m),
while operating profits increased to Pounds 16m (Pounds 11.7m).
Electronic equipment manufacturing, which remains profitable, has been split
into three divisions: power supplies; components and instruments.
Mr Richard Hanwell, chairman, said: 'When I took over there were different
trade names operating at different sites competing in different markets.
Following an internal review of equipment manufacturing we have decided to
refocus the division.'
The interim dividend is increased to 2.8p (2.6p). Earnings per share,
excluding the non-recurring item, increased to 7.5p (6.5p).
COMMENT
Important as ESD's contribution has been to Farnell it should not overshadow
the fact that within the midst of the deepest recession since the war,
organic growth was still responsible for 7 per cent of the increase in
pre-tax profits. The only black spot is the German operation which is likely
to remain in the red for at least another six months. However, Germany
notwithstanding, the group is still expected to make pre-tax profits of
Pounds 36.5m, giving earnings per share of 18p. This puts the shares - down
3p to 312p - on a prospective multiple of 17.3. Given its UK performance the
premium rating looks fair.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12426</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Havelock Europa open offer
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Shareholders in Havelock Europa applied for a total of 309,845 shares under
the recent open offer, 3.09 per cent of the total available.
Havelock explained that the outcome was in line with expectations, as nine
out of 11 of the principal shareholders took part in the placing and,
therefore, did not apply for further new shares in the offer.
Shares not applied for under the open offer will be subscribed by placees
who have undertaken to take the shares in full.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12427</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Wentworth suspended as results are again
delayed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES IN Wentworth International were suspended at 3p yesterday as the
plastic packaging company announced a further delay in the publication of
its annual results.
Mr Robert Gill, who became chief executive in July, said the board had
decided to suspend the shares because of the prolonged nature of an
investigation into the company's past accounting practices.
'It has taken us longer to pull the pieces together than we had expected,'
he said.
Mr Gill said he hoped an announcement could be made within weeks rather than
months. 'There are still some uncertainties,' he said.
He refused to comment on whether any charges would be brought against former
employees.
Many of the accounting problems appear to have occurred since the company's
1989-90 results.
That was the year Wentworth merged its energy assets into a joint venture.
The value of the oil and gas business formed a significant part of the
accounting problems, Mr Gill said.
He maintained that Wentworth's packaging businesses remained sound. They
were 'not without problems, but I believe these can be addressed by hands-on
management,' he said.
In August Mr Gill had warned that Wentworth would be unable to pay a
dividend following the discovery of accounting practices which he described
as 'sharp' and 'at the cutting edge'.
Banque Indosuez is Wentworth's largest shareholder with a 61.3 per cent
stake.
The bank found itself with the holding following a failed rights issue in
1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12428</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Marine Midland maintains recovery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MARINE MIDLAND Bank, Hongkong and Shanghai Bank's US subsidiary, yesterday
reported third quarter net earnings of Dollars 29.9m (Pounds 17.3m) compared
with losses of Dollars 56.9m in the same period last year.
The latest results represent the third consecutive quarter of profits and
lift nine month net earnings to Dollars 73.5m compared to net losses of
Dollars 166.2m for the first nine months of 1991.
Mr John Bond, Marine Midland's president and chief executive, said the bank
had continued to make 'solid progress' in the third quarter, especially
given that second quarter net earnings of Dollars 41m were bolstered by some
non-recurring recoveries from the group's problem asset portfolio.'
Total interest income in the third quarter was Dollars 274.6m, down from
Dollars 348.9m.
Operating expenses, excluding restructuring and credit-related costs were
Dollars 171.6m, compared with Dollars 173.8m in the second quarter and
Dollars 191.7m a year ago.
Credit related expenses, including a Dollars 10.2m provision for loan
losses, were Dollars 44.8m, down from Dollars 96.3m in the 1991 third
quarter.
Non-accruing loans fell by 19.3 per cent to Dollars 759.8m or 7.84 per cent
of loans outstanding from Dollars 942m or 8.03 per cent a year earlier.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12429</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Honeymoon over at SmithKline - The merged
group must now increase sales
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL ABRAHAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE MERGER is complete, says Mr Bob Bauman, chief executive of SmithKline
Beecham, the Anglo-American group formed by the fusion in 1989 of the US
group SmithKline Beckman and the UK's Beecham Group. The combined group can
no longer drive up earnings through cost savings. Now, says Mr Bauman, the
company must show it can generate growth through volume.
As long as recession continues, SmithKline Beecham's growth must come from
pharmaceuticals. For the first nine months this year, profits at animal
health fell 14 per cent to Pounds 39m, while consumer brands rose only 2 per
cent to Pounds 168m. In contrast, operating profits in pharmaceuticals grew
9 per cent to Pounds 567m.
However, the group's biggest-selling drug, the blockbuster ulcer treatment
Tagamet, is under pressure. In Europe it is suffering from competition from
a new generation drug, Losec, marketed by Astra, the Swedish group. Last
April its price was cut in Japan by 15 per cent and in the US its patents
expire in 1994.
Mr Bauman says the pharmaceuticals business' success will be determined by
the group's ability to defend existing products like Tagamet; its capacity
to bring new products aggressively to market; and finally whether the
company picks the right drugs from small pharmaceuticals and biotechnology
groups which it can then market.
So far, the group is defending Tagamet highly successfully. The drug's US
sales actually increased 2.5 per cent by value during the first nine months,
according to Mr Hugh Collum, finance director.
Once Tagamet's US patents expire in 1994, generic versions will reduce its
sales by between 30 and 50 per within two years, according to Mr Bauman.
However, Mr Bauman hopes to have approval from the Food and Drug
Administration to sell the drug over the counter (OTC) with a doctor's
prescription. The company has just set up an OTC partnership with Marion
Merrell Dow of the US. He warns, however, that earnings are unlikely to be
enhanced even if Tagamet receives approval in 1994, because of the high
marketing costs associated with an OTC launch.
In the longer term, the challenge for Mr Bauman is to ensure SmithKline
Beecham's development pipeline is strong enough to replace Tagamet and still
drive earnings growth.
The company is investing heavily in research and development, spending
Pounds 430m last year. It has recently announced a reorganisation of its R&amp;D
activities.
Mr Bauman explains: 'We were undertaking too much in the past. We were
developing over 70 different compounds for 100 different indications. We
have now reduced the number to 30 molecules.'
The company aims to bring products to market two to three years earlier than
before. Mr Bauman explains: 'If there is one area where you can get a
competitive advantage, it is the speed that you take a product through to
market. Sales and profits arrive earlier and the life of the product before
its patent expires is extended.'
The group is also on the look-out for innovative drugs from other companies
that it can co-develop and market. The most successful drug acquired in this
way looks likely to be Seroxat, an anti-depressant known in the US as Paxil.
Brokers County NatWest believe the drug, licensed from Ferrosan, a
subsidiary of Novo Nordisk of Denmark, could generate sales of Dollars 450m
(Pounds 262m) by 1995.
The other new drugs on which SmithKline Beecham's future is based include
Relafen, an anti-arthritis drug with 10 per cent of the US market by value
since its launch in February; Kytril, the anti-nausea treatment; and Engerix
B, a hepatitis B vaccine.
Mr Bauman stresses the strength of SmithKline Beecham's marketing skills.
There were more than 110,000 visits to general practitioners in May for the
US launch of Relafen.
The jury is still out on the transition to an organically driven growth
business. Some operations, such as animal health, continue to perform
poorly. Mr Collum explains there are six companies in animal health with
about 15 per cent each. He expects to see rationalisation. It is a core
business, but its nature is likely to change.
Meanwhile, some of SmithKline Beecham's drugs are set to come under
pressure. Relafen will face renewed competition from Voltaren, a product
marketed by Ciba-Geigy, the Swiss group. Engerix B will come under
increasing pressure from Recombivax, marketed by Merck of the US. It has
been in short supply because of manufacturing problems.
Finally, Augmentin, SmithKline Beecham's antibiotic which could break the
Dollars 1bn sales barrier for the first time this year, is being targeted by
Eli Lilley's Lorabid.
The much-famed marketing skills of Mr Bauman and his company will be fully
needed if the group is to replace Tagamet fully after its US patents expire
in 1994, incidently driving SmithKline Beecham into the drugs industry's
first division.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12430</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: River &amp; Merc Extra assets fall 21%
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value of River and Mercantile Extra Income Trust fell by almost 21
per cent, from 102.3p to 81.07p per share, over the year to September 30
1992.
The result however, represented a slight recovery over the figure of 78.8p
recorded six months earlier.
Net revenue declined to Pounds 2.61m (Pounds 2.71m) for earnings of 7.07p
(8.31p) per share. Nevertheless, the total dividend goes up from 6.74125p to
7.875p with a fourth interim of 1.96875p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12431</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Wolseley surprises with 14% rise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES IN Wolseley, the heating and plumbing distributor which owns the
Plumb Centre chain, yesterday rose 64p, or 19 per cent, to 408p after the
company announced higher than expected profits.
Pre-tax profits increased some 14 per cent to Pounds 91.3m in the year to
July 31. Analysts had expected Pounds 70m and Mr Jeremy Lancaster, chairman,
said the company forecast a lower figure. 'These results took us somewhat by
surprise,' he said.
The group was helped by a second-half upturn on the US East Coast, a
better-than-expected Pounds 7.9m contribution from Brossette, the French
company acquired in February, and a 49 per cent increase in operating
profits from a streamlined manufacturing division.
But Mr Lancaster remained cautious. He said France was weakening and no
improvement was expected in the UK.
Turnover increased 12.5 per cent to Pounds 1.95bn, mainly due to the
inclusion of Brossette and a strong performance by two of the company's four
US subsidiaries.
Ferguson, which operates throughout the East Coast, increased profits 34 per
cent and saw record sales in July as lower interest rates brought signs of
recovery. But there was no improvement in California, where Familian
recorded its first-ever trading loss. Overall US operating profits increased
3.2 per cent to Pounds 32.5m.
The UK was affected by recession and margin pressure. Plumb Centre sales
were flat, Builder Centre was weak and plant hire lost money. In spite of
Brossette's inclusion operating profits from the UK and France fell 4 per
cent to Pounds 38.4m.
Manufacturing, which has been overtaken in size by Wolseley's distribution
business, increased profits from Pounds 17.1m to Pounds 25.5m, of which
Pounds 2.3m came from released provisions. The figures were helped by the
disposal of two loss-making subsidiaries. Car aerial and pump manufacturing
performed well.
Wolseley said cash flow remained strong. In spite of taking on about Pounds
30m of borrowings with Brossette, net borrowings fell almost Pounds 9m to
Pounds 58.9m, giving gearing of 17.2 per cent.
Earnings per share increased 13 per cent to 26.27p. A final dividend of
9.45p is proposed, to make a total of 12.55p, up 3.7 per cent.
At the interim stage, Wolseley's profits fell from Pounds 38m to Pounds
33.7m pre-tax.
See Lex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12432</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Dan-Air in talks with BA over possible rescue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH AIRWAYS and Dan-Air were in intense last-minute negotiations
yesterday with increasing signs that BA will rescue the smaller airline.
Airline industry analysts expect Dan-Air and BA to make an announcement as
early as today or tomorrow.
Although chances of a BA rescue of Dan-Air were put at only about 50 per
cent at best last week, the negotiations appear to have made progress and an
agreement now looks imminent.
But airline industry executives remained cautious. 'We've been led up the
garden path before,' one said, adding, however, that a decision was widely
expected in the next 24 hours.
BA and Dan-Air declined to comment yesterday on the negotiations to rescue
the financially troubled Gatwick-based carrier owned by the Davies &amp; Newman
group. A BA rescue is seen as the last chance for Dan-Air after talks with
Mr Richard Branson collapsed two weeks ago.
BA, which broke off talks with Dan-Air in September, was approached by Mr
David James, the company doctor in charge of Dan-Air, about 10 days ago.
BA is understood to have offered to acquire a minority stake in Dan-Air on
condition it involved only the scheduled part of the airline's operations
and not its charter business.
BA also made it clear it would not be interested in a rescue if it entailed
long regulatory problems with the Monopolies and Mergers Commission (MMC)
and the European Commission.
There were signs last night that the UK government could favour a BA rescue
because it would save jobs at Dan-Air and Gatwick airport. Dan-Air employs
about 2,500 people.
Any agreement is likely to spark protests by other UK carriers including
British Midland and Mr Branson's Virgin Atlantic.
However, as there appears to be no other way of salvaging Dan-Air, the
government could consider it was in the national interest to allow BA to
acquire a minority stake in the airline. Government approval, however, is
likely to hinge on BA agreeing to allow Dan-Air to continue operating as a
separate identifiable airline.
'They would probably have to maintain an arm's-length approach to Dan-Air,
as they do with their UK regional services, to win government approval,' one
UK aviation official said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12433</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Nomura to lose 50 jobs in London
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE retreat from continental European equities, once seen as the next big
money-spinner for securities houses, continued yesterday as Nomura closed
down its London-based marketmaking activities in non-UK stocks.
The move, which follows Baring Securities' decision last month to cut back
its continental European business, came as Japan's largest securities house
announced a cut of a third in its London-based equities staff to around 70.
The total of 50 redundancies yesterday, which included several in investment
banking, mark the first widespread cuts in London by a Japanese financial
institution.
They are likely to undermine the reputation for job security built up by
Japanese houses - though the squeeze on broking houses following the fall in
the Tokyo stock market made redundancies far more likely.
Nomura began making markets in continental European equities only two years
ago, and had been quoting prices in 65 stocks.
Like other securities houses with large London operations, Nomura had seen a
move into continental stocks as an antidote to the overcrowded UK equity
market. However, against a background of rising costs and low turnover, many
brokers have found the continental equity business to be an expensive one to
maintain.
The redundancies in UK equities yesterday mean that Nomura will no longer
research a number of sectors of the UK stock market, including building,
financials, insurance, chemicals and utilities. It remains a marketmaker in
130 UK stocks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12434</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Corporate Japan frets about profits: A wave of cost cuts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE list reads like an honour roll of Japan's post-war industrial success
stories: the Fujitsu computer group, the NEC electronics group, Minebea, the
world's leading maker of miniature bearings, and Nissan Motor. Instead, it
is part of the list of companies likely to report embarrassing losses in
coming weeks.
As companies own up to dismal results for the six months to September, they
will also be announcing more staff cuts, pared product lines, and trimmed
executive salaries, as manufacturers attempt to respond to recession by
restructuring. One in 10 Japanese listed companies is likely to report a
loss for the period and only a few of those will get out of the red during
the second half.
Japanese executives have begun to concede that poor profitability is not
merely an inevitable result of recession. Many companies had recognised in
the mid-1980s, after the yen's rapid appreciation and the maturing of core
markets, that profits were in long-term decline and a restructuring was
necessary.
But the easy money era of the late 1980s inspired unwise expansion of
domestic production capacity and a rapid increase in staff, making the
present crisis more acute and the need for restructuring more urgent.
The expansion was made in expectation of a continuing increase in sales, a
forecast inspired, for example, by the 12 per cent jump in orders received
for industrial machinery in 1988, and the 21 per cent rise a year later.
While corporate investment in fixed assets rose 66 per cent over the past
seven years, revenues rose only 29 per cent.
Nikko Research estimates that the operating profit margin for manufacturers
this calendar year will be 3.1 per cent, down from 3.2 per cent in 1986, and
from the oil shock-affected 4.5 per cent of 1975.
Meanwhile, Nikkei, the financial information company, estimated that the
asset turnover ratio of listed manufacturers fell from 1.19 in 1984 to 0.97
in the last fiscal year.
There are two causes common to the plight of many manufacturers: the
changing nature of the domestic market, and inefficient use of assets and
personnel.
In the past, companies were able to pay for their international expansion
with profits earned from the domestic market, where price competition was
often a matter of consensus. Market-opening measures and a more aggressive
approach by the Fair Trade Commission stimulated competition, but another
important factor was the entry of old manufacturers into new markets during
the past few years.
Nippon Steel began making personal computers, Minolta, the camera company,
ventured into office equipment, and Minebea, the bearings maker, went into
cosmetics. Komatsu, the construction machinery producer, started
manufacturing silicon wafers and established a distribution network for
Norwegian pleasure boats.
One result was increased crowding of already congested markets. When 11
semiconductor makers or nine television set producers squeeze into a
shrinking domestic market, price-cutting leads to falling profits.
Apart from entering new markets, companies expanded their product lines in
existing markets, as the flow of low-cost funds encouraged investments that
should not have been made. Companies were feeling wealthy, sales were
rising, and the surge in stock and land prices gave them a seemingly
everlasting financial cushion.
Now the present economic downturn has left manufacturers stranded in new
markets, either desperately trying to justify their investments by cutting
prices or about to announce an embarrassing retreat. Mr Masanobu Takahashi,
director of corporate research at Sanyo Investment Research, said the
difficulties highlight the 'excessively competitive nature of Japanese
business'. He argues that companies are 'restructuring for their survival',
and predicts 'an inevitable' consolidation in the next few years. Companies
must be prepared to withdraw from unprofitable markets, and not just prune
the product lines.
The character of the average manufacturing company also plays its part in
the crisis. While the country's shopfloors are rightly famous for lean
production techniques, the company itself is often remarkably bloated.
A manager at a cosmetics maker estimated that '25 per cent of our workforce
is unemployed', and Mitsubishi Motors, whose profits have risen against the
trend, says a reason for its success is that 'we entered the business late,
and kept a leaner administrative workforce'.
During the late 1980s, as companies rushed labour-saving technology into the
factories, the typical head office was over-staffed. This has become a heavy
burden on profits. The finance ministry reckons labour costs as a percentage
of sales were 16.1 per cent in the second quarter this year, compared with
15.7 per cent in 1986, and 15 per cent in 1975, the other crisis years. UBS
Phillips &amp; Drew estimates manufacturing unit labour costs will rise 10 per
cent this year, but productivity will fall 6.5 per cent.
Another aspect of the corporate character working against higher profits is
the asset profile. Mr John Baldwin, strategist at Jardine Fleming
Securities, said 21 per cent of listed companies' assets are securities or
land, up from 14 per cent in 1980. Neither are likely to produce high yields
for the next few years.
'The asset base is being used very inefficiently, and this is a bigger
factor in dragging down profitability than falling margins,' Mr Baldwin
said. Most of the stocks are cross-holdings in suppliers or financial
institutions and are not easily offloaded without rupturing that
relationship.
In studying corporate profitability from the mid-1960s, Wako Research
Institute found that in the late 1980s, frustrated companies turned to
financial engineering. Using a profit index, the institute calculated that
pre-tax profits grew by almost 80 per cent between 1986 and 1989, while
operating profits were about 20 per cent higher - much of the difference was
due to financial engineering.
Instead of counting gains on stock portfolios, companies are now booking
losses, and interest income has fallen in tandem with their cash cushion.
Japanese manufacturers are having to go back to the future - resuming a
restructuring begun in the mid-1980s and halted prematurely.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12435</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / SmithKline rises 8% in quarter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL ABRAHAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SMITHKLINE Beecham, the Anglo-American healthcare group, yesterday reported
third-quarter profits up 8 per cent from Pounds 252m to Pounds 272m.
A particularly strong performance from the group's pharmaceuticals
operations offset falling or stagnant profits in its animal health, clinical
laboratories and consumer brands businesses. The group's A shares closed up
15p at 527p.
The results were achieved on sales up 9 per cent at Pounds 1.28bn. Earnings
per share increased 13 per cent to 6.8p and 12.1 cents per equity unit.
The company, which generates 50 per cent of its sales in the US, suffered
from adverse exchange rates. At comparable rates, sales increased 12 per
cent, trading profits 8 per cent and pre-tax profits 13 per cent. Pre-tax
profits for the first nine months were Pounds 804m (up from Pounds 735m) on
sales of Pounds 3.74bn (up from Pounds 3.44bn).
The pharmaceuticals operations posted operating profits up 11 per cent to
Pounds 173m. Sales increased 24 per cent to Pounds 709m.
The group's new products performed well. Seroxat, an anti-depressant,
achieved 23.7 per cent market share in the UK.
Mr Hugh Collum, finance director, said Relafen, SmithKline Beecham's
anti-arthritis medicine, was now the third best-selling non-steroidal
anti-inflammatory treatment in the US with 10 per cent of the market by
value. Kytril, a nausea-prevention treatment for cancer patients, has been
accepted by more than 90 per cent of targeted clinics.
Mr Hugh Collum said the group had also benefited from the exceptional
performance of Engerix B, its hepatitis B vaccine.
Older products also performed well. Augmentin, an antibiotic, increased
worldwide sales by 41 per cent. Tagamet, the ulcer drug, which has lost most
of its patents except in the US, declined 4 per cent worldwide.
Consumer brands' operating profits fell 5 per cent to Pounds 68m on sales
down 6 per cent at Pounds 338m.
Trading profits in the animal health division declined from Pounds 17m to
Pounds 16m. The group said markets continued to be weak.
Clinical laboratories' operating profits were static at Pounds 18m on sales
up 3 per cent at Pounds 144m.
The company proposed a third interim dividend of 2.075p (up from 1.875p) per
share and 4.503 cents (up from 4.24 cents) per equity unit.
Background, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12436</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Hammerson warns of 50% cut in payout
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HAMMERSON yesterday became the second big UK property group to signal a
dividend cut when it announced plans to cut the total payout by more than 50
per cent from 20.5p to 10p.
The company said depressed conditions in its main markets of the UK, Canada
and Australia meant the interim dividend of 3.5p is maintained, but a final
dividend of 6.5p instead of 17p would be recommended.
Mr John Parry, managing director, said the cut took the dividend to a
'sustainable' level. Mr Sydney Mason, chairman, spoke of a recession 'both
deeper and longer than any in living memory'.
In August Slough Estates cut its interim dividend from 4.4p to 3.1p.
Yesterday's proposed cut by Hammerson was expected by the stock market,
which marked up the company's 'A' shares by 13p to 192p. Analysts were
divided over whether other large UK property companies would also cut
dividends when announcing results in coming weeks.
Hammerson pre-tax profits fell from Pounds 31.1m to Pounds 23.3m in the six
months to June 30. The fall was mainly due to higher finance costs: the
company's development programme is nearly complete so less interest is being
capitalised.
Net rental and other income increased 3.9 per cent to Pounds 63.4m. Vacancy
rates increased 1 per cent from a year ago to 8.5 per cent but remain low
compared with the sector. Bad debts also remained low at less than 1 per
cent of turnover and are likely to be below last year's Pounds 1.4m, the
company said.
Finance costs increased from Pounds 21m to Pounds 31.8m, as capitalised
interest fell from Pounds 19.4m to Pounds 8.5m. Capitalised interest is
likely to total Pounds 15m this year, and fall to almost zero next, as the
development programme is completed.
Net borrowings stood at just under Pounds 800m compared with Pounds 824m at
the year-end, leaving a gearing percentage 'in the mid-70s', said Mr Parry.
But this figure partly depends on property values, only valued at the
year-end.
There were no profits from property trading. An investment property in Fleet
Street, London was sold for Pounds 12m, giving an extraordinary profit of
Pounds 4.3m.
Earnings per share fell from 12.9p to 10.8p.
Lex, Page 20
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12437</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Breakthrough near in BA-USAir talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent and GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A breakthrough appeared imminent last night in talks between the UK and US
governments which would clear the way for British Airways to acquire for
Dollars 750m (Pounds 436m) a 44 per cent stake in USAir, the sixth largest
US airline.
Mr Andrew Card, US transportation secretary, is due to hold an unscheduled
meeting today in London with Mr John MacGregor, his UK counterpart. The
meeting is widely seen as a sign that the Bush administration is keen to
reach swift agreement with the UK on a new, more liberal, bilateral aviation
agreement and approve BA's investment in USAir.
The White House has come under intense pressure from the three largest US
carriers - American Airlines, United Airlines and Delta Air Lines - to block
the BA-USAir deal unless it can secure an open skies agreement between the
two countries and greater access for US carriers into the UK market.
The big three US carriers appeared concerned last night at the surprise
visit of Mr Card, fearing it could lead to a hasty agreement which they
claim could damage their competitive positions.
US and UK negotiators began a new round of talks on this controversial issue
in London yesterday.
Until Mr Card announced his decision to fly to London it was widely felt the
current round of talks was unlikely to produce a concrete result. The big
three carriers suggested this week they did not expect an agreement until
after the US presidential election on November 3.
But the BA-USAir deal was brought to the forefront of the US political
debate on Monday by Mr Ross Perot, the independent presidential candidate,
who attacked the venture during the final television debate between the
three election contenders.
He claimed the deal could damage the domestic airline industry and Mr Bill
Clinton, the Democratic candidate, also suggested the US should only approve
the deal if it received equal market access to the UK.
The Bush administration and Mr Card are believed to favour the BA investment
in USAir as it would help secure the US carrier's future, protect domestic
jobs and encourage foreign investment.
The White House has indicated it is prepared to consider the UK's proposal
to phase in liberalisation in air transport. But the UK has also insisted
the US approve the BA-USAir deal before agreeing to a new aviation regime
between the two countries.
During the presidential debate Mr Perot used the BA-USAir deal to reinforce
his complaint that US interests were hurt by the presence of too many
lobbyists in the big party campaigns. But the Texas billionaire neglected to
declare his own substantial financial interest in the airline industry.
The Perot Group donated land for the recently opened Alliance Airport
between Dallas and Fort Worth and then lobbied for millions of dollars in
federal money to build the airport. The group stands to benefit from
development of an estimated 18,000 acres of land it owns around the Alliance
site.
In addition, one of Alliance's main customers is Dallas-based American
Airlines, whose payments for Alliance facilities underwrite some of the
airport's debt and which is leading the lobbying fight against the BA-USAir
deal.
A dispute has broken out over whether the US government is glossing over an
impending financial crisis in the banking sector, which could cost billions
of dollars in federal money, writes George Graham in Washington.
During the 1988 US presidential election neither Democrats nor Republicans
drew much attention to the looming savings and loan crisis that is expected
to end up costing taxpayers Dollars 195bn (Pounds 113.3bn).
In the last of three televised presidential debates, on Monday night, Mr
Ross Perot, the independent candidate, raised the prospect that in the
immediate aftermath of the election perhaps 100 problem banks might have to
close at a cost to the taxpayer of about Dollars 100bn.
This scenario is based on a study by Mr Roger Vaughan and Prof Edward Hill,
published earlier this month by the Washington Post Company. The study,
entitled Banking on the Brink, argues that 1,150 banks are so weakly
capitalised that they are likely to fail or be forced into mergers in the
next few years. While many of the banks meet current international capital
standards, the authors argue that the book value of assets such as property
loans overstates their real worth.
'If their assets were valued at what they would fetch today in the market,
these banks would be shuttered on the spot,' the study says.
Other analysts make similar predictions of a banking collapse, although some
lower estimates of the likely cost.
Federal officials, backed up by their analysts, reject the pessimistic
calculations. 'The notion that we are hiding some kind of commercial banking
bailout is utter nonsense. Stories of a December collapse are simply
ridiculous,' Mr Nicholas Brady, the treasury secretary, told the American
Bankers Association in Boston this week.
Dan-Air talks, Page 21
US bank results, Page 26
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12438</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Mexico bows to pressures on peso
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MEXICO CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MEXICO has unexpectedly accelerated the maximum rate at which the peso can
devalue against the dollar, from 20 to 40 centavos a day, thereby reversing
a long-held policy of steadily reducing the daily slide in the currency. The
change will take effect from today.
The increased slide to an equivalent of 4.6 per cent a year will only apply
to the price at which pesos are sold, or the effective ceiling on the
exchange rate: the price at which the peso is bought will continue to be
fixed at 3,056 pesos per dollar.
But the effect will be to increase the volatility of the peso in the foreign
exchange markets, and lead to a faster devaluation of the average exchange
rate.
'The government is accepting the pressures on the peso in the foreign
exchange market,' says Mr Roberto Barrera, head of research at Invermexico,
a brokerage. 'In one sense it is a reversal, but in another the decision
addresses concerns of investors, and clears up uncertainty.'
The announcement on exchange rate policy reflects recent weakness in the
peso. It came earlier than investors had expected, an indication of the
government's need to act quickly before currency dealers gained the upper
hand.
A government official said: 'The increased slide to some extent pays
attention to concerns that the exchange rate is overvalued. But the change
is largely insignificant. If we cannot hold a slide of 2.4 per cent, we
cannot hold 4.6 per cent.'
Above all 'the change in exchange rate policy is complemented by other
important changes that are aimed to get inflation to 7 per cent next year'.
The government will announce, as part of the annual renegotiation of the
wage and price accord, that electricity and petrol prices will rise by up to
10 per cent next year, minimum wages by 7 per cent and contractual wages by
a maximum of 10 per cent. This will be the first time the wage accord will
explicitly cover contractual, rather than just minimum, wages.
Mexico's inflation rate is expected to be about 12 per cent this year,
suggesting that in real terms the peso would have appreciated by about 6-7
per cent against the dollar, had current annual devaluation been maintained.
The current account deficit is likely to top Dollars 20bn (Pounds 11.6bn)
this year, or more than 6 per cent of GDP.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12439</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Republicans struggle to woo women voters: Contentious issues
are being played down
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY DWORKIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT George Bush, trailing badly in the polls, is faring even worse
among women voters. As a result the Republicans have been struggling to
recast their appeal to women - or, some say, repair the damage they have
already done.
Not only do women constitute the majority of the population but they vote in
greater numbers - up to 10m more, by some estimates.
Mr Bush was at pains in Monday night's final presidential debate to rebut
charges that he, along with his presidential rivals, surrounded himself with
white men. 'We've a good record of appointing women in high positions and
positions of trust and I'm not defensive at all about it.'
His running mate, Vice-President Dan Quayle, has also found a new coyness on
the divisive issue of abortion, and backed away from the more strident
'family values' rhetoric so much a feature of the Republican convention in
August. It was, he said last month, 'a very complex issue' and his concern
was 'to get more of a national reflection on the tragedy of abortion'.
Even some of Mr Bush's supporters concede that the Democrats have appeared
more responsive to women's concerns. Ms Linda DiVall, the Republican
pollster, says 'women tend to look to the government to take a more active
role in solving the problems in their lives'. She cites issues such as
health care, day care, parental leave and the fight against job and pay
discrimination as areas where the more interventionist Democratic approach
appeals.
In many respects women have borne the brunt of current US economic problems,
the central focus of the Democratic campaign. Of families headed by single
women, 45 per cent live in poverty; nearly two-thirds of workers on the
minimum wage are women. A recent survey of women's attitudes showed that the
economic security of their families was the overriding concern.
It also indicated that financial pressures have pushed more women into the
workforce - 57 per cent of the total population - but that working mothers
still feel they are mainly responsible for keeping their families together.
The early emphasis on 'family values' seemed at times wildly out of touch
with these realities. 'I believe the message to working women that came out
of the Republican convention was enormously harmful,' said Ms Page Gardner,
who handles women's issues for the campaign of Governor Bill Clinton. 'What
women want is something that will make it easier for them to juggle work and
family.'
Mrs Marilyn Quayle, the vice-president's wife, took to the pages of the New
York Times to remedy the impression left by her assertion at the convention
that 'most women do not want to be liberated from their essential nature as
women'. She wrote that, far from attacking working women, she believed that
'making choices concerning work and family has become a constant in women's
lives'.
It is not only in the context of family values that women's role and status
in society have been widely discussed.
A series of scandals has drawn attention to the problem of sexual abuse in
the armed services. More significantly, last year's confirmation hearings
for Judge Clarence Thomas, the Supreme Court nominee - and the all-male
Senate judiciary committee's aggressive questioning of Prof Anita Hill, who
accused him of sexual harassment - continue to cast a long shadow.
This spectacle, reinforcing the perception that Washington's institutions
are old-fashioned and insensitive, gave impetus to the record number of
women running this year for high office. Eleven women (10 Democrats) have
been nominated for the Senate, which has now only three women members, of
whom one is a temporary stand-in. These include strong Democratic contenders
in California, Illinois and Pennsylvania, important battleground states in
the presidential election.
Analysts believe the female candidates will help draw women into the
Democratic camp in these states. Ms Harriet Woods, a women's rights
activist, notes that Mr Clinton has made an effort to associate himself
publicly with them - both at the Democratic convention and on the campaign
stump. The Republicans, in contrast, have tended to use surrogates, such as
Ms Lynn Martin, the labour secretary, or the candidates' wives.
The question of abortion is a wild card in the election.
The Supreme Court recently upheld its guarantee of abortion rights by the
narrowest of margins, indicating that another Republican justice could tip
the balance against it. Under the influence of the right wing the Republican
platform in Houston included a strong anti-abortion position, which still
dogs the attempts of Mr Bush and his running mate to play down its
significance.
Polls show economic issues rating higher than abortion with women voters -
but strategists from both parties believe the issue has hidden force. It is
clearly a factor for many upper-middle class Republican women, who may be
deserting the party in significant numbers.
Ms Woods points out that the threat to legalised abortion may reinforce
financial concerns. Ms DiVall argues that Mr Bush can regain women's votes,
but only if he confronts this concern by redefining the debate over economic
opportunities. 'He must make it clear that an activist government is, in
fact, the enemy of choice,' she says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12440</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Peru set to quit rights treaty
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SALLY BOWEN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LIMA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PERU took the first steps yesterday towards withdrawing from the San Jose
Convention, the principal treaty governing human rights in Latin America.
The move is designed to pave the way for introduction of the death penalty
for convicted terrorists, a sanction prohibited by the convention.
Mr Oscar de la Puente Raygada, the prime minister and foreign affairs
minister, said Peru 'is confronting an exceptional situation' with regard to
the actions of guerrilla groups. The government would prefer to renounce the
death penalty clause alone, but if the Organisation of American States were
to rule this out Peru would withdraw from the treaty in its entirety, he
said.
President Alberto Fujimori, who has already established summary trial
procedures by secret military court for those accused of terrorism, will
seek to short-circuit the relatively prolonged period normally involved in
withdrawing from international treaties.
Meanwhile, round-ups of Sendero militants are continuing in the capital on
an almost daily basis.
However, counter-terrorist police chief General Ketin Vidal denied earlier
rumours that Mr Oscar Ramirez Durand, tipped to succeed Mr Guzman as leader
of Sendero, was among a group of nine key figures arrested at the weekend.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12441</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Clinton keeps his lead after debate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUREK MARTIN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
US President George Bush gave it his best shot on Monday night. But there
was no immediate evidence, apart from the encouragement for his supporters,
that his vigorous performance in the final presidential debate had turned
the electoral tide in his favour, writes Jurek Martin in Washington.
Four TV network polls found him the least persuasive of the candidates.
Governor Bill Clinton, the Democratic contender, was the 'winner' in two, Mr
Ross Perot, the independent, in one, while the other had these two tied.
Only in the poll that gave the nod to Mr Perot was Mr Bush reckoned to have
matched Mr Clinton.
This confrontation saw some spirited exchanges. The most eye-catching
assaults were launched by Mr Perot on Mr Bush over his pre-Gulf war policies
towards Iraq as well as over Panama, the savings and loan scandals, the
health of the banking system, the North American Free Trade Agreement, and
foreign attempts to take over US airlines.
Mr Bush repeatedly said there was 'a dangerous pattern' to Mr Clinton's
behaviour of not speaking the truth and that therefore he could not be
trusted in the White House.
Mr Clinton kept recalling Mr Bush's infamous 'read my lips, no new taxes'
pledge of four years ago and said that although Mr Bush was only too willing
to cede control of economic policy to his campaign chief, Mr James Baker,
'the person responsible for economic policy in my administration will be
Bill Clinton'.
This permitted the president one of his better interventions: 'That's what
worries me, he's going to be responsible.'
Yesterday, Mr Clinton promised to hammer away at economic issues, a strategy
that has brought him leads of 12-18 points in most national polls.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12442</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Housing starts continue to climb
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BUILDERS started work on slightly more US homes last month, adding to a
surge in August, but the knock-on effects for the rest of the economy could
be slight, Reuter reports from New York.
The Commerce Department said housing starts rose 1.4 per cent in September,
following a revised 12.6 per cent climb in August. Mr David Lereah, chief
economist at the Mortgage Bankers Association, which tracks mortgage
activity, said: 'I don't think people should think the housing industry is
likely to drive the economy in a significant manner, but we're finally on
the right road.'
Some economists said the modest September rise compared with August might
show housing activity had peaked. They also noted a decline in mortgage
applications.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12443</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Brasilia sell-offs to exclude'strategic groups'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   RIO DE JANEIRO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE new Brazilian government is planning a radical overhaul of its
privatisation programme, recasting it as a more nationalistic policy which
excludes many so-called 'strategic companies'.
Mr Antonio Barros de Castro, the new head of the programme, made clear in an
interview with the Financial Times that, in the medium and long term, the
programme would change considerably from that initiated last year by former
President Fernando Collor.
Criticising the previous administration for being 'too concerned with
selling everything at all costs and under equal rules', Mr de Castro
strongly defended the thesis that sectors such as telecommunications, oil
and mining remained under state control.
'I don't see any convincing reasons why companies like Vale do Rio Doce (the
state mining company), Telebras and Petrobras should go. Not only are these
companies successful but our economy is still in formation and must pass
through many important structural changes in which these companies have an
important role.'
The traditional aspect of these companies was important. 'To think of
privatising Petrobras would be a cultural violation.'
Mr de Castro's views contrast sharply with those of his predecessor, Mr
Eduardo Modiano, who believed that Brazil should privatise all its state
sector and who fought riots and numerous legal challenges to get the
programme under way in September last year.
Privatisation is the most sensitive issue facing the administration of
Acting President Itamar Franco who took office nearly three weeks ago
following Mr Collor's suspension. The team contains many past critics of
privatisation, including Mr Franco himself, and fears of a slowdown of the
programme have caused the main Sao Paulo stock market index to fall 10.9 per
cent.
The Franco administration has been eager to reassure investors that the
programme will not be halted and that the next 10 sell-offs already
scheduled will be maintained. Tomorrow Acesita, a big steel company, will go
on sale.
However, sweeping changes are planned for all sales after March.
Mr de Castro's main pre-occupation is to end what he calls 'precipitous
universality,' that is, applying the same conditions to all sell-offs. 'How
can it be right for Goiasfertil, a non-viable fertiliser company, to be sold
under the same rules as Embraer (the aerospace group), the nerve of
Brazilian technology?'
New legislation is being prepared to go before Congress to introduce three
or four general company categories, each of which will have different rules
for the limit on foreign capital (currently 40 per cent) and the type of
currencies qualified to bid. This will not outlaw the use of controversial
'rotten currency' - unserviced debt of some state entities used in the
programme to date. But a certain proportion of cash will be insisted on
which could vary from 10 per cent to 'much higher than 40, though never
100'.
Some 'exceptional' companies would be subject to special rules agreed with
Congress; one such is Embraer. Mr de Castro said he would like to have
included in this the National Steel Company (CSN) which is scheduled for
sale in December, but 'I'd rather sell something I consider wrong than break
our promise of not changing the rules of sales already agreed'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12444</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Peru set to quit human rights treaty
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SALLY BOWEN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LIMA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PERU took the first steps yesterday towards withdrawing from the San Jose
Convention, the principal treaty governing human rights in Latin America.
The move is designed to pave the way for introduction of the death penalty
for convicted terrorists, a sanction prohibited by the convention.
Mr Oscar de la Puente Raygada, the prime minister and foreign affairs
minister, said Peru 'is confronting an exceptional situation' with regard to
the actions of guerrilla groups. The government would prefer to renounce the
death penalty clause alone, but if the Organisation of American States were
to rule this out Peru would withdraw from the treaty in its entirety, he
said.
President Alberto Fujimori, who has already established summary trial
procedures by secret military court for those accused of terrorism, will
seek to short-circuit the relatively prolonged period normally involved in
withdrawing from international treaties.
He has not discounted the possibility of the death penalty being applied to
guerrilla leaders such as Sendero Luminoso's Abimael Guzman or Mr Victor
Polay, of the Tupac Amaru Revolutionary Movement, who are behind bars.
Mr Fujimori said: 'If they are found politically responsible for terrorist
acts committed in the future, then the same penalty could be applied to
them.'
The prospect of Peru's withdrawal from the San Jose pact has raised fears
among local organisations that respect for human rights, always fragile and
rudimentary in the country, may suffer further erosion. But the groundswell
of support for tougher measures against guerrillas is likely to ensure Mr
Fujimori wins widespread popular backing.
Meanwhile, round-ups of Sendero militants are continuing in the capital on
an almost daily basis. However, counter-terrorist police chief General Ketin
Vidal denied earlier rumours that Mr Oscar Ramirez Durand, tipped to succeed
Mr Guzman as leader of Sendero, was among a group of nine arrested at the
weekend.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12445</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Perot raises spectre of Dollars 100bn bank disaster
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DURING the 1988 US presidential election neither Democrats nor Republicans
drew much attention to the looming savings and loan crisis that is expected
to end up costing taxpayers Dollars 195bn (Pounds 113.3bn), writes George
Graham in Washington.
A dispute has now broken out over whether the government is again glossing
over an impending financial crisis, this time in the banking sector, which
could again cost billions of dollars in federal money.
President George Bush and Governor Bill Clinton, the two main presidential
candidates, agreed in the last of their three televised debates on Monday
night that the US banking system was fundamentally sound, though both
conceded there were problem banks. But Mr Ross Perot, the independent
candidate, raised the prospect that in the immediate aftermath of the
election perhaps 100 problem banks might have to close at a cost to the
taxpayer of about Dollars 100bn.
This catastrophic scenario is based on a controversial study by Mr Roger
Vaughan and Prof Edward Hill, published earlier this month by the Washington
Post Company.
The study, entitled Banking on the Brink, argues that 1,150 banks are so
weakly capitalised that they are likely to fail or be forced into mergers in
the next few years.
While many of the banks meet current international capital standards, the
authors argue that the book value of assets such as property loans
overstates their real worth.
'If their assets were valued at what they would fetch today in the market,
these banks would be shuttered on the spot,' the study says.
At the core of the problem, according to Mr Vaughan and Prof Hill, are 10
large bank holding companies each with more than Dollars 10bn in assets.
Mr Bert Ely, a banking consultant in Alexandria, Virginia, makes a lower
estimate of the likely cost of bank failures and believes the existing
resources of the Bank Insurance Fund will be enough to cover depositors in
these banks, without increasing the premiums levied on banks.
Adding a sense of urgency to the more gloomy predictions is the
implementation on December 19 of new legislation which would give federal
bank regulators the responsibility to close banks whose capital falls to 2
per cent of assets, rather than waiting until they are technically
insolvent.
Federal officials, and other banking analysts, reject both these pessimistic
calculations on bank capital and the idea of a banking Doomsday on December
19.
MR Ross Perot has waded into the controversy surrounding British Airways'
proposed Dollars 750m (Pounds 436m) investment in a 44 per cent stake in
USAir, writes George Graham. In the final televised debate between the three
main presidential candidates on Monday night, Mr Perot said the BA deal,
which still needs US government approval, as well as a similar deal already
approved in which KLM of the Netherlands took a stake in Northwest Airlines,
would be 'terribly destructive to the airline industry'.
'We're getting ready to dismantle the airlines industry in our country and
none of you knows it. And I doubt in all candour if the president knows it,'
he said.
The Texas billionaire used the airline deals to reinforce his complaint that
US interests were hurt by the presence of too many lobbyists in the big
party campaigns. But Mr Perot neglected to declare his own substantial
financial interest in the airline industry.
The Perot Group donated land for the recently opened Alliance Airport
between Dallas and Fort Worth and then lobbied for millions of dollars in
federal money to build the airport. The group stands to benefit from
development of an estimated 18,000 acres of land it owns around the Alliance
site.
In addition, one of Alliance's main customers is Dallas-based American
Airlines, whose payments for Alliance facilities underwrite some of the
airport's debt and which is also leading the lobbying fight against the
BA-USAir deal.
US bank results, Second Section
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12446</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Bush takes campaign trail south
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARBARA HARRISON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ATLANTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT George Bush yesterday began a campaign train trip through the
south-east, aimed at convincing the region's 'Reagan Democrats' that he can
deliver a better economic performance in a second term.
Mr Bush will travel from Atlanta, Georgia, through South Carolina to Raleigh
in North Carolina in an attempt to secure victories in states once thought
to be certain bets for the Republicans.
While Mr Bush's chances are still estimated to be good in South Carolina, in
Georgia and North Carolina he looks increasingly vulnerable to Arkansas
Governor Bill Clinton, the Democratic contender.
The president has to contend with the special appeal of an all-southern
Democratic ticket; an advantage pressed home by Mr Clinton and his running
mate, Tennessee Senator Al Gore.
But the Bush camp believes the race is still close enough for him to win
respectably in the south. Polls show that he trails Mr Clinton by fewer
points in southern states than he does nationally.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12447</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Investing in a route through recession -
The progress of two West Midlands engineering groups
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL CHEESERIGHT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WAGON Industrial Holdings and Triplex Lloyd, two West Midlands engineering
groups, have been trying to invest their way out of recession.
Their experience, based on the policy of becoming strong companies in often
quite narrow sectors, indicates the manner in which medium-sized groups have
been re-positioning in international markets.
Yesterday, Wagon demonstrated the execution of that policy with the
announcement of the purchase of Polypal.
Despite declines in turnover in the year to the end of last March, to Pounds
229.5m for Wagon and to Pounds 167.2m for Triplex Lloyd, and falls in
pre-tax profits to Pounds 14.1m for Wagon and Pounds 7.06m for Triplex
Lloyd, the expansion of both groups has not passed unnoticed.
Wagon's shares have been trading recently in the middle of the 1992 range
and those of Triplex Lloyd have been at the bottom of their range, but the
two have won the approbation of stockbroking analysts.
Albert E Sharp has recommended its clients to buy Triplex Lloyd. 'Focus on
castings increasing and prospects encouraging; property could provide cash
for future expansion.' It suggested clients should hold Wagon. 'Good
management in recession means a much reduced cost base and strong balance
sheet.'
The two groups have in common the manufacture of automotive components and
precision products but thereafter their interests diverge. Wagon has its
materials handling business, Triplex Lloyd is active in the power and
building products sectors.
Since April 1990, Triplex Lloyd has bought six companies, five for cash
totalling Pounds 11.6m and one for shares, the issue of which generated
Pounds 5.6m cash. Wagon, before yesterday's purchase, the largest of the
present series, had spent Pounds 6.7m in 1990-91 on four companies, Pounds
1m on three companies in 1991-92, and, during the present financial year,
Pounds 4.73m on six companies.
None of the acquisitions represented a departure from existing lines of
business. Rather, Wagon and Triplex Lloyd were able to exploit the poor
business climate by, in some instances, buying companies at knock-down
prices from the receiver, in order to fill gaps or to expand their product
ranges.
The series of isolated purchases sprang out of plans made during the early
part of the recession, which has lasted longer than either anticipated.
Mr John Hudson, Wagon's chief executive, said that in 1989 the company
thought it was heading for recession with Pounds 24m of debt. It was decided
to sell the office furniture and steel operations.
'That wiped out the debt. It generated Pounds 12.5m of cash. We took the
view we would run through recession with a strong balance sheet.'
Triplex Lloyd's key decisions were taken in 1990, said Mr John Foley, the
finance director. At that time the group had four divisions, automotive and
engineering, power, building products and electrical engineering.
'We began to look at our capital requirements in some detail. We decided
that notwithstanding gloom in building products and engineering, we saw
growth in power and automotive if we became more efficient.'
The first result was the sale of the electrical engineering business for
Pounds 13.2m.
Both groups, then, began the recession with a disposal which, in their
different ways, provided a financial springboard for expansion of, and
concentration of resources on, the remaining businesses.
But there was one caveat. Triplex Lloyd has not sought to expand its
building products group. It has tended to nurse it along, stripping out
overheads and keeping it profitable, the better to concentrate on investment
in its power and automotive businesses.
Although both companies approached the recession along broadly the same
lines, emphasising a simultaneous approach of cost-cutting and development,
their financial approach has been different.
Wagon has stuck with the policy of remaining cash positive. At the end of
last March it had net cash balances of Pounds 14.5m. Financing the
acquisition of Polypal through an equity issue is consistent with this
policy. The fact that Polypal has cash balances of Pounds 6m increases
Wagon's ability to expand without resort to debt.
Triplex Lloyd on the other hand has had a more relaxed approach to debt.
This is partly because it has extensive property holdings of surplus
industrial land that, even in the present depressed markets, provide an
asset backing for borrowing.
Gearing increased during 1991-92 to 45 per cent and remains high, Mr Foley
said, 'because we are continuing to invest. The only way to get it down is
in lumps, disposing of land or of businesses.'
These financial approaches point to differences in management style. Triplex
Lloyd changed after July 1991, following the death of Mr James Doel, the
chairman, and the appointment of Mr Colin Cooke as his successor.
The group became more outward looking, according to Mr Foley, with an
attempt to achieve greater understanding of the market. 'Effective and
creative marketing must become the driving force,' Mr Cooke told employees
last March.
For its part, Wagon has announced a series of management changes, with the
appointment of Mr Kevin Wilson as group managing director, reporting to Mr
Hudson, and a series of internal changes.
These reflect, Mr Hudson said, 'the emerging realisation that the 1990s will
be very different' and that there is a need for more hands-on management of
the group's subsidiaries. Wagon is reconciled to slow economic growth.
'I'm clear you have to do well whatever you do,' said Mr Hudson of his
diversified group of companies. 'If they're not strong players in their
niches you've got problems. You've got to be international. You've got to
have common sense in your earnings profile.'
Mr Foley, looking into the future and considering the technological advances
Triplex Lloyd has been making in its casting operations, takes a similar
view.
'We want to re-position so as to serve the growth markets and to beef up the
size of those operations which serve the growth markets.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12448</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: 46% rise for Essex Furniture
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ESSEX FURNITURE, the Leigh-on-Sea based manufacturer and retailer, expanded
pre-tax profit by 46 per cent in the year to June 30.
From turnover ahead 52 per cent at Pounds 7.15m (Pounds 4.69m) trading
profit rose 49 per cent to Pounds 696,000 (Pounds 468,000). Interest charges
were cut to leave the pre-tax balance at Pounds 727,000 (Pounds 497,000).
Mr Michael Franks, chairman, said five new showrooms were opened in the year
and in the current term it was intended to add at least three more.
Despite the difficult trading environment the first quarter of the current
year had shown growth in all areas.
The head office and factory was large enough to support present trading
levels but the time had come to evaluate moving into larger premises, he
said.
Earnings per share were 5.03p (3.25p) and the final dividend is 1.5p on
capital increased by the May rights issue, to make a total of 2.75p (2.25p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12449</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Wagon raises Pounds 31m for European
acquisition
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL CHEESERIGHT, Midlands Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WAGON Industrial Holdings, the Telford-based engineering group, is to buy
Polypal, a Belgian manufacturer of storage equipment, for Pounds 32.3m and
finance the acquisition with a fully underwritten 1-for-4 rights issue at
335p, raising a net Pounds 30.8m, writes Paul Cheeseright, Midlands
Correspondent.
The rights price is 25p below the lowest level at which the shares have
traded this year. Yesterday they fell 12p to 396p.
The rights is also available to convertible holders on a 1-for-14 basis.
Wagon, which specialises in materials handling, precision engineering and
automotive components, also announced a rise in pre-tax profits for the six
months to September 30 to Pounds 8.52m, against Pounds 6.02m which was
struck after Pounds 2m exceptional costs for factory rationalisation.
The interim dividend is maintained at 6.325p and an unchanged final of
10.675p is forecast on the capital enlarged by the rights issue of 9.89m
shares.
Earnings per share came out at 15.08p (9.71p) basic or 14.56p (10.12p) fully
diluted.
Polypal is the largest of the series of acquisitions Wagon has made since
the beginning of the recession. It comes with Pounds 6m of net cash, but has
been bought as a means of expanding Wagon's presence in the European
materials handling sector.
It gives a complementary line of products, manufactured in Liege, and a
distribution network in France, Germany and the Netherlands to supplement
the existing Wagon presence in Spain and the UK.
In the half year to last June, Polypal's pre-tax profits were static at
BFr92m (Pounds 1.8m) on turnover little changed at BFr881m.
Wagon expects it to contribute Pounds 1m to its 1992-93 pre-tax profits.
In the first half Wagon drew the benefit both of the cost cutting exercises
for which it paid in 1991-92 and of the small acquisitions it has been
making to bolster its existing lines of business. Turnover improved to
Pounds 114.4m (Pounds 114m).
The company said that immediate market prospects were not encouraging.
After a demand spurt in the spring, UK orders had reverted to 1991 levels,
while in continental Europe uncertainty remained after the effective
revaluation of the D-Mark.
COMMENT
Wagon has ridden the recession with more aplomb than most. The record of
quick adaptation and the quiet expansion of an ungeared business promise a
lift in this year's pre-tax profits to about Pounds 19m against Pounds 14.1m
in 1992. This makes the rights issue, supported by a forecast maintained
dividend look fairly priced. Earnings per share on the enlarged capital
should come out at about 25.5p, compared with 23.79p, putting the shares on
a prospective p/e of 15.5. This may look slightly high for the sector, but
then Wagon is faring better than most of its peers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12450</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Edinburgh Trust shows little change at
halfway
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EDINBURGH Investment Trust, the second largest investment trust in the UK,
yesterday announced an unchanged interim dividend of 2.85p and reported a
modest 0.4 per increase in net assets per share.
Portfolio performance lagged the FT-A All-Share Index, which posted a 2.9
per cent gain in the six months to September 30, but was ahead of the FT-A
Investment World Index, which fell by 0.5 per cent.
Investment income fell by 13.8 per cent to Pounds 20.9m (Pounds 24.3m)
reflecting the reduced exposure to the UK in the early part of the year, as
well as sales of foreign bonds and dividend cuts by some UK companies.
This decline was partly offset by higher interest on deposits which grew to
Pounds 3.67m (Pounds 2.4m) and total revenues slipped by 7.5 per cent to
Pounds 24.8m (26.8m).
Pre-tax revenues fell to Pounds 17.6m (Pounds 19.1m) while earnings per hare
dipped from 4.69p to 4.57p.
In the past six months the group said further funds had been invested in
both the UK equity market and the gilt market in anticipation of lower
interest rates.
At the end of September the geographical split of the equity portfolio,
which was valued at Pounds 777.4m, was as follows: UK - 65.8 per cent; North
America - 9.4 per cent; continental Europe - 12 per cent; Japan  - 7.6 per
cent; other Far East - 5.2 per cent.
Net assets at September 30 were Pounds 749.1m, equivalent to 254.9p per
share, against an adjusted 253.9p at the end of March and 273.6p at the end
of September 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12451</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Compaq faces 'additional
challenge' from IBM PC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
COMPAQ'S third-quarter sales rose by 50 per cent to Dollars 1.06bn, from
Dollars 709m in the same period last year, in stark contrast to IBM's
'substantial decline' in PC sales, reported last week.
Compaq's net income for the quarter was Dollars 49m, or 61 cents per share,
compared with a net loss of Dollars 70m in the third quarter of 1991 when
the company took a pre-tax restructuring charge of Dollars 135m.
'Compaq shipped worldwide a record number of PCs in the third quarter,
including over 200,000 in September alone, yet we entered the fourth quarter
with a sizeable backlog,' said Mr Pfeiffer.
'We are getting much better at forecasting demand,' he added, 'and expect to
begin meeting current demand on most products during the fourth quarter.'
'Despite our continuing market share gains, Compaq is fully aware of the
fiercely competitive market that lies ahead and we are committed to take
decisive and timely actions necessary to ensure continued success,' said Mr
Eckhard Pfeiffer, Compaq president and chief executive.
IBM's launch of its new ValuePoint range of PCs yesterday, with prices for
fully configured systems including a colour monitor starting at Dollars
1,299, 'is clearly an additional challenge,' Mr Pfeiffer said.
On Monday, Compaq lowered US prices on several of its popular desktop and
notebook personal computers in advance of IBM's anticipated ValuePoint
product introductions.
IBM also said it planned to match price cuts by competitors and the company
adjusted the prices of its new ValuePoint products on the eve of their
introduction in response to Compaq's price cuts.
For the first nine months of 1992, Compaq reported net income of Dollars
124m, or Dollars 1.48 per share, against Dollars 64m, or 72 cents per share,
last year. Sales advanced to Dollars 2.7bn from Dollars 2.4bn in the same
period last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12452</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Growth in volume helps boost GTE
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GTE, the largest local telephone company in the US, yesterday posted a 9 per
cent advance in third-quarter earnings from continuing operations,
reflecting volume growth and strong gains in the mobile-cellular business.
For the three months to September 30, earnings rose to Dollars 500m, or 55
cents a share, from continuing businesses, compared with Dollars 457m, or 51
cents, a year earlier. Revenues and sales were 2 per cent higher at Dollars
4.97bn, against Dollars 4.85bn.
The figures, which met analysts' expectations, do not include GTE's
electrical products operations it sold in the third quarter in two separate
deals valued at Dollars 1.1bn.
For the first nine months, earnings from continuing operations advanced to
Dollars 1.37bn, or Dollars 1.51, against Dollars 1.05bn, or Dollars 1.16,
last year, when it took a net charge of Dollars 204m, or 12 cents a share,
related to last year's Dollars 6bn merger with telecommunications group
Contel.
Stripping out last year's one-time charge, earnings per share from
continuing operations rose 9 per cent in the first nine months. Revenues and
sales were up at Dollars 14.85bn from Dollars 14.39bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12453</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Wells Fargo hit by debt
provision
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WELLS FARGO, the California bank that has been hit by commercial property
loan problems, yesterday disclosed a sharp drop in third-quarter net
profits.
The bank's net income was Dollars 24m, down from Dollars 86m a year ago,
while earnings per share fell to 21 cents from Dollars 1.59 in the third
quarter of 1991.
Wells said the main reason for the steep decline was a Dollars 400m bad debt
provision, double the level a year ago.
Mr Carl Reichardt, chairman, said the bank's pre-tax earnings before
provisions remained high by historical standards. But he said the California
economy, especially in the southern part of the state, 'continues to decline
and increased reserves appear prudent'.
For the first nine months of 1992, Wells Fargo's net income was Dollars
225m, compared with Dollars 252m a year ago.
Return on assets at Wells was 0.18 per cent, while return on equity was just
1.5 per cent. A year ago, the return on assets was 0.62 per cent and the
return on equity was 10.62 per cent.
Net loan write-offs in the third quarter amounted to Dollars 264m, double
the Dollars 123m of write-offs a year ago. The slump in commercial property
continued to be the main problem for these write-offs.
On Wall Street, the Wells Fargo share price fell Dollars  5/8 to close at
Dollars 65 1/8 .
By contrast, third quarter net earnings at the Pittsburg-based Mellon Bank
more than doubled, from Dollars 70m to Dollars 156m. Earnings per share were
Dollars 2.57, against Dollars 1.10 a year ago.
Mellon said the quarterly results included Dollars 76m in gains on the sale
of securities and an Dollars 18m charge related to cost-cutting at the bank.
But even excluding these special items Mellon still achieved a 42 per cent
increase in third quarter net earnings, to Dollars 98m.
Mellon's bad debt provisions were Dollars 40m in the quarter, or half the
previous year's level. Loan losses were up only slightly year-on-year, from
Dollars 59m to Dollars 61m.
The Mellon share price was Dollars  3/8 higher at Dollars 45 7/8 .
In Ohio, Banc One, the rapidly-expanding retail banking group, said its
third-quarter net earnings were Dollars 186.2m, or 87 cents a share.
This was an improvement on the third-quarter net profit of last year,
although the figure has been restated at Dollars 140.4m to reflect two
acquisitions.
Banc One's return on assets was 1.49 per cent, one of the highest in the US
and nearly twice the national average. Return on equity was 17.14 per cent.
Mr John McCoy, chairman, said the bank continued to see an improvement in
both its own profits and the credit quality of recently-acquired affiliates
in the process of being integrated into the group.
Banc One's bad debt provision was Dollars 115m, up from Dollars 95m a year
ago.
On Wall Street, Banc One's shares were up Dollars 1 1/8 at Dollars 46 1/4.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12454</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Colgate-Palmolive back in the
black in third term
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
COLGATE-Palmolive, the US consumer products group, yesterday reported
after-tax profits of Dollars 128.8m for the three months to end-September,
on sales of Dollars 1.83bn.
The figure compares with a Dollars 197.4m loss in the same period of 1991,
but the previous year's results were depressed by a one-off restructuring
charge of Dollars 340m before tax.
Colgate said with this excluded net income would have shown a 34 per cent
increase year-on-year, and earnings per share a 15 per cent rise to 78
cents.
Mr Reuben Mark, Colgate's chairman, said all four geographical regions
showed higher sales and profits in the third quarter.
For the group overall, unit volume was up by 12 per cent, although the
advance partly reflected the purchase of the Mennen business in the US.
Without Mennen, there would have been a 5 per cent unit volume increase.
The third-quarter results bring Colgate's net profits for the first nine
months of 1992 to Dollars 367.1m, compared with Dollars 38m - after the
restructuring charge - in the same period of 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12455</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Johnson &amp; Johnson advances 17%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHNSON &amp; Johnson, the US healthcare group, yesterday turned in a 17 per
cent increase in third-quarter net earnings on sales which rose nearly 12
per cent, helped by a lower tax rate and a weaker dollar.
The company had net earnings of Dollars 425m, or 65 cents a share, against
Dollars 363m, or 54 cents.
There were fewer shares outstanding in the latest quarter following the
company's Dollars 500m stock buy-back programme in the second quarter.
Pre-tax earnings increased 12.3 per cent in the quarter.
The company's sales of Dollars 3.48bn in the latest quarter were lifted
about 3.8 per cent by the benefits of a weak dollar.
During the quarter, Johnson &amp; Johnson was charged Dollars 116m, plus
interest, in damages awarded to Minnesota Mining &amp; Manufacturing. The
company also received Dollars 74m from the settlement of a lawsuit with
Amgen. Johnson &amp; Johnson said the net result of these had no material effect
on third-quarter earnings.
For the first nine months, the company had net earnings of Dollars 1.35bn,
or Dollars 2.05 per share, on sales of Dollars 10.25bn, against earnings of
Dollars 1.19bn, or Dollars 1.78, on sales of Dollars 9.3bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12456</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: US banks show signs of recovery
continuing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE recovery trend in US banking continued when a quadrupled third-quarter
net profit was unveiled by NationsBank, the large south-eastern regional
group formed last year by the merger of C &amp; S Sovran and NCNB.
NationsBank said it earned Dollars 350m of net income in the third quarter,
compared with Dollars 81m a year ago. Earnings per share were Dollars 1.40,
against 31 cents in the same quarter last year.
For the first nine months of 1992, net income more than doubled
year-on-year, to Dollars 911m, while return on equity was a strong 17.27 per
cent for the nine-month period.
Third-quarter 1992 net loan write-offs amounted to Dollars 141m, down from
Dollars 280m a year ago. Bad debt provisions in the quarter were Dollars
150m, well below the Dollars 430m of a year ago.
In Connecticut, Shawmut National, an indicator of the state of the New
England economy, recorded a more modest Dollars 13m third-quarter net
profit, compared with Dollars 2.3m a year ago.
Shawmut's earnings per share were 14 cents, up from 2 cents a year ago.
The bank's bad debt provisions were Dollars 43.6m in the quarter, against
Dollars 57m a year earlier.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12457</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Reebok results fall below
expectations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
REEBOK International, the US sports shoe maker, posted disappointing
earnings for the third quarter and warned that its fourth-quarter results
would trail earlier projections.
Net income for the quarter advanced to Dollars 74.4m, or 80 cents a share,
on sales of Dollars 863.2m, from Dollars 66.2m, or 71 cents, on sales of
Dollars 764.3m a year earlier.
Most analysts had expected earnings of about 83 cents a share in the latest
quarter.
Mr Paul Fireman, chairman and chief executive, said the company had cut its
expected full-year earnings from operations to a range of Dollars 2.50 to
Dollars 2.55 a share from earlier estimates of Dollars 2.70 to Dollars 2.85.
Although sales of Reebok and Rockport brands increased in the quarter, sales
of Ellesse fell sharply to Dollars 12.2m from Dollars 20.4m, while AVIA lost
22.4 per cent to Dollars 36.4m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12458</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Kaiser Aluminum tumbles to
Dollars 3.9m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURIE MORSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CHICAGO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
KAISER Aluminum, the US mining company suffering from low prices for most of
its products, yesterday reported a sharp decline in earnings for the third
quarter.
The company unveiled net income of Dollars 3.9m, or 6 cents a share, for the
quarter, down from Dollars 23.1m, or 41 cents, last time. Sales were Dollars
458.5m, compared with Dollars 509.7m a year ago.
For the first nine months of the year, Kaiser's earnings were Dollars 24.3m,
or 42 cents, down from Dollars 81.3m, or Dollars 1.56, last year. Nine-month
sales were Dollars 1.4bn, compared with Dollars 1.53bn last year.
'Third-quarter results reflect lower realised prices for the company's
alumina, primary aluminium and fabricated aluminium products,' the company
said. It added that lower prices reflected softened demand, combined with a
cyclical worldwide over-supply of aluminium.
Kaiser shipped 164,700 tonnes of primary and fabricated aluminium in the
third quarter, and 518,500 tonnes in the first nine months, compared with
167,000 tonnes and 492,200 tonnes, respectively, in the same 1991 periods.
Primary aluminium accounted for about 48 per cent of Kaiser's third-quarter
shipments, against 52 per cent in the third quarter of 1991.
Alumina shipments totalled 469,000 tonnes in the third quarter, down from
511,300 tonnes in 1991.
Phelps Dodge, the world's second-largest copper producer, reported
third-quarter earnings above analysts' expectations. Net income jumped to
Dollars 119.9m, or Dollars 1.70 per share, an increase of 83 per cent over
third-quarter 1991 earnings of Dollars 64.7m, or 93 cents.
For the first nine months, the US group recorded net income of Dollars
240.9m, or Dollars 3.42 per share, up from Dollars 197.7m, or Dollars 2.85
per share, last year.
Sales were Dollars 672.1m in the third quarter, and Dollars 1.9bn for the
first nine months, compared with Dollars 617.6m and Dollars 1.8bn,
respectively, for the same periods a year ago. Cash-flow from operating
activities reached Dollars 288.5m in the first nine months of 1992.
Third-quarter results include income of Dollars 36.4m, or 52 cents a share,
from the sale of 20 per cent of the company's interest in a Chilean copper
mine to Sumitomo of Japan.
Phelps Dodge Mining Company reported third-quarter operating earnings of
Dollars 113.6m, compared with Dollars 87.3m a year ago, reflecting a higher
average copper price and lower production costs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12459</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Growth in volume helps boost GTE
9%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GTE, the largest local telephone company in the US, yesterday posted a 9 per
cent advance in third-quarter earnings from continuing operations,
reflecting volume growth and strong gains in the mobile-cellular busi-ness.
For the three months to September 30, earnings rose to Dollars 500m, or 55
cents a share, from continuing businesses, compared with Dollars 457m, or 51
cents, a year earlier. Revenues and sales were 2 per cent higher at Dollars
4.97bn, against Dollars 4.85bn.
The figures, which met analysts' expectations, do not include GTE's
electrical products operations it sold in the third quarter in two separate
deals valued at Dollars 1.1bn.
Operating income from the group's local telephone operations rose 7 per cent
to Dollars 1.08bn. Revenues increased 2 per cent to Dollars 3.99bn, helped
by a 7.7 per cent annual rise in usage of the company's local network for
long-distance calling and a 3.6 per cent annual increase in access lines.
These increases, however, were partly offset by lower tariffs charged to
long-distance carriers for access to its local network.
Operating income from GTE's cellular telephone business climbed to Dollars
65m from Dollars 32m on revenues which rose 5 per cent to Dollars 980m from
Dollars 935m.
The number of new customers rose about 34 per cent, including 57,000 in the
quarter, bringing the total to 977,000 from 727,000 a year earlier. Average
revenues per subscriber fell slightly in the quarter, to Dollars 77 a month.
For the first nine months, earnings from continuing operations advanced to
Dollars 1.37bn, or Dollars 1.51, against Dollars 1.05bn, or Dollars 1.16,
last year, when it took a net charge of Dollars 204m, or 12 cents a share,
related to last year's Dollars 6bn merger with telecommunications group
Contel.
Stripping out last year's one-time charge, earnings per share from
continuing operations rose 9 per cent in the first nine months. Revenues and
sales were up at Dollars 14.85bn from Dollars 14.39bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12460</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Laidlaw plans Italian purchase
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LAIDLAW, the North American waste services and school bus operator, is about
to make a direct investment in Europe by acquiring a mid-sized Italian waste
technology company.
Laidlaw said yesterday the company would not be identified until its
employees and customers had been told of the takeover. The Italian concern
has annual sales of Dollars 40m to Dollars 50m and specialises in hazardous
waste treatment.
Laidlaw expects to use the Italian company's expertise in its US and
Canadian operations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12461</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: New chip from Intel to carry
name not number
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INTEL'S fifth generation of microprocessor chips, to be launched early next
year, will carry a new name instead of a number.
The US company has registered the name 'Pentium' as a trademark to prevent
competitors using it.
Intel's current products are called the 386 and the 486, following a
numbering convention the company has developed over the course of several
years.
'The natural course would be to call this chip the 586,' said Mr Andrew
Grove, Intel president and chief executive. 'Unfortunately, we may not able
to trademark those numbers.'
Intel lost a legal battle with rival Advanced Micro Devices last year to
protect its numbering system.
'That means that any company might call any chip a 586, even if it doesn't
measure up to the real thing.'
Pentium will be the 'brains' of the next generation of personal computers.
'It represents the next advance in performance - running software two to
three times faster than today's 486 PCs,' said Mr Grove.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12462</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: Compaq faces 'additional
challenge' from IBM PC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
COMPAQ'S third-quarter sales rose by 50 per cent to Dollars 1.06bn, from
Dollars 709m in the same period last year, in stark contrast to IBM's
'substantial decline' in PC sales, reported last week.
Compaq's net income for the quarter was Dollars 49m, or 61 cents per share,
compared with a net loss of Dollars 70m in the third quarter of 1991 when
the company took a pre-tax restructuring charge of Dollars 135m.
'Compaq shipped worldwide a record number of PCs in the third quarter,
including over 200,000 in September alone, yet we entered the fourth quarter
with a sizeable backlog,' said Mr Pfeiffer.
'We are getting much better at forecasting demand,' he added, 'and expect to
begin meeting current demand on most products during the fourth quarter.'
'Despite our continuing market share gains, Compaq is fully aware of the
fiercely competitive market that lies ahead and we are committed to take
decisive and timely actions necessary to ensure continued success,' said Mr
Eckhard Pfeiffer, Compaq president and chief executive.
IBM's launch of its new ValuePoint range of PCs yesterday, with prices for
fully configured systems including a colour monitor starting at Dollars
1,299, 'is clearly an additional challenge,' Mr Pfeiffer acknowledged.
'IBM is flexing its muscles. 'Big Blue' has made a lot of changes by giving
its PC unit autonomy and unburdening it from corporate overheads, but it
remains to be seen how efficient they can be,' he said.
Compaq's own drive to reduce costs led to a workforce reduction of 1,000,
announced earlier this month. Restructuring and other special charges
associated with the job cuts, totalling Dollars 85m, were reflected in the
third-quarter results. The charges were offset by a gain of around Dollars
86m on the sale of an equity interest in Conner Peripherals.
On Monday, Compaq lowered US prices on several of its popular desktop and
notebook personal computers in advance of IBM's anti-cipated ValuePoint
product introductions.
'This action is another example of our resolve to remain an aggressive cost
leader, coupled with PC technology and customer support leadership,' Mr
Pfeiffer said.
IBM also said, however, that it planned to match price cuts by competitors
and indeed the company adjusted the prices of its new ValuePoint products on
the eve of their introduction in response to Compaq's price cuts.
For the first nine months of 1992, Compaq reported net income of Dollars
124m, or Dollars 1.48 per share, compared with Dollars 64m, or 72 cents per
share, last year. Sales advanced to Dollars 2.7bn from Dollars 2.4bn in the
same period last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12463</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / International Company News: LSI Logic reverses into loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LSI LOGIC, the US semiconductor manufacturer, suffered third-quarter losses
after Dollars 102m restructuring charges for the closure of its German
production plant and a refocusing of its product lines.
Net losses for the quarter were Dollars 111m, or Dollars 2.51 per share,
compared with a net profit of Dollars 804,000, or 2 cents a share, in the
third quarter last year.
Excluding the results of the charge, the operating loss in the quarter was
Dollars 3m, compared with an operating profit of Dollars 4m in the third
quarter a year ago. Including the restructuring charge, the operating loss
in the third quarter was Dollars 105m.
Revenues in the third quarter were Dollars 154m, down nearly 11 per cent
from Dollars 172m a year ago.
Last month, LSI Logic announced it would accelerate the phasing out of older
manufacturing capacity in the US and Germany, and emphasise higher
value-added products. including application-specific integrated circuits
(Asic).
The growth in third quarter revenues over the prior second quarter reversed
a string of four consecutive quarterly declines.
The net loss for the nine months was Dollars 117m, or Dollars 2.63 per
share, compared with a net profit of Dollars 7m, or 17 cents a share, in the
same period last year. Revenues were Dollars 456m, down nearly 14.5 per cent
from Dollars 534m a year ago.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12464</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Recession chills Green parties: A decline in political
fortunes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MARSH and WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DEATH in peculiarly macabre circumstances of two leading personalities
from the German Green movement comes at a highly difficult moment for
Europe's ecology parties.
The waif-like figure of Ms Petra Kelly - sympathetic, mercurial, articulate
and neurotic - became an early symbol of the Greens' Europe-wide potency as
the movement picked up momentum in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Her demise, together with that of her companion, Mr Gert Bastian, coincides
with a decline in the Greens' political fortunes in most countries across
the continent. There is no shortage of awareness of the importance of
environmental issues, registered in the membership figures of organisations
like Greenpeace and Friends of the Earth. Greenpeace's German organisation
has 700,000 members - roughly 20 times as many as the German Greens.
But the environmental movement in most European countries is weathering a
crisis. Not only has fractiousness replaced cohesion as the main political
hallmark of many Green parties, the economic downturn has cast a
considerable pall over efforts to make Green issues a government priority.
Mr Jonathon Porritt, one of Britain's best-known environment campaigners,
said last month that he would cease to play an active role in the Green
party. Paying tribute yesterday to Ms Kelly's importance in building up the
Greens' international reputation, he pointed to the 'central paradox' of the
movement. 'It flourishes only when unsustainable economic growth also
flourishes. If awareness, activity and commitment depend on policies which
end up destroying the earth, we will have to think of ways of countering
that.'
Ms Kelly was a folk heroine of the west German Greens' political upsurge up
to the mid-1980s.
She imparted life and energy to environmental ideas which, in many cases,
have permeated the policies of mainstream parties throughout the continent.
Commenting on Ms Kelly's drive well beyond Germany's borders, Mr Gerd
Leipold, disarmament co-ordinator of Greenpeace International, and a former
head of Greenpeace Germany, said yesterday, 'Everyone was impressed and a
bit frightened by her activities. She was very active, if not hyperactive.'
Yet Ms Kelly became progressively disillusioned with the Greens' standing in
Germany and abroad during the past few years.
As long ago as 1987, she voiced deep discontent that the party had developed
into 'a typical German party' beset by theological feuding and factional
rivalry. In the December 1990 unified German elections, the Greens lost
their representation in the Bundestag.
In the past two years, Ms Kelly was particularly mortified by the negative
effects of reunification on former members of the dissident movement in
eastern Germany.
Ironically, it has been France - long disdained by the German Greens as a
place where environmental issues were given minimal hearing - where the
movement has lately received its strongest international boost.
In last March's regional elections, 18 per cent of the electorate voted for
France's two ecology parties, the Verts, headed by Antoine Waechter, a
European MP from Alsace, and Generation Ecologie (GE) headed by Mr Brice
Lalonde, a former environment minister in the Socialist government.
The vote made them the third largest political force in France after the
Socialists and the right, and gave the Verts the first chairmanship of a
regional council.
In Germany, if federal elections were held tomorrow, the Greens would
probably re-enter parliament as a result of protest votes triggered by the
economic and social consequences of unification.
But the thought is likely to be of little consolation to Green party
activists who, across much of Europe, seem simply to have lost their way.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12465</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Yeltsin 'yielding to right': Influence of conservative
forces growing in Moscow
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A SENIOR Russian government official yesterday told a group of western
correspondents he feared that President Boris Yeltsin was under the
influence of conservative forces and was signing decrees contradicting the
course of economic reform he himself had charted.
The official, who is closely associated with the economic reform team
brought into government a year ago by Mr Yegor Gaidar, the acting prime
minister, said at least four ministers were likely to be dropped from the
cabinet in favour of conservative figures. He named Mr Andrei Nechaev, the
economics minister and Mr Peter Aven, the foreign trade minister, both
criticised by Mr Yeltsin in a speech to the Russian parliament two weeks ago
for ineffective work.
This is the second warning in the past few days issued by senior figures to
foreign reporters about the growing strength of a conservative, or
reactionary, movement. The first, last Friday, was backed by five officials
of ministerial or presidential adviser rank, including Mr Andrei Kozyrev,
the foreign minister and Mr Anatoly Chubais, a deputy prime minister in
charge of privatisation.
Yesterday's warning was made on condition that the official - a deputy
minister - was not personally identified. In contrast to the warnings made
by the ministerial group, he claimed Mr Yeltsin was going along with
pressure to change course, rather than being threatened by it. This view
accords with the impression made by Mr Yeltsin in parliament, when he told
the government not to rely only on its own ideas for economic reform and
dwelt on the many mistakes made by it.
The official pointed to Mr Yeltsin's signing yesterday of a decree creating
one single joint stock company controlling all of the Russian gas industry.
The official said the signing of the decree, which could not be confirmed by
the president's office last night, ran directly counter to government policy
to break the industry into three or four companies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12466</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Petra Kelly shot dead by partner, police believe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BONN'S political establishment has been shocked by the deaths of Ms Petra
Kelly and Mr Gert Bastian, founder figures in Germany's Green party and
peace movement in the 1980s. The two were found shot dead at home in Bonn,
almost three weeks after they were last seen or spoken to.
Police investigators said yesterday that Ms Kelly, 44, co-founder of the
Greens and one of its first MPs in 1983, had been shot by Mr Bastian, 69,
who had then committed suicide. No message was found.
Mr Bastian, a former major-general in the Bundeswehr, was himself a leading
figure in the German peace movement, having retired early from the army in
1980 in protest at the deployment of cruise missiles. He was a curious
political convert, having once been a member of the right-wing Christian
Social Union, latterly belonging to the international organisation 'Generals
for Peace'.
Both had become alienated from the mainstream of the Greens, disillusioned
with its bickering and faction-fighting.
The extent to which Ms Kelly and Mr Bastian had withdrawn from the public
eye was underlined by the length of time before their partially decomposed
bodies were discovered on Monday night.
Colleagues in the Green party said Ms Kelly had been depressed by the
political situation in Germany, in particular with the attacks on
asylum-seekers, and the mood of hostility to foreigners. However, they did
not believe depression was enough to explain suicide.
She was a product of the anti-Vietnam war movement in the US, where she
studied in the 1960s, and brought something of that movement to the founding
of the Greens. She was an extrovert and a charismatic speaker, at ease with
political leaders, and an important source of encouragement for protest
movements in former East Germany.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12467</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / EC tries to defuse Danube dispute
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS DENTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUDAPEST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Community has stepped in to avert confrontation between Hungary
and Slovakia over the damming of the river Danube. The move comes as
Slovakian constructors are poised to block and divert the Danube river into
the controversial Gabcikovo power plant against furious Hungarian
opposition.
The EC has invited Slovak and Hungarian negotiators to meet today in
Brussels to try to hammer out a compromise.
The EC's initiative in hosting last-minute talks put on hold Slovakia's plan
to begin damming the river yesterday but the delay represents only a stay of
execution and the chances for agreement remain slim. The EC environment
commissioner, Mr Karel Van Miert, had urged Slovakia to avoid taking an
irreversible step to complete the project before negotiations but made no
further intervention.
Both sides have painted themselves into a corner, with Budapest claiming
that the 40km diversion of the Danube, its northern border, would be an
environmental catastrophe and territorial violation. Slovakia's position is
equally hard, because of the economic cost of abandoning the project.
The dispute has become entangled with tensions over the 800,000 Hungarian
minority in Slovakia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12468</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Russian parliament restates claim to ownership of Izvestia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Russia's conservative parliament renewed its challenge to the authority of
President Yeltsin yesterday, restating a disputed claim to ownership of the
influential newspaper, Izvestia, Reuter reports from Moscow. Mr Yeltsin
issued a decree in September establishing Izvestia as a separate legal
entity under state control to keep it out of the hands of parliament, where
opponents of radical market reforms are in the majority.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12469</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Former foes to discuss keeping the peace
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WHITE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GLENEAGLES
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
COLLABORATION on military peacekeeping operations between Nato and former
Warsaw Pact countries is to be discussed by defence ministers early next
year.
Nato ministers backed a German proposal made at a meeting yesterday of the
Nato nuclear planning group. They also sought to ensure that France  - which
stands outside Nato's military organisation - should be fully involved in
allied peacekeeping initiatives.
Britain, the US and other allies yesterday put forward concrete proposals to
help Nato prepare for peacekeeping operations, such as in former Yugoslavia.
Mr Volker Ruhe, the German defence minister, said Bonn was willing to
increase its logistical support for humanitarian relief efforts in former
Yugoslavia, but would not send soldiers.
The alliance decided in June that troops and equipment could be used for
peacekeeping outside Nato territory. So far there have been no requests from
the Conference on Security and Co-operation in Europe for such units.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12470</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Worries over Yeltsin's path: Influence of conservative
forces growing in Moscow
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A SENIOR Russian government official yesterday told a group of western
correspondents he feared that President Boris Yeltsin was under the
influence of conservative forces and was signing decrees contradicting the
course of economic reform he himself had charted.
The official, who is closely associated with the economic reform team
brought into government a year ago by Mr Yegor Gaidar, the acting prime
minister, said at least four ministers were likely to be dropped from the
cabinet in favour of conservative figures. He named Mr Andrei Nechaev, the
economics minister and Mr Peter Aven, the foreign trade minister, both
criticised by Mr Yeltsin in a speech to the Russian parliament two weeks ago
for ineffective work.
This is the second warning in the past few days issued by senior figures to
foreign reporters about the growing strength of a conservative, or
reactionary, movement. The first, last Friday evening, was backed by five
officials of ministerial or presidential adviser rank, including Mr Andrei
Kozyrev, the foreign minister and Mr Anatoly Chubais, a deputy prime
minister in charge of privatisation.
Yesterday's warning was made on condition that the official - a deputy
minister - was not personally identified. In contrast to the warnings made
by the ministerial group, he claimed Mr Yeltsin was going along with
pressure to change course, rather than being threatened by it. This view
accords with the impression made by Mr Yeltsin in parliament, when he told
the government not to rely only on its own ideas for economic reform and
dwelt on the many mistakes made by it.
The official pointed to Mr Yeltsin's signing yesterday of a decree creating
one single joint stock company controlling all of the Russian gas industry.
This corporation would, he said, exercise a more direct control over the
various gas enterprises than the present state body, Gasprom.
The official said the signing of the decree, which could not be confirmed by
the president's office last night, ran directly counter to government policy
to break the industry into three or four companies.
The industry, and other sectors of the crucial energy complex, would pass to
the control of industrial managers who would 'exploit the consumers who are
not organised as a political force', he said. 'The President is now open to
proposals of this kind. Sometimes these proposals come with threats to stop
production if they are not carried through.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12471</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / EC's VAT rate agreement wins mixed reception
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE formal accord on EC-wide VAT rates and excise duties received a mixed
reception yesterday from European business.
EC finance ministers agreed a deal late on Monday night in Luxembourg, after
clearing the final hurdle to unanimous approval - a dispute between Britain
and Spain about the duty applied to sherry in the UK. They had come close to
agreement in July, but were thwarted by the objections of some member states
to specific aspects of the deal.
The package of eight directives will fix a legally binding minimum VAT rate
of 15 per cent across the Community until 1996, and minimum duties on a
range of other products including tobacco, alcohol and mineral oils.
Earlier legislation imposed a new transitional VAT system on the Community
which will allow member states to do away with the 60m or so forms filled in
annually at borders.
Ministers and the European Commission welcomed the accord as a great step
towards a border-free single market after January 1 1993, although it will
leave rates in Europe virtually unchanged.
But Mr Jean-Yves Muylle of Unice, the pan-European employers' confederation,
said: 'The agreement is certainly a good thing, but we are still concerned
by the system which should come into force on January 1 1993.' Unice
believes the transitional system will impose undue administrative burdens on
business.
Speaking in Edinburgh, Mr Tim Jackson, of the EC Association of Alcohol and
Spirit Drinks Producers, said the deal would 'do nothing to harmonise the
widely differing excise rates levied on spirits throughout the EC' or to
reduce distortion of competition between spirits and other alcoholic drinks,
such as beer and wine.
Europia, the petroleum industry body, warned that differing excise duties on
products such as heating oil might encourage cross-border fraud. 'Legally
everything is clear, but fraudsters are very intelligent and (the deal) does
offer every opportunity for fraud,' said Mr Gilbert Portal, secretary
general of the association.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12472</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Overland relief convoys suspended by UN: Tudjman and Cosic
appeal for end to conflict in Bosnia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCES WILLIAMS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE United Nations refugee agency said yesterday it had been forced to
suspend relief convoys along the only all-weather road into Bosnia because
uncontrolled 'warlords' were deliberately targeting aid trucks.
The suspension came as President Franjo Tudjman of Croatia and President
Dobrica Cosic of the rump Yugoslavia urged the warring parties in
Bosnia-Hercegovina to work for an end to the fighting and for an accord on a
new constitution for the republic.
The call was in a joint statement made last night at the international peace
talks in Geneva, under the chairmanship of Mr Cyrus Vance and Lord Owen. The
wording of the statement left little doubt the two presidents were agreed in
opposition to arguments by Bosnia's Moslem-led government that the republic
should not be divided along ethnic lines.
The presidents also agreed new steps towards normalising relations between
their two states following war in the second half of last year. Lord Owen
said the declaration was another 'building block' in the drive to construct
a peaceful edifice covering all the republics of former Yugoslavia.
A close aide to President Alija Izetbegovic of Bosnia, who was also at the
Geneva talks, discounted a claim on Croatian radio that the Bosnian leader
had been toppled during his absence by a pro-Serb faction. 'We hear a lot of
these claims,' the aide said. 'Most of them are spread by people who have
their own reasons to make trouble.' He said the president was heading back
to Sarajevo today.
The suspension of relief convoys leaves the Sarajevo airlift as the only
means of transporting humanitarian supplies to the Bosnian capital and
central Bosnia-Hercegovina, where more than 750,000 people face starvation
and freezing temperatures this winter.
Mrs Sadako Ogata, UN High Commissioner for Refugees, said the shelling of
two convoys on the Mostar-Sarajevo road last Friday was yet another example
of the failure of the parties to the conflict to live up to their
commitments.
UNHCR officials estimate they need to provide 9,230 tonnes of food and other
supplies to 1.6m Bosnians each week in winter. Last week it delivered just
1,130 tonnes.
Mr Cedric Thornberry, director of civil affairs with the UN protection force
(Unprofor) in ex-Yugoslavia, said in Geneva yesterday the situation in
Bosnia was 'becoming quite desperate, with hundreds of thousands of people
displaced from their homes, many of them wandering the roads and trying to
survive in the hills'.
General Satish Nambiar, the Unprofor commander, said the extra 6,000 or so
UN troops promised to escort aid convoys and open roads would be deployed by
mid-November.
Gen Nambiar also said Unprofor would protest to the Bosnian Serb leadership
over an incident yesterday when its commander in Sarajevo and three aides
were held briefly at gunpoint at a checkpoint.
Gen Nambiar confirmed that the withdrawal of Yugoslav forces from the
Prevlaca peninsula in Croatia had been completed.
Blind eye, Page 19
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12473</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Brussels deal to curb toxic waste trade
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GARDNER and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LUXEMBOURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EC environment ministers yesterday decided that member states will have the
right to ban imports of hazardous waste for disposal, opening up an
agreement to regulate trade in toxic waste after two years hard negotiating.
The agreement in principle was made possible after the European Commission
took the rare step of changing the legal basis of the regulation from the
internal market and trade provisions in the EC treaty to its environment
clauses.
The legal switch established that the environment took precedence over the
free circulation of goods demanded by the single market, in what EC
environment commissioner Karel Van Miert nevertheless stressed was 'a unique
case'. Non-radioactive toxic waste had hitherto been characterised by
European Court jurisprudence as a tradeable good.
Ms Segolene Royal, the French environment minister, hailed yesterday's
decision as 'one of the applications of the Maastricht treaty, which states
that the environment takes precedence over commercial policy'.
The regulation, which should come into effect in September 1994, reinforces
the principle that waste should be dealt with as close as possible to the
point of production.
Mr Van Miert is fighting hard inside the Commission to ensure that
environment policy does not become a casualty of subsidiarity.
Ministers also agreed to propose controls on a chemical believed to eat the
ozone layer faster than other substances the world is already trying to
eliminate, Reuter reports.
Diplomats said the ministers decided that methyl bromide, used to drive
insects off farm land, should be added to the list of products targeted for
control or phase-out in the Montreal Convention on protection of the ozone
layer.
Green Sprouts, Page 18
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12474</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Italy seeks Ecu8bn stand-by EC loan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM and ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME, BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ITALY has asked for a special stand-by loan of Ecu8bn (Pounds 6.3bn) from
its European Community partners, but the EC is likely to impose strict
budgetary conditions before it agrees to the request.
The Italian government announced it had begun talks on a loan facility at
the beginning of the month. In asking for Ecu8bn, Italy has sought the
maximum funding possible from its Community partners to offset the loss of
reserves supporting the lira last month. The figure is considerably higher
than the Ecu5bn which had been mentioned unofficially.
Rome has indicated its willingness to accept EC conditions. Commission
officials said yesterday that in practice a maximum of Ecu10bn was available
to Italy under rules which allow the EC to help countries experiencing
balance of payments problems or adverse capital movements.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12475</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Italy asks EC for special stand-by loan of Ecu8bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM and ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME, BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ITALY has asked for a special stand-by loan of Ecu8bn (Pounds 6.3bn) from
its European Community partners, but the EC is likely to impose strict
budgetary conditions before it agrees to the request.
The Italian government announced it had begun talks on a loan facility at
the beginning of the month. In asking for Ecu8bn, Italy has sought the
maximum funding possible from its Community partners to offset the loss of
reserves supporting the lira last month. The figure is considerably higher
than the Ecu5bn which had been mentioned unofficially.
Rome has indicated its willingness to accept EC conditions. Commission
officials said yesterday that in practice a maximum of Ecu10bn was available
to Italy under rules which allow the EC to help countries experiencing
balance of payments problems or adverse capital movements. Under such rules,
the EC would go to the capital markets to raise the money, using its own
guarantees.
Commission officials confirmed yesterday that the quickest timetable for
approval would involve submitting the plan to the EC monetary committee -
made up of senior central bank and treasury officials - on November 16, and
to finance ministers a week later.
The loan is also likely to be conditioned by the timing of the approval of
the main measures in the 1993 Italian budget and a decision on when the lira
re-enters the European Monetary System, which it left with sterling on
September 17.
Greece is the only EC member to have applied for support under the 1988
rules, and received an Ecu2.2bn stabilisation loan in February 1991.
Foreign Minister Emilio Colombo, calling for rapid parliamentary approval of
the 1993 austerity budget, yesterday said the vote would determine Italy's
standing in the Community, Reuter adds from Rome.
'It is up to us Italians to decide whether we belong to the first, second,
third or fourth division of the EC - or whether we are out of the Community
altogether,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12476</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Bundesbank softens line on rate cuts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE German Bundesbank yesterday clearly softened its intractable stance on
lowering interest rates with the acknowledgement that international economic
conditions were an important factor in its policy decisions.
A speech by Mr Hans Tietmeyer, vice-president of the central bank, which
coincided with fresh Bundesbank manoeuvres to reduce short-term money market
rates, was widely read as a signal that key rates, including the
internationally important Lombard rate, could start falling soon.
Money supply growth was only one element in policy-making, Mr Tietmeyer told
banking students. 'But we know there are other factors, such as currency
inflows and the changed international competitive situation, which must be
considered at the same time.'
The Frankfurt Stock Exchange responded with sharp gains, and the DAX index
closed 32.48 points higher at 1,511.55, just below the day's high. Domestic
bond markets also improved on the news.
The relaxation of the bank's rigid attitude towards rates follows many
months of fruitless appeals from abroad for interest rate reductions to help
boost the international economy. But any cuts will be more closely related
to easing the economic difficulties now crowding in on Germany.
According to Mr Martin Hufner, chief economist at Bayerische Vereinsbank,
Germany is heading for a recession, with real falls in gross domestic
product in the second half of this year and the first half of 1993.
According to Mr Tietmeyer, recent moves by the Bundesbank demonstrated that
its attention was not fixed 'dogmatically and exclusively' on the M3 money
supply measure.
In recent weeks, influenced by changed competitive conditions - brought
about by the effective revaluation of the D-Mark against most European
monetary system currencies - it had steered overnight rates downwards.
They were now 1.5 percentage points lower than at the start of September.
Capital market rates of below 7.5 per cent were the lowest since late 1989,
he added.
But the revaluation is also damaging an export-based economy which was
already showing marked signs of strain. New orders for German industry have
fallen for six months in succession, and hopes of recovery abroad or at
least an improvement in domestic consumer demand have failed to materialise.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12477</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Heseltine broadens scope of energy review
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT voiced confidence last night that it had averted a House of
Commons defeat over the coal industry by broadening the scope of its review
of the industry to include a detailed analysis of Britain's long-term energy
needs.
The latest concessions, following a dramatic U-turn on Monday over the scale
of shutdowns, were unveiled by Mr Michael Hesel-tine, the trade and industry
secretary, to meet the demands of the remaining Conservative critics of the
programme.
After a series of meetings between Mr Heseltine and backbench MPs yesterday,
Mr John Major felt confident enough to state publicly that the government
would defeat a Labour motion calling for a complete moratorium on closures.
Mr Robin Cook, Labour's industry spokesman, responded to the new shift in
the government's position with a demand that it support the opposition's
motion to keep all the pits open pending an independent inquiry.
Labour was encouraged that a similar motion was approved by the House of
Lords last night, with the government being de-feated by 25 votes, but Tory
optimism about the outcome of tonight's Commons' vote was boosted when Mr
Winston Churchill, a leading rebel, said the policy had changed enough for
him to support the government.
As miners prepared to converge on Westminster to lobby MPs before today's
debate, Mr Cook also called for the resignation of Mr Heseltine after what
he termed the government's latest 'humiliating retreat'.
In exchanges earlier in the Commons with Mr John Smith, the Labour leader,
Mr Major said the fall in demand for coal from electricity generators meant
a substantial reduction in coal capacity was inevitable.
But in reference to the 21 mines covered by the government's moratorium, the
prime minister insisted subsequently he would keep an open mind while the
review continued. 'We are not closing the pits and we are not closing our
minds,' he said.
The widening in the scope of the government review was foreshadowed by Mr
Heseltine in meetings with Tory MPs designed to win over all but the most
die-hard critics of any pit closures. Mr Heseltine promised that the
analysis of the future of 21 threatened pits would be wide-ranging and open,
embracing a strategic analysis of Britain's energy requirements.
That pledge was reinforced by Lord Wakeham, the Lord Privy Seal, in the
House of Lords. The former energy secretary said that a broad range of
issues would be covered by the review - including the level of coal imports,
the relationship between electricity suppliers and the owners of gas
generation stations, and allegations that suppliers could abuse their market
positions.
Mr Heseltine had suggested previously that the study would be more narrowly
focused.
Pit losses challenged, Page 8
Parliament, Page 9
Clean coal technology, Page 16
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12478</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Major shifts economic policy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR last night unveiled a significant shift in economic policy to
give priority to growth and employment as his government sought to restore
its battered authority at Westminster.
After Mr Michael Heseltine, the trade and industry secretary, agreed to
widen the scope of his promised review of closures in the coal industry, the
prime minister signalled that he hoped for further cuts in British interest
rates.
With Conservative MPs deeply gloomy about the economic outlook and the
Treasury forecasting no early end to the recession, Mr Major said the
government intended to build a strategy for growth and jobs. In an interview
with ITN after the new approach was unveiled by Downing Street, Mr Major
said: 'A strategy for growth is what we need; a strategy for growth is what
we are going to have.'
Earlier he indicated that international deflationary pressures should allow
borrowing costs to drop below the present 8 per cent level without risking
an upsurge in inflation. The government would not be indifferent to the
level of the pound on the foreign exchange markets but it had no specific
target.
Mr Major told colleagues that he wanted an 'early, strong but sustainable'
recovery which would take advantage of the competitive edge provided by
sterling's devaluation, while keeping inflation low.
But he also warned colleagues that next month's Autumn Statement would
foreshadow the tightest squeeze on public sector pay in recent memory to
convince financial markets that the government remained serious about
containing the pace of price rises.
The prime minister said he was determined that the sharp cuts in most
Whitehall spending programmes needed to meet the Treasury's overall spending
targets should not fall on projects which had a direct impact on 'jobs and
growth'. That implies that increases in public sector pay will be held below
2 per cent and might be frozen.
He indicated that he wanted the government to offset the inevitable
reductions in some capital spending programmes by scrapping Whitehall rules
inhibiting private sector involvement in large infrastructure projects.
One suggestion last night was that reductions, for example, in the
Department of Transport's road-building programme could be matched by a
drive to make it much easier to allow the private sector to build toll
roads.
Mr Major's stance - signalled by Downing Street and later confirmed in a
series of television interviews - marks the beginning of a determined
attempt to restore his grip on the Tory party at Westminster.
Senior ministers conceded that sterling's ignominious exit from the European
exchange rate mechanism last month and this week's U-turn over coal had
severely weakened the government's - and the prime minister's  - authority.
Mr Major had now responded to the unease among Conservative MPs and in the
country at large by signalling that his first priority was an end to the
recession.
He also made it clear that on one issue - his absolute determination to
ratify the Maastricht treaty - he was not prepared to give any ground to his
critics on the Conservative backbenches.
The Maastricht bill is scheduled to return to the House of Commons next
month and Mr Major told colleagues: 'I think people would be well-advised to
accept that I say what I mean on the subject of European policy. If people
don't trust me, they had better find someone they do trust.'
Mr Major's new emphasis on economic growth rather than the defeat of
inflation was seen at Westminster as evidence that the threatened rebellion
by Conservative MPs over the government's original coal closure plan
reflected much deeper unease over the depths of the recession.
With the public spending cuts under consideration in the run-up to the
Autumn Statement threatening much larger job losses in both the public and
private sectors, Mr Major was concerned to stress that his commitment was to
economic recovery.
But his decision to emphasise that priority appeared also to mark a more
fundamental re-assessment by the Treasury of the balance of risks in
policy-making after the latest batch of gloomy economic news.
Despite the sharp devaluation of the pound since last month and the
accompanying two-point reduction in interest rates, the government now
appears convinced that further deflation poses a greater risk than an
upsurge in inflation.
Major in strongest denial yet on ERM, Page 9
Rebels join Smith in attack over Europe, Page 9
Editorial Comment, Page 18
Observer, Page 19
Letters, Page 19
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12479</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Stock and Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
STOCK MARKET INDICES
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100:                             2,617.0              (+54.8)
Yield                                     4.60
FT-SE Eurotrack 100                   1,021.70             (+20.70)
FT-A All-Share                        1,229.53              (+1.9%)
FT-A World Index                        136.77              (-0.4%)
Nikkei                               16,987.66             (+83.85)
New York:
Dow Jones Ind Ave                     3,186.02              (-2.43)
S&amp;P Composite                           415.48               (+0.5)
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
US CLOSING RATES
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
Federal Funds:                        2 13/16%            (3 1/16%)
3-mo Treas Bills: Yld                   3.085%             (3.023%)
Long Bond                              95 9/32            (96 3/16)
Yield                                   7.647%             (7.567%)
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
3-mo Interbank                        7 13/16%                 (8%)
Liffe long gilt future:           Dec 98 27/32       (Dec 97 13/16)
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
NORTH SEA OIL (Argus)
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
Brent 15-day (Dec)               dollars 20.75             (20.775)
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
Gold
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
New York Comex (Oct)             dollars 343.8              (342.7)
London                          dollars 343.55             (342.95)
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
STERLING
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
New York:
Dollars                                1.62325              (1.625)
London:
Dollars                                 1.6255              (1.632)
DM                                        2.47               (2.42)
FFr                                       8.38               (8.21)
SFr                                     2.2125              (2.155)
Y                                       198.25              (195.5)
Pound Index                               80.2               (79.5)
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
DOLLAR
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
New York:
DM                                      1.5184             (1.5012)
FFr                                      5.149               (5.09)
SFr                                     1.3575              (1.343)
Y                                       122.45              (120.5)
London:
DM                                      1.5195             (1.4835)
FFr                                      5.155               (5.03)
SFr                                     1.3605             (1.3215)
Y                                       121.95             (119.75)
Dollar Index                              62.9               (62.1)
Tokyo open:                           Y 122.34
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12480</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World News in Brief: Canadians retaliate over flag
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
US President George Bush apologised to Canada for the displaying of the
Canadian flag upside down during a World Series baseball game. The scene was
televised across Canada, where entrepreneurs were yesterday doing a roaring
trade selling upside-down US flags.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12481</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / World News in Brief: TV scientist Magnus Pyke dies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TV scientist Dr Magnus Pyke has died aged 83. Dr Pyke, known for his
extravagant gesticulations and lively chatter, presented the programme Don't
Ask Me in the 1970s and wrote more than 20 books in an attempt to make
science more understandable. He leaves two children.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12482</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Borrowing rule change for housing market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MEASURES to revive the deeply depressed housing market were announced by the
government yesterday, aimed at helping people faced with mortgages larger
than the value of their homes.
The changes follow weeks of talks between building societies, the Treasury
and the Building Societies Commission, the industry watchdog.
Home owners, many of whom are unable to move because their properties are
worth less than their mortgages, will now be allowed to borrow up to Pounds
25,000 in unsecured finance from their building societies to use as top-up
finance. Until now building societies have been unable to lend more than
Pounds 10,000 without a property as security.
The government is also easing the conditions under which mortgage customers
can obtain income tax relief if they move home. Mortgage interest relief
will continue to be claimable when a home owner moves to another property
but retains the original mortgage.
The changes will affect millions of homeowners whose houses have fallen
sharply in value since they bought them because of the downturn in the
housing market.
Building societies and insurance companies will now have to hold talks to
see how these moves affect mortgage indemnity cover, the insurance which
protects the top 10 or 15 per cent of the loan if the borrower gets into
difficulties.
The changes were announced by Mr Anthony Nelson, economic secretary to the
Treasury, who said they would provide a 'modest but useful stimulus' for the
housing market.
Halifax Building Society, the largest UK mortgage lender, said the new
measures were unlikely to have much impact. 'Today's announcement will be
modest in its effect and don't expect it to produce any significant
results,' a spokeswoman said.
Mr John Wriglesworth, housing market analyst at the City stockbrokers UBS
Phillips &amp; Drew, denounced the proposals. He pointed out that there seemed
to be little demand for top-up loans from Abbey National and the clearing
banks for people with so-called negative equity.
Many large building societies are currently battling to maintain their
capital strength and profitability despite a large number of bad debts. Mr
Wriglesworth said he thought it unlikely that some building societies would
risk weakening their capital strength by engaging in more unsecured lending.
C&amp;G mortgage rate cut, Page 9
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12483</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Markets rise on signals from Bundesbank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN and CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE PROSPECT of a fall in Germany's official interest rates yesterday
triggered sharp upward movements in European equity markets, sterling and
the dollar.
Operators in international financial markets seized on moves by the
Bundesbank and a report in a leading German newspaper pointing to lower
borrowing costs by the year-end as evidence that the German central bank was
relaxing policy in response to a sharp slowdown in the German and
international economies.
Sterling and the dollar gained strongly in London, with the pound advancing
by 5 pfennigs against the D-Mark to DM2.47 and the dollar gaining 3 1/2
pfennigs to DM1.5195. In late New York trading the pound was quoted at
DM2.4656 and the dollar at DM1.5184. When Far Eastern markets opened today,
the pound was quoted at DM2.4585 and the dollar at DM1.5135.
Equities in London also bounded ahead, with the FT-SE 100 index closing just
below its day's high at 2,617, up 54.8, on hopes of lower UK interest rates.
In Frankfurt, all but one of the 30 shares in the Dax index moved ahead for
it to close 32.48 or 2.2 per cent higher at 1,511.55, just below the day's
high. Equities in France posted still stronger gains, with the CAC 40 index
closing 52.60 or 3.1 per cent higher at 1,731.26.
Yesterday's surge of confidence in European markets followed a report in the
Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung that the Bundesbank had told German bankers
it wanted lower interest rates by the end of the year.
The impression that the German authorities were encouraging lower rates was
then reinforced by news that the Bundesbank was changing its method of
supplying funds to the domestic money market. It said it would provide money
to the market for the next 14 days by a variable rate repurchase agreement
to replace fixed rate agreements expiring today.
Markets were further heartened by a statement from Mr Hans Tietmeyer,
Bundesbank vice-president, that growth in the M3 measure of money supply was
not the be-all and end-all of monetary policy. 'We know there are other
factors, such as currency inflows and the changed international competitive
situation, which must be considered at the same time,' he said.
According to Mr George Magnus, international economist of Warburg Securities
in London, yesterday's events were 'an exciting development' and
'confirmation that some changes in Bundesbank policy are afoot'.
Mr Gerry Holtham, chief economist of Lehman Brothers in London, was less
certain. He said the markets had probably over-interpreted the Bundesbank's
actions and warned against expecting too sharp a fall in German rates.
The German domestic money market responded to yesterday's signals by
aggressively pushing down the cost of borrowing over the months ahead.
Mr Holtham said that by late yesterday the market was discounting a fall in
German money market rates from 8.9 per cent to around 8.5 per cent in three
months and a still steeper fall to around 7.8 per cent in six months' time.
The Bundesbank's short-term intentions will be clear today when it fixes the
rate at which it lends to the banks. It is also due to release the figures
for money supply growth in September.
Some bankers in Frankfurt suggested that the central bank initially would
allow only a gradual fall in rates. But there was widespread agreement that
the ground was being prepared for eventual cuts in the discount and Lombard
rates from their respective levels of 8.25 per cent and 9.5 per cent set
last month.
The recent effective revaluation of the D-Mark has exacerbated Germany's
mounting economic difficulties by reducing the competitiveness of its export
industries, notably the heavy plant and vehicle manufacturers which
traditionally export half their output.
Mr Tietmeyer's remarks about M3 may also have been designed to soften the
impact on financial markets of a sharp increase in money supply following
the massive speculative inflows during last month's currency crisis.
Bundesbank softens line on rate cuts, Page 2
Loans fall signals deeper gloom, Page 9
Sterling fall forces shift in Ford pricing, Page 10
Lex, Page 20
International capital markets, Page 29
Currencies, Page 31
World stocks, Page 37
London stocks, Page 40
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12484</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Germany determined not to build Eurofighter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WHITE, Defence Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY stood firm yesterday in its determination to scrap the four-nation
European Fighter Aircraft project in spite of industry estimates that
production costs could be cut by 20 per cent.
Mr Volker Ruhe, German defence minister, dismissed suggestions by his UK
counterpart, Mr Malcolm Rifkind, that Bonn might still opt for a revised
version of the Pounds 20bn EFA. 'The aircraft will not be built,' he said.
Bonn wants the other partners to agree to switch EFA funding to a new
aircraft, and in the meantime to slow down development work. But Mr Ruhe
made clear last night he was not seeking to build an aircraft without
Britain.
Budget pressures in all four countries were working in favour of Germany's
arguments, he said, adding: 'I don't think the streets of Birmingham are
plated with gold and silver.'
He questioned whether Britain's coalminers would understand the need for
continuing the EFA project.
Mr Ruhe and Mr Rifkind avoided the subject when they met for breakfast
before a Nato ministerial meeting yesterday at Gleneagles, in Tayside,
Scotland.
The industrial consortium developing the aircraft sent its confidential
study on possible cost savings to the four governments at the end of last
week.
Mr Rifkind, describing the study as 'most encouraging', said it indicated
that costs could be lowered by some 12 per cent by rationalising production
arrangements. Removing some of the aircraft's capabilities could increase
this to 20 per cent, he said. UK industry representatives said the savings
could go as high as 30 per cent.
Spain, the junior partner alongside Germany, Britain and Italy, indicated it
would support going ahead on the basis of a 30 per cent reduction.
However, Mr Julian Garcia Vargas, its defence minister, said production
would need to be stretched out because of budgetary constraints. Spain said
last week it was committed to keeping a four-nation programme and wanted to
make the most of the Pounds 5bn already invested in EFA. But production
should be delayed 'by some years'.
Defence ministers are expected to decide on the future of the project in
early December.
The German minister said yesterday he had not seen the results of the
industrial study, but that
there were 'differences of conception' with Britain, especially over the
need for a fighter to undertake overseas missions. Germany sought 'a
European fighter, not a world fighter', he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12485</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / Heseltine broadens energy review: Major tries to restore
authority by rebalancing economic policy towards recovery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT was confi-dent last night that it had headed off a House of
Commons defeat over coal closures by broadening the scope of its planned
review to include a detailed analysis of Britain's long-term energy
requirements.
The latest concessions to Conservative critics came as Mr John Major
signalled a drive to restore his battered authority at Westminster by
rebalancing his economic policy to emphasise the priority of recovery.
The prime minister told colleagues he was willing to respond to the depth of
the recession with further cuts in interest rates if public spending was
kept under control. But he made clear that on one issue - his determination
to ratify the Maastricht treaty - he was not prepared to give any ground to
his critics on the Conservative backbenches.
With Conservative MPs deeply gloomy about the economic outlook, Mr Major
indicated that international deflationary pressures might allow interest
rates to drop below the 8 per cent mark without risking an upsurge in
inflation.
But he also warned that next month's autumn economic statement must see the
tightest squeeze on public sector pay in recent memory if the Treasury was
to convince financial markets that it remained serious about containing the
pace of price rises.
The prime minister is said to be determined that the sharp cuts in most
Whitehall spending programmes needed to meet the Treasury's targets should
not fall on projects which have a direct impact on 'jobs and growth'. That
implies that increases in public sector pay will be below 2 per cent and
might be frozen.
He has also indicated that he wants the government to offset the inevitable
reductions in some capital spending programmes by scrapping Whitehall rules
which inhibit private sector involvement in large-scale infrastructure
projects. One suggestion last night was that reductions in the Department of
Transport's road-building programme could be matched by a drive to make it
much easier to allow the private sector to build toll roads.
Mr Major's decision to rebalance his economic policy came as senior
ministers engaged in a frantic effort to restore discipline among Tory MPs
after the government's embarrassing U-turn over the bulk of its coal closure
programme. The latest concessions on the pit review were foreshadowed by Mr
Michael Heseltine, trade and industry secretary, in meetings with Tory MPs
designed to ensure their support in today's Labour-sponsored debate on the
industry.
Mr Heseltine promised that the planned review of the future of 21 threatened
pits would be wide-ranging and open, embracing an strategic analysis of
Britain's energy requirements.
That pledge was reinforced by Lord Wakeham, Lord Privy Seal, who told the
House of Lords that a whole range of issues would be covered by the review -
including the level of coal imports, the relationship between electricity
suppliers and the owners of gas generation stations and allegations that
some suppliers were abusing their market positions.
Mr Heseltine had suggested previously that the review would be much more
narrowly focused on the viability of the threatened pits, but was forced to
give further ground to quell the disquiet among Conservative MPs.
After the latest concessions he received a public assurance that the
executive committee of the powerful backbench 1922 committee would now urge
all Tory MPs to back the government - and a tacit acknowledgement that his
own cabinet position was now secure.
Mr Major emphasised the government's willingness to listen to its critics
during clashes in the House of Commons with Mr John Smith, the Labour
leader.
He stressed that all the evidence given to the review would be available
publicly and that the government would co-operate fully with a planned
inquiry of the trade and industry select committee into the pit closures.
The judgment of Conservative party managers at Westminster last night was
that the concessions would ensure that all but a handful of potential rebels
on its own side would now support the government against the Labour motion
demanding a complete moratorium on all closures.
THE COAL CRISIS
Pit losses challenged Page 8
Heseltine's hard task Page 8
Parliament Page 9
Business and the environment Page 16
Editorial Comment Page 18
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12486</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: CountyGlen in talks and dealings halted
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Shares of CountyGlen, the Irish property investor and trader, were suspended
at 60p yesterday following the announcement that it was selling a property
and was in talks which might lead to an offer.
The company has received an offer of IPounds 900,000 (Pounds 980,000) for a
property. It will be recommending acceptance at an extraordinary meeting.
If agreed, the company would be left with cash, receivables and some
property which is already on the market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12487</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921021
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Management buys Whitbread offshoot
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Homark, a maker of beer and wine dispensing equipment, has been bought by
its management from Whitbread.
Financial support has been provided by 3i and Bank of Scotland.
Homark, founded in 1963, has recently extended its factories to include a
fifth site in Parkstone, Dorset.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12488</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / People: Finance and insurance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Jeremiah Casey, chairman of First Maryland Bancorp and chief executive of
AIB US division, has been appointed to the board of ALLIED IRISH BANKS.
*****
Paul Talbot, md of Brown Shipley Unit Trust Managers, has been appointed
executive director, broker division of FIDELITY INVESTMENTS.
*****
Geoffrey Bell has been appointed md and Robin Owens and Peter Shand
directors of BROWN, SHIPLEY &amp; Co following the takeover by Kredietbank.
*****
Trevor May has been appointed UK insurance analyst at BZW; he moves from
Nomura.
*****
Shaun Astey, formerly marketing director of General Portfolio, becomes
director of personal markets at BUPA.
*****
Leonard Licht has resigned as a director of KEYSTONE INVESTMENT COMPANY.
*****
Allan Rickmann has been appointed environmental director of WILLIS CORROON
Limited. He also becomes group environmental adviser.
*****
Martin Harridine, formerly deputy chairman of Oriel Group, becomes a
director of JARDINE INSURANCE BROKERS Limited, following Jardine's
acquisition of a number of Oriel subsidiaries.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12489</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / People: Problems brewing
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Robin Simpson, under-secretary at the Department of Trade and Industry, is
to become director of the BREWERS' SOCIETY, the national trade association
for the brewing and pub retailing industry.
He takes over at a time when the brewing industry's relations with the
government have been severely strained by the disruption caused by the
enforced disposal of a third of the major brewers' pub estates.
The industry is also becoming increasingly restive over the effects of the
recession and the issue of EC duty harmonisation.
Increased personal allowances for importing drinks into the UK, coming into
effect next year, are seen as a particularly serious threat to drinks
retailers in south-east England.
Simpson, 52, a graduate of St Andrew's University, has been at the DTI since
1962. He was regional director in the north-east from 1986 to 1990 and is at
present head of the DTI's steel, metals and minerals division.
He succeeds Alan Tilbury, a former attorney-general of Botswana, who is
retiring after 22 years with the society.
Tilbury's appointment as director in 1990 broke the society's long tradition
of filling the post from the top brass of the armed forces.
*****
Robin Holland-Martin, a director of fund managers Henderson Administration
Group, has joined the board of Dorling Kindersley in a non-executive
capacity, in advance of the publisher's stock market listing at the end of
the month.
Old Etonian Holland-Martin, 53, is a former partner of Cazenove, brokers for
the floatation, but says that, as he left Cazenove in 1974, there is no
particular connection between his spell there and the current appointment.
He has been a director of Henderson since 1983, and has also been involved
with a number of venture capital companies. Currently chairman of the
visiting committee for the Royal College of Art, Holland-Martin takes a
particular interest in design - hence his enthusiasm for Dorling Kindersley,
which specialises in highly illustrated reference books.
He is the third non-executive director on the board, joining Juliet
Kindersley, shareholder, and wife of chairman and chief executive Peter
Kindersley; and Frank Gaudette, chief financial officer of Microsoft which,
pre-floatation, holds a 26 per cent stake in the company.
*****
John Lindsey, who resigned as executive director of the Professional Golfers
Association (PGA) last December, has been made golf manager at St Andrews, a
new post created as part of a management restructuring at St Andrews Links
Trust, with effect from next January.
The secretary of the Trust, Alec Beveridge, is retiring at the end of the
year, and will be replaced by Nicky James as general manager and secretary.
Lindsey, responsible for the golfing facilities which are next year being
augmented by a fifth 18-hole course as well as new practice facilities, will
report to James and usher in 'a new era in the provision of customer
service' according to the Links Management committee chairman Robert Burns.
Before his three years at the PGA, Lindsey, 46, had been on the promotional
side of Rothmans International. After a spell in Australia, he returned to
London for the group in 1984, and, working with Mark McCormack's
International Management Group, helped set up the Dunhill Cup.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12490</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Bovis expansion
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Bovis Construction, a division of P&amp;O, has acquired two businesses in
mainland Europe engaged in project management, cost planning and time
scheduling.
The companies are Tillyard (Deutschland), based in Dusseldorf, and Tillyard
of Zurich.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12491</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: IMI to advise on Nuovo Pignone
issue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ENI, Italy's public-sector energy and chemicals group, has chosen Istituto
Mobiliare Italiano (IMI), the investment and financial services group, to
advise on the privatisation of its Nuovo Pignone subsidiary.
Florence-based Nuovo Pignone is the second of the state-owned companies
destined for accelerated privatisation following a surprise announcement by
the government in September. Last week, the IRI state holding group
appointed Merrill Lynch as its adviser in the sale of Credito Italiano.
It is widely expected that Nuovo Pignone, which earned net profits of
L37.1bn (Dollars 29.9m) after minority interests last year on sales of
L1,550bn, will be privatised via a trade sale, probably to one of the
world's big engineering groups.
The company, which employs about 5,000 at seven sites around Italy,
specialises in compressors and gas turbines, as well as a range of
energy-related equipment.
ENI gave no indication of how or when the sale would take place.
The group, which has already mandated Merrill Lynch, Union bank of
Switzerland and Banca Commerciale Italiana to report on how to go about a
disposal, appears concerned to avoid a sale to the highest bidder without
guarantees on job security and the development of Nuovo Pignone.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12492</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Technology: Taming an unfriendly beast - Printers are
becoming easier to use
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEOF WHEELWRIGHT and LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Ease of use has become the slogan of the personal computer industry. Whether
this means pictorial representations of commands on the computer screen, or
handwriting recognition that enables control of the computer with a pen, PC
hardware and software companies are sparing no effort to make their products
more 'user friendly'.
That is, until these same users try to move their work from the personal
computer screen to the computer printer. For years, printers have been the
bane of many PC users' working lives. With compatibility problems,
multitudes of settings and a lack of standardisation, the printer remains
the most complex and frustrating aspect of personal computing.
For those users who have the misfortune to share a laser printer over a
computer network, the task is even more daunting - with the prospect of an
unfriendly printer holding up the productivity of whole groups of people,
rather than just one frustrated individual.
It appears that the makers of laser printers have finally taken this problem
to heart. Industry leader Hewlett-Packard is expected to release a new range
of faster and easier-to-use 'network' printers this month, while PC maker
Compaq Computer threw its hat into the ring with a similar range of products
a month ago.
HP declined to comment on its forthcoming product announcements, but the new
HP LaserJets will feature automatic language and interface switching for
mixed computing environments. This means that in an office which uses Apple
Macintosh and IBM-compatible PC systems, for example, one user can print to
the new LaserJet from a Macintosh at the same time that someone else in the
office prints out documents from an IBM-compatible PC. The printer will
automatically sort out the queueing of the documents, switching between page
control languages and interfaces.
For users with networks, there will be cost and performance benefits. HP's
'JetDirect' interface will allow the new LaserJet systems to be installed
directly as devices on the network - and therefore will not require a PC to
act as a 'print server' to the network printer.
It also means that data will be transferred at network connection speeds -
much higher than those that can be achieved over a standard parallel or
serial port. Thus, although the new LaserJet models print at only eight
pages per minute, their ability to take data from the PC to the printer at
network speeds will improve response times and overall performance.
HP's latest LaserJets will print at resolutions of up to 600 dots per inch,
double the existing 300 dots per inch standard, and will use smaller 'toner'
particles so that the resolution may look even higher.
HP is expected to price its new printers aggressively, at between Dollars
2,000 and Dollars 3,000. The new LaserJets represent Hewlett Packard's
fourth generation of laser printers since 1985 when the company launched the
original LaserJet printer, the single most successful product in the history
of the company.
Ever since, points out John Young, HP president and chief executive, the
company has maintained its dominant share of the market. Over the same
period, he notes that IBM has seen its share of the PC market dwindle in the
face of competition from 'clone' builders.
Now Compaq, which led the battle to steal market share from IBM in the PC
market in the mid-1980s, is after a piece of HP's laser printer market. This
is the first significant new challenge to HP's dominance of the market in
several years.
Compaq's announcement that it is moving into the network laser printer
market appears to have been a long-studied choice. The PC maker dallied with
the idea for several years before unveiling its first laser printers a month
ago.
Rather than taking on HP in the highest volume part of the laser printer
business, Compaq is aiming at the high-performance sector with printers that
produce 15 and 20 pages per minute.
The company cites reams of market statistics to support its decision. In
Europe sales of 12 to 19 page-a-minute laser printers grew 72 per cent to
Dollars 340m last year, and are expected to continue growing at an annual
rate of 31 per cent for the next five years, according BIS Strategic
Decisions.
In the US, this segment of the market exploded during 1991, with revenue
increasing almost fourfold to Dollars 879m, according to the market
researchers. Compaq also sites studies conducted by the UK-based Romtec
market research organisation showing that for every three PCs sold, two
printers are sold to go along with them.
According to David Clarke, Compaq marketing director, printers are the
second-largest revenue stream for PC dealers after PCs themselves - and that
dealers retain higher profit margins on printers than on PCs. He argues that
network laser printers have the highest possible margin and offer the
ability to sell all kinds of value-added services that do not exist in the
sale of a low-end system to a single user.
But Compaq faces an uphill climb. HP has a strong hold on the market, while
Canon and Apple Computer also represent formidable competitors. Ironically,
Compaq's entry into the laser printer market comes just as HP is renewing
its efforts to become a big player in the market for personal computers.
According to at least one US market report, HP is now winning PC sales to
customers who are tired of waiting for shipments of Compaq PCs that have
been delayed by component shortages.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12493</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of World Car Industry (10): Overtaken on the bends -
Italy's Fiat falls behind in Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LANE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THESE are challenging times for Fiat. August's new car registrations in
western Europe show that the Turin auto-maker suffered a 7.1 per cent volume
drop in the first eight months of the year, giving it 12 per cent of the
market.
After failing only by the narrowest of margins to capture the number one
position in west Europe from the Volkswagen group in 1988 and 1989 with a
share of 14.9 per cent, Fiat has slipped back since 1990.
A contributory factor has been the Fiat Group's continuing slide in its home
market. Deliveries of the Group's Lancia-Autobianchi, Alfa Romeo and
Innocenti ranges in Italy have all fallen heavily. In the first eight months
of the year Lancia-Autobianchi's figures were 8.8 per cent lower with
124,700 deliveries, while Alfa Romeo was 4.4 per cent down with 77,600 and
Innocenti 16.1 per cent down with 8,900.
Of the Turin Group's principal badges only Fiat advanced, improving by 1.8
per cent to 544,200 deliveries.
But in a market that grew by 4.7 per cent, the increase in the number of
deliveries was insufficient for Fiat to keep its market share. This fell
from 32.7 to 31.8 per cent.
In contrast to the Fiat Group, importers have been enjoying a good year in
Italy. Their deliveries rose by 9.8 per cent to 956,500, and their aggregate
market share increased from 53.2 to 55.8 per cent.
Fiat has been missing the opportunities offered by a strong home market. 'We
expect deliveries of new cars to be almost 2.3m this year, only slightly
down on 1991 and confirming Italy as Europe's second largest market,' say
officials at Unione Nazionale Distributori Automotoveicoli (the importers'
association UNRAE).
They attribute the buoyancy to two factors: traffic restrictions in large
cities at the beginning of the year which encouraged purchases of new cars
fitted with catalytic exhausts and the large backlog of orders for new
models such as Volkswagen's Golf and GM's Astra.
UNRAE's figures show that Volkswagen recorded an increase of 28.4 per cent
in the first eight months, and with deliveries of 172,000 it took 10.0 per
cent of the total market. GM achieved a rise of 37.4 per cent to 92,400
deliveries and a market share of 5.4 per cent. But notwithstanding this
improvement, GM still lags behind Ford (11.2 per market share) and Renault
(7.8 per cent) in the importers' league, as well as Volkswagen.
'Competition between all the makers, Fiat Group and the importers, has
always been tough,' notes UNRAE. That market gains are ferociously sought
and expensively bought in Italy has been especially clear to Italian
television viewers and newspaper readers this year, as car makers have
engaged in very competitive marketing across the media.
Price has been an important weapon, and it has been used extensively by Fiat
which has offered low-cost finance and extra trade-in discounts to lure
potential buyers into its showrooms. Already conscious of the price factor,
importers are concerned that the lira's devaluation and exit from the ERM
will reverse the gains they have made.
Cars of German and French origin are the most vulnerable. UNRAE officials
note that foreign makers are trying to absorb the higher lire costs. 'In
seeking market share, importers have kept their half-yearly list rises
between 1.5 and 2 per cent.'
UNRAE points out that the recent emergency economic package will help Fiat.
Protectionism is never far below the surface, and the Turin Group should
benefit if a discernible undercurrent of 'Buy Italian' sentiment develops
into full flood.
With conditions becoming tougher, this is not the easiest time for Japanese
makers to tackle the Italian market. However, importing mainly from Britain
and Spain, they should not be handicapped by the lira's devaluation against
the D-Mark and French franc.
Japanese cars have long been presented as a threat to be fought with all
possible means. It is significant that Ford and Opel and other GM models are
categorised as German, rather than as US transplants, whereas British or
Spanish cars bearing Japanese badges are labelled with Japan as producer
country. Results so far this year suggest, however, that they have not
suffered.
Nissan's sales have roared ahead. Deliveries of 17,000 between January and
August were 41.2 per cent higher than in the same period last year, giving
Nissan market share of 1.0 per cent. Honda's deliveries advanced by 19.5 per
cent to 7,400, and a market share of 0.4 per cent. And while Toyota's
deliveries were virtually static at 3,300, this will change when its British
plant starts producing.
Italians are not immune to the appeal of Japanese technology and
reliability, particularly when these qualities are allied to design flair.
Attractive new models with Japanese names are winning ground in an Italian
market in which the clock will not be turned back to the era of Fiat rule.
Indeed, the Turin Group will have a hard struggle to keep its share above 40
per cent over the next two years. With the continuous flow of new models
from foreign makers, Fiat Group will be fully stretched to hold ground
through face-lifting efforts to its ageing range.
Launched earlier this year, the small 'Cinquecento' made by Fiat's Polish
venture cannot be expected to spearhead a recovery. Volumes are too small,
with a substantial part destined, in any case, for the Polish market, and
margins are low on such a car.
Fiat will have to wait until new models are leaving the production lines at
the green-field plant currently under construction at Melfi in Italy's
instep region of Basilicata.
Declaring its six-monthly results at the end of September, Fiat recorded
pre-tax profits down from L1,455bn to L655bn and a significant worsening of
net financial position from surplus of L431bn to indebtedness of L2,510bn.
'The prospects for the second half appear even more difficult. To the
virtual stagnation of the world economy are added the effects on demand of
the measures that the Italian government is adopting,' says Fiat.
The company adds, 'Macroeconomic conditions pose a great challenge to the
company.' Next year offers much gloomier prospects than 1992. With its Melfi
models, Fiat cannot afford less than immediate, blockbusting winners.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12494</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of World Car Industry (21): Adaptability in slow
motion - The Toyota dynasty retreats gracefully
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN BUTLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE changing of the guard at Toyota Motor took place like clockwork.
After precisely 10 years as president at Japan's most profitable company, Mr
Shoichiro Toyoda last month took over the chairmanship from Eiji Toyoda, his
cousin once removed, and passed on the presidency to his younger brother
Tatsuro.
Toyota - Japan's biggest car maker with 40 per cent of the domestic market -
has managed to keep it all in the family for yet another generation of
leadership.
The regularity and predictability of the event gave not a hint that the
Japanese automobile industry is facing one of its most difficult periods
since the war, with domestic sales falling and profits collapsing.
Much like Toyota's Lexus luxury cars that have proved so popular in Europe
and North America, Toyota itself gives all the appearance of cruising along
in splendid comfort, unruffled by the crumbling of the road surface.
The appearance, however, could be deceiving. Certainly, of all Japan's
automobile companies, Toyota, with 40 per cent of the market, will emerge
the least scathed by the recession in the industry. Yet even for Toyota
change is in the wind.
To start with, the appointment of Mr Tatsuro Toyoda as president is likely
to mark the end of the Toyoda dynasty at the company, which now owns an
insignificant percentage of the company's shares. To promote a young member
of the Toyoda family over the head of more senior directors would probably
provoke a revolt in the company.
The structure of the board of directors at Toyota was also changed with the
appointment of the new president. Mr Tatsuro Toyoda previously served as
Toyota's sole executive vice president. This time Mr Toyoda will be joined
by five executive vice presidents, throwing wide open the choice of the next
president.
As Mr Shoichiro Toyoda said on the announcement of his brother's
appointment: 'There is a strong possibility that (the next president) would
be someone without Toyoda as a surname.'
Mr Shoichiro Toyoda was a strong leader at the company, and helped see
Toyota successfully through a decade of rapid international expansion. His
brother was intimately involved in that expansion. Tatsuro was until 1988
president of Toyota's joint production operation with General Motors in the
US, New United Motor Manufacturing. He also ran Toyota's US sales efforts,
and speaks fluent English.
Tatsuro's appointment gives a more international flavour to a company that
is often seen (probably without justification) as inward looking and
archetypically Japanese. But he is not expected to exert the same degree of
strong leadership shown by his brother.
He will also be facing a business environment that has become extremely
difficult. Toyota's consolidated pre-tax profits fell by 40 per cent to
Y427.8bn in the year to June on sales that rose by 3.1 per cent to
Y10,163bn.
Toyota has gained market share slightly in the nine months to August, as its
loyal customers continued to snap up its latest model cars. But sales have
still declined by 4.1 per cent in the domestic market to 1.77m vehicles
during the period.
Yet Toyota has one of the strongest balance sheets in Japan, with cash and
short term investment amounting to Y1,944bn, and net debt worth only 14 per
cent of shareholder's equity.
This means that Toyota is capable of withstanding almost anything the
Japanese, or international, market throws at it in the next few years.
The pressure on Toyota from the rest of the industry to soften its
aggressive competitive stance has become extremely intense, and Toyota plans
a number of changes to cope with the difficult business environment.
The company is likely to knock a few poorly-selling models out of its
extensive line up in an effort to save costs. Like other makers, it is
trying to save costs by cutting back on the variety of engine types,
steering wheels, decorative trim, or colour combinations that it now offers
customers. Tatsuro Toyoda supported the idea of saving money by using more
common parts in different vehicle designs, although some Toyota engineers
are sceptical about whether this will work.
But in two critical areas, Toyota has given no hint of change. The company
has dismissed suggestions that the current four year cycle of model changes
should be lengthened to save money. And the new president said Toyota had no
intention of increasing prices to boost margins.
Toyota would no doubt like to save money, but the company retains a strong
ethic oriented toward providing its customers with the latest technology and
design at the cheapest price. As the biggest and probably most efficient
producer, it can pursue this strategy for a long time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12495</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Ikea's logic furnishes a market riddle: John Thornhill
describes a curious interest in Habitat
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN THORNHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
As a rallying cry it is less than impressive. As a statement of intent it
has proved remarkably effective: 'We shall offer a wide range of home
furnishing items of good design and function, at prices so low, that the
majority of people can afford to buy them'.
The words are those of Mr Ingvar Kamprad, the Swedish entrepreneur,
outlining the business philosophy behind Ikea.
Ikea is the privately owned furniture retailer, which, in four decades, has
grown from a single store in Sweden's backwoods to become one of the most
successful international retailers in the world.
At the end of last year, Ikea ran more than 100 outlets in 25 countries,
with annual sales of SKr22.3bn (Pounds 2.2bn).
The company's vast blue and yellow retail sheds selling about 11,000
strangely named furniture products, such as Orgryte sofas and Smedvik dining
tables, are a feature of the international retailing landscape. Yet the
company's remarkable expansion is due largely to organic growth.
Ikea's reported interest in buying the UK and French arms of the struggling
Habitat chain, owned by Storehouse, has therefore inspired considerable
curiosity, and even outright puzzlement, within the furniture retailing
industry.
Mr Richard Hyman, director of Verdict, the retail consultants, says: 'The
possible acquisition has no commercial logic at all. If Ikea has a spare
Pounds 50m to invest, I would have thought they would have done better to
continue expanding what is clearly an outstandingly successful format,
rather than buying a loss-making high street chain which provides very weak
competition.'
Such sentiments are expressed in slightly more muted form even within the
Ikea Group. The furniture company's headquarters in Denmark yesterday
continued to deny all knowledge of the possible acquisition of Habitat. Its
UK business was similarly baffled.
A clue to the conundrum may lie in the fact that Storehouse is conducting
talks with the Ikea Foundation rather than with the Ikea Group itself. The
Ikea Foundation, set up by Mr Kamprad, is the legal owner of the furniture
group and is responsible for other activities, including the disbursement of
awards every three years to improve the quality of life and the environment.
The idiosyncratic Mr Kamprad may therefore be conducting the discussions
through the foundation without telling his colleagues in the furniture
group. He has certainly expressed a personal interest in Habitat before.
Three years ago, when Storehouse came under siege from the corporate raider,
Mr Asher Edelman, Mr Kamprad contacted the company and asked if he could buy
the furniture chain.
Mr Michael Julien, then chief executive of Storehouse, visited Denmark to
discuss the deal with Ikea, but it faded away. So did the threat from Mr
Edelman.
Sir Terence Conran, the former chief executive of Storehouse and the guiding
spirit behind Habitat, said Ikea then believed it could use Habitat to
expand into a different segment of the UK furniture market. 'They saw that
Habitat could be the leading edge of Ikea giving the group an up-market high
street presence,' he said yesterday, emphasising that he had no knowledge of
the current talks.
At the end of March, Habitat was running 40 stores in the UK, after slimming
down the chain in recent years in the face of recession. Habitat also runs
36 more successful stores in France, which contributed profits of Pounds
7.1m last year, and 17 troubled stores in the US, which incurred a loss of
Pounds 7.7m. In total, the Habitat group incurred losses of Pounds 8.8m on
sales of Pounds 201.2m.
Ikea is certainly not the only name in the frame as a potential acquirer and
'issues of substance' are still said to be under discussion. Au Printemps,
the French retail group, has also expressed interest in acquiring the
successful French arm, at least. Several other groups are also believed to
have come forward with proposals.
City analysts suggest, nevertheless, that Ikea is the likely prospective
victor, but they believe that any buyer would be most likely to acquire the
UK and French businesses as a package, leaving Storehouse to dispose of - or
close - the US arm separately.
If Ikea were to complete the acquisition, it would command a strong position
at the upper end of the hugely fragmented UK furniture market, even though
its combined percentage share of the sector would still be in low single
figures.
Furniture retailers have been badly affected by recession, but Ikea has
proved resistant. After establishing a presence in Warrington in 1987, it
has opened stores in Wembley and Birmingham generating sales of Pounds 91.4m
last year. It plans to open stores at a rate of about one per year for the
forseeable future, with Gateshead and Croydon being added to the list this
year.
Ikea seems likely to retain Habitat's distinctive style and name. Mr Kamprad
may provide the listless retailer with the purpose Storehouse has been
singularly unable to supply during the past few years.
Lex, Page 26
 ---------------------------------------------------
                IKEA'S EXPANSION
 ---------------------------------------------------
Year    Outlets     Countries     Turnover SKr (m)
 ---------------------------------------------------
1954      1            1                3
1964      2            2               79
1974     10            5              616
1984     66           17             6770
1991     96           24            22325
 ---------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12496</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / World News In Brief: German Greens found dead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
German Greens party founder Petra Kelly, 44, and her companion, former West
German major general Gerd Bastian, 69, were found dead in their Bonn home in
a case of murder, suicide or both, the investigating prosecutor said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12497</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Perkins wins Chrysler US order worth Dollars 100m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PERKINS GROUP, the Peter-borough-based diesel engine manufacturer, has won a
big order from Chrysler of the US for high-technology 'green' engines to
power a new range of Mexican-built Dodge trucks.
The order will be worth Dollars 100m (Pounds 58m) for Perkins over the next
five years, and is its first contract with one of the big three US motor
companies since the North American Free Trade Agreement recently initialled
by President George Bush and his Mexican and Canadian counterparts.
The deal, won against tough international competition, comes nine months
after Perkins won a Dollars 1bn, 10-year contract to supply engines to
Caterpillar, the US construction equipment group.
Mr Tony Gilroy, Perkins Group managing director, said the Chrysler order
came against the backdrop of a fairly depressed UK market and 'not very
buoyant world markets'. It would bolster the group's ability to maintain
current employment at Peterborough, where the workforce has fallen by 10 per
cent to 3,000 during the current recession.
Mexico had been a big market for Perkins for many years, but had assumed new
strategic importance because of Nafta, Mr Gilroy said.
Although the initial engines for the Dodge contract will be supplied from
Peterborough, assembly will soon be transferred to Mopesa, a Perkins
associate company based at Toluca in Mexico. Eventually, Mexico could be
used to source key engine components.
Mr Gilroy said the order was 'yet another significant expression of
confidence from a leading internationally known automobile customer in our
ability to meet increasingly stringent environmental and performance
standards'.
The new Phaser engines being supplied to Chrysler are six-cylinder,
turbocharged units which comfortably meet current US federal emission
standards. For Chrysler, the engines also suit demand in Mexico for
low-pollution trucks.
Low-emission diesels are one of the main focuses of the industry's
technology efforts as it grapples with more demanding emission regulations.
Perkins' Phaser family is designed so that, with modification, it can meet
the forth-coming US 1994 and European Community 1996 emission regulations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12498</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / The Lex Column: Storehouse/Ikea
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr David Dworkin, chief executive of Storehouse, must have his fingers
crossed. A deal to sell Habitat to Ikea would suit Storehouse nicely even
though the company does not particularly need the cash. Selling the British
and French chains at anything like the mooted Pounds 50m would easily fund
closure of Habitat in the US, which lost Pounds 8m last year. And though the
French business is profitable, the UK has long been a headache the company
could live without.
By the same token it is difficult to see what Ikea sees in Habitat. There
are superficial similarities between the two chains, but they hide more than
they reveal. Ikea's vast furniture barns contrast with Habitat's mix of high
street and edge-of-town locations. The logistics of handling a pan-European
chain with half a dozen UK outlets are also very different to managing some
70 Habitat stores. While the worst may be over at Habitat, this could be a
deal which Ikea lives to regret.
If a contract is signed, Mr Dworkin can concentrate on wringing profits out
of Mothercare in the no-holds-barred manner which proved so successful at
BhS. Better buying, distribution, pricing, layout, management and marketing
would transform Mothercare's prospects. Yet with the shares on a multiple of
27 times this year's estimated earnings, plenty of recovery is already in
the price. And investors may wonder how Marks and Spencer intends to respond
to the revival of BhS.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12499</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Fairshares Plus: Correction
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SATURDAY'S Minding Your Own Business page gave an out-of-date number and
address for JSL Software, the supplier of Fairshares Plus. The correct
address is 5 West Street, Epsom, Surrey, KT18 7RL. The telephone number is
0372 741969.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12500</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of Locating in North America (6): Seeking solutions
overseas / Profile of NFC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURIE MORSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN NFC, the UK-based transport and logistics giant, decided to pack up its
Home Services Division and move to North America a year ago, it was not
looking for cheaper labour, a more favourable tax climate or relief from
trade barriers. Its aim was to place a corporate division in the heart of
its increasingly international business and in the process raise the
company's profile in the minds of US investors.
Best known in Britain for its Pickfords and Hoults Group home moving
services, NFC viewed the US and Canada as prime markets for business
expansion and sources of fresh investment capital. The company, which
advertises itself as 'the world's largest mover', has in recent years
struggled to keep its UK operations profitable. A moribund UK property
market has halved the company's home moving business there and had also
depressed results from the home delivery services NFC's Merchants Group
provides for UK retailers.
Other sectors of NFC businesses have also come under fire, with its big
Logistics group undergoing reorganisation in 1991. Successive losses in its
Pickford Travel unit resulted in the sale of the unit in 1991, with the
remainder of NFC's Travel and Property division being scaled down.
Until UK interest rates decline and the domestic home mortgage market
revives, NFC executives are looking to geographic expansion and product
innovations to fuel growth, particularly in the Home Services division.
When the division moved to North America, NFC was already deriving 30 per
cent of its profits from US and Canadian operations and wanted to expand
non-UK profits to 50 per cent by the end of 1992.
So Mr Denis Olliver, NFC's managing director of the Home Services Division,
was not entirely surprised when the company's chief executive, Mr Jack
Mather, called him into the Bedford, UK executive suite in early 1991 and
suggested Mr Olliver move, with his divisional staff, to the US.
'While NFC has significant employee ownership, we had just converted the
ratio of our ADRs from one for one, to one for five. That increased the face
value of the shares and - we hoped - would attract institutional investor
interest in the US.
'The relocation had become a shareholder issue. We wanted more visibility in
the US and Canada,' Mr Olliver said.
From a personal perspective, the relocation order was more of a jolt. 'I had
just that afternoon signed a contract for a new house. My wife had wanted to
move closer to her mother and we had found a place just 8 miles away,' Mr
Olliver says. and 'I told her we were moving, but that it was not going to
be eight miles away from her mother, it was going to be 4,000.'
Aside from the shareholder issues, the scope of NFC's North American
operations made it strategically important that one UK member of the NFC
Board should have a North American perspective and be available to the US
and Canadian business managers for direct communication.
The company owns Illinois-based Allied Van Lines, the second or
third-largest of the 23 leading van lines in the US, depending on the
measure used. Orange and Black Allied trucks move households across the US,
with Allied's profits holding at Dollars 16m in 1991, in spite of a
faltering US economy. NFC bolstered its home moving business this year by
acquiring Allied Van Lines, Canada. It also operates Pickfords, Canada.
Another divisional business, California-based Merchants Home Delivery
Service, was growing rapidly through acquisitions and successful marketing.
Merchants' trucks and staff perform home deliveries of appliances and
furniture for some of the US's largest retailers, including Sears, J C
Penny's and Federated Department Stores, the parent of Bloomingdales.
Merchants, which had income of Dollars 40m in 1985, grew to a Dollars 120m
business in 1991.
Separate from the Home Services Division, but still in North America,
NFC-owned Exel Logistics was building a reputation as one of the largest
independent providers of warehousing and distribution services in the US.
Anxious to accomplish the relocation relatively swiftly, NFC executives
narrowed potential sites to Atlanta and three US cities where the subsidiary
businesses were already headquartered.
Atlanta, with its warm weather, active international airport and friendly
business climate was attractive but the suburban Chicago location was
finally selected.
'First, we liked its central location, within the US and globally. We have
operations in Australia, Singapore, Hong Kong, Canada, Europe and the UK. In
the UK we only had a one-hour overlap in the business day with Australia. In
Chicago we overlap by several hours with the UK and Australia - we like the
timeliness, the improved communications,' Mr Olliver said.
Since Allied already had a well-established infrastructure in Chicago, NFC
had only to move the core of its Home Services staff. Legal, marketing, and
other support staff were already in place. The marriage of the Allied office
into a corporate divisional headquarters had the added benefit of giving US
employees there more promotional opportunities within NFC. Although NFC
employees are unionised in the UK, they are not in the US, and union issues
were not a factor in the NFC move.
A big factor in the selection process for the globe-trotting executive was
Chicago's O'Hare International Airport. A new international terminal is due
to open at O'Hare in mid-1993. The state-of-the art terminal will double the
amount of square footage devoted to international travellers and will have
21 gates, 156 ticketing postions and 68 customs inspections stations. A
'people-mover' system will transport weary travellers to the central core of
the airport.
NFC did not seek tax or other incentives from Chicago or Illinois to sweeten
the move. 'There wasn't time and I don't believe in them,' Mr Olliver said.
However, he said that Allied Van Lines did accept a tax and training
incentive package from Mr Jim Thompson, then the governor of Illinois, after
it considered a move to Texas several years ago.
The move - predictably for a company in the moving business - went well.
Executives say NFC is already benefitting from having input with 'an
American point of view'. The cultural import was first seen in a revamp of
the Home Services Division's marketing literature. 'Everything we sent out
to shareholders, all our communications, have been completely
de-Anglicised,' Mr Olliver says.
He says the managers of NFC's American companies now believe NFC has a
better feel for their businesses. He also thinks that he gets a fresh
viewpoint and exposure to new ideas. 'What we try to do here is not keep
re-inventing the wheel. If something is working in California, we try to see
how it would work across all our operations. We have a real exchange of
ideas worldwide.'
Illinois-based NFC executives have also assisted in a Dollars 20m computer
revamp at Allied, a measure the company is undertaking to diversify Allied's
services and leave it positioned for growth as the US economy recovers.
Real financial dividends of the relocation have yet to be measured. NFC was
due to release its 1992 financial report in early October. Mr Olliver says
the fading US economy will keep the Home Services division results flat for
the year, but that revenue declines are not expected.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 38
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12501</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJVB5AGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Kurds face winter hardship, relief mission warns
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MURRAY BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ISTANBUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AT least 1.5m people could be at risk from hunger and cold this winter in
the Kurdish-controlled areas of north Iraq, according to the findings of a
joint US-EC relief mission to the region.
The conclusions, published yesterday, are considerably more gloomy than
assessments by the United Nations in June, when it was still assumed the aid
could be trans-shipped through Baghdad.
The report coincides with talks in Baghdad where the UN has still to extend
the current aid memorandum, the legal basis for its relief operation since
the end of the Gulf War.
According to the UN's original calculations, the winter shelter programme
for North Iraq was to cost Dollars 85m. The US-EC mission puts the figure at
Dollars 185m.
Turkish officials confirm the US has already approached Turkey to allow the
aid to be transported through Turkey, in the event that talks with Baghdad
break down.
'It was difficult enough last year, with the government's consent. If
Baghdad does not agree soon, there will be no time to stockpile supplies,'
said a UN official.
The UN said yesterday that approval had been given 'in principle'. However,
agreement had still to be found on both procurement and exchange rate
policy, with the UN keen to avoid using the unrealistic official rate for
procurement of one dinar to Dollars 3.
EC officials warned yesterday relief agencies had between eight and 10 weeks
to pre-position supplies before the onset of winter. Without Baghdad's
agreement, relief trucks will have to use the much longer route in Kurdish
areas, limiting the freight tonnages.
An economic embargo has halted traffic on the Iraqi-Turkish border at Harbur
Bridge, where Turkish Kurdish rebels have been fighting against Iraqi
Kurdish forces.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12502</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJVB5AGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Caribbean alarm at plutonium shipments
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CANUTE JAMES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KINGSTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SEVERAL governments and environmental protection groups in the Caribbean are
combining to protest against what they say is the planned use of the
Caribbean Basin for shipments of plutonium from France to Japan over the
next eight years.
The first shipment, on the 3,800-tonne Japanese vessel, the 'Akatsuki Maru',
will pass through the Caribbean 'in a few weeks', according to
environmentalists.
This will be followed by 38 more shipments from Cherbourg, France, to Japan,
where the plutonium is to be used in fast breeder nuclear reactors.
The ship has already been banned from the territorial waters of several
countries, and the cargo has raised the concern of governments along likely
alternative routes, including Malaysia, South Africa and Argentina.
Greenpeace, the environmental group, says the 'Akatsuki Maru' will be
attempting to travel in secret on a route which will take it through the
Caribbean Sea.
Government sources in the Caribbean say the ship will be accompanied by
armed vessels.
'Sea transport of plutonium raises a number of serious problems,' said the
Caribbean Conservation Association, a regional environmental protection
lobby.
'Ships are particularly susceptible to on-board fires or collisions, and as
the shipments will pass through the open sea as well as coastal waters, a
release of plutonium could affect both the marine and terrestrial
environment.'
Jamaica's environment ministry said the island's government would oppose the
plutonium shipment through the Caribbean.
'Jamaica's position is to keep the Caribbean free of the transport of such
hazards,' according to a ministry official. There was no indication,
however, as to what form the government's opposition to the shipment would
take.
The growing opposition to the planned shipments of plutonium is based also
on fears of an adverse economic impact on the region.
Many island economies are heavily dependent on tourism and hoteliers say
prospective tourists might be reluctant to visit the region because of
concerns over the presence of the plutonium.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12503</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJVB5AGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / New star rises for American Jews: Israel's US lobby is
questioning its future role
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE American Jewish lobby in Washington, bruised a year ago by a scathing
attack from President George Bush over Israel's request for a big package of
US loan guarantees, might be excused for celebrating this autumn.
Not only is President Bush on the political ropes as he struggles against
the odds to win re-election, but also Congress approved the 1993 US foreign
aid bill last month, which included the full Dollars 10bn in loan guarantees
originally requested by Israel. Grants to Israel of Dollars 3bn were the
largest to any country, as in previous years. The real value of this has
fallen, but as a proportion of all US foreign assistance it has risen
sharply to some 30 per cent as the overall 'aid-cake' has shrunk.
The consolidation of the aid followed the fall in June of the right-wing
Israeli government of Mr Yitzhak Shamir, an event welcomed by many American
Jews who supported his more conciliatory successor, Mr Yitzhak Rabin.
Yet Israel's supporters in the US are not celebrating much. Instead,
changing circumstances have raised the prospect that the US Jewish
community's high-profile fund-raising and political lobbying for Israel may
have peaked.
The battle over the loan guarantees, in which US financial assistance to
Israel was tied for the first time to political conditions, was a chastening
experience for the Jewish lobby. But other factors have also raised
questions about its future role.
In August, Mr Rabin attacked the most prominent American Jewish lobbying
organisation, saying it had damaged US-Israeli relations by its aggressive
tactics. More subtly the traditional concentration on pro-Israel activity
may have been undermined by the apparently receding threat to the Jewish
state from its Arab neighbours and growing internal concerns within the US
Jewish community about its own erosion by assimilation.
There are literally dozens of pro-Israel groups operating in the US, where
the 6.5m Jewish population is 2m more than that of Israel itself. 'It is
probably the most highly organised ethnic community in the world,' says the
director of one such group.
The Conference of Presidents of Major American Jewish Organisations has 48
member groups. Privately-raised funds for Israel, including Israel Bonds,
total almost Dollars 2bn a year.
The main lobbying group is the Washington-based American Israel Public
Affairs Committee, or Aipac. With an annual budget of Dollars 17m, a staff
of 140 and nine offices around the US, Aipac has developed into a powerful
advocate of support for Israel, lobbying both congress and the
administration.
It was Aipac which was the main focus in September 1991 of an unprecedented
attack by President Bush on the Jewish lobby for attempting to push the loan
guarantees through congress in defiance of his insistence that they be
delayed until after the Middle East peace conference in Madrid the following
month.
Aipac - and the 1,000 volunteers it had brought to Washington to lobby
Congress members on the issue - was routed by the president. Congress
quickly agreed to the delay. It was the biggest reverse for the Jewish lobby
since President Reagan pushed through the sale of Awac early-warning
airplanes to Saudi Arabia in 1983.
The shock of the defeat was compounded when President Bush linked approval
of the guarantees - intended to aid the absorption of mass immigration to
Israel from the former Soviet Union - to his demand that Mr Shamir freeze
Jewish settlements in the occupied territories.
This brought to the surface longstanding disquiet among many American Jews
over the commitment by Mr Shamir and his Likud party to eternal Israeli rule
over the West Bank and Gaza and to expanded settlements. A poll of top
American Jewish leaders showed 78 per cent in favour of a settlement freeze
in exchange for the loan guarantees.
'The community was not divided about fighting for the loan guarantees - but
people were dismayed and appalled at Shamir for giving greater priority to
the settlements. People were mad primarily at Bush, but they were also mad
at Shamir,' says Mr Thomas Smerling, director of Project Nishma, an American
Jewish organisation that supports territorial concessions by Israel.
Mr Rabin himself provided a further, unexpected jolt when he took Aipac to
task during a visit to Washington. This partly reflected concern that Aipac
had too willingly championed Likud positions. But it was more an expression
of Mr Rabin's view that the US-Israel relationship is a government matter
which can be upset by Aipac attempts to exert pressure through Congress.
Aipac staffers - they decline to be quoted - insist they will continue to do
business as usual. They see, if anything, a greater need to lobby for aid at
a time when foreign aid programmes are coming under increasing political
pressure in the US.
But others say a deeper shift may be taking place within the American Jewish
community. Now that Middle East peace talks are well under way and as
Israel's economy matures, the urgency of protecting Israel against a
perceived existential threat has been blunted.
The Rabin government itself is looking to American Jews for business
investment, rather than hand-outs and propaganda support - a message which
Mr Shimon Peres, the foreign minister, conveyed last month to Israeli
diplomats working in the US.
In this climate, more domestic concerns could come to the fore. The greatest
of these is assimilation and the long-term threat this poses to the Jewish
community's strength. A study of the US Jewish population published last
year showed that 52 per cent of those who married between 1985 and 1990
chose a non-Jewish spouse.
'American Jews are going to be seeking a new role for themselves under the
Rabin government,' says Mr Harry Wall, the Anti-Defamation League's
representative in Jerusalem. '(The growing concerns) are internal focal
issues, not external threats, so it is quite possible to see a turning
inward by American Jews.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12504</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJVB5AGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Bahamas accounts overdrawn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CANUTE JAMES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Bahamas government is withholding release of Dollars 33m in cheques it
has written because its domestic bank accounts are overdrawn.
Mr Hubert Ingraham, the prime minister, said it was 'unacceptable for the
public treasury of a sovereign state to be in a scandalous position whereby
Dollars 33m in cheques are written to pay government bills, but cannot be
released because there is no money in the government's overdrawn bank
accounts for the cheques to be honoured.'
Mr Ingraham, who took office in late August, said tax collection methods
would be improved, especially of customs duties which account for more than
half the government's revenue. However, the administration would not change
the tax regime, in which incomes are not taxed.
He blamed the previous administration of Sir Lynden Pindling, saying the
budget deficit grew from Dollars 35m in 1990 to Dollars 82m last year. Mr
Ingraham said the policy of a balanced current budget had been abandoned
under the previous government.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12505</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJVB5AGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Venezuela pushes ahead with electricity price rises
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOSEPH MANN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CARACAS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
VENEZUELA'S government has approved a series of price rises by public and
private electric power companies, despite widespread opposition.
The increases, to be staggered over 36 months, will cover residential,
commercial and industrial subscribers.
The cost of electricity is a big political issue in Venezuela, even though
rates are relatively cheap compared with the rest of the world. In March
President Carlos Andres Perez ordered a temporary freeze on planned price
increases because of political pressure following an attempted coup d'etat
in February.
The government has not released details of the price rises, but officials
said they involved 'very small' monthly increments. The rises should boost
the government's flagging privatisation programme - several electric power
companies are due to be sold this year and next.
They should also improve the inflation-hit profits outlook for Venezuelan
power companies; the country's largest private electricity utility, La
Electricidad de Caracas, recently announced an indefinite suspension of
dividends due to the rate freeze.
Mr Alirio Parra, minister of energy and mines, said the increases were
intended to reduce the large gap between residential and commercial power
rates. For many years Venezuelan industry and commerce have been subsidising
residential consumption by paying higher prices.
The minister stressed that, even when the new rates were effective,
Venezuela's power costs would continue to rank among the lowest in the
world.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12506</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJVB5AGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / US household group forges Chilean link
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LESLIE CRAWFORD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SANTIAGO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Procter &amp; Gamble, the US household and personal care group, has teamed up
with Chile's leading pulp and paper manufacturer to supply southern Latin
America with disposable nappies and feminine hygiene products, writes Leslie
Crawford in Santiago.
Procter &amp; Gamble has paid Dollars 95m for a 50 per cent share of Prosan, a
disposable nappy company owned by Compania Manufacturera de Papeles y
Cartones (CMPC). In addition, both companies will be linking their
operations in Argentina to export their products to Uruguay, Paraguay and
Bolivia. Sales are expected to top Dollars 200m next year.
CMPC recently inaugurated a new Dollars 600m paper pulp plant in southern
Chile built in partnership with Simpson Paper of the US. CMPC will be
supplying Procter and Gamble with cellulose for its operations elsewhere in
Latin America. The deal is the most recent example of the drive by Chilean
companies to find new export markets, often in association with foreign
partners.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12507</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJVB5AGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Colombia assesses quake damage
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STRONG aftershocks rattled Colombia yesterday after two big earthquakes and
an eruption of fire, steam and boiling mud from a volcanic mound killed at
least five people, AP reports.
Reports of injuries and structural damage still trickled in from isolated
villages cut off by Sunday's earthquake of 7.2 on the Richter scale and
Saturday's tremble of 6.6.
The worst of the disaster fell on a rural area in north-west Colombia where
a crater exploded in a huge ball of fire on Sunday. The explosion caused a
three-metre-high wall of mud.
The afflicted region, San Pedro de Uraba, is in a mountainous, coffee
growing area of northern Colombia, about 200km north of Medelln.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12508</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJVB5AGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Smuggled uranium may be bomb-grade
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MUNICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMAN investigators believe black-market uranium seized last week was
weapons-grade material despite claims to the contrary by a minister, Reuter
reports from Munich.
Prosecutors are awaiting a laboratory analysis of over 2kg of uranium which
was seized near Munich on Friday, the second time in a week German police
turned up radioactive materials apparently stolen from stocks in the former
Soviet bloc.
Mr Klaus Topfer, environment minister, said at the weekend the Munich
uranium was too weak to be used in a nuclear warhead. Scientists have said
at least 20kg was needed for a bomb.
The Munich chief prosecutor, Mr Heinz Stocker, told reporters he hoped to
have a final analysis of the uranium by late this week. Uranium 235, one
isotope of uranium, must be concentrated to be used as an explosive or as
fuel for a nuclear reactor.
Prosecutors said they were still uncertain about where the uranium had come
from. Seven people were detained across southern Germany at the time,
including two Czechoslovak nationals.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12509</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJVB5AGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Overture to opposition by Finnish coalition
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FINLAND'S ruling centre-right coalition yesterday agreed to hold talks with
the opposition Social Democrats on the country's economic problems, but it
rejected an opposition demand to broaden the government.
Mr Esko Aho, the prime minister, made his offer after the Social Democrats
emerged as the main winners in Sunday's local election.
They won 27.1 per cent of the vote, 5 points up on their performance in last
year's general election. Mr Aho's ruling Centre party unexpectedly took only
19.2 per cent. Their main coalition partner, the Conservatives, captured
19.4 per cent.
Contrary to forecasts, the Greens did not make much headway and won only 6.9
per cent of the vote, while the former Communists - the Left Federation -
won 11.9 per cent.
The city and municipal elections took place amid speculation that if the
ruling parties were routed the coalition could fall apart.
Mr Ulf Sundqvist, the leader of the Social Democrats, said yesterday that
the government had to make changes in its latest crisis package, which
includes a compulsory savings scheme as well as sweeping cuts in government
spending and tax increases to reduce the budget deficit.
Finland's gross domestic product declined 6.5 per cent in 1991. The
unemployment rate, at 13.6 per cent in August, is one of the highest in
western Europe.
'The country's economic problems remain and considering the challenges we
face in the next half year we must get the country back into shape,' said Mr
Pertti Salolainen, the foreign trade minister.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12510</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJVB5AF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Azeri-Armenian clash in enclave
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Fighting flared in the disputed mountain territory of Nagorno-Karabakh
yesterday, with Azeri and Armenian antagonists both reporting lives had been
lost, Reuter reports from Moscow.
The fighting in Nagorno-Karabakh centred on the vital Lachin corridor, the
only overland route connecting the territory's Armenian-speaking population
with neighbouring Armenia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12511</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJVB5AF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / EC adopts law on maternity pay
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
European Community ministers yesterday formally agreed on a law which will
guarantee women across the Community a minimum level of maternity leave and
pay, Reuter reports from Brussels.
Under the law, adopted without further discussion at a meeting of EC
ministers, pregnant and breastfeeding women will be guaranteed 14 weeks'
wages at a minimum of statutory sick pay. The plan will result in big
improvements in only a small number of EC countries, notably Britain,
Ireland and Portugal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12512</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of World Car Industry (18): A motorway over the Rio
Grande - Mexico's labour force becomes a strategic asset for the US auto
industry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MEXICO'S car market has emerged from the tortuous North American free trade
negotiations well placed to strengthen its position as a low-cost
manufacturing base for the big three US car companies.
Under the terms of the agreement, the US has agreed to remove all tariffs on
Mexican cars and car parts within 10 years, and let Mexico be considered
North American for purposes of meeting US Corporate Average Fuel Economy
(Cafe) standards. In turn, Mexico will abolish restrictions on foreign
investment in car part makers, and gradually relax all restrictions on
imports.
While this latter Mexican concession has raised fears of a flood of American
imports, the booming domestic market should provide room for all five
domestic producers. From January to July this year domestic car sales
reached 417,887 units, up 11.2 per cent on the same period in 1991. Sales
this year will be around 730,000 units, nearly 100,000 more than last year,
and three times sales in 1987.
While this year's 10 per cent growth is half last year's, this is largely a
result of a slowing economy. When the economy picks up in the second half of
next year, growth should return to previous levels. The privatisation of
Mexico's banks has greatly expanded access to credit, making it easier for
middle-class Mexicans to finance their car purchases. Domestic sales should
reach 1m by 1995 on current projections.
Exports have shrugged off the weakening US market, and in the first seven
months were 235,000 units, 27 per cent up on the same period last year.
Exports on current trends should be about 400,000 cars this year, nearly
seven times more than in 1986.
The big three US car companies account for the lion's share of exports, with
Chrysler exporting Ram Chargers, Ford Tracers and Escorts, and General
Motors Cavaliers and Cutlasses. These car companies have invested heavily in
export plants in Mexico recently, because of Mexico's low costs, relatively
high productivity of employees, and proximity to the US market.
The average Mexican car worker makes Dollars 4-Dollars 5 a day, a fifth of
his US counterpart. But productivity at Mexico's custom-built export plants
in Northern and central Mexico is as high or higher than in many US plants,
thanks in part to malleable labour unions. Ford's Hermosillo plant has been
widely regarded as one of the most efficient in the world, and was hailed as
such by MIT researchers in the book The Machine that Changed the World.
Under the proposed free trade agreement the US car companies will almost
certainly integrate still further their Mexican and US, Canadian operations,
concentrating production of a few vehicles in Mexico, and importing
remaining domestic Mexican needs from up north. With production of 700,000
split among 10 car models, Mexico's plants still operate on a much smaller
scale than those in the US.
The United Auto Workers union has opposed Nafta precisely because it fears
that such restructuring would lead to a loss in their jobs. In February GM
gave a hint of what might happen, by shifting production of some engines
from Moraine, Ohio, to Toluca, Mexico.
Mr Victor Barreira, head of Ford Mexico, says 'we would like to have high
volume plants in Mexico, keeping some production at home, and exporting some
. . . We will pick the place (between the US, Mexico and Canada) where it
makes sense to produce a vehicle.' He hints that Ford is looking at
producing small vehicles in Mexico. Detroit may thus shift production of
some small cars from Asia to Mexico.
The proposed Nafta makes such as strategy more attractive, by putting
minimum North American content at 62.5 per cent (compared with just 50 per
cent in the US-Canadian FTA) for cars to be eligible for tariff-free imports
into the US. It is much easier for the US Mexican-based plants rather than
Asian-based plants to meet this condition, since practically all the parts
of the US Mexican cars are from the US, or Mexico.
Mexico's two other car producers - Nissan and Volkswagen - are at some
disadvantage, since they import many of their parts from their home country.
Nissan has thus strongly attacked the high local content provision under
Nafta. It would have to pay Mexican tariffs on cars produced for the Mexican
market, if they do not meet the content rules.
Volkswagen decided long before Nafta was proposed to bring parts producers
to Mexico, to help it compete in the North and South American markets. Mr
Dietrich Aufenacker, sales and marketing vice-president, says 'if you want
to sell a product in North America you have to source in North America. Our
strategy is thus sourcing in dollars in dollar-dependent countries. That is
the only way to reduce dependence on the EC.' VW is thus bringing a minimum
of 25 German suppliers to Mexico.
The company last year exported from Mexico 60,000 cars to the US, and this
year hopes to increase this to 100,000.
At same time it is boosting exports from Mexico to Central and South
America, from around 5,000 last year, to a hoped for 10,000 next year. Mr
Aufenacker hints that like Ford the company may bring to Mexico another line
of cars, to compete with its North American rivals.
Even with the booming domestic market, Nissan and Volkswagen are likely to
face more intense pressure from the US car companies as Mexico releases its
import restrictions. Under the proposed Nafta, Mexico will let car producers
import Dollars 1 value of cars for every 80 cents of exports, a ratio
gradually falling to 55 cents over 10 years, and then disappearing.
Currently Mexican car makers can only import Dollars 1 value of cars for
every Dollars 2 of exports.
Ford, Chrysler and GM do not produce any compact cars in Mexico at present,
but under Nafta will import them from the US, thus entering a segment of the
Mexican market that VW and Nissan have traditionally dominated. Chrysler in
particular reckons that imports of such cars from the US will increase its
market share in Mexico.
The threat of more competition has forced VW to introduce Japanese style
work groups and 'just-in-time' inventory management in an effort to raise
productivity. Worker resistance to this led to a month-long strike in July
and August. For while productivity at Mexico's export plants is high, it is
still pitifully low at the older plants in and around Mexico City that
source the domestic market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12513</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of World Car Industry (16): Quiet man with the
world's hardest job / Profile of Jack Smith of GM
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JACK SMITH arguably has the hardest job in the world automobile industry.
As president and chief operating officer of General Motors Mr Smith faces
the formidable task of returning the company's core North American
automotive operations to the black, and quickly.
Mr Smith was catapulted into this position last April at the age of 54 when
GM's board staged a coup, which was prompted by its unhappiness over the
relatively slow pace of change under Mr Robert Stempel, the group's
chairman, and Mr Lloyd Reuss, the then president. Mr Stempel's wings were
clipped and Mr Smith, the then head of international operations, took over
from Mr Reuss.
Mr Smith, who was passed over for the presidency two years ago when Mr Reuss
became chairman, now has the task of slimming down GM's bloated bureaucracy,
closing inefficient or redundant plants, rationalising its model range and
cutting its cost of parts by making its suppliers more efficient.
But Mr Smith is no stranger to corporate turnarounds. He made his mark in
Europe in the mid-1980s when he turned around GM's operations there from
heavy losses into one of the corporation's most profitable businesses - and
the way he went about that provides a case study in the rapid change now
engulfing GM in North America.
A quiet, unassuming man who still speaks with the accent of his native
Massachusetts, Mr Smith has a reputation for decisiveness and a willingness
to delegate - an important factor in an industry which is learning the
importance of 'empowering employees' to take on more responsibilities.
His initial expertise in GM was in finance but by proving himself as a
successful operating manager, he bridged the traditional gulf in the motor
industry between 'bean counters' and 'product men'.
His European success was due in part to fortuitous circumstances, including
strong economic growth and Japanese import restraints, yet he also made
several bold, crucial changes to the way GM operated on the continent.
First, GM did not increase its manufacturing capacity at a time of rising
demand but instead worked its existing plants much harder.
Mr Smith persuaded European unions to work three shifts, around the clock,
rather than the traditional two eight hour sessions.
In an interview with the Financial Times last December Mr Smith recalled:
'One of the lessons we learnt in Europe is that there is a lot of room to
increase capacity in an existing plant through innovative shift
arrangements, through concepts such as running through breaks.'
GM has just begun three-shifting at one North American plant and will
certainly want to extend the practice when the US market recovers. Another
extremely important change was his successful drive to reduce GM Europe's
materials costs. The company diversified its supplier base away from its
heavy dependence on Germany, to reflect the balance of its sales across the
continent.
It also began offering suppliers long term contracts and 'advance
contracts', the latter being issued well ahead of a car going into
production, to tie suppliers more closely into the manufacturing process.
And it began a process of advising suppliers on ways to improve their
efficiency so GM could reap the benefits in reduced costs.
All these initiatives were under the control of Mr J Ignacio Lopez de
Arriortua, GM's head of purchasing in Europe, and one of Mr Smith's first
moves on taking over the presidency was to appoint Mr Lopez as head of
purchasing worldwide, with a particular mandate to shake up North America.
Mr Smith also relocated GM Europe's head office to neutral Switzerland. This
was important, he said, because it allowed 'all the plants to work together.
They don't think one is being given special consideration.'
Following April's coup he was quick to set up the head office of his newly
created North American Operations in Warren, a suburb of Detroit some 10
miles from the GM bureaucracy at corporate headquarters.
Another important factor in the European turnaround was a strong run of
products which went down well in the market. That will be harder to fix
quickly in the US, given the long lead times needed to bring new models into
production, but GM does have some winners in its current line-up, notably
the small Saturn car and Cadillac's Seville and Eldorado models.
But perhaps the greatest challenge Mr Smith faces is bringing a deeply
suspicious United Auto Workers union along with the cuts in manpower and
plants necessary for GM to become an efficient producer.
He managed it in Europe, but will need all his quiet persistence to bring it
off at home.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12514</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of World Car Industry (17): Heir to the Iacocca
legend / Profile of Robert Eaton, Chrysler's next chairman
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS hard to follow a living legend, but that is the task that faces Mr
Robert Eaton who will take over as chairman of Chrysler from Mr Lee Iacocca,
the man who oversaw the company's return from near financial death at the
start of the 1980s.
Bob Eaton was named last spring as the surprise choice to succeed Mr
Iacocca. The Big Three US motor manufacturers usually pick their chairmen
from within, but Chrysler went outside to rival General Motors, plucking Mr
Eaton from his position as president of GM's European unit.
But while Mr Iacocca will be a tough act to follow, Mr Eaton has at least
joined the company at a good time, when its fortunes have suddenly rallied.
Just two years ago some motor industry analysts questioned whether Chrysler
could survive as an independent company. After its remarkable escape from
near bankruptcy in the early 1980s, the company seemed to rest on its
laurels, diversifying into non-automotive businesses and failing to develop
quickly a new range of cars to replace its ageing K series models.
It was heading into a recession with a stretched balance sheet, losing
market share and facing huge financial demands to develop new models.
But adversity has bred resilience. The balance sheet remains weak but
Chrysler can at least now see glimmers of light at the end of the tunnel. It
has slashed its operating costs and revamped its method of developing new
vehicles to the point where some analysts are now calling it a model for the
US industry.
Above all, it looks as if it has a succession of critical hits on its hands.
This autumn sees the roll-out of its long-awaited LH model range of
extremely roomy mid-range cars which have won accolades from the motoring
Press. The question now is whether they, together with several other
important products the company will wheel out between now and 1994, will
prove an equal success with the motoring public.
Mr Eaton, who is 52 and currently the company's chief operating officer,
says the LH production start up is going 'outstandingly well' - as good as
or better than any he has known - and the few models that have been
delivered to customers so far have been 'extremely well received'.
Mr Eaton brings to the new job a reputation as a good engineer, manufacturer
and quality expert, with an eye for detail and an ability to foster
team-building. As such, he should give the company many skills complementary
to Mr Robert Lutz, the Chrysler president who was passed over for the top
job and has a particular flair for the development and marketing of new
products.
Mr Eaton himself reckons the most important attributes he has brought to the
company include a 'relatively broad view of the industry - European,
Japanese etc - and a very strong background and track record in cost,
quality and product'.
His European experience is of limited direct value to Chrysler since it has
virtually no overseas operations, though it is growing its export business
to Europe fast from a low base and now has a mini-van production joint
venture in Austria. Still, Mr Eaton reckons his time in Europe will be
valuable because it has given him a 'broader perspective of the US and its
problems in comparison to the rest of the world'.
Mr Eaton grew up in Colorado, took a degree in engineering and joined GM as
a trainee in 1963, working his way up the group's engineering side. His most
important break came when the company sent him to Europe in 1988 to take
over from Mr Jack Smith - now number two at GM - who had begun to turn
around the area from losses into GM's most successful automotive operation.
Mr Eaton carried on the Smith tradition and won particular plaudits for
negotiating new flexible working agreements with European labour unions and
for GM's rapid move into the east German.
A down to earth man with reputation for frugality and informality, Mr Eaton
will take over next January as chairman , although Mr Iacocca will remain on
the board as chairman of the executive committee for one year (extendable)
and will continue to do some consulting for the company.
This has led some analysts to suggest that Mr Iacocca, who has evidently
found it hard to quit the company, might remain breathing down Mr Eaton's
neck. However, Mr Eaton quotes Mr Iacocca as saying 'I'll be retired and
I'll no longer be involved in any day to day operations of the company.'
A diametrically opposed problem arose in August when Mr Kirk Kerkorian, the
Californian who is the company's largest single investor, demanded a meeting
with Chrysler executives to express concern about the reduced role Mr
Iacocca would be playing after January.
However, after a two-hour meeting he seemed to go away happy. Part of his
concern seemed to be the fact that he had never met the new chairman. Mr
Eaton acknowledges that 'in hindsight I probably should have met him earlier
 .' but says relations are now excellent.
Where does Mr Eaton see Chrysler five years down the road? 'I believe the
company has the opportunity to be the premier North American automobile
company from the standpoint of product, quality, cost and customer
satisfaction, and giving a very good return to its shareholders,' he says.
By premier he obviously does not mean the largest - since Chrysler is by far
the smallest of the big three - though he thinks it could be able to
increase its share of the US car and light truck market from the current 13
per cent to 15 per cent. For a company which just two years ago seemed the
sick man of Detroit, that is no mean achievement.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12515</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of World Car Industry (15): Blood, tears and factory
closures - General Motors is pulling no punches in its fight for financial
recovery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE cries of pain and anger echoing around Detroit these days are those of a
revolution in the making at General Motors, which is urgently trying to
return to financial health.
The pain is from GM's suppliers, who are being asked to slash their prices;
from the United Auto Workers union, which faces plant closures; and from
white collar workers, who will, among other things, have to start paying
part of the premium for their health insurance.
GM is trying to rush through a slimming regimen which it should have made in
the 1980s but failed to carry out because of its sheer size, inbred
bureaucracy, and a traditional arrogance which failed to recognise how much
the world was changing.
The question now is whether it can move far enough, fast enough, given its
bureaucratic nature and union opposition to job losses, and make itself
sufficiently strong to match the formidable challenge from Japanese
manufacturers.
The changes began late last year when Mr Robert Stempel, the chairman,
announced the first phase of plans to revive GM's core North American
vehicle operations, which lost some Dollars 6bn to Dollars 7bn last year. He
revealed that over the next few years the group would close 21 plants and
cut some 70,000 jobs.
This was a major change in stance by the company, and meant final
recognition that the market share it lost in the 1980s to Japanese and other
American manufacturers was not going to come back. During the decade GM's US
market share fell from around 46 per cent to 35 per cent, but its plant
closures did not keep pace.
The result was that it entered the recessionary downturn of the past two
years with its plants working at a far lower percentage of capacity  -
around 60 per cent, according to analysts' estimates - than its rivals, thus
compounding its losses.
However, even the raft of changes set in motion with Mr Stempel's December
announcement did not go as rapidly as the GM board hoped and in April it
staged an extraordinary coup. Control of the board's executive committee was
taken from the chairman and given to a non-executive director. Mr Lloyd
Reuss, the company's president and the man responsible for overseeing North
America, was removed from that job and his place taken by Mr Jack Smith,
head of international operations.
It is Mr Smith who is now implementing the group's previously agreed
strategy, though he has introduced several creative touches of his own and
is bringing to the task an urgency which was previously lacking.
Nowhere has this urgency been more evident than in the activities of Mr J
Ignacio Lopez de Arriortura, a Spaniard who shook up GM's European parts
suppliers in the 1980s and has now been called upon to do the same in North
America by Mr Smith.
Mr Lopez has caused immense controversy in the parts industry by demanding
big cuts in prices by GM's suppliers, which he says can be achieved if they
improve their efficiency.
The suppliers have accused him of undermining their relationship with GM by
putting out for fresh bidding contracts they thought they had already won,
including in some cases sensitive information which they regarded as
proprietary.
The supply industry, which went through a major rationalisation in the
1980s, says GM is now demanding further efficiency improvements which are
simply not there to be had. But Mr Lopez insists otherwise, and is offering
suppliers the help of GM teams to identify waste and inefficiency. Whatever
the rights and wrongs of the situation, it is sending a powerful message to
Detroit that GM has changed. It is no longer business as usual.
This message is also being drummed home to GM's own subsidiaries, which
supply some 70 per cent of the group's parts, making it highly vertically
integrated by the standards of the automobile industry. Mr Lopez is putting
teams of efficiency experts into these operations as well and warning them
that they can no longer rely on GM as a captive customer, but must earn the
right to sell to the company along with the world's best.
There is a danger in this strategy of clashes with the United Auto Workers
union, which is strongly opposed both to job cuts at GM and the loss of
supply contracts to outside companies. But it was a reluctance to take tough
action in the past which has brought GM's North American operations so
deeply into the red now.
The delicacy of relations with the union was brought home in September when
GM's plans to eliminate 240 UAW jobs at a tool and die shop in Lordstown,
Ohio, led to a nine-day strike which stopped production of some of the
company's most popular vehicles.
This was widely interpreted as a shot across GM's bows by the UAW, ahead of
next year's renegotiation of a three-year labour contract, to demonstrate
that the company cannot slim down as it wishes without considerable
resistance.
But GM too can play hardball: one of the plants on its list of 21 due for
closure is Willow Run, just outside Detroit. Most analysts had expected this
plant to stay open and one in Texas, making the same car, to close. However,
the Texan plant survived after its UAW workers agreed to more flexible
working practices sought by the company.
Even if GM can slash its cost base, it will still face the task of producing
cars that US consumers want at prices they are prepared to pay. Its record
here is extremely mixed. In the 1980s it became notorious for making dull,
look-alike cars of dubious quality. But here too the company is changing
substantially. Its quality is now generally regarded as close to Japanese
rivals.
Cadillac, its luxury car brand, has a big hit on its hands in the new
Seville, while the group's small Saturn is in such demand that dealers
cannot get enough of the model.
Saturn, which is manufactured by an entirely separate company, using
state-of-the-art management and production techniques, demonstrates what
high standards GM can achieve. So too do its extremely successful European
operations.
And for all its current woes, the company retains immense strengths: it is a
formidable technological leader at a time when this is more important than
ever in the development of new vehicles. It is still huge, allowing large
potential economies of scale. And it has a vast dealer network.
The revolution could still come to grief, but the company's prospects look
brighter than for many, many years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12516</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of World Car Industry (6): Skidmarks and D-Marks -
Germans steer nervously through the currency chaos
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AT A TIME when German car companies are battling to bring down costs to the
levels enjoyed by their foreign competitors, export markets have suddenly
been thrown into disarray by turbulence in the currency markets.
After more than five years of peace on the European exchange rate scene,
German manufacturers now survey a landscape in which the UK, Italian, and
Spanish currencies have all fallen sharply in value against the D-Mark. With
economic growth weak across Europe, or non-existent in some countries, price
rises to compensate for the full extent of the devaluations are out of the
question.
Nor is the picture much brighter elsewhere. In the US, which has become an
increasingly rough market in the past few years, the low valuation of the
dollar against the powerful D-Mark has increased the difficulties of selling
German cars.
Competition from Japanese models, whether made in Japan or in 'transplant'
facilities, has changed the US market dramatically, while the tax on luxury
goods - against which German carmakers fume - has also eroded sales.
But while the background may be gloomy, the German industry has performed
surprisingly well so far this year. In the first half, production was 2 per
cent above the level of the same period in 1991, a year which saw west
German production exceed 5m cars for the first time. Exports, which slid
last year by 16 per cent to 2.2m units, were 21 per cent higher in the first
half of 1992 at 1.3m. This jump in exports is partly due to the introduction
of new models, says the German motor industry association (VDA).
In the volume range, Volkswagen has its third generation Golf, and Opel
(part of General Motors) its new Astra, both competing strongly with each
other. But a more important reason for the higher level of foreign
deliveries is the decision of car companies to rebuild their stocks at
foreign dealers.
When unification enabled east Germans to replace their dated Trabants and
Wartburgs with western models, domestic car producers did their utmost to
meet the huge jump in demand.
This was partly at the expense of foreign markets. In 1991, new car
registrations in united Germany soared to 4.2m units; in the previous year,
with the country unified for only three months, the figure was 3m. Of last
year's total, 730,000 were in east Germany and 3.4m in west Germany, which
experienced a 13 per cent rise.
Foreign imports did exceedingly well, showing just how stretched the German
industry was to meet demand. In east Germany, importers took 52 per cent of
the market, led by the French and Japanese. In west Germany, the import
share was 32 per cent, though this was 39 per cent including cars made by
German producers in plants abroad. This year, the post-unification boom has
tailed off. New registrations in the first half of 1992 were down by 9 per
cent, though sales in east Germany showed a marginal rise. For the full
year, the VDA reckons with 'a markedly lower' new registration total for the
whole country. As well as the fading of the east German impulse, the
domestic market has also been affected by higher taxes, high interest rates,
and the dampening influence of the constant discussion in Bonn over new ways
of financing the budget deficit.
With the domestic market having peaked, the German motor industry has
stepped up its efforts abroad. Hence its collective chagrin at the latest
currency upsets. VW, for example, sells more cars to Italy than to any other
export market. Almost as many VWs are sold in the UK and France combined.
Since the end of last year, the D-Mark has appreciated by more than 4 per
cent against EC currencies, by at least 10 per cent against sterling and the
lira, and by nearly 10 per cent against the peseta.
VW says it is not changing prices in markets where currencies have devalued
until the situation is clearer. Mr Tom Purves, managing director of BMW
(GB), said just after the turmoil in the European Monetary System that the
company's UK prices would have to rise at the turn of the year to compensate
for sterling's sharp fall.
But the recession-hit state of the market would mean that BMW could by no
means lift prices by enough to make up for all of this.
So German companies' margins are being squeezed further. The industry has
long been aware that its costs are out of line with those of its
competitors. While the rest of Europe has reduced labour over the past
decade, German companies have added jobs. Now, the Germans are going into
reverse; jobs in the motor industry have already fallen this year by 15,000
to 765,000 people. More cuts are inevitable as companies strive to become
more competitive and offset the effect of high wages and social security
costs, as well as of shorter working weeks.
'Other European automobile nations have increasingly approached Germany's
productivity level in recent years', says Mr Achim Diekmann, the VDA's
managing director. Thus the German industry is no longer able to rely on
productivity advances to offset high labour costs. 'The German industry's
production costs are too high, not just in comparison with Japan but also
with its European rivals', he adds.
In the past, German producers could charge a premium for superior technology
and quality. But, warns Mr Diekmann: 'The premium prices necessary to secure
adequate profits at a time of heavy cost pressures are gradually beginning
to endanger the market position of German products.'
One solution, apart from further cost and job reductions, is to invest in
new efficient plants which make optimum use of modern, streamlined
manufacturing techniques. Opel and VW are doing this in east Germany, where
around 100,000 cars should be produced this year, rising to more than
400,000 in the mid-1990s. VW is also investing heavily in Czechoslovakia
(Skoda), Spain (Seat), Mexico, and China.
But the price for boldness must go to BMW. Earlier this year, it decided to
build a plant in the US to circumvent high German costs, insulate itself
from gyrations in the dollar's value, and develop more productive firepower
for use against its Japanese and other rivals. Audi, the up-market VW
subsidiary, is also considering a North American plant, but BMW will be
there first.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
             WESTERN EUROPE'S TOP 20 BEST SELLING MODELS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
MODEL                    1991   % share     1990    % share    % change
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
VW GOLF/JETTA         719,000     5.3      825,410    6.2       -12.9
FORD ESCORT/ORION     613,000     4.5      487,484    3.7        25.7
FORD FIESTA           606,000     4.5      597,620    4.5         1.4
GM OPEL KADETT/ASTRA  576,000     4.3      591,168    4.5        -2.6
FIAT UNO              538,000     4.0      599,701    4.5       -10.3
RENAULT CLIO          537,000     4.0      148,981    1.1       260.4
PEUGEOT 2             479,000     3.5      509,822    3.8        -6.0
GM VECTRA/CAVALIER    432,000     3.2      415,180    3.1         4.1
RENAULT 19            391,000     2.9      408,713    3.1        -4.3
FIAT TIPO/TEMPRA      380,000     2.8      422,941    3.2       -10.2
VW PASSAT             347,000     2.6      276,439    2.1        25.5
GM OPEL CORSA/NOVA    342,000     2.5      330,029    2.5         3.6
VW POLO               300,000     2.2      219,003    1.7        37.0
FORD SIERRA           269,000     2.0      318,898    2.4       -15.6
PEUGEOT 405           262,000     1.9      291,828    2.2       -10.2
CITROEN AX            259,000     1.9      301,195    2.3       -14.0
AUDI 80/90            254,000     1.9      263,562    2.0        -3.6
FIAT PANDA            253,000     1.9      271,830    2.1        -6.9
BMW 3 SERIES          242,000     1.8      180,007    1.4        34.4
MERCEDES W124         229,000     1.7      230,208    1.7        -0.5
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: AID provisional estimates
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12517</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of World Car Industry (8): Clouds in the crystal ball
 -UK recession takes savage jobs toll
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE is little to relieve the gloom shrouding the UK new car market. Sales
forecasts have been steadily revised downwards throughout the year, with
background fears now being voiced that the market this year could be barely
more than 1.5m units - a 35 per cent fall from the record 2.3m units of
1989.
Total output has held up surprisingly well - after eight months it was 0.5
per cent higher than a year ago at 858,204 - but dismal sales prospects for
the final quarter of the year are likely to see output for the full year sag
below 1991's 1.24m units.
The failure of the UK economy to emerge from recession, and weakness in
other important markets like North America, has begun to take a significant
toll in short time working, job cuts and other measures to stem losses and
adjust output to lower demand. The cuts have been severe in the volume car
sectors and even worse in the executive and luxury car sectors, where Jaguar
and Rolls-Royce have been forced into savage cutbacks, with 1,000 workers to
go from Rolls-Royce alone.
The year has also seen Lotus, General Motors' sports car and engineering
subsidiary, abandon production of its Elan small sports car and a string of
less illustrious companies collapse then re-emerge with new owners - among
them Reliant, Evante, Jensen and Ginetta.
Among the survivors, TVR of Blackpool is doing well thanks to the
introduction of its spectacular Griffith 'supercar' while Morgan, still
producing around 500 of its vintage-style sports cars annually at Malvern,
Worcestershire, has merely seen its order book shorten a bit (it still
extends for some years) and remains glad it shrugged off the televised
advice of former ICI chairman and TV company 'doctor' Sir John Harvey Jones
to expand production.
The underlying UK market situation is actually worse than the bald figures
indicate. Prof Garel Rhys, professor of motor industry economics at Cardiff
Business School, says this has been the year in which, after years of
industry pleadings, the UK Government finally acted on the anomalous Special
Car Tax, halving it to 5 per cent.
Had there not been an intervention by the Government last month, the
struggle for sales between now and the end of the year could easily have
assumed a much graver dimension for manufacturers.
The collapse of the market this year to levels far below expectations has
already left the industry with excess stocks. But in addition there are at
least 40,000 unsold cars which are not fitted with the catalysts which
become mandatory on all new cars sold throughout the EC from next January 1.
Had the industry been forced to sell or otherwise dispose of all these
before the January 1 deadline, the consequent price war would have made the
present situation pale by comparison. However, the UK Government is invoking
an EC Commission escape clause under which manufacturers are to be given
until the end of next year to dispose of the non-'cats'.
The further fall in new car sales in September - down 4 per cent compared
with a year ago, leaving year-to-date sales at 1.3m, a further 2.62 per cent
below last year - has left manufacturers casting around ever more feverishly
for more carrots with which to tempt buyers.
A new round of price cuts was recently started by Ford, its once clear-cut
market leadership increasingly being eroded by second-placed Vauxhall and
fourth-placed Peugeot-Talbot. (Rover Group is third, but has also been
losing market share.)
The price cuts, which apply to stocks of 1992 models only, range from Pounds
235 on a basic Fiesta small hatchback to Pounds 2,161 on a Fiesta 1.4 litre
Ghia - reducing its price to Pounds 8,999 - and Pounds 2,150 off its
sporting RS 2000 model, now selling at Pounds 14,000.
Even if the UK market embarks on a firm recovery next year, pricing is bound
to come under increasing pressure. Both the UK's Monopolies and Mergers
Commission and EEC Commission have identified UK new car prices as
frequently being at the high end of the EC spectrum. Potentially more
worrying for the industry is a report from Ludvigsen Associates, the
UK-based automotive analysts, asserting that European car buyers as a whole
are paying up to one-third more for their car than counterparts in Japan and
North America.
Price pressures will be increased, too, by heightened competition as Honda
and Toyota join Nissan in UK manufacturing, and both Nissan and Peugeot each
start building small cars to complement their respective British-built
Primera and Peugeot 405 upper-medium car models.
In the meantime, the competitive position of Rover Group, which manufactures
only in the UK and has a very high level of UK content, has been increased
by the devaluation of sterling, particularly against the D-Mark. Although
Ford has cut sharply its balance of payments deficit on its UK motor trade
to Pounds 214m last year from Pounds 1.297bn in 1990, the position of it and
Rover's main rivals is less clear-cut because of the amounts of vehicle or
components imported from Europe.
However, they remain significantly better placed than importers and
distributors of German cars in particular, who need substantial price
increases to compensate for sterling's fall. Recently Mr Tom Purves,
managing director of BMW(GB), the executive car maker's wholly-owned
importer, said price increases of 12-14 per cent would be needed to
compensate for the currency shifts. Equally, he accepted that in current
market conditions BMW, Volkswagen and others will have to absorb most of the
adjustment through reduced margins.
The share of the market taken by imports is in any case continuing to
recede. They accounted for 54.27 per cent in September (55.82 a year ago)
and 55.48 for the first nine months of the year (55.97).
Precisely when the UK market is likely to start to recover remains a matter
of hot debate.
Mr John Towers, managing director of Rover Group, is cautiously optimistic.
He suggests that sales could recover to 1.65m or perhaps even 1.7m units
next year. 'We know for a fact that there is a lot of money about. Once we
break through the consumer confidence barrier, then quite clearly there
could be a lot of movement in the market.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12518</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of World Car Industry (7): His other car is Porsche /
Profile of Ferdinand Piech, VW's manager in waiting
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FERDINAND PIECH is a disconcerting man with an impeccable and impressive
engineering background and a detailed knowledge of the motor industry's
newest manufacturing and management methods, many of them originating in
Japan, writes Andrew Fisher.
From the start of next year, he will be in a unique position in the German
car industry.
That will not be just because he steps up then to become the next chief
executive of the Volkswagen group, though that in itself will be enough to
give him a powerful voice in the industry. Enhancing his status - and
certainly not making it any less controversial - will be his continued
position as head of the supervisory board of Porsche, the problem-ridden
luxury sports car company.
Because of his independent wealth, Mr Piech is not shy of speaking his mind.
Nor is he averse to knocking heads together in the interests of greater
productivity and profitability in an industry which is now acutely aware of
its high cost burden compared with Japanese and European rivals.
At VW, the 55 year-old Mr Piech will be taking on the top job at a time of
continued pressure on profits. Not only are the company's labour and other
costs too high, even compared with its German competitors, but VW is also
faced with the problems of adjusting to the revalued D-Mark. With the German
currency having moved up by more than 10 per cent against the lira this
year, sales to Italy, VW's biggest export market, will not become any
easier.
At Audi, the up-market VW subsidiary which he now heads, Mr Piech has made a
strong impact. With an attractive model range, combining solidity with
sportiness, Audi has been an important contributor of profits to the VW
group, even though it still has to recover fully in the US from the sales
slump caused by allegations (of which it was cleared) of unsafe
acceleration.
Mr Piech, a keen skier, jogger, and fast driver, was involved as an engineer
in the trailbreaking Audi Quattro sports car, the use of galvanised steel to
prevent rust, and significant developments in aerodynamics. Die Zeit, the
weekly newspaper, said he had 'petrol in his veins'.
He has shown this in his activities at Porsche, where he continues to exert
a strong influence as a member of one of the families who control the
company's voting shares. He did not see eye-to-eye with Mr Arno Bohn, the
former Nixdorf Computer marketing specialist who has just left as Porsche's
chief executive.
The unexpected choice of Mr Piech to head VW, with the backing of both
industrial and trade union representatives on its supervisory board, shows a
clear awareness on both sides of the problems and challenges facing the
group. Mr Piech is known for his tough approach to business, his often
prickly manner, and his dedication to constant improvements in productivity.
It was clearly these qualities that led the supervisory board to prefer Mr
Piech over Mr Daniel Goeudevert, who joined VW from Ford-Werke, the German
subsidiary of Ford Motor of the US. At one time, Mr Goeudevert, a former
Sorbonne professor of literature, looked like the main candidate to succeed
Mr Carl Hahn, whose career with VW dates from the time when he led the
Beetle to success in the US market in the 1960s.
Mr Goeudevert, who has strong and unconventional views about the motor
industry and its environmental and transport responsibilities, would
certainly have been a more conciliatory and collegial boss than Mr Piech.
But the rapid pace of change in the industry upset all the calculations.
Originally, Mr Hahn was to have stayed on for two years after his normal
retirement date. That would have taken him to the end of next year.
Concern over VW's profitability as it continues with a heavy DM51bn (Dollars
34bn) programme of capital investment in Germany and abroad led the board to
change its mind and time the succession for a year earlier. At the same time
as the news of Mr Piech's impending appointment emerged, VW said it intended
to cut 12,500 jobs from its domestic workforce of 130,000 people by 1996.
This would be achieved through natural fluctuation, and VW denied reports
that the reduction would total 25,000.
Whatever the final number, the trend is clear: fewer jobs and a determined
onslaught on costs. VW made net profits of DM445m (Dollars 278m) in the
first half of 1992, a rise of 3 per cent, but pre-tax profits were 17 per
cent lower at DM987m. With foreign markets becoming tougher, competition
from the Japanese hotting up, and the unity-inspired sales boom at home
tailing off, Mr Piech will be taking the wheel at VW just when the road is
getting bumpier.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12519</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4ABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of World Car Industry (3): Speeding into a pile-up -
Europe expands at the worst possible time
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WEST EUROPE'S big six volume car makers are facing a rough ride as
competition intensifies and new car sales weaken. A wave of additional
capacity is being built across Europe in an industry that is already
suffering from shrinking margins.
The new plants from Portugal to east Germany and from the UK to Italy were
planned as west European car producers were still basking in an
unprecedented succession of annual sales records.
They are about to hit the market, however, as the European appetite for
buying new cars is succumbing to retrenchment.
The leading volume car producers in Europe are enjoying widely differing
fortunes, while the specialist car makers have been hit hard in their main
markets on both sides of the Atlantic.
A new group of executives must lead the European motor industry through the
1990s with changes announced at the top of four leading producers -
Volkswagen, Ford of Europe, GM Europe and Renault.
In the last two years the Volkswagen group of Germany has established a
clear lead ahead the west European new car market, but its profitability is
under heavy pressure both from the dash for growth and from its failure to
get to grips with its expensive German cost base. VW's domestic cost
problems have been exacerbated by the recent currency turmoil and the big
devaluations of the lira and the pound.
While its profits sag the group, which includes Audi, SEAT and Skoda, has
boosted its share of west European new car sales to a record 17.3 per cent
in the first eight months of the year from 16.5 per cent in the same period
a year ago.
In a market which has declined by an estimated 2.2 per cent the VW group has
increased its sales by 2.8 per cent in the first eight months to around
1.66m.
To confront the serious cost-cutting challenge in Germany the top management
of VW is being overhauled with the retirement of Mr Carl Hahn, who has led
the group's increasingly hectic expansion since 1982. He will be succeeded
as group chairman by Mr Ferdinand Piech, the tough Austrian-born chief
executive of Audi, VW's executive and luxury car subsidiary. Mr Piech's
closest rival for the top job, the Frenchman Mr Daniel Goeudevert, a former
manager with Citroen, Renault and Ford, will become group deputy chairman in
addition to remaining chairman of the Volkswagen brand organisation.
Ford is shaking up the management of its loss-making European operations
with the appointment of Mr Jacques Nasser, the 44-year-old Lebanese
Australian, as chairman of Ford of Europe from the end of December, when Mr
Lindsey Halstead retires. At Renault Mr Louis Schweitzer, a former top
French civil servant, has succeeded Mr Raymond Levy as chairman, while Mr
Louis Hughes, 43, moved from Opel to become president of GM Europe,
following the surprise departure of Mr Robert Eaton to Chrysler in the US.
Mr Nasser faces a formidable challenge at Ford of Europe, which suffered
record losses last year and which is forecast to make another loss in 1992.
He inherits a daunting agenda for restructuring what was earlier regarded as
a model of efficiency in the European auto industry and a vital contributor
to Ford group profits.
Ford, which was narrowly the leader of the west European new car market in
1984, has now slipped to fifth place among the big six volume car makers in
Europe, where its financial woes in the last two years have been in stark
contrast to the record profits achieved by General Motors Europe.
GM was the most profitable of the big six volume car makers in Europe last
year with a 7 per cent net profit margin. The net profits of its core
Opel/Vauxhall car and light commercial vehicles rose to a record Dollars
1.96bn in 1991 compared with the net loss of Dollars 961m suffered by Ford
of Europe.
While GM's European profits have totalled more than Dollars 1.75bn in each
of the last four years, Ford has suffered a steep decline from a net profit
of Dollars 1.56bn in 1988 to a net loss of Dollars 961m last year.
Ford's European automotive operations accumulated a net loss of Dollars
1.079bn in 1991, but this was partially offset by the net profit of Dollars
118m at its financial services in Europe.
The profits of GM's European operations provided at least a partial cushion
against the record losses suffered by the group in the US last year which
totalled Dollars 7.087bn including a Dollars 1.8bn special restructuring
provision. The European profits could not prevent the world's biggest
vehicle maker suffering an overall loss of Dollars 4.5bn, however, the
largest annual loss recorded by a US company.
In spite of lower sales this year GM Europe, which includes Saab Automobile,
moved into second place in the west European new car market after the first
eight months of this year, helped by the waning fortunes of the Fiat group.
Fiat, which only three years ago was still challenging the Volkswagen group
for market leadership, has suffered the sharpest slide by a leading European
producer.
By sharp contrast Renault, the French state-owned car maker which is
developing a far-reaching alliance with Volvo of Sweden, has staged a
dramatic recovery in the last two years. Long regarded as one of the weakest
of the European producers, Renault has emerged this year as the
fastest-growing volume car maker in Europe. It increased its sales volume by
around 5 per cent in the first 8 months to boost its market share to 10.5
per cent from 9.8 per cent a year earlier.
Its pre-tax profits jumped fivefold in the first half of the year to
FFr5.44bn from FFr962m in the same period a year ago. It has drastically cut
its debt burden and Mr Schweitzer, the new Renault chairman, has forecast
this month 'satisfactory profits for the full year' even taking into
consideration a 'considerably more difficult second half'.
Among Europe's specialist car makers Jaguar and Rolls-Royce Motor Cars of
the UK are mired in deep and continuing losses as are Saab and Volvo of
Sweden. Porsche of Germany is cutting its workforce by a third over three
years. Rover, a subsidiary of British Aerospace, also remains in loss in the
face of the steepest slide into recession suffered by the motor industry in
Britain in the post-war period. UK new car sales have dropped by a third in
the last three years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12520</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJUB4AA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of World Car Industry (2): A chequered pattern /
Review of the outlook in the world's main car markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LEADING western car makers have intensified warnings in recent weeks that
west European new car sales would fall in 1993 for the second successive
year.
According to Mr Louis Hughes, president of General Motors Europe, west
European new car sales will drop to 13.3m this year from 13.43m in 1991 and
will be 'clearly under 13m' in 1993 'if present consumer uncertainty in some
markets continues'.
Only the inclusion of eastern Germany has masked the fact that new car sales
elsewhere in west Europe have been in decline since the record year of 1989.
According to Automotive Industry Data, the UK-based automotive analysts, new
car sales in west Europe (excluding east Germany) peaked in 1989 at
13,467,000 and then fell to 13,259,000 in 1990 and 12,763,000 last year.
German reunification added a new market, eastern Germany, which last year at
730,000 was the sixth largest in Europe. This allowed the total west
European market to remain at a record level with sales in 1990 of 13,489,000
and 13,493,000 in 1991.
Even the enlargement of the market can no longer disguise the weakening
trend of demand for new cars, however.
Mr Allan Gilmour, president of Ford's worldwide automotive operations,
maintains that in addition to the severe recession in the UK 'recent
currency and interest rate fluctuations throughout Europe have created
uncertainty and reduced consumer confidence.
'Now we are seeing slow-downs in Spain, France and Italy and, to some
extent, in Germany. Near-term prospects for the auto industry in Europe are
not very good.'
According to Mr Jacques Calvet, chairman of PSA Peugeot Citroen, west
European new car sales will fall by 1.5 per cent this year with a further
1.3 per cent fall in 1993 as political and economic factors generate greater
gloom in Europe.
'Looming elections, triumphant monetarism - as the Bundesbank leads and
France merely follows - structural problems in the UK and the determination
to correct certain economic and financial imbalances in Spain and Italy are
causing consumer spending and investment either to stagnate or decline.'
He expects European exports to be complicated by the 'combination of
unstable EC exchange rates, a weak dollar and the deliberately undervalued
yen. As a result unemployment is on the rise.'
Prospects in North America and in Japan are not much more encouraging. 'The
US is showing some signs of improvement,' says Mr Gilmour, 'but if it's a
recovery, it's a painfully slow-developing one.'
Mr Yoshifumi Tsuji, president of Nissan Motor, Japan's second largest
vehicle maker, said this month that 'the global motor industry today is
facing a business climate of unprecedented severity'. Vehicle demand had
dropped in all three of the world's major motor markets, Europe, the US and
Japan, and he warned that 'there is little expectation that the market will
recover quickly in the immediate future'.
DRI, the UK-based automotive analysts, forecast that worldwide new car sales
this year will be virtually unchanged at 34.05m compared with 34.04m last
year. The drop of 2.7 per cent in 1991 from 34.97m in 1990 was the largest
sales reduction since the 1980/81 recession.
The latest DRI forecast made in autumn 1992 suggests that new car sales
worldwide will begin to recover next year with an increase of 4.5 per cent
to 35.59m. The study suggests that demand will continue to expand through
the mid-1990s with sales breaking through the 40m barrier in 1997 to reach
40.7m.
The forecast growth in demand next year is expected to be supported by a
marked strengthening of new car sales in the US coupled with a return to
growth in Japan after two years of falling new car registrations.
While sales in west Europe are forecast to fall further by 1.8 per cent to
13.15m next year, the latest DRI study suggests that sales in North America
will jump by 11.0 per cent to 10.26m in 1993 with demand in Japan rising by
3.0 per cent to 4.71m.
Car sales in the Asia Pacific region (excluding Japan) are expected to
remain on a fast track with demand rising by 8.4 per cent next year to 2.45m
following a jump of 7.6 per cent in 1992. New car demand in South Korea is
forecast to exceed 1m for the first time in 1994 with the market having
doubled since 1989.
Sales are also expected to expand next year in Latin America - led most
importantly by Brazil - and in east Europe.
New car demand in Japan in 1992 is falling for a second year in succession,
the first time for many years that there has been such a prolonged period of
decline. The fall of 4.6 per cent in 1991 and a forecast decline of 6 per
cent this year follow a period of extraordinary growth in the late 1980s,
when the Japanese new car market climbed from 3.28m in 1987 to 5.1m in 1990.
According to the DRI forecast Japanese new car sales are not expected to
break through the 5m barrier again before 1995/96.
In west Europe the DRI study says that new car sales will begin to recover
in 1994 helped by the climb out of prolonged recession by the UK. New car
sales in the UK are not forecast to match the 1989 peak of 2.3m, however,
until 1997 at the earliest. Steady growth in west Europe in the three years
from 1994 to 1996 is forecast to take sales above 14m for the first time in
1995 and above 15m in 1997.
The pattern of west European new car sales in the last two years has been
substantially influenced by developments in Germany, which alone now
accounts for close to 30 per cent of total west European new car
registrations.
The boom which followed reunification is now over and sales are falling.
'Germany was instrumental in supporting west European car sales and
production last year and this pivotal support has now been removed at a time
when key markets like the UK and France have still to show real signs of
recovery,' says the DRI study.
DRI forecasts that the German market will fall by 8 per cent this year to
3.8m - with some bringing forward of sales into 1992 to avoid next year's
VAT rise. It suggests the German market will bottom out at 3.5m in 1994 but
warns that 'it is not inconceivable that the projected downturn for the
German market could continue into 1994'.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                     WORLD CAR SALES FORECAST (000's)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                              1992     1993     1994     1995      1996
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
WORLD TOTAL                 34,047   35,587   37,156   38,943    39,967
Germany                      3,807    3,453    3,494    3,650     3,751
Italy                        2,417    2,271    2,221    2,199     2,278
France                       2,096    2,201    2,309    2,410     2,456
UK                           1,589    1,716    1,912    2,145     2,270
Spain                        1,022      992    1,102    1,289     1,299
EC total                    12,479   12,213   12,663   13,359    13,769
West Europe total           13,393   13,152   13,661   14,428    14,896
US                           8,444    9,422    9,731    9,852     9,826
Japan                        4,576    4,712    4,864    5,000     5,104
South Korea                    846      925    1,006    1,060     1,123
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                       WORLD CAR OUTPUT FORECAST (000's)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                              1992     1993     1994     1995      1996
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
WORLD TOTAL (net)*          35,151   37,029   38,033   39,193    40,179
Germany                      4,846    4,606    4,582    4,637     4,798
France                       3,318    3,508    3,543    3,645     3,761
Spain                        1,827    1,876    1,931    2,140     2,179
Italy                        1,579    1,481    1,630    1,656     1,687
UK                           1,263    1,590    1,698    1,838     2,006
EC total                    13,162   13,478   13,856   14,509    15,083
West Europe total           13,454   13,828   14,248   14,923    15,497
US                           6,215    6,861    6,773    6,582     6,352
Japan                        9,819    9,776    9,980   10,217    10,260
South Korea                  1,243    1,394    1,555    1,661    1,711
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
*Excluding traceable double counting.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: DRI World Automotive Forecast Update - Autumn 1992.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12521</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of Locating in North America (4): Costs can vary
greatly - Property and labour markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARBARA HARRISON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE costs and availability of property and labour rank among the top
concerns of companies considering relocations.
Property costs can vary greatly depending on whether a company is looking to
locate a manufacturing plant, find a headquarters or regional office or set
up a distribution warehouse. Yet, no matter the type of facility, shifts in
the US property market have occurred that have affected and will affect
property prices.
Two factors have wreaked havoc with the US property market over the past few
years: the overhang in supply of commercial properties from excessive
building during the 1980s and a decline in demand stemming from the US
recession and continued economic sluggishness.
Although the building boom of the 1980s is over, some cities overbuilt more
office space than others and some, such as Chicago which arrived late to the
party, have recently faced substantial and badly timed additions to their
office property inventories.
In 1991, after the economy had run out of steam, Chicago added 3.4m square
feet of commercial property and saw its central business district vacancy
rate rise to 22.3 per cent from 17.6 per cent between the second quarter of
this year and the same period last year, according to figures from Cushman &amp;
Wakefield, a top US commercial property firm.
Vacancy rates can push rental costs up or down. In the central business
district of Los Angeles, the vacancy rate rose to 29.2 per cent in the
second quarter from 22.6 a year before and rental costs declined from a
range of Dollars 20-42 per square foot to Dollars 17-40.
In addition to lower prices, more vacant space can also mean tenants can win
fatter concessions from landlords for outfitting the space or grace periods
at the start of the lease.
Even with little additional building, the cost of property has been driven
down in some areas by lack of demand. Areas such as New England and the
Mid-Atlantic states, including such states as New York and Pennsylvania,
have been hard hit by the US economy's downturn and the consolidation of the
securities and banking industries.
On the opposite coast, the computer and defence industries that were once
the engines powering California's growth have been shrinking painfully over
the past two years and, at least for defence, will continue to do so.
But as testimony to the gravity of the US recession, the national vacancy
rate has continued to climb for central business districts even though the
amount of newly added space in those areas has declined every year since
1986.
However, this trend has been accompanied by a shift away from central
business districts. More and more companies are choosing to set up in the
suburban areas immediately surrounding large or mid-sized cities or to
forsake cities for more rural locations, particularly for greenfield plants.
BMW, for example, selected Spartanburg, South Carolina for its new assembly
plant.
In greenfield sites, it is virtually worthless to cite property costs, since
these frequently are a bargaining chip in negotiations with a relocating
company. Often the site itself can cost nothing or very little.
The flight from the inner cities has partly been spurred by costs, but it
also has much to do with quality of life issues - such as schools, housing,
parks and recreation.
The northern suburbs of Atlanta, for example, have been ranked as the number
one preferred location by a series of surveys, including that of Ernst &amp;
Young with the International Association of Corporate Real Estate Executives
which was published earlier this year.
The area's amenities, and most particularly the relatively reasonable cost
of housing, has convinced a number of large companies to relocate there
recently, including UPS.
The cost of living for employees is important for companies partly because
of what kinds of salaries and wages will be required at the new site.
Runzheimer International, a Wisconsin-based consulting firm on living and
travel costs, calculates that Dollars 60,000 is the standard compensation
for a middle management employee or a highly skilled technician.
Based on a family of four, with a mortgaged home and two cars, companies
would have to vary their compensation levels according to location. They
would have to pay employees more to settle in Los Angeles, with total annual
costs of Dollars 77,454, than in Memphis, where costs run to just Dollars
55,492 a year.
For companies seeking reasonably priced manufacturing labour, the US's
south-east continues to offer the best value with an average of just Dollars
9.77 per hour, according to figures compiled by PHH Fantus, the leading US
relocation consulting firm. Yet in spite of the lower averages of wages in
the region, two of the south-east's states, South Carolina and Georgia, have
innovative public programmes to train employees for incoming investors.
Mr Robert Ady, president of PHH Fantus, said that foreign firms often
overestimate the skill level of American workers. He advises them to
realistically appraise local worker capabilities.
South Carolina's programme to train BMW workers was, he said, crucial to its
choice of that state.
With the North American Free Trade Agreement on the horizon, however, those
whose top priority is to set up in a low wage location are likely to go to
Mexico.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
         COST-OF-LIVING VALUES IN SELECTED LOCATIONS: 1992
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Location                    Total annual           Index
                           costs (Dollars)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Los Angeles, CA               77,454               129.1
Washington, DC                71,967               119.9
Boston, MA                    69,901               116.5
Chicago, IL                   66,353               110.6
Atlanta, GA                   63,925               106.5
Minneapolis, MN               63,227               105.4
St Louis, MO                  60,081               100.1
STANDARD CITY, US             60,000               100.0
Houston, TX                   58,344                97.2
Phoenix, AZ                   55,718                92.9
Memphis, TN                   55,492                92.5
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Based on a family of four with a Dollars 60,000 annual income, living
in a 2,400 sq ft home which carries a mortgage and incurring all normal
home ownership and maintenance costs. The family owns two cars: a late
model driven 14,000 miles a year and a four-year-old model driven 6,000
miles yearly. Car expenses include both fixed and operating costs.
Federal, state and local income taxes are paid. They also pay sales
taxes and purchase goods and services typical for a family in their
income bracket at their location. The family has also set aside an
amount for investments and savings. Costing is based on representative
communities surrounding the core city in which families earning Dollars
60,000 a year are most likely to reside.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source:   Runzheimer International
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12522</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of Locating in North America (5): Enhanced packages -
Incentives
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARBARA HARRISON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE adage that information is power has a new application in the corporate
relocation business.
As companies have learned more about what array of incentives are available
(or even conceivable) and other companies' agreements have become standards
to exceed, incentive packages to lure relocating firms have increased.
'The level of incentives has increased in the last two years,' says Mr
Robert Ady, president of PHH Fantus, the leading US consulting company.
Incentive packages used to run between Dollars 10,000 and Dollars 30,000 per
worker, or some 10-30 per cent of total investment. But now, says Mr Ady,
while the range is the same, the average has risen a couple of percentage
points, or to about Dollars 20,000 per worker instead of Dollars 15,000.
Several factors have contributed to the rise in incentives. The track record
of relocations has improved and become more public in the past few years and
this has permitted wider and greater knowledge in the corporate community of
what kind of deals can be done.
This in turn has prompted firms to attempt to secure an even better deal
than that of a previous company. This desire could be especially keen if the
previous deal was with a competitor.
As evidence perhaps of how companies want to drive harder bargains,
consulting companies see corporate relocation as a growing business area.
For example, Ernst &amp; Young, the big accounting and consulting firm, joined
the International Association of Corporate Real Estate Executives to conduct
a relocation study, called 'Reshaping America', published earlier this year.
Next year it will publish its new guide, 'Ernst &amp; Young's Guide to US
Business Cities'.
US states, cities and towns are more eager than ever to secure new jobs. The
vast wave of corporate shrinkage that has swept the US since the start of
the decade has meant that unemployment has remained high.
Many states have had to face fiscal crunches and are keen to attract new
corporate citizens that will generate state revenues. Tax relief 'is part of
the equation even if money is tight', says Mr Ady. Tax incentives for
investors - particularly if they create new jobs - are on the books in most
US states.
But like the companies looking for the best deal for relocation, states and
cities have also become more shrewd about what they may be giving away. Many
are now inserting what are known as 'clawback clauses' into their relocation
incentive deals.
These force the company to return the subsidies that the state or city
provided if it does not live up to its agreement. The town of Ypsilanti,
Michigan is, for example, suing General Motors over the company's decision
to close its plant there. The town says that GM violated the agreement it
made to provide employment in return for tax abatements. Detroit and New
York City have similar cases against other companies.
Nonetheless, traditional tax incentives, as well as infrastructure
improvements and financing, usually through bonds, remain important items
for negotiating a deal. Even utility companies are becoming more creative
about luring corporate relocations using services, rate incentives,
financing and community economic development programmes.
But states and cities as well as companies are turning to a broader than
ever variety of other incentives. These can include incentives regarding
acquisition of machinery, building of day care centres, assistance with
finding housing for relocating employees and subsidised home mortgages.
In particular, training of the workforce is increasingly becoming the key
incentive for many companies. In 1970, the typical PHH Fantus client did 90
per cent of its workforce training in-house and just 10 per cent externally.
Today, the company says its studies indicate that by 2000 those numbers will
reverse.
Some states, such as Georgia and South Carolina, have programmes that will
train a workforce to the required specifications of incoming investors.
Other states are expected to follow suit with similar types of programmes in
order to compete.
States can also feel that - instead of giving away their rights to tax
revenues, infrastructure - training and other quality of life type
incentives are attractions that will remain if a given company decides to
move on.
One result of the greater array of incentives and the competition for
corporate relocations is that searches are taking longer, according to Mr
Ady.
BMW's selection of Spartanburg, South Carolina for its new US plant took
three years. The length of the search has increased because corporate
relocations teams have become bigger, which has meant more complicated
scheduling for trips to the site. And often the teams return to the site
three or four times before a decision is made.
For foreign firms, this could also be an expensive proposition. But there is
no substitute for personal contact with the location and its people. Given
widespread American antipathy toward Japan, it is important for Japanese
companies, in particular, to get a feel for the community's receptivity
toward their investment.
The presence of other foreign firms, especially those from one's own
country, can also provide some comfort. In BMW's case, a number of other
German firms, including Siemens, Bosch and Bayer are also in South Carolina.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12523</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Chase recovery continues with 29% rise in profits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A 29 per cent rise in Chase Manhattan's third-quarter net profits showed
that the recovery is continuing at the big New York bank that has spent the
past two years slashing costs and changing its strategy.
Chase, which has reduced its workforce by 8,000 people and reorganised
itself to concentrate on retail banking in the New York area and wholesale
banking globally, turned in Dollars 176m (Pounds 102.3m) of third-quarter
net income. This translates into earnings per share of 94 cents, compared
with 79 cents a year ago.
Although the Chase results were helped by an increase in net interest
revenues - from Dollars 863m a year ago to Dollars 898m in the third quarter
just ended - the bank is still coping with higher bad debt provisions,
especially related to its loan exposure in the depressed US commercial
property market.
The third-quarter provision for possible loan losses was Dollars 320m,
compared with Dollars 265m a year ago. The bank said it expected such
provisions to continue at relatively high levels.
Net loan write-offs totalled Dollars 321m, almost half the Dollars 656m
level of a year ago.
At the end of September Chase had Dollars 7.4bn of domestic commercial
property loans on its books, down from Dollars 8.9bn a year ago. Some
Dollars 2.23bn of these loans were classified as non-performing, down
slightly from Dollars 2.36bn a year before.
For the first nine months of 1992 Chase achieved Dollars 470m of net
profits, up from Dollars 385m in the same period last year. Bad debt
provisions were Dollars 915m, up from Dollars 770m in the same period of
1991.
However, net loan write-offs in the first nine months of 1992 fell to
Dollars 912m from Dollars 1.6bn in the first three quarters of last year.
Mr Tom Labrecque, chairman, said the third-quarter results reflected the
bank's programme of building its core businesses.
He said Chase had further strengthened its capital base, reaching a Tier One
ratio (capital as a percentage of net risk-weighted assets) of 6.5 per cent,
up from 5.2 per cent a year ago.
Chase's return on assets rose to 0.71 per cent from 0.53 per cent in
September 1991. The bank's return on equity was 12 per cent, up from 10.5
per cent a year ago.
Wall Street reacted favourably to the Chase earnings figures, marking the
bank's share price Dollars  7/8 higher to Dollars 23 3/8.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12524</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Setback for Castor Holdings creditors
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
UNSECURED creditors of Castor Holdings, the bankrupt Montreal-based property
finance company chaired by Mr Wolfgang Stolzenberg, the German-Canadian
financier who lives in London, have been told that they stand little chance
of recouping any of their CDollars 700m (Pounds 315m) investment.
Castor's bankruptcy trustee gave the bad news to creditors last week.
It came in a progress report based on a preliminary review of the value of
the company's assets, which consist almost entirely of high-risk second and
third mortgages and construction loans on several dozen projects in the US
and Canada.
Most of Castor's funds came from European banks as well as private investors
in Switzerland and Germany.
The biggest unsecured creditors include Chrysler Canada's pension fund and
Credit Suisse, which has an exposure of about CDollars 100m.
Mr Stolzenberg, Castor's co-founder and chairman, appeared before a Quebec
bankruptcy receiver yesterday to answer a list of statutory questions
normally put to the directors of insolvent companies.
The hearing was held behind closed doors and Mr Stolzenberg was not expected
to shed much light on the complex inner workings of Castor.
But an official of Richter &amp; Associates, which is acting as trustees, said
the firm provided a number of extra questions to the receiver.
The Richter official said Mr Stolzenberg was expected to be interviewed in
greater depth by the trustees within the next few weeks.
Castor's investors earned handsome returns in the early 1980s, when they
benefited from the high interest rates on subordinated mortgages and large
fees paid by developers.
They also enjoyed big tax benefits as a result of Castor channelling much of
its money through subsidiaries in jurisdictions which had negotiated
favourable tax treaties with Germany.
Cash flows and income quickly dried up, however, when the North American
property industry sank into reces-sion.
Much of Castor's money was invested in hotels and undeveloped land, which
are especially vulnerable.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12525</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Trafalgar to allow HK Land one seat
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TRAFALGAR House, the UK property, construction and engineering group, will
today tell Hongkong Land that it is only willing to appoint one of its
directors to the board.
Hongkong Land, the property and development group which controls 14.9 per
cent of Trafalgar, wants to put two directors, Mr Rodney Leach and Sir
Charles Powell, on Trafalgar's board. A Trafalgar executive said after talks
with institutional shareholders its board yesterday decided it would be
'more appropriate' to appoint one director from Hongkong Land.
Trafalgar maintains that its institutional shareholders believe two seats
would give Hongkong Land too much weight on the board.
Trafalgar's team at today's meeting with Hongkong Land will be lead by Mr
Alan Clements, the former ICI finance director who has replaced Sir Nigel
Broackes as chairman, and Mr Allan Gormly, formerly in charge of the
engineering division, who takes over from Sir Eric Parker as chief
executive.
Management changes, which include the appointment of a non-executive
director unconnected with Hongkong Land, were agreed by Trafalgar's board.
The other non-executive directors at Trafalgar are Mr David Howell, a senior
Conservative MP and Mr Tony Ryan, chairman of GPA Group, the aircraft
leasing company. Mr Clements remains a non-executive chairman. His other
directorships include Mirror Group Newspapers and Granada Group. His
appointment is an interim measure.
Mr Simon Keswick, chairman of Hongkong Land, and Mr Henry Keswick, chairman
of Jardine Matheson, which controls a third of Hongkong Land, are likely to
argue that Trafalgar's decision to appoint a chairman from within the board
underlines the importance of bringing in two independent directors.
Trafalgar plans to announce its management changes today. It is expected to
confirm that Sir Nigel, who founded Trafalgar more than 30 years ago, has
been appointed life president, an honorary consultancy post without a seat
on the board.
Sir Eric will continue as deputy chairman and keep his seat on the board
until his 60th birthday next June.
Observer, Page 25
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12526</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / BAe small shareholders stage revolt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Aerospace yesterday faced a protest from its small shareholders who
refused to approve a special resolution to reduce the company's capital as
part of its financial and industrial restructuring announced last month.
Although the capital reduction was finally approved by 99.75 per cent, small
shareholders forced the company to call a poll after BAe failed to win the
necessary majority from the 200 shareholders at yesterday's extraordinary
general meeting.
The meeting was supposed to rubber-stamp the capital reduction to enable BAe
to pay a 3p interim dividend following its Pounds 750m restructuring
write-offs. But it lasted more than two hours as small shareholders grilled
Mr John Cahill, BAe's chairman, over the restructuring and forced a poll.
One City of London analyst said the reaction of small shareholders was not
surprising. 'Too much is going on at BAe for small shareholders to
understand; the City itself had trouble understanding the latest
restructuring package,' he said.
He was referring to the collapse of BAe's share price after the company
announced last month a first-half pre-tax loss of Pounds 129m, a Pounds 750m
write-off, a proposal to produce regional jets jointly with Taiwan, the
closure of the historic Hatfield manufacturing plant and a capital reduction
involving cutting the nominal value of ordinary shares from 50p to 10p. One
shareholder told Mr Cahill: 'The only thing that is extraordinary about the
meeting is that losses of this magnitude are allowed to occur.'
Shareholders questioned the proposed venture with Taiwan and asked whether
other problems were expected 'to crawl out of the woodwork'.
Mr Cahill defended the company's restructuring and recovery strategy.
Provided forecasts were maintained, he said BAe was expected to operate
profitably in the second half of this year now that it had capped the losses
of its 146 regional jet business.
Regional jets had been the 'single most important factor in the company's
financial underperformance', he said.
Mr Cahill added progress had been 'good' in the negotiations with Taiwan
Aerospace. BAe hopes to complete the Taiwan deal by the end of the year.
Company officials also said the company remained confident over its
long-term relationship with Saudi Arabia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12527</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow firmer as investors show
resilience again
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
Some good corporate earnings results helped US share prices to end firmer
yesterday despite further declines in IBM and another rise in bond yields,
writes Patrick Harverson in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 14.04 at 3,188.45. The
more broadly based Standard &amp; Poor's 500 was also firmer at the finish, up
3.23 at 414.96, while the Amex composite edged 1.21 higher to 368.54 and the
Nasdaq composite roared ahead 8.06 to 590.67. Turnover on the NYSE was heavy
at 226m shares.
The fifth anniversary of the October 1987 stock market crash passed
uneventfully. Market sentiment remained reasonably positive, buoyed by a
third quarter reporting season that is proving to be more positive than
envisaged.
The resilience of investors was displayed last week, when large declines in
three of the market's biggest stocks - IBM, Philip Morris and Westinghouse -
only slightly depressed the Dow and left the wider market indices, such as
the S &amp; P 500, unscathed. IBM remained weak, but again failed to disturb
sentiment significantly.
Investors also shrugged off continued declines in bond prices, which sent
short and long-term yields higher as fixed interest markets expressed
concern about the implications of a Democratic victory in the presidential
election next month.
Among individual stocks, Time Warner rose Dollars 1 1/4 to Dollars 24 on the
news that the entertainment group earned Dollars 6m in the third quarter, an
improvement on the Dollars 62m loss reported at the same stage a year ago.
The company, however, reported a loss after preferred dividend payments were
included.
IBM continued to decline in the wake of last week's dreadful earnings
figures and the stock fell another Dollars 2 1/4 to Dollars 68 1/2 in
turnover of 2.7m shares.
Chase Manhattan Bank rose Dollars  7/8 to Dollars 23 3/8 after reporting a
big improvement in quarterly profits to Dollars 176m, up from Dollars 136m a
year earlier. Other banks were firmer in anticipation of good quarterly
earnings, including Chemical, up Dollars 1 3/4 at Dollars 33 1/4 , also
aided by reports that the billionaire investor, Mr Warren Buffett, may have
taken a stake in the bank. Blockbuster rose Dollars  5/8 to Dollars 14 1/2
on news of a 37.5 per cent rise in third quarter earnings to Dollars 41.3m,
or 22 cents a share.
Hasbro climbed Dollars  5/8 to Dollars 33 3/8 on the American Stock Exchange
after reporting profits of 75 cents a share in the third quarter, up from 55
cents a share a year ago.
On the Nasdaq market, Microsoft led the way higher, rising Dollars 2 1/2 to
Dollars 87 7/8 in heavy trading after an analyst at the securities house,
Goldman Sachs, made positive comments on the stock. Others to benefit from
Goldman recommendations included BMC Software, up Dollars 1 at Dollars 61
1/4 , Sybase, Dollars 2 1/2 higher at Dollars 40 1/2 and Oracle Systems,
Dollars 1 1/2 firmer at Dollars 22 1/8 .
Canada
TORONTO share prices ended higher, boosted by firmer bank and gold stocks.
Toronto's 300 index added 17.78 points, or 0.55 per cent, to 3,225.48, with
advancing issues ahead of declines 271 to 248. Volume was 25.7m shares worth
CDollars 208m against 29.5m shares worth CDollars 259.2m on Friday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 47
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12528</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Nikkei falls below
17,000 on futures-related selling
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Nikkei average lost 2.6 per cent yesterday, falling below the important
level of 17,000 for the first time since August 26, as futures-related
arbitrage unwinding depressed share prices, writes Emiko Terazono in Tokyo.
The 225-issue index fell 466.00 to 16,903.81. The index opened at the day's
high of 17,331.59, then fluctuated in a narrow band for the rest of the
morning. Later, arbitrage unwinding and index-linked selling pushed the
index to the day's low of 16,833.70.
Volume fell to 180m shares from 212m. Buying by public funds was not seen
and trading by arbitrageurs dominated activity. Losers led gainers by 780 to
133, with 180 issues remaining unchanged. The Topix index of all
first-section stocks lost 20.28 to 1,292.99 but in London, the ISE/Nikkei 50
index rose 1.95 to 1,039.94.
Market participants said the government's 'guidance' to financial
institutions not to sell holdings was distorting the market.
Rumours that a leading Japanese broker had advised clients to liquidate
holdings worried some investors, as did speculation that September money
supply figures, to be announced today, would indicate negative growth.
However, some investors hope weak economic indicators may prompt the Bank of
Japan to ease interest rates. One strategist noted that the Bank of Japan's
branch managers' meeting at the end of October could provide indication of
the timing of a cut.
Pharmaceutical stocks, which had previously gained on the Aids and
Interferon themes, fell on profit-taking. Green Cross, the most active issue
of the day, lost Y50 to Y1,480 and Meiji Milk Products fell Y28 to Y942.
Retailers fell on last week's weak interim earnings announcements. Isetan, a
leading department store, lost Y130 to Y2,220 and Marui fell Y30 to Y1,030.
Export-oriented companies were lower as the yen regained its strength
against the dollar. Hitachi lost Y22 to Y726 and NEC fell Y14 to Y692. Japan
Radio, the wireless telecommunications equipment maker, tumbled Y200 to
Y1,320 on fears of poor earnings.
In Osaka, the OSE average fell 361.66 to 18,709.67 in volume of 7.4m shares.
Roundup
The bullishness which sent Hong Kong higher yesterday was not apparent
elsewhere in the region. Bombay was closed to enable brokers to complete
settlement of deals but trading should resume today.
HONG KONG shot up in late trading on a wave of overseas buying which brokers
attributed to renewed confidence in the long-term economic prospects for
China and Hong Kong. The Hang Seng Index ended up 104.58 or 1.75 per cent at
6,089.91. Turnover fell to HKDollars 3.42bn from Friday's HKDollars 3.99bn.
Among the most active stocks were HSBC Holdings, up HKDollars 1 at HKDollars
59, Cheung Kong, up 80 cents at HKDollars 22.60 and Sun Hung Kai Properties,
up 50 cents at HKDollars 34.25.
SEOUL saw renewed optimism on hopes of an end to the recent political
instability. Reports that the former co-chairman of the ruling Democratic
Liberal Party was not to join a new political party boosted sentiment,
analysts said. The composite index climbed 13.25 to 539.70 in turnover of
Won315bn.
AUSTRALIA closed just off its opening level, after dipping below a key
support level earlier in the day. The All Ordinaries index dropped below
1,410 to 1,408.8 before recovering to close at 1,417.6, down 2.2. Turnover
was moderate at ADollars 169.5m.
The biggest volume in the mining sector was Forsayth, which traded 44m
shares overnight at 24 cents. Brokers said the deal was crossed by the Perth
stockbroker Hartley Poynton, which sold a further 11m to the London-based
brokers County NatWest in an overseas deal. The chairman Mr Andrew Kroger
was believed to be the seller and the shares finished unchanged at 25 cents.
NEW ZEALAND closed at a 13-month low, as the NZSE-40 capital index fell as
low as 1,357.71 before recovering to a 1,365.36 finish, down 8.59.
Fletcher Challenge was the focus of the market, as it went ex-dividend of 7
cents. The stock ended unchanged at NZDollars 1.85.
The other stock to feature was Lion Nathan, which lost a further 10 cents to
NZDollars 4.10. It lost 11 cents on Friday on a report that a broker had
downgraded Lion's profit forecast.
TAIWAN reversed early gains to finish slightly lower. The weighted index,
which opened up more than 20 points, closed 14.81 lower at 3,734.51.
Turnover was TDollars 13.7bn.
MANILA's power cuts continued to interrupt trading and the composite index
closed 13.50 lower at 1,357.61 as combined turnover eased to 211m pesos from
234m. PLDT fell 10 pesos to 940 pesos in spite of a strong rise in US
trading on Friday.
KUALA LUMPUR concentrated on domestic issues as the composite index gained
4.28 to 612.33.
SINGAPORE's investors remained buyers of Malaysian issues and the Straits
Times Industrial index fell 5.71 to 1,328.41.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 47
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12529</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Strong bonds lend support to
German equities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff and HILARY BARNES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEITHER Paris nor Frankfurt were particularly enthusiastic about the gains
which took the Eurotrack up yesterday, writes Our Markets Staff.
FRANKFURT was supported by a strong bond market early in the day, to the
discomfiture of derivatives traders. The Bundesbank's average bond yield
fell another 11 basis points, from 7.47 to 7.36 per cent.
The DTB traders, caught short ahead of the options and futures expiry last
Friday, were confounded again yesterday by the continuation of an impressive
bond rally which has run since late August, and left them no choice but to
cover again.
Little investment buying was seen as the DAX index rose 17.46 to 1,479.07.
International blue chips such as Allianz, Deutsche Bank, Daimler and Siemens
were prominent among the winners, although Hoechst scored the biggest gain
in this class with a rise of DM6 to DM227.
Fundamentals registered in the DM7.50 rise to DM466 in BMW, placed on BZW's
buy list last week. Thyssen fell DM7 to DM157.50, following its news of a 25
per cent cut in fourth quarter steel production.
PARIS had another lacklustre day in turnover of just FFr1.54bn. The CAC-40
index ended 14.88 higher at 1,679.06, in the middle of its 28-point trading
range for the day.
The market was pleased by the news from Generale des Eaux that it expects
net attributable profit to grow by 11 to 12 per cent in spite of trimming
its 1992 turnover estimate. The stock rose FFr50 to FFr1,888. By contrast,
Lyonnaise des Eaux fell FFr10.50 to FFr465.
CMB fell FFr7.10 to FFr168 after JP Morgan downgraded its 1992 and 1993
earnings estimates for the company.
MILAN showed signs of consolidation after its recent rally, the Comit index
falling 6.59 to 411.11 in turnover estimated at less than Friday's L167.5bn.
Fiat fell L107 to L4,225, Generali L750 to L27,720 and Mediobanca L460 to
L10,930. But privatisation stocks bucked the trend, with Credito Italiano
rising L90 to L2,290 and Nuovo Pignone up L170 to L5,350.
Stet lost L43 to L1,292 in a London reaction to the company's rushed
presentations last Thursday, explaining its reasons for buying Finsiel.
Ras fell L210 or 1.3 per cent to L15,710 as the insurer's rights issue got
under way, while its savings shares lost L177 or 2.3 per cent to L7,521.
Shares in the engineering group, Worthington, were suspended pending details
of an alleged sale of a majority stake in the group by Dresser Industries of
Dallas to Ingersoll Dresser Pump Company. Analysts said that Ingersoll would
be obliged by the new 'Opa' laws to buy out minority shareholders in
Worthington.
AMSTERDAM saw pressure on cyclicals intensify as the CBS tendency index
retreated 1.5 to 104.0 in moderate volume. Retrenchment in world steel left
Hoogovens at a four-year low as it shed Fl 3.20, or 9 per cent to Fl 31.00.
Oce van der Grinten plunged nearly 19 per cent after a bigger-than-forecast
fall in third quarter earnings, partly because of the strength of the
guilder. It closed Fl 9.00 lower at Fl 38.50.
Reports that sales at its stores had weakened drove Ahold down Fl 2.90 to Fl
73.20, although it repeated earlier forecasts of higher 1992 profits.
ZURICH was led higher by banks, encouraged by easing interest rates, as the
SMI index rose 21.2 to 1,904.7.
Turnover was moderate. In banking, where German banks were said to have put
their Swiss counterparts on the buy list, UBS was the most active stock as
it rose SFr15 to SFr814, CS Holding gained SFr35 to SFr1,990 and SBC SFr5 to
SFr286.
BRUSSELS saw further weakness in Petrofina which eased BFr450 or 5.9 per
cent to BFr7,150 on continued concerns about the future of the Ekofisk oil
field. The Bel-20 index fell 3.38 to 1,091.07.
STOCKHOLM was unmoved by a sharp fall in Skanska's eight month pre-tax
profit and the Affarsvarlden index finished 1.3 lower at 660.3 in turnover
of SKr308m.
Skanska's B shares rose SKr1.50 to SKr46.00 as the results proved better
than expectations.
COPENHAGEN's all share index was down by 1.02 to 254.20, a new low for this
year, writes Hilary Barnes. Unidanmark fell DKr3 to DKr113 following the
bank's announcement that it expects a DKr4bn loss this year. The bank also
announced that it is raising supplementary capital, laying off staff and
concentrating on domestic business.
MADRID was supported in low turnover by a strong banking sector and a better
performance from utilities as the general index rose 1.36 to 195.32.
VIENNA was dragged lower by the publication of a sell recommendation by
Morgan Stanley on OMV, which fell Sch38 to Sch650. The ATX index fell 12.76
to 770.25.
ISTANBUL fell to a four-month low as Ergeli, down TL250 to TL2,900,
disappointed the market with third quarter results. The index lost 104.35 or
2.7 per cent to 3,790.28 in turnover of TL109.5bn.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                   FT-SE ACTUARIES SHARE INDICES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
October 19                                           THE EUROPEAN SERIES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes                    Open     11.30    12.00    13.00
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100             997.53   1001.17  1000.65   999.45
FT-SE Eurotrack 200           1059.641    062.69  1060.41  1059.28
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                 14.00     15.00    16.00    Close
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100             999.57    999.66  1001.97  1001.00
FT-SE Eurotrack 200            1060.90   1060.76  1064.11  1063.18
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                       Oct 16    Oct 15    Oct 14    Oct 13    Oct 12
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100    996.54    986.39    992.09    999.62    984.55
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1066.23   1061.28   1074.77   1085.38   1069.79
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
High/day: 100 - 1002.22; 200 - 1066.42
Low/day: 100 - 997.35 200 - 1058.44
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 47
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12530</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MINING issues featured strongly as prices recovered some ground lost last
week. The gold index gained 15 to 799 while the overall index was 11
stronger at 2,942. Industrials gave up earlier gains to close down 3 at
3,936.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 47
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12531</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / World Stock Markets: Hong Kong illuminates darkening week
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM COCHRANE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
US EQUITIES turned in midstream last week, but after a recovery on Monday
and a good start to the quarterly reporting season on Tuesday - subsequently
marred by disappointing progress reports from IBM and Philip Morris - New
York still had enough left to lead the FT-Actuaries World Index into a 1.3
per cent gain in local currency terms.
In most of the major investment blocs, the week ended less happily than it
began. Europe was subdued as downgrades moved from corporate earnings to
national economic prospects in Germany, France and the UK in particular; for
Japan, even the bulls were saying that hopes of a further cut in interest
rates, and recovery, were counterbalanced by short-term fears for the
economy and corporate profits.
Hong Kong, however, was more interested in a massive underdeveloped economy:
China. The successful resolution of Sino-US trade negotiations pushed up the
market early in the week and unsupported rumours of an early resolution to
the airport financing argument kept it going to achieve the best gain of the
week.
Hoare Govett Asia says on Hong Kong that the pro-reform flavour of the 14th
party congress in Beijing has been appreciated, and that this week the
impending visit to Beijing by Mr Chris Patten, governor of Hong Kong, will
dictate market movements.
The week's most serious underperformer was South Africa, where local
institutions are not buying shares and where, further, there is evidence
that they are switching out of equities and into bonds and cash.
Political strife between the government and the ANC has combined with hints
about higher taxes and a rise in the financial rand, which tends to depress
shares in local currency terms; and it is known that some R4bn of rights
issues are in the immediate supply pipeline.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                       MARKETS IN PERSPECTIVE
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                % change     % change in
               % change in local currency **    sterling**  US Dollars**
              1 Week  4 Weeks  1 Year  Start of Start of      Start of
                                         1992     1992          1992
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Austria       +0.47   -5.79    -18.20   -10.65    +4.68        -7.30
Belgium       -0.89   -3.47     -6.19    -6.14    +8.94        -3.51
Denmark       +0.80   -5.06    -31.24   -29.26   -17.36       -26.81
Finland       +3.42   +6.98    -21.00   -14.72   -14.54       -24.33
France        +0.10  -10.53     -8.97    -5.27   +10.53        -2.11
Germany       +1.42   -7.38    -10.56    -9.75    +4.70        -7.28
Ireland       -2.27  -11.66    -26.15   -22.32   -10.05       -20.34
Italy         +4.84  +12.10    -15.42   -14.64   -14.55       -24.33
Netherlands   -0.20   -2.97     -1.25    +1.81   +18.07        +4.57
Norway        -0.65   -7.37    -32.18   -22.97   -13.67       -23.55
Spain         -0.31  -10.64    -26.58   -21.62   -19.15       -28.39
Sweden        -0.88  -12.03    -23.80   -15.85    -5.41       -16.23
Switzerland   -0.02   -1.71     +8.12   +10.57   +28.30       +13.62
UK            +0.71   -0.01     -1.93    +2.25    +2.25        -9.44
EUROPE        +0.64   -3.42     -7.01    -3.72    +3.91        -7.97
Australia     -3.25   -7.37    -14.18   -16.45   -10.52       -20.56
Hong Kong     +6.49   +5.22    +47.94   +39.46   +58.48       +40.35
Japan         +1.17   -3.22    -28.40   -22.77    -9.05       -19.44
Malaysia      +1.62   +4.15    +17.07    +8.16   +32.82       +17.63
New Zealand   -0.44   -7.64    -10.15   -16.44    -5.32       -16.13
Singapore     -0.85   -1.07     -8.74   -17.29    -5.65       -16.44
Canada        -0.52   -7.43    -10.28   -10.27    -5.99       -16.74
USA           +2.11   -2.44     +5.28    -1.05   +11.72        -1.05
Mexico        +1.80   +9.12     +4.11    -1.37    +8.08        -4.28
South Africa  -5.84   -8.97    -16.00   -18.42   -30.50       -38.45
WORLD INDEX   +1.34   -2.93     -9.21    -8.60    +2.69        +2.70
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
** Based on October 16th 1992.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Copyright, The Financial Times Limited, Goldman, Sachs &amp; Co., and County
NatWest Securities
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 47
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12532</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Reebok results fall below Wall
Street expectations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
REEBOK International, the US sports shoe maker, yesterday posted
disappointing earnings for the third quarter and warned that its
fourth-quarter results would trail earlier projections.
Net income for the quarter advanced to Dollars 74.4m, or 80 cents a share,
on sales of Dollars 863.2m, from Dollars 66.2m, or 71 cents, on sales of
Dollars 764.3m a year earlier.
Most analysts had expected earnings of about 83 cents a share in the latest
quarter.
The results were released after Wall Street's close, but shares in Reebok
were unavailable for late trading yesterday. The stock closed at Dollars 29,
up Dollars  5/8 on the day.
Mr Paul Fireman, chairman and chief executive, said the company had cut its
expected full-year earnings from operations to a range of Dollars 2.50 to
Dollars 2.55 a share from earlier estimates of Dollars 2.70 to Dollars 2.85.
Although sales of Reebok and Rockport brands increased in the quarter, sales
of Ellesse and AVIA fell sharply. Ellesse sales dropped to Dollars 12.2m
from Dollars 20.4m, while AVIA lost 22.4 per cent to Dollars 36.4m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12533</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: American Cyanamid shows
improvement
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AMERICAN Cyanamid, the US pharmaceuticals and chemicals company, yesterday
posted third-quarter net earnings of Dollars 61m, or 68 cents a share,
compared with Dollars 56m, or 60 cents, a year earlier.
Earnings per share advanced more sharply than net earnings, thanks to fewer
shares outstanding in the 1992 quarter.
Sales rose 7 per cent to Dollars 1.2bn from Dollars 1.12bn.
The company's medical group saw higher sales and earnings in the quarter,
led by pharmaceuticals and medical devices.
Agricultural sales also advanced in the three months, and the group narrowed
its traditional third-quarter loss.
Cyanamid, which has been moving away from the chemicals business, said
chemical sales fell in the quarter, largely reflecting the divestment of
several businesses and the discontinuation of some product lines.
Operating earnings for the chemicals group, however, rose in the quarter,
led by paper chemicals, resin products and water treatment chemicals.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12534</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: US banks show recovery trend
continuing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE recovery trend in US banking continued yesterday when a quadrupled
third-quarter net profit was unveiled by NationsBank, the large
south-eastern regional group formed last year by the merger of C &amp; S Sovran
and NCNB.
NationsBank said it earned Dollars 350m of net income in the third quarter,
compared with Dollars 81m a year ago. Earnings per share were Dollars 1.40,
compared with 31 cents in the same quarter last year.
For the first nine months of 1992 net income more than doubled year-on-year,
to Dollars 911m. Return on equity was a strong 17.27 per cent for the first
nine months of 1992.
Third-quarter 1992 net loan write-offs were Dollars 141m, down from Dollars
280m a year ago. Bad debt provisions in the quarter were Dollars 150m, well
below the Dollars 430m of a year ago.
In Connecticut, Shawmut National, an indicator of the state of the New
England economy, recorded a more modest Dollars 13m third quarter net
profit, compared with Dollars 2.3m a year ago.
Shawmut's earnings per share were 14 cents, compared with two cents a year
ago.
The bank's bad debt provisions were Dollars 43.6m in the quarter, down from
Dollars 57m a year ago.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12535</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Italy in move to settle row over Efim's
debts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ITALY yesterday tried to end a damaging row with foreign banks by saying it
would pay some debts of Efim, the state holding company which owes foreign
lenders about L4,000bn (Dollars 3bn), Reuter reports from Rome.
The conglomerate's debts and the row over how they should be repaid was
widely blamed for undermining Italy's credibility in financial markets
during its worst economic crisis in years.
A statement from the office of Mr Giuliano Amato, prime minister, said the
government was now prepared to cover the debts of Efim and companies it
controlled 100 per cent.
'The cabinet has put at the disposition of (Efim's) liquidator finances to
pay the corporation's debts and those of the companies that were 100 per
cent owned,' a statement said.
Efim controls about 140 companies, not all wholly-owned, ranging from
helicopter-makers to glass manufacturers, and those only partially owned may
not be covered by the decree.
According to recent testimony by Mr Alberto Predieri, Efim liquidator, Nuova
Safim, a 100 per cent-owned sub-holding company, owed 90 per cent of the
money lent by foreigners.
Efim's debts to foreign and domestic lenders and suppliers are L17,500bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12536</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: German minister agrees to takeover of Minol
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE takeover of the east German oil company Minol by a consortium including
the German steelmaker Thyssen and the French oil company Elf-Aquitaine, has
been approved by Mr Theo Waigel, the German finance minister, Reuter reports
from Bonn.
The finance ministry said the takeover would secure around 7,000 jobs in
eastern Germany.
The Federal Cartel Office, which must make a final ruling on the venture,
said it had no preliminary reservations.
Mr Joachim Gruenewald, state secretary in the finance ministry, said: 'With
planned investment of around DM6bn (Dollars 4.20bn) . . . this privatisation
is one of the biggest planned for east German industry.'
Under the agreement reached with the Berlin-based Treuhand privatisation
agency, the Elf-led consortium pledged to invest at least DM4bn. Should it
fail to do so, it would become liable to penalties, the ministry said.
The core of investment would go towards building a new oil refinery in Leuna
in east Germany, with an annual capacity of 10m tonnes of crude oil, for
DM4.3bn.
A Treuhand agency spokesman would neither confirm nor deny weekend press
reports that claimed the agency had paid the consortium DM2.2bn to purchase
Minol.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12537</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / EC toxic waste accord is near
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRONWEN MADDOX, Environment Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AGREEMENT is likely at today's EC Environment Council on a new regulation to
limit trade in non-radioactive toxic waste, after two years of negotiation.
The new rules will prevent EC members from exporting toxic waste to
countries outside the Community and the European Free Trade Association, a
move designed to protect developing countries from becoming dumping grounds.
The rules will also ban imports from non-European developed countries,
although developing countries will still be allowed to ship waste to the EC
and Efta for treatment.
The stumbling block has been the issue of whether EC countries should have
the right to ban imports of toxic waste from each other. The right to refuse
imports is supported by Britain, which has backed the principle of national
self-sufficiency in treating hazardous waste, and by France, which spent the
summer in bitter rows over whether it could ban imports of German waste.
However, today's council is likely to agree that Luxembourg, Portugal,
Greece and Ireland should be allowed to export some waste to other EC
countries as they produce too little to dispose of it economically at home.
If the council reaches agreement, the EC will be able to ratify the Basle
Convention, an international treaty governing trade in hazardous waste which
came into force in May.
Under the new rules, countries could maintain imports of waste within the EC
and Efta. The UK last year imported 44,000 tonnes of hazardous waste, nearly
half of it coming from Switzerland and Belgium.
The council will also discuss an EC position on the 1987 Montreal Protocol,
designed to reduce the emission of gases which could harm the ozone layer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12538</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Brussels angry at Chernobyl restart
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The European Commission said yesterday it was deeply worried by Ukraine's
decision to restart one of the three power plants at Chernobyl, the site of
the world's worst nuclear accident in 1986, Reuter reports from Brussels.
Leaks of radioactive gases at a similar plant in Lithuania in the last few
days proved the danger of such reactors and the start-up at Chernobyl could
only fuel anxiety in those two countries as well as across Europe, EC
Commissioner Karel Van Miert said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12539</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Lloyds plans to shut down merchant banking division
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LLOYDS BANK, the smallest of the Big Four clearers by asset size, is to
close Lloyds Merchant Bank, its loss-making merchant-banking operation, and
transfer three other business units to the parent bank.
The decision to shut Lloyds Merchant Bank, a tiny operation compared with
the merchant bank arm of Barclays or National Westminster, comes after
several years in which it has incurred losses.
In the first half of this year Lloyds Merchant Bank announced a loss of
Pounds 14m. The bank will be gradually phased out of existence during the
next two years, but only 50 jobs will be lost from its 360 workforce.
At the same time, Lloyds is to transfer Lloyds Investment Managers, Lloyds
Development Capital, its venture capital arm, and Lloyds Bank Stockbrokers
to report directly to the parent bank.
When the bank reported an 11 per cent increase in interim pre-tax group
profits to Pounds 369m in August, investment managing and stockbroking were
reported to be doing well.
The closure of Lloyds Merchant Bank is the latest in a series of withdrawals
by Lloyds from unprofitable activities in the UK and overseas to concentrate
on more profitable retail banking lines of business and small and
medium-sized corporate business.
At the time of Big Bang in 1986, Lloyds Merchant Bank was intended to
compete with the merchant banking arms of Lloyds' main rivals, but its range
of activities contracted steadily in the late 1980s.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12540</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Separatists gain heart in row over Canadian reforms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GROWING prospects that Canadian voters will reject a package of
constitutional reforms in next Monday's national referendum have ignited
confidence among Quebec separatists hoping for an eventual breakaway by the
province.
The separatists have taken courage from opinion polls showing a widening
margin of voters throughout the country opposed to the package, known as the
Charlottetown agreement.
Opposition is especially strong in Quebec and British Columbia. Although the
results of the referendum will not be binding, the deal in practice requires
the approval of Quebec and at least a clear majority of the nine
English-speaking provinces to be implemented.
While Quebec nationalists insisted in the early stages of the campaign that
a No vote would simply be a rejection of the terms of the Charlottetown
deal, they have more recently linked a No vote to support for greater
autonomy for the province.
Mr Lucien Bouchard, leader of the separatist Bloc Quebecois, said at the
weekend that a No victory would mark the end of attempts at national
reconciliation and usher in a new era in Canadian politics.
Opposition to the agreement has grown in spite of overwhelming backing among
the country's political leaders, organised business and trade unions.
Supporters still insist they can make up lost ground in the final week of
the campaign. But most observers now think the odds favour a No victory in
at least Quebec and British Columbia.
Critics have found it easy to zero in on the defects of what is a delicate
compromise between various regions and population groups. The recession and
the widespread unpopularity of Mr Brian Mulroney, the prime minister, have
given the opponents extra ammunition.
The reforms, aimed at keeping Quebec within the federal fold, envisage
greater autonomy for all the provinces in areas such as immigration and
education. They also aim to transform the Senate from an appointed to an
elected body, with equal representation for all the provinces.
But western provinces have baulked at the enshrinement of Quebec's status as
a 'distinct society' within the constitution.
According to an opinion poll published yesterday, a clear majority of
Canadians want Mr Mulroney to call an election or resign if the
Charlottetown deal is rejected.
Mr Matthew Barrett, chairman of the Bank of Montreal, said yesterday the
most unsettling implication of a No victory was the boost it would give to
separatist forces in Quebec. 'At a minimum, a No vote is a vote for
constitutional gridlock,' Mr Barrett said. 'A new deal, let alone a better
deal, will be extraordinarily difficult to achieve.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12541</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Bush fights to regain initiative in final TV debate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT George Bush last night launched his most confident and pointed
attack so far on Governor Bill Clinton, in a late attempt to revitalise his
flagging campaign for re-election on November 3 and to dent his Democratic
opponent's big lead.
After hesitant performances in the first two televised debates between the
candidates, Mr Bush took the offensive in last night's third debate to
accuse Mr Clinton of trying systematically to take both sides on every
issue.
'There's a pattern here of appealing to the auto workers and then trying to
appeal to the spotted owl crowd. You can't do that as president,' Mr Bush
said.
Few analysts last night believed that a strong debate performance would be
enough to do more than nibble at Mr Clinton's lead in the polls, which in
the past 24 hours have shown him ahead by between 12 and 18 percentage
points.
Yet the president at least dispelled the pervasive reports of recent days
suggesting that he had already given up the fight.
He met the expectations of his supporters by delivering an attack on his
opponent's record as governor of Arkansas and by drawing a philosophical
distinction between himself and Mr Clinton, who he said was 'still talking
about spending more and taxing more'.
In a stinging barb, Mr Bush warned Americans to 'watch your wallet' if Mr
Clinton wins.
Mr Bush got support from an unexpected quarter when Mr Ross Perot, the
independent candidate in the presidential election, dismissed as irrelevant
Mr Clinton's experience as governor of such a small state as Arkansas. 'I
could say I ran a small grocery store on the corner and extrapolate that and
say I could run Walmart; that's just not so,' he quipped.
But Mr Perot reserved his harshest words for Mr Bush, whom he accused of
building up foreign dictators and then seeking to exonerate himself by
admitting error.
'Create Saddam Hussein with taxpayers' money, step up to the plate and say
it was a mistake. Create Manuel Noriega, step up to the plate and say it was
a mistake . . . that's leadership, folks,' he jeered.
While Mr Clinton appeared at times defensive, many analysts felt immediately
after the debate that he had done at least enough to cement his already
solid lead in a majority of states.
With last night's final debate out of the way, President Bush is heading
south to bolster his flagging support in the two Carolinas, Georgia and
possibly Florida. Governor Clinton is embarking on a 'winning the west'
tour, including stops in Nevada, Wyoming and Montana.
Ghost of campaign past drives Democrats, Page 5
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12542</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / The Lex Column: Skanska
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Yesterday's warning that writedowns at Skanska will be even bigger this year
than in 1991 is a sober reminder of the Swedish influence on European
property markets. In one of the last big binges of the late 1980s Swedish
investors reacted to the lifting of domestic capital controls by pouring
money into German, Belgian, Dutch and British real estate. They are now
suffering the hangover. Many have already been wiped out; others or their
bankers are well represented in the list of potential sellers waiting for
the first flicker of an upturn.
Skanska certainly paid top dollar for two City developments, one of which
remains tenantless while the other is just 15 per cent let. To be fair there
is no indication that the company will do other than hang on to these
investments, and it has the balance-sheet strength to do so. For the moment
there are presumably enough headaches back home, what with extraordinary
losses from unauthorised dollar speculation and mismatched loans.
Bottom fishers may be attracted by the SKr48 share price given net assets of
perhaps SKr80-90 per share and signs of resilience in the main contracting
businesses. Assets, though, are hard to value these days, not least in
Scandinavia. There is also a feeling in Stockholm that things will get worse
before they get better.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12543</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / The Lex Column: UK banks
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Since banks are supposed to be interest rate-sensitive stocks, they might
have been expected to forge ahead after Friday's base rate cut. Instead,
Barclays has fallen by 11 per cent amid renewed worries about its dividend,
Lloyds is scarcely changed, National Westminster is down 1 per cent and even
the highly-regarded Bank of Scotland is down 4 per cent. The market
evidently believes interest rates are still far too high to stop asset
prices falling. It follows that the quality of bank loan books continues to
deteriorate.
In this context the latest survey of UK bank lending from Robert Fleming and
Dun &amp; Bradstreet is hardly encouraging. High-risk corporate loans rose by
Pounds 700m to Pounds 31.8bn in the first half of 1992. Banks would need
Pounds 4.2bn in additional provisions to cover 30 per cent of that total.
The main burden would fall on Barclays, National Westminster, Bank of
Scotland and Royal Bank (whose shares have risen 3 per cent since the rate
cut).
Small wonder, then, that investors are snapping up banks with high foreign
currency earnings such as HSBC and Standard Chartered. But both depend
heavily on the volatile Hong Kong market. The latter's profits may be
boosted by currency movements but these also weaken its tightish capital
ratio. As for a traditionally defensive stock like Abbey National, it cannot
remain unscathed indefinitely if house prices continue to fall.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12544</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AF6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / The Lex Column: The burning question
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The government's partial climbdown over pit closures may prove to be the
worst possible outcome for electricity companies. On the surface it looks as
if the generators and the regional electricity companies (RECs) will get the
coal supply contracts the market was hoping for. Simply slowing the rate of
pit closures, though, may not stop rebel Tory MPs voting against the
government. Even assuming victory tomorrow, there is a lingering suspicion
that Mr Heseltine will use the breathing space to look for ways to shovel
more British coal over to the electricity industry.
Offer, the electricity regulator, could create some slack if it can show
that the RECs breached their duty to purchase power at the most economical
rate in buying from independent gas-fired generators. Shares in Norweb and
Southern, which have the heaviest involvement in gas-fired generation, fell
sharply yesterday ahead of Mr Heseltine's statement. But the regulator was
happy to promote gas-fired generation in the name of wider competition. The
RECs will have every right to feel aggrieved if he forces them to cancel
projects which were contracted when gas was the cheapest energy source
available.
The government may be inclined to trim nuclear generation, especially since
the privatisation of Nuclear Electric is a distant prospect. Decommissioning
aged Magnox reactors would certainly leave room for more coal. The costs,
though, are deeply uncertain. National Power and PowerGen might still be
coerced into taking more British coal under the veiled threat of a
monopolies inquiry. Without back-to-back contracts with the RECs, their
margins would be squeezed. With dividends covered over three times by
earnings and forecast earnings growth well into double digits, the
generators certainly have an embarrassment of riches. A bigger danger then
for shareholders would be that they call the government's bluff and find
themselves taken to the MMC.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12545</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AF5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / French summer output stagnates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FRANCE'S industrial output flattened out in July and August, making
opposition parties nervous about the bleak economic legacy they might
inherit if they win legislative elections next spring.
Publishing figures for both July and August, Insee, the government
statistics office, said industrial output stagnated over the two months.
This overall figure masked falls in manufacturing production and
construction of 1.2 per cent and 1.7 per cent respectively, from their June
levels, which were offset by a 4.7 per cent rise in energy output.
This evidence that French industry, at best, marked time during the summer
months casts serious doubt on Insee's earlier predictions of a 0.9 per cent
increase in industrial output and a 0.6 per cent rise in gross domestic
product in the third quarter.
Over the weekend, Mr Valery Giscard d'Estaing, leader of the centre-right
UDF, said one reason he thought opposition parties should be wary of forming
a government, even if they win a parliamentary majority next March, is that
they would find the situation too bad to be redressed before the next
presidential election, due in 1995.
The current opinion polls give the UDF and its electoral ally in the
legislative elections, the neo-Gaullist RPR party, a 2:1 majority over the
ruling Socialists.
Mr Giscard d'Estaing said the two parties should be satisfied of three
conditions before again agreeing to 'cohabit' in government with Mr
Mitterrand as they did in 1986-88.
These were that the economic situation should not be too serious, that a
centre-right government should be assured of enough time to improve it, and
that the president should at least be neutral and preferably should support
any government economic policy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12546</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AF4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Poor outlook for E Germany
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE business outlook for east German enterprises has continued to
deteriorate in 1992, and production is expected to be stagnant in the second
half of the year, according to a new survey of the former Communist economy.
The Institute for Economic Research in Halle reported yesterday that a
questionnaire of 300 companies showed that their positive expectations in
the first part of the year had not been fulfilled.
It cited in particular newly-privatised enterprises reporting a sharp fall
in business prospects, and a general deterioration in external conditions -
reflecting in particular the collapse in trade with eastern Europe.
The only sectors showing an upturn were construction and service industries,
according to the institute.
With the turnover of manufacturing industry expected to be stagnant in the
second half of the year, overall turnover for 1992 would be significantly
lower than in 1991.
The gloomy report coincided with a new flurry of debate in Bonn about how to
finance the cost of public transfers to the east German economy.
There were heated denials from the Chancellor's Office, and from members of
the ruling government coalition, of a report in the mass-circulation Bild
Zeitung that a compulsory loan scheme was once again under debate.
The newspaper said the plan involved a 7.5 per cent surcharge on income tax,
payable for 10 years, which would be repaid without any interest rate.
The plan was flatly rejected by Mr Otto Lambsdorff, leader of the Free
Democrats in the ruling coalition. What was required was rigorous savings
from the government budget, and only if that failed to reduce the budget
deficit should tax increases be contemplated, he said.
The issue of raising more money to reduce the deficit and finance spending
in the east is a key question on the agenda of talks for a 'solidarity pact'
between German industry, trade unions, the government and opposition.
Trade union leaders have made it clear they will not agree to any restraint
on wages unless it is matched by sacrifices by the business sector and
high-income groups.
Editorial comment, Page 24
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12547</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AF3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Queen welcomed to Bonn, Britain welcomed to Europe: Monarch
emphasises bilateral relations and German reunification
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE flags of Britain, Germany and the European Community flew over Bonn
yesterday to welcome Queen Elizabeth on a state visit, and to underline
Germany's desire to see the UK as an enthusiastic EC member state.
The European theme was a clear German leitmotiv on the first day of the
visit by the Queen and the Duke of Edinburgh, who will spend most of their
time in Berlin and the states of former East Germany.
President Richard von Weizsacker, the German head of state, stressed the
point repeatedly in his welcoming address, that 'Europe without the British
is unthinkable'.
'We in Germany are convinced that we need the special British contribution
to Europe more than ever,' he said.
The response from the Queen was slightly more subdued, with the emphasis
rather on bilateral relations and her enthusiasm for German unification. Yet
she rose to the European theme, with a firm statement that 'We British are
Europeans. That means that we are your partners in the European Community.'
'Building the European Community has never been easy,' she added. 'Nor, as
so much of our continent emerges from a dark age, has it ever been more
important.'
Both heads of state were anxious to paper over some of the recent verbal
cracks in the bilateral relationship, with good humour if possible.
The German president remarked that 'recently a war of words was declared
over, without any declaration of war having ever been given. How nice]' It
was perhaps a gentle reminder that the disagreement over turmoil on the
currency markets which began and ended in Britain.
The Queen remarked that 'like all close friends, we do not always see eye to
eye, but, as friends should, we try not to let the sun go down on our
quarrels. We have too much to lose to allow that.'
Her real enthusiasm was reserved for a tribute to German unification: 'The
division of Germany was always artificial,' she declared, 'and an affront to
freedom. Its end was widely welcomed in the UK.'
Not only that, she said, it gave her personal pleasure, 'not least because
many of my German ancestors had close associations with places in the new
states'. It was a personal touch which will underline her already huge
popularity with the German population.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12548</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AF2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Thyssen to slash steel production
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THYSSEN Stahl, Germany's biggest steel maker, is to slash production by
almost a quarter and introduce short-time working in the last three months
of this year.
In an announcement which coincided with renewed warnings that the industry
could soon face an international structural crisis, the company said output
from its two hot-rolling mills would be 300,000 tonnes less than in the last
quarter of 1991.
The cuts, intended to help stabilise prices, would affect practically all
other manufacturing stages, it added. No details were available of numbers
affected by the introduction of short time.
Blaming falling orders and increasing price competition inside the European
Community - 'the last large open market' - Thyssen said the rise in imports
from eastern Europe had been especially strong.
According to the RWI economics institute in Essen, a leading centre of
expertise on the industry, manufacturers in former communist states are now
selling steel at 'almost any price' inside the Community because their
domestic markets have collapsed.
East European steel imports into Germany are expected to reach 2.3m tonnes
this year, compared with 900,000 tonnes in 1991.
The German industry, which recently warned of the need for up to 20,000 job
losses by the end of 1994, has been squeezed progressively throughout this
year by falling prices and shrinking domestic and international demand.
Foreign markets have failed to recover in line with forecasts, and key
domestic customers in the plant engineering and vehicle industries have
reported steep falls in new orders. Steel price increases imposed in the
spring have since been eroded, and total production has fallen.
According to government figures, German steel output fell 2.2 per cent in
the first nine months of this year.
The RWI institute said although available data suggested that steel makers
were currently being hit by a 'normal' cyclical downturn, the flood of cheap
imports combined with the threatened closure of the US market to imports
could cause long-term damage.
If European exporters were refused access to North America as a result of
domestic suppliers' complaints of dumping, and the imports continued, the
result could be structural over-capacity in Europe.
This could lead to a situation last experienced in the late 1970s, when
European manufacturers demanded state subsidies to gain or protect market
share, the institute said.
There were already signs that this was happening. 'In Spain, Italy and
France, open or hidden subsidies are being paid with little or no
requirement for capacity reductions,' the institute claimed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12549</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Hafslund Nycomed buys Spain's Laboratorios
Leo
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN FOSSLI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   OSLO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HAFSLUND Nycomed, the Norwegian group best known for its X-ray imaging
products, has announced the acquisition of family-owned Spanish
pharmaceuticals company Laboratorios Leo for NKr171m (Dollars 28.45m).
The acquisition was made through its Nycomed Imaging subsidiary, which
intends to build a sales and distribution network in Spain.
Nycomed Pharma, another Hafslund subsidiary, will utilise Laboratorios as a
channel through which to sell its products. 'The Spanish company gives
Nycomed Pharma a presence in an important European market for
pharmaceuticals, which enables a future introduction of (Nycomed Pharma's)
proprietary and/or in-licensed products in the Spanish market,' Hafslund
said.
In 1992, Laboratorios expects to achieve good profitability on estimated
sales revenue of NKr120m, Hafslund said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12550</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Welcome for Swissair plan to cut jobs and
consider merger
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZURICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SWISS stock market analysts have welcomed announcements by Swissair at the
weekend that it would eliminate 1,000 jobs, slightly more than 5 per cent of
its workforce, by the end of next year, and consider merging with
Scandinavian Airlines (SAS) or Austrian Airlines.
'It is a sign that they are really dealing with their structural problems,'
said Mr Dominique Bertrand, an analyst at Swiss Bank Corporation.
In the view of many, Swissair has too small a national customer base to be a
global airline and too big a base to be a niche operator. Its personnel
costs, 40 per cent of total costs, are much higher than those of most
competitors.
The airline has been trying hard to cut costs, even shifting some
labour-intensive activities to Bombay. Earlier this year, it made 400
administrative staff in Switzerland redundant.
It has also formed alliances with SAS and Austrian Airlines in Europe and
with Delta Airlines and Singapore Airlines for intercontinental services in
a bid to cut costs by sharing facilities.
But Mr Otto Loepfe, the airline's chief executive, said at the weekend that
all this was not enough in the current depressed environment.
Swissair will suffer a large loss on operations for the third year in a row
this year, recording a net profit thanks only to sales of assets, mainly old
aircraft.
Mr Loepfe said that the airline might merge with SAS and/or Austrian
Airlines. 'That is the direction things are going,' he said, although he
cautioned that it would not happen quickly. Laws would have to be changed
first. Swiss law, for example, requires that roughly 20 per cent of Swissair
shares be held by Swiss state bodies. They now hold 20.4 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12551</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Metsa-Serla reduces deficit 53% to FM169m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
METSA-SERLA, the Finnish forestry group, reported a FM169m (Dollars 36.26m)
loss (after financial items) for the first eight months of the year. This
was a 53.6 per cent improvement on the FM364m deficit in the same period of
1991.
Net sales improved by 2.2 per cent to FM5.03bn from FM4.92bn, while its
operating loss was FM514m, compared with FM529 for the same period of last
year. There was a loss of FM21.75 a share compared with a FM41.30 loss for
the January-August period of 1991.
The operating margin was FM686m, 13.6 per cent of net sales, which was an
improvement on the FM495m operating margin and 10.1 per cent of net sales
for the first eight months of last year.
It added that an estimated FM1.74bn of the consolidated balance sheet was at
risk as a result of the floating of the markka on September 8 and estimated
the increase in Finnish markka equivalents of foreign currency net income
would offset the increase in net liabilities within about six months.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12552</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Kemira declines 80% despite static sales
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BROWN-HUMES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KEMIRA, the Finnish state-owned chemical group, yesterday reported an 80 per
cent increase in pre-tax losses to FM264m (Dollars 56.6m) in the first eight
months as sales remained static at FM7.1bn.
The company said Finland's prolonged economic recession and weak markets in
other countries were to blame.
In particular, it highlighted continuing pressure on its fertiliser
business, which has been hit by low domestic demand and lower prices in
Europe due to cheap east European imports. It is likely to close two
operations in Finland with the loss of 340 jobs.
The company says it is encouraged by increased demand for titanium dioxide
and a better performance from its chemicals unit. It expects results in the
final four months, helped by a pick-up in Finnish fertiliser sales and a
lower relative depreciation charge, to be better than last year.
The group still says its full-year result will be 'clearly negative' and may
equal last year's FM522m loss. Sales for the whole year are estimated at
FM11bn.
NESTE, the Finnish state-owned oil and petrochemicals group, suffered a loss
of FM914m (Dollars 196m) for the first eight months, its first deficit since
1986.
The result compares with a FM388m profit in the same period in 1991. Sales
rose marginally to FM36.4bn from FM36.1bn.
The group said the downturn in the world economy had an impact on its main
oil refining, petrochemicals and plastics activities.
Neste Oil, the group's largest business area, boosted sales to FM29.7m from
FM29.5m, but profits were hit by lower international refining margins and
inventory losses.
The group's figures were also affected by lower petrochemical and plastics
prices and by the impact of weaker freight rates on its shipping division.
Neste said its operating result was likely to hold steady over the last four
months of the year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12553</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Oce-van der Grinten cuts forecast
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
OCE-VAN DER Grinten, the Dutch photocopier and office equipment
manufacturer, yesterday forecast a 15 per cent decline in full-year net
profit, a downward revision of earlier projections, prompted by an
unexpected 16 per cent decline in third-quarter net profit.
The company, which had projected a rise in results for 1991-1992 ending
December 31, said net profit in the three months to August 31 dropped to Fl
18.8m (Dollars 11.4m) from Fl 22.5m a year earlier. Sales were up 3 per cent
at Fl 641m.
It blamed the continued weak state of the economy in most of its main
markets, as well as the rise of the guilder against the dollar. In the first
half, Oce had reported an 8 per cent rise in net profit.
News of the decline caused Oce's shares to fall sharply on the Amsterdam
Stock Exchange, where they closed down 19 per cent at Fl 38.50 from Fl 47.50
on Friday. Oce is the first large Dutch company to release its third-quarter
figures, with most others due to report in late October and early November.
The figures mean Oce's net profit in the first nine months was virtually
flat at Fl 70.0m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12554</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: BP quits polyethylene foam market with
Spanish sale
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL ABRAHAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Petroleum Chemicals completed its exit from polyethylene foams with
the sale of its Spanish operations to Huels Troisdorf, the German group.
BP Chemicals did not disclose the financial details of the deal. The
business employs about 60 people in a plant at Alcala de Henares which
mainly supplies the automotive and toy industries. BP Espana said the
operations represented only a small proportion of its Pta4.6bn (Dollars 43m)
turnover last year. The deal is subject to approval by the Spanish
authorities.
The move follows the sale last month of BP Chemicals' UK foams operations in
Croydon, south London, to Zotefoams, a management buy-out. The deal,
arranged by 3i, was worth more than Pounds 20m (Dollars 33.14m). The
disposals are part of BP Chemicals' strategy of focusing on areas of
competitive strength.
Huels, a specialist in heat-resistant low-pressure polyethylene foams, plans
to invest DM344m on a capital investment programme.
Last month, the UK Department of Trade and Industry cleared the sale of BP
Chemicals' 120,000-tonne-a-year low-density polyethylene unit in Antwerp to
Neste of Finland. It also sold its polyethylene film business at
Bromborough.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12555</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Skanska faces significant shortfall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BROWN-HUMES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SKANSKA, Scandinavia's largest construction and property company, will make
a substantial loss this year after yesterday reporting a 77 per cent fall in
pre-tax profits to SKr438m (Dollars 78.67m) for the first eight months.
The group was hit by heavy losses on financial operations, but the full-year
result will also reflect an estimated SKr1.5 to SKr2bn in property
write-downs and a SKr400m loss caused by the surge in Swedish short-term
interest rates in September.
Mr Lars-Ove Hakansson recently stepped down as group chairman because of the
currency and interest rate losses and was replaced by Mr Percy Barnevik,
chief executive of Asea Brown-Boveri.
Before property write-downs and taxes, Skanska will make a full-year profit
of SKr200m compared with a SKr2.2bn profit last year. This puts it on course
for a 1992 loss of more than SKr1bn after inclusion of these items.
The profits deterioration in the first first eight months was almost
entirely due to losses on financial operations as operating income was
largely unchanged at SKr1.7bn.
The group suffered an extraordinary SKr518m loss following foreign currency
deals which resulted in the dismissal of the head of its finance subsidiary,
Skanska Kapitalforvaltning, last August.
It also incurred a SKr500m loss after adjusting its money market portfolio
to market levels. Since the end of the reporting period, the group has
scaled back this portfolio substantially, to less than SKr5bn in mid-October
compared with SKr13bn a month earlier.
For the full year, the group estimates that negative net financial items
will total SKr1.6bn, double last year's level, excluding the extraordinary
foreign exchange loss.
Group revenues for the eight months fell to SKr19.97bn from SKr22.92bn, with
a prediction that the total for the year would drop to SKr30.3bn from
SKr34.6bn.
Skanska said the downturn in the Swedish construction market accelerated in
the latest period, with new residential construction expected to fall by 25
per cent during 1992.
Skanska and Volvo also announced they would bid for full control of the
investment groups Custos and Protorp which will cost the two companies
around SKr450m each.
If they succeed, they aim to sell all the assets in the companies and
dissolve them.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12556</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Unidanmark set to raise annual loss to
DKr4bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HILARY BARNES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   COPENHAGEN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
UNIDANMARK, Denmark's second largest banking group, is heading for a DKr4bn
(Dollars 700m) loss this year, more than double the 1991 DKr1.7bn deficit.
The bank is raising supplementary capital from Danish institutional
investors to prevent its capital adequacy ratio from falling below the
country's minimum 10 per cent level at the end of the year.
It also will cut staff by 1,700, or 22 per cent, over two years as part of a
programme to save DKr750m by the end of 1994. As part of a new business
strategy, the bank will withdraw from most of its international banking
operations.
'We shall become a slightly smaller bank with a lower risk profile,' Mr Hugo
Schroder, chairman of the supervisory board, said.
The cost-cutting follows soaring loss provisions at the bank, which are
expected to exceed last year's DKr5.4bn. The increase in provisions
reflects, among other things, foreign exchange losses by customers over
recent weeks.
The bank's own losses on its securities portfolio and foreign exchange have
increased by about DKr700m to DKr1bn since the half year, said the bank. But
basic financial earnings remained satisfactory, although lower than
expected, said Mr Thorleif Krarup, chief executive, brought in to run the
bank in August.
The bank has received promises from institutional investors, including
pension funds, mortgage finance institute Nykredit and insurance company
Trygg to subscribe DKr1.1bn in supplementary capital, which is being raised
through a bond issue carrying an interest rate of 1.5 percentage points over
the corresponding government bond.
Further support will be sought up to a maximum of DKr3bn. The bank said it
would remain in the red in 1993, but cost-reductions should result in a
small profit in 1994.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12557</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Paribas sees little impact in Ciments
Francais crisis
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PARIBAS, the French banking and investment group, expects only a limited
impact from the financial crisis at Ciments Francais, its former
cement-making subsidiary, according to Mr Andre Levy-Lang, the chairman.
The Paribas share price has fallen sharply this month on the revelation that
Ciments Francais had made losses believed to run to hundreds of millions of
francs on off-balance sheet financial dealings. Yesterday, Paribas' share
price rose by FFr1.5 to FFr311.
Last April, Italcementi, the Italian building materials group, agreed to pay
FFr6bn (Dollars 1.19m at current rates) for a controlling stake in the
already debt-laden Ciments Francais.
Mr Levy-Lang also revealed that Paribas's financial trading is weaker in the
current six months than it was in the first half of the year. In particular,
there had been a sharp drop in the Ecu bond market since the Danish vote
against EC monetary and political union in June. However, the impact on
Paribas of the recent currency market turmoil was limited.
Last year, Paribas made its first ever loss, FFr184m, as against a FFr2.54bn
net profit in 1990, reflecting intense competition in French banking and
provisions for the value of its property investments.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12558</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Government Bonds: Long gilts fall sharply while short end
rises strongly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS and PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE STRUCTURE of UK interest rates shifted markedly yesterday as the
financial markets absorbed the impact of the political crisis that has
sprung from the country's worsening economic position.
Long-dated gilts fell sharply, with losses of as much as one and a half
points on some issues. Last Friday's one point cut in interest rates - which
at the time gave a lift to gilts across the maturity spectrum - was seen
more as a panic reaction from a government getting into political trouble.
Yesterday's cabinet decision to delay most of its planned coal mine closures
also unnerved the market.
With no long-term economic strategy in place, such measures left the market
fearing that the government was being buffeted from one decision to the
next, with potentially serious consequences for gilts.
At the other end of the yield curve, short-dated gilts gained strongly on
the day on the hope of further interest rate cuts. Industrialists and
commentators in the City have argued that a one-point base rate cut is
insufficient to get the economy moving, putting pressure on the government
for more drastic action.
As a result, the sterling yield curve steepened sharply. The yield on
20-year bonds jumped from just over 9 per cent at the end of last week to
9.2 per cent yesterday, while two-year paper dropped from 7.1 per cent to
under 7 per cent. This left the curve some 35 basis points steeper between
the two and 20-year maturities, with around 225 basis points difference in
yield between them.
At the same time, the yield spread over German bonds, which had tightened in
recent days, began to open up. By the end of yesterday it stood at 154 basis
points, compared with 145 at the end of last week, according to Mr Chris
Anthony of UBS Phillips &amp; Drew.
OTHER European markets performed well yesterday, led by Germany.
Shorter-dated bunds did well during the morning as traders looked forward to
today's repurchase agreement - or repo - tender from the Bundesbank.
Despite the lack of any positive signs after last week's Bundesbank council
meeting, the market began the week positively in the hope that the central
bank will either reduce its fixed rate repo or switch back to a variable
rate system, possibly signalling cuts ahead. However, prices fell back and
by the end of the day the yield on 10-year bonds had settled just above 7.3
per cent.
IN FRANCE, a decline in short rates helped push longer-dated bonds forward
by more than a quarter of a point. Call rates fell by a quarter of a point
to under 11 per cent, while three-month money dropped by more than half a
point to below 10.5 per cent.
However, against the background of gains in the bund market, the spread
between German and French government bonds remained at over 100 basis
points.
SPANISH bonds rallied strongly on the news that local accounting regulations
are to be relaxed so that banks do not need to reflect the full impact of
losses on bond holdings in their accounts immediately.
In the hope that this could forestall any sell-off of bonds from the banks,
the ten-year benchmark jumped more than a point and a half, pushing the
yield down to 12.88 per cent.
US Treasury prices drifted lower across the board yesterday on supply
worries and continued concern about the implications for the market of a
Democratic victory in the presidential election.
In late trading, the benchmark 30-year government bond was down  15/16 at 96
7/32 , yielding 7.564 per cent. The two-year note was also notably weaker,
down  1/4 at 99 3/4 , to yield 4.117 per cent.
At the opening, prices extended last Friday's losses which had been incurred
in the wake of reports that Mr Bill Clinton, the Democratic nominee, had
said he would consider more expansive fiscal measures to boost the economy
if he were elected in November. Treasury investors are worried that big
increases in government spending could widen the deficit, push up interest
rates and fuel inflationary pressures.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 34
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12559</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Paris to start express clearing
of Ecu securities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SAME-DAY clearing system for Ecu securities will come into operation in
Paris at the start of next year, before the launch of a similar system
planned in the UK.
The creation of competing systems comes despite the downturn in the Ecu
market, which many investors now feel will revert to being a quiet backwater
of the Eurobond market.
The Bank of France said yesterday that it and Sicovam, the securities
clearing house, would launch the system to strengthen the Ecu market in
Paris, helping to make it a more competitive financial centre.
The new system, to be called Sire, will offer sale and repurchase
facilities, helping the encourage the development of the Ecu repo market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 34
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12560</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Bonds: CDollars Eurobond launched despite
volatility
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Investment Bank yesterday braved adverse market conditions to
launch a CDollars 200m Eurobond, via Hambros Bank, but an aggressive pricing
and fee structure deterred many London-based banks from underwriting the
transaction.
'It was a punchy deal in the wrong market, and the cut in commissions just
pushed it a shade too far,' said one banker.
However, Hambros Bank defended the deal, saying it had met keen interest
from continental European retail investors.
The Canadian bond market has been extremely volatile in the run up to the
country's referendum on constitutional reform next Monday. Last week's
downgrade of Canada's foreign debt by Standard &amp; Poor's proved a further
blow to confidence.
Nevertheless, some bankers felt that the market could have been receptive to
the right deal. 'The market has virtually discounted a No vote in the
referendum, so there is a lot of upside in the event of a Yes vote,' said
one Canadian banker. The triple-A rated European Investment Bank was
certainly the right quality of name to access the market.
However, the pricing of the the 5 1/4 -year transaction, to yield 30 basis
points above the comparable Canadian government bond yield, was felt to be
on the tight side, at least for institutional investors.
'If the market had rallied, people would have looked the other way,' one
banker said. But market conditions did not prove favourable.
However, the final straw for potential underwriters was the cutting of fees
from a standard 25 basis points for five-year fixed-price reoffer
transactions, to 22 1/2 basis points.
'Underwriters felt they had to draw the line somewhere,' explained one
banker.
London-based banks declined to participate in the deal, which was syndicated
among a group of continental European retail-targeted banks, which will try
to sell the bonds at issue price - so earning a full 1 7/8 points fees -
rather than at the fixed reoffer price.
Hambros took the bulk of the issue on its own books, allotting only CDollars
2m of bonds to co-leads and CDollars 1m to co-managers. The deal closed at
98.70 bid, below its fixed reoffer price of 98.90.
Elsewhere, Credit Foncier de France launched a FF1.5bn offering of 10-year
bonds, fungible with an existing FF3.5bn issue, making it one of the largest
in the market.
The deal was considered fairly priced at a spread of 45 basis points over
the 10-year OAT yield, and benefited from a buoyant French government bond
market.
In the dollar market, J P Morgan brought a Dollars 150m issue of 10-year
subordinated floating-rate notes, with minimum and maximum interest rates.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 34
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12561</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Liffe holds talks with CBOT over
futures trade link
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN, LAURIE MORSE and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, CHICAGO, SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE London International Financial Futures and Options Exchange (Liffe) and
the Chicago Board of Trade (CBOT) are discussing a link which would allow
some bond and debt futures to be traded interchangeably in London and
Chicago.
This would be only the second link of its kind, after the agreement between
the Chicago Mercantile Exchange and the Singapore International Monetary
Exchange, on their Eurodollar contracts.
In a letter to members, Mr Nick Durlacher, Liffe's chairman, said the
exchange was discussing with the CBOT 'the possible establishment of a
mutual offset arrangement for certain products'. The products involved are
the CBOT's 10-year US Treasury note futures and options, and Liffe's German
bund and Italian BTP futures and options.
'This approach is consistent with your board's long-held view that the
trading of identical products in different time zones is best achieved by
exchange linkages,' he added.
The CBOT also wrote to its members last week to inform them that its board
of directors had unanimously approved the proposal to set up a mutual offset
arrangement with Liffe.
'Such an arrangement could form the centrepiece of a major floor-traded,
foreign debt complex at this exchange,' it said.
Co-operation between the exchanges would allow trades made on one exchange
to be closed, or matched, on the partner exchange, increasing traders'
flexibility.
The CBOT's jealously-guarded long-bond contract has not been included in the
discussions, it said.
Liffe is also in negotiations with Globex, the electronic after-hours
trading system developed by the Chicago Mercantile Exchange (CME), Reuters
and the CBOT. If the bilateral Liffe/CBOT agreement goes ahead, Liffe's
potential membership of Globex could take a different shape, with London's
debt contracts traded on the CBOT floor during the US day and evening, and
then on Globex screens for a gap of a few hours between the Chicago evening
close and Liffe's morning opening.
The CBOT outlined its position on the plan in a letter to Mr Durlacher.
Staff from the two exchanges are expected to discuss the arrangement this
week in Chicago.
Mr Durlacher's letter to Liffe members pointed out that discussions
regarding both Globex and the linkage with the CBOT were 'at an early
stage'.
Among conditions for joining Globex is that Liffe products should trade on
the system outside the European trading day of 7am to 7pm London time.
During that period, Liffe products would continue to operate through
floor-trading and after-hours screen trading on the exchange's APT system.
At last Thursday's Liffe board meeting, a Pounds 1.25m investment in Liffe's
APT after-hours trading system was authorised, to ensure that the system
would be able to cope as volume increased.
Other stumbling blocks to an agreement with Globex include the length of the
contract: Liffe wants a short initial commitment to the system.
The CBOT has also held talks with Germany's Deutsche Terminborse (DTB),
which trades a rival German bund contract. However, an arrangement with
Liffe would forestall any agreement with the DTB. No decision has yet been
made, and, according to a CBOT official: 'All doors are open.'
The DTB said: 'Nothing is decided but discussions with the CBOT are
slowing.' It is also pursuing other channels, the official added.
Mr Les Hosking, chief executive of Sydney Futures Exchange (SFE), says he
plans to conclude negotiations this week with Globex which may see the SFE
joining the global after-hours electronic futures and options trading system
by Christmas, Reuter reports from Sydney.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 34
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12562</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Arts: Period polish - Chamber Orchestra of Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MURRAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
On the face of it, a small-orchestra programme of Beethoven, Haydn and
Schumann would seem unlikely to fill the Barbican Hall. On Saturday,
however, the band was the crack Chamber Orchestra of Europe, and their
conductor was the period specialist Nikolaus Harnoncourt. He is better known
for his Bach and Monteverdi, but he has strong convictions about performing
styles in later music too. Nothing in this programme was less than crisp and
vivid.
That was true even of the little Haydn violin concerto in G, called 'no. 2'
 -but possibly not by Haydn at all. The orchestra's leader, Marieke
Blankestijn, was the coolly assured soloist; the accompanying strings
addressed their music in strictly pre-Romantic style. For Beethoven's First
Symphony and Schumann's Third, the 'Rhenish', there were smallish period
timpani, dry and effective, and in the earlier work fine valveless trumpets.
The trumpeters returned for the Schumann with instruments of a later model,
and a perfectly balanced trio of trombones spoke beautifully in the 'Cologne
Cathedral' movement. But all the parts of the orchestra gleamed in that
work: instead of the lush, plush sound of a big modern band, we had a lithe
polyphony of voices, all colourfully distinct. Harnoncourt's beat can be
slightly unrelenting, but for the pawky Landler movement - the so-called
Scherzo - he relaxed to wholly disarming effect. The string of little dances
took on a comic mock-innocence.
In the Beethoven Harnoncourt was severer, in his more usual manner. He
insisted upon clean, sharp dynamic extremes - bracing, sometimes even
disconcerting, but convincing. If his treatment was occasionally stiff, the
exuberant brio of his players went a long way toward compensating for it.
Barbican Hall. Sponsored by ICI
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12563</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Arts: Katharina Wolpe's dedicated interpretation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL DRIVER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The career of composer Stefan Wolpe, which embraced many places - Berlin,
where he was born in 1902, the Weimar Bauhaus, Jerusalem, New York, where he
died in 1972 of indecently lingering Parkinson's Disease  - and numerous
musical styles: tonality, jazz, Busoni-esque neo-classicism, the
twelve-tonery of Schoenberg and Webern) - remains relatively little known
and his work under-appreciated. Yet he belongs in the pantheon of 20th
century masters. The piano recital by Katharina Wolpe given as part of the
MusICA series at the ICA on Sunday was most welcome and persuasive advocacy,
and it drew nearly a full house.
There was special pleasure in hearing the dedicated interpretations of the
composer's daughter, as in descrying the family likeness; but Ms. Wolpe's
performances stood by their own signal merit: her bright limpidity of touch,
keenly intelligent formal sense, and instinctively classicist and restrained
manner. The programme ranged widely over Wolpe's oeuvre, unfolding in nearly
chronological order, beginning with the knowingly-entitled Early Piece from
1924. This was an interesting piece: eclectic in harmony, touching on fugue,
and very distinctive in the way that it manages to combine dauntless linear
flow with extreme disjunctiveness of form.
Wolpe's superbly intellectual Passacaglia of 1936 followed in a reading that
was highly disciplined and articulate, full of feeling, and very slightly
marred by fingerslips. The 7 Little Studies (1944-41), none lasting more
than a few seconds, take epigrammatic subtlety as far as it can go,
pre-empting the approach of the Hungarian composer Gyorgy Kurtag. (The
miniatures of Schoenberg's Op. 19, on which Ms. Wolpe drew for encores,
chimed nicely with the studies, as with Wolpe's piano music in general.) The
far more extended 2 Studies of 1948 showed Wolpe at his best, creating a
thrillingly wide sense of musical space but by means of intimate and plastic
expressivity. Ms. Wolpe brought them off marvellously.
The seven short movements (including a pair of fugues) of the Zemach Suite,
written in 1939 and danced in New York by a choreographer of that name,
showed a Wolpe of jazzy tonal asperity; while the two Forms, No. 1 from 1959
and No. 4 (subtitled Broken Sequences) from 1969 (the second and third,
intended for chamber ensembles, fell victim to his disease), showed the
composer at his most masterfully abstract - abstract and yet subtle and
radiant and many-mooded and fascinating. The concert was a triumph.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12564</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Arts: 'The Fiery Angel' and 'Stiffelio' - Opera
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW CLARK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Germany's municipal theatres are famed for their novelty-seeking opera
productions - but as long as the music is familiar, the public will buy it.
Give them something unknown, and they are notoriously conservative. That is
why most companies stick to tried and tested favourites, however
unrecognisable the characters may appear when they reach the stage.
Fortunately, there are occasional exceptions, when a well-cast, well-staged
production makes an immediate impact, and word gets round that a
little-known work is actually worth hearing. This has been the case with The
Fiery Angel at Freiburg and Stiffelio at Ludwigshafen.
Unlike Shostakovich's two operas, which are fast becoming repertory works,
Prokofiev's more substantial output is virtually unknown in Germany. The
Freiburg Fiery Angel will help redress the balance. The work's structure may
be illogical, its grotesque climax too farcical for Teutonic taste, but it
is otherwise well-suited to the German theatre: a fast-moving, colouristic,
virtually indestructible music drama about obsession and devil-possession.
It offers a tough challenge to its leading soprano - which Vivian Tierney, a
familiar voice at Glyndebourne and ENO, meets with thrilling equanimity.
She may not yet possess the sheer weight of tone considered desirable for
Renata, but she sounded comfortable in the role, as if stamina were taken
for granted. There was ample projection and dramatic expression, and her
pure, well-produced voice had an appealing lustre, with no uneven squalls.
In visual terms, she portrayed a tragically youthful heroine, slim,
athletic, almost angelic, darting barefoot and terror-stricken across-stage
in the opening scene, clinging restlessly to Ruprecht in Act two,
unnervingly self-contained in the finale. Miss Tierney came over as a fresh
and sincere artist, drawing the best from those around her (and singing in
excellent German). She found admirable support not just from Neal Schwantes'
chivalrous young Ruprecht, but from the conductor Thomas Gabrisch, who kept
orchestral dynamics well under control.
The production team - staging by Wolfram Mehring, decor by Herbert Murauer,
costumes by Maja Scholl-Lemcke - adopted a bare essentials approach, in
which a set of dislocated representational designs, imaginatively used and
selectively lit, created a potent theatrical atmosphere. Haunting the
proceedings from the start were a group of diabolical black-hooded figures,
moving in slow motion and working up a powerful cauldron of steam in the
Agrippa scene. These, one presumed, were the same characters who,
transformed into monks, set about raping the crazed nuns in the expertly
choreographed pandemonium of Act five.
Verdi's Stiffelio, about a German Protestant priest who confronts and
eventually forgives his adulterous young wife, had never previously been
performed in Germany (although its later re-incarnation as Aroldo was staged
several times in the 1950s and 1960s). The opera's subject-matter has never
matched Italian taste, but it seems to be enjoying a minor revival north of
the Alps. London's Royal Opera will stage it in January, and Ludwigshafen's
Italian-language production will be shown later in the Netherlands, Belgium
and Poland.
The Swiss producer/designer Marco Arturo Marelli gave the work a clear,
concentrated aesthetic, drawing attention not to production tricks, but to
the human drama in Verdi's music. The action was dwarfed by a simple set of
blue-grey panels, re-aligned and re-lit according to the demands of each
scene. Together with Dagmar Niefind's black period costumes, they captured
the austere religious claustrophobia which shrouds the drama. The principals
acted with poise, while the chorus scenes had a severe formality, from which
Marelli drew maximum expressiveness. One does not often encounter Verdi
productions as discreet and intelligent as this.
There were no big Italianate voices on offer, but the cast was balanced and
sang with a sense of style. As the adulterous Lina - her symbolic red wig
and shawl providing the only visual colour all evening - Inga Nielsen
delivered her arias with delicate expression, as precisely-tuned in her
crystalline top as in her ample chest register. The stage presence was
graceful but cool. As Stankar, the opera's strong-tempered father-figure,
Eduard Tumagian gave an experienced performance, despite his narrow vocal
range. In the title role, which must rank as the most unromantic of Verdi
tenors, Zvetan Michailov sang elegantly, but with tight, bottled tone.
Lothar Zagrosek's neat conducting lacked Verdian fire. The local
Ludwigshafen chorus was excellent.
I enjoyed this encounter with Stiffelio. It may lack the consistent melodic
inspiration of its immediate predecessor, Luisa Miller, or the dramatic
breadth of the later works, but it is short, coherent and unmistakably
Verdian.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12565</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Taiwan is the subject of BBC2's foreign affairs series Assignment. Brian
Barron reports from the island which became the home of those Chinese who
opposed Mao Tse Tung and which today boasts the world's largest foreign
reserve. The programme accompanies the first delegation of communist Chinese
journalists to visit Taiwan and also films the greatest collection of
ancient Chinese treasures, taken from the Forbidden City when the
Nationalists under Chaing Kai Shek retreated and now kept in tunnels
underneath Taiwan's capital.
BBC2 also offers Beethoven's Not Dead (9.00), a one-off half-hour comedy
adapted from a show first seen at the 1991 Edinburgh Festival with
classically trained musicians Miles and Millner.
Battlecries, one of the series appearing under the umbrella title 'War And
Peace', provides testimony from three Tornado aircrew shot down in the Gulf
War (9.30 BBC2). ITV screens the second part of its highly professional
documentary series The Kennedys. This episode (10.40) concentrates on John
F, showing the part played by father Joe's money in winning the presidency.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12566</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Arts: French quartet festival - Weekend concerts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAX LOPPERT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A small but very interestingly formed string-quartet festival has been
unfolding at irregular intervals in the theatre of the London French
Institute. Its purpose is to assemble a brightly talented collection of
rising quartet groups, mostly (but not all) French, and and to dot into the
schedule a handful of British premieres by French composers. The series is
well worth sampling, for its own sake - since worthwhile new quartet groups
and quartet music are always desperately needed on the London
chamber-musical scene - and also as a token of the recent, and considerable,
renewal in chamber-musical activity on the other side of the Channel. The
day when Pierre Boulez could categorically dismiss the string-quartet medium
as hopelessly old-fashioned is apparently long done, and entirely
unlamented.
On Friday evening, midway through the festival programme, the Quatuor
Rosamonde, prizewinners at Evian (1983) and the EBU competition at Salzburg
(1986), played Berg (the Quartet, Op. 3) and Beethoven (the C major, Op. 59
no. 3) with sharp-pointed attack and an intellectual energy that informs
every musical note and line. The sound is not plush, the style not remotedly
influenced by 'Viennese' manners; leanness and clarity are evidently the
corporate goals, and vigorously pursued. For these reasons, and because of
the innate qualities of the music, the Rosamonde made a lively case for the
British premiere of Philippe Hersant's Second Quartet (1988). Its four
movements are devoted to various forms of post-Impressionist patterning,
light-reflections and lingeringly sensuous plays with texture: cool,
elegant, attractively cut.
On Saturday evening it was the turn of the Quatuor Parisii, winners at
Banff, Evian and Munich (1986 and 1987), and of the new quartet specially
written for the occasion by Gilbert Amy, distinguished Boulez pupil and
associate. As it happens, only three movements had been completed in time -
sufficient, however, to show that Amy's avant-garde affiliations are now
tempered by other concerns and pursuits.
The music grows out of cell-like repetitions of figures in ways that appear
to admit unusual influences (unusual, that is, for a Boulezian): Janacek,
even - albeit at arm's length - the '70s minimalists. The effect is at once
of tough argument and immediate appeal; even on this incomplete evidence it
seems a work written not academically, but from deep inside the medium.
The Parisii delivered the music with tremendous authority and, again,
intellectual vigour. In Webern (the early Quartet), Milhaud (the deliciously
sardonic Fourth Quartet, 1946) and the Beethoven Op. 130, risks were taken,
hard edges manifested in the playing, that proved exhilarating in context.
Indeed, it was heartening to encounter another young French group so
distinct and so committed in approach.
French Institute, SW7; series organised with the Association Pro Quartet of
Paris; final concerts on Oct 23 and Nov 3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12567</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Arts: Bravura portraiture / Review the 'Swagger' exhibition
at the Tate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM PACKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'The Swagger Portrait' is a phrase that bears any number of interpretations.
To Andrew Wilton, Keeper of the British Collection at the Tate and curator
of this intriguing exhibition, it may be glossed simply enough by the
subtitle he has given it, 'Grand Manner Portraiture in Britain from Van Dyck
to Augustus John: 1630-1930'.
Swagger, showing-off, self-regard and self-display - such human indulgence
is as old as civilisation itself, let alone the practice of the portrait
that has marked its record. Here we are offered a bare 300 years' worth,
effectively limited within our own national school of painting, but the
questions still come begging in. Who is doing the swaggering? It has always
been quite as much the artist, up to his bravura tricks, as the mere patron
who dresses up and foots the bill. And so, in that case, what, no Holbein,
no Titian, no Rubens or Velasquez to get us going, no David, Goya, Ingres or
Vigee le Brun to keep us going, nor even Whistler, Munnings, MacEvoy or
Nicholson to finish up?
Wilton argues his case bravely, and within the particular context points up
effectively the constant creative stimulus and exchange that British artists
have enjoyed with artists from abroad - from, such as Van Dyck, Batoni,
Winterhalter and Sargent in successive centuries. In this respect, with
Holbein, the obvious precursor, reasonably excluded, the only serious
omission is Whistler: never exactly the swagger painter, perhaps, but with
his consummate dandyism and rigorous aesthetic, the perfect, necessary
complement and counterpoint, to Sargent above all.
The substantial achievement is simply the bringing together of so many
marvellous works within a coherent sequence, and yet, mixing the obvious
with the unfamiliar, keeping the whole fresh and full of surprises. This,
after all, is the familiar story of a field in which the British School
stands equal, if not pre-eminent, among international peers. We know it well
enough already, but at once, in a first room of some seven first division
Van Dycks, we are back on our heels. How hard it is to turn away from Lady
Carlisle, Mrs Porter or fair Erminia with her Cupid, but for the treats to
come.
The direct comparison of Van Dyck with his young English successor at the
Cavalier Court, William Dobson, is especially useful, not so much for what
it tells of Dobson's antecedents as for his proper distinction. No less
refined in feeling and observation than Van Dyck, he is yet more forthright
and robust in spirit. His painting of the first Lord Byron clearly
foreshadows the quality of 18th century British portraiture, of Reynolds
especially whom, had he lived beyond his thirties, he might well have far
outstripped.
It is good, too, to see Michael Wright, the Scottish painter at the
Restoration Court, shown beyond the Scottish context for the cosmopolitan he
was, indeed anticipating Ramsay in his travels between Rome and London. But
the more notable connection is that demonstrated between Allan Ramsay and
his Italian contemporary, Pompeo Batoni, painter extraordinary to the
British Milord on the Grand Tour, whom he befriended on his first extended
visit to Rome in the late 1730s.
Fifty years on, Henry Raeburn's Sir John Sinclair follows Wright and Ramsay
in a great sequence Scotch grandees in tartan splendour. More intriguing,
however, is the cast the painting makes back, on the one hand, to Dobson, on
the other, forward a century to Sargent. It is at such moments that one
regrets the conventional chronology of these theme shows. Dobson, Raeburn,
Sargent: Van Dyck, Hudson, Gainsborough, Lawrence; Millais, Orpen, John -
there is no end to it.
There are many particular treats: Hudson's extremely fetching Mary Panton in
the blue silks of her 'Van Dyck' dress; Reynolds' windswept Mrs Musters;
Gainsborough's dancing Giovanna Bacelli; Beechey's Prinny; Raeburn's
harp-playing Lady Northampton; Millais' 'Hearts are Trumps' of the three
Armstrong daughters; the Lawrence's willowy Catherine Gray  - wonderful
things.
The show's final service is the challenge it offers to the received wisdom,
that this great tradition in portraiture saw a sad tailing-off this century.
The lie is given, in the last brave room, by the several magnificent
Sargents above all, but also by Boldini and Lavery; by Orpen's exquisite
Lady Rocksavage and his Mrs St George; by Augustus John's extravagant Madame
Suggia and by his seated William Nicholson, who should be represented here
by more than his likeness.
In a happy coincidence, the Allan Ramsay retrospective shown this summer at
the Scottish National Portrait Gallery at Edinburgh, where it was reviewed
by Patricia Morison, has now come to London. This study confirms Ramsay's
recent critical elevation to the front rank of British painters. While the
Tate celebrates him in the grand manner, at the National Portrait Gallery
follows his later transition into a closer, more delicate and intimate
realism. The psychological intensity of his scrutiny is remarkable, his
delicacy more French than anything else in British art, his colour of the
utmost refinement. As a painter of men, and in his self-portraits, one
begins to think of Goya. As a sympathetic painter of women, young and old,
he has no rival.
The Swagger Portrait: The Tate Gallery, Millbank SW1, until January 10.
Allan Ramsay: The National Portrait Gallery, St Martin's Place WC2, until
January 17: sponsored by Mobil North Sea - a concessionary ticket is
available to cover both exhibitions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12568</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of Locating in North America (2): Investment is
easier - Canada
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CANADIANS are more receptive to foreign investors now than they have been
for many years. With the economy in the doldrums, any company offering new
jobs, especially in manufacturing, can expect a warm welcome.
Most curbs on foreign investment have been relaxed, except for a handful of
politically sensitive areas, such as cultural industries and airlines.
Only a small proportion of acquisitions and greenfields projects still
requires screening by Investment Canada, the government's foreign-investment
watchdog.
Energy, financial services and pharmaceuticals are among the sectors where
access for foreign companies is easier now than it has been at any time in
the past two decades. Furthermore, federal and provincial incentives are
plentiful, ranging from outright grants and interest-free loans, to
worker-training assistance.
These carrots are not proving juicy enough, however. Ironically, while many
Canadians have been warming to foreign business, the view of Canada among
investors has grown distinctly chilly.
Ms Maureen Farrow, chief economist at Coopers &amp; Lybrand's office in Toronto,
observes that 'we're not the natural for investment which we used to be, and
we're not really making it easy for ourselves'.
Ms Farrow groups the complaints in two main categories: the cost of doing
business in Canada, and the public policy environment.
High taxes are a particular concern. According to a recent Organisation for
Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD) report, the proportion of taxes
to GDP in Canada has climbed from 34.5 per cent in 1989 to 37.1 per cent in
1990 and 39.4 per cent last year. By contrast, the US has a tax burden of
just under 30 per cent.
With governments at all levels facing a severe budget squeeze, there is
little scope to bring down taxes and other levies until the economy
improves.
The business community is also upset with the policies of social-democratic
governments in Ontario and British Columbia, two of Canada's most
industrialised provinces.
As Ms Farrow puts it, politicians in Ontario 'are not completely
anti-business, but there's a perception in the marketplace that they're
working to increase the costs of doing business here, rather than to
decrease it'.
For example, business people point to stricter environmental reviews (and
thus longer delays in getting new projects off the ground), and the widening
scope of 'employment equity' rules, which require employers to pay greater
attention to the needs of visible-minority and disabled employees.
Employers in Ontario are currently waging a vociferous campaign against a
proposed new labour law which would, among other things, severely limit the
ability of strikebound companies to hire replacement workers.
On the other hand, Quebec is aggressively wooing investors with an
industrial strategy focused on 13 'clusters' in which the francophone
province believes it has the best chance of being competitive in world
markets.
Five sectors - aerospace, pharmaceuticals, information technology products,
power generating equipment and metal processing - are already well
established there.
Rolls-Royce, the UK engine-maker, recently unveiled a CDollars 140m (Dollars
113.80m) venture to produce an industrial version of its Trent 800 turbofan
aero engine near Montreal. The company has been helped by a CDollars 17m
interest-free loan from the federal and provincial governments and by
investment tax credits.
Rolls-Royce's decision is evidence that, for many companies, the present
drawbacks of locating in Canada are still outweighed by advantages.
Besides government assistance, investors continue to be drawn by Canada's
rich natural resources, its highly-educated and reliable workforce, the high
disposable income of consumers, and by the pleasant lifestyle for expatriate
managers.
Pharmaceutical companies such as Glaxo and Merck Frosst have substantially
expanded their research and development facilities in Canada, as the federal
government has improved patent protection for brand-name medicines.
Canada has always touted its proximity to the big US market as a drawcard
for investors. The 1989 free trade pact with the US and the
recently-negotiated North American free trade agreement with Mexico have
added an important new dimension to this argument.
Lower trade barriers mean that investors thinking of locating in Canada
would be foolish not to look beyond the domestic market.
As the Conference Board of Canada noted in a recent study, US subsidiaries
can no longer justify their presence in Canada simply on the basis of
domestic sales. The Canadian offshoots must now 'carve out and justify their
existence as an integral component of the company,' the Conference Board
said.
The 1989 US-Canada free trade agreement, coupled with the recent recession,
have already exerted strong pressure on business, workers and government to
improve Canada's competitiveness - and thus its attraction to foreign
investors.
Canada now has the lowest inflation rate - just above 1 per cent - among
leading industrial countries.
Wage increases have slowed dramatically in the past two years, and companies
are becoming increasingly outspoken in their criticism of unhelpful
government policies.
Policymakers are gradually coming to grips with some of the thorniest issues
affecting the long-term business climate. These include increasingly close
scrutiny of the much-maligned education and unemployment insurance systems,
and of hard-pressed workmen's compensation and health care services.
But it is still too early to tell whether, when and to what extent
business's concerns will be addressed through tangible reforms.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12569</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Survey of Locating in North America (3): One big weakness -
North American Free Trade Agreement
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NANCY DUNNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EIGHT reports, prepared by the Bush Administration's 'private sector
advisers,' were sent to Capitol Hill last month along with the text of the
North American Free Trade Agreement (Nafta).
Seven of the eight were hearty endorsements.
'Nafta is the most comprehensive agreement dealing with services that the US
has yet negotiated,' said Mr John Reed, chairman of Citicorp.
'By linking the US more closely to two of our principal trading partners,
new jobs will be created, new businesses formed. . .' said Mr Joseph Gorman,
chairman of automotive, space and information services group TRW.
Furthermore, said Mr James Robinson, chairman of American Express, the pact
will 'enhance the worldwide competitiveness of US companies and provide a
model and incentive for more open trade and investment relations with other
countries.'
The business leaders - all chairman of three of the advisory committees -
had good reason for their delight. For multinationals, the Nafta comes close
to total wish fulfilment.
If the pact is approved by the legislatures of the US, Mexico and Canada, it
will provide a legal basis for economic integration of North America over
the next 15 years, nourish the marriage of cheap Mexican labour and US and
Canadian technology and capital and forever change the face of business
relations between the trading relations.
Over the next 15 years, tariffs, quotas, and licensing requirements will
disappear between the three signatories. Gradually, the countries will open
to each other's companies their government procurement and
telecommunications markets. Lawyers, bankers, accountants, truckers,
insurers, providers of most services - and those yet to be invented - will
be allowed to move and operate freely in the region.
With just a few exceptions - the oil sector in Mexico and the 'cultural'
sector in Canada - investors from one Nafta country will be accorded the
same rights as domestic producers in another.
Although some takeovers will require government approval, investors will
have no performance standards to meet and they will not face any
restrictions on transfers of profits, royalties or other payments, proceeds
from the sale of all or part of their investments. They will have complete
protection for their patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade secrets.
Although the borders of the trade area will be protected by domestic content
requirements - in the case of cars, 62.5 per cent in eight years - new
barriers have not been raised to outsiders. More than ever before,
environmental safeguards have been included in this pact. Customs procedures
are harmonised and an elaborate dispute settlement mechanism is established
with a commission and a secretariat to manage the implementation of the
agreement.
For all its truly historic proportions, the pact has one big weakness: its
failure to provide for the social consequences of integration. In its haste
to help President Carlos Salinas of Mexico 'lock in' his unilateral economic
reforms, the US and Canada may be condemning Mexico to economic domination
by the multinationals of its northern neighbours. Their failure to push for
expanded labour rights may doom Mexican workers to continued exploitation
and subsistence living standards.
This is where the eighth 'public sector adviser' - the Labour Advisory
Committee - stands. It acknowledges that Mexico has labour laws on the books
as strong or even stronger than its northern neighbours. But, to its own
detriment, the laws are not enforced.
'There are no protections in this agreement against further
de-industrialisation of the American economy,' the LAC says. 'There are no
counter-incentives to inhibit massive transfers of investment and production
to Mexico.'
The pact will inevitably lead to plant closures, job losses and lower
standards of living in the higher-wage nations, the LAC continues. 'For all
the countries, it could mean the degradation of workplace health and safety
standards, a possible increased use of child labour and a general
deterioration of labour management relations.'
US trade officials insist this will never happen. Trade-related jobs pay 17
per cent more than other jobs, they say; ultimately Mexican wages will rise
as they have in other export-based economies. This contention is disputed,
however, by a new report from the nonpartisan Congressional Office of
Technology Assessment (OTA).
'Mexican wages will probably remain low, held down by large-scale
unemployment and underemployment, attracting investment by US companies
seeking to compete through low wages rather than high productivity,' said
the OTA. Furthermore, the pact will throw Mexicans off their uncompetitive
farms and businesses, which will lead to increase emigration from Mexico to
the US. Growing trade and investment will intensify the environmental
problems along the 2,000-mile US-Mexico border.
The extent to which these trends - or, indeed, the pact as a whole - will
affect the US and Canadian economies is in dispute. A special study by
DRI-McGraw Hill concluded that although the agreement will change the
profile of North American industry and alter investment and trade flows over
the long run, the impact will not be immediate 'nor will it be static over
time.'
'In general, DRI (Daewoo Research Institute) expects the major impact of the
agreement to occur on investment flows, at least in the short term, while a
significant stimulus to increased trade flows will occur only over a longer
period of time,' it said.
Although it is difficult to separate purely Nafta-related investment from
other capital flows, Mexico has already experienced a huge increase in
investment - a cumulative 78 per cent increase between 1988 and 1991.
Mexico will absorb the largest macroeconomic impact, but the effect will be
limited to about 1 per cent a year on Mexico's growth rate. The impact on
the US and Canada will be even smaller.
A significant factor in the outcome could be the US election. Governor Bill
Clinton, the Democratic candidate, has promised to strengthen Nafta
provisions for labour and the environment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12570</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / The men are for turning: Major's government will continue to
run scared until the recession begins to end
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOE ROGALY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The part-moratorium on pit closures announced in the Commons by Mr Michael
Heseltine yesterday is a cry for help from a government that is running
scared. The fear in the eyes of ministers reflects the fear in the hearts of
many ordinary people: it is a fear of unemployment. Mr John Major and his
colleagues are behaving like politicians on the run. On Sunday night those
closest to the prime minister were summoned to an emergency gathering. This
was followed by an emergency cabinet meeting yesterday morning. The foreign
secretary, who should have accompanied the Queen on her visit to Germany,
stayed behind until yesterday afternoon. The chancellor missed his
appointment with European ministers of finance. They have all clearly had
the fright of their lives.
What remains open to question is whether they are afraid for the right
reasons. Consider what has happened. A week ago Mr Heseltine, who has taken
the title of president of the Board of Trade, said that 31 pits would close
over the next five months, with the direct loss of 30,000 jobs. To the
apparent surprise of the prime minister, and those of his cabinet colleagues
who knew of the decision, that single announcement set off an explosion of
public outrage that has yet to subside, in spite of yesterday's huge
climbdown.
Such was the force of this explosion that the talk over the weekend was of
whether the Conservative government will survive (it will) and, more
directly, whether Mr John Major will stay in office (he almost certainly
will). The prime minister lost much of his authority when Britain was forced
out of the exchange rate mechanism on September 16. His reputation has since
been further damaged, first by the lack of preparation of public opinion for
the coal closures, and then by yesterday's retreat. The question is - how
damaged?
To answer this we must establish why public disapproval of the government's
initial decision was so intense. It had little to do with a national desire
to preserve the coal mines. The dismissal of miners does arouse a sentiment
in the middle classes that does not apply to other workers, many more of
whom have been made redundant over the past decade than the number of
pit-workers now under threat. The abrupt manner of Mr Heseltine's
announcement, and the apparent intention to impose the first redundancies
within a few days, added to the national sense of injustice. But I do not
recall any march of the gentry of Cheltenham over the sacking of British
Telecom employees, or the decimation of the steel industry's workforce.
The real reason why Mr Major is in trouble is that he fought an election on
the promise of an end to the recession, which he has failed to deliver. In
the early summer, basking in the afterglow of his victory, he noted the
happy stock markets and Treasury forecasts and mused about it being the best
of all possible times in which to be prime minister. Confidence had been
restored. The economy was on the move. The Maastricht treaty was in the bag.
He would soon assume the responsibilities of Britain's presidency of the
European Community. Later in the summer he even wondered whether the pound
might overtake the D-Mark as the anchor currency of Europe. Being prime
minister must have seemed almost as enjoyable an activity as watching
Chelsea play football.
Then everything began to go wrong. The Danes rejected the Maastricht treaty.
That unleashed the dark forces within the Conservtive party - the diehard
Thatcherites, the anti-Europeans, the lifetime members of the Bruges Group.
The markets turned downwards again. Unemployment began to touch southern
families, Conservative families, and the professional classes. House prices
fell further. Television comedians began to tell jokes like, 'shop now while
shops last'. The recession seemed endless.
Mr Major, favoured by fortune until April 10, turned into that most doleful
of all creatures, an unlucky prime minister. He stood firm against assaults
on his close friend and heritage secretary Mr David Mellor, but Mr Mellor
was driven out of office. He identified his personal authority with the
defence of the D-Mark parity within the ERM, only to find sterling blown out
of the water a week later. He has since seemed to manacle himself to a
chancellor whose own credibility has been squandered.
This sad tale has been accompanied by an extraordinary outburst of
vituperation from the Conservative press, the very same gang that helped Mr
Major win the election. I put this down only partly to the idiosyncracies of
particular editors; the more significant factor may be that readers, gulled
in April into a belief in economic good times under the Tories, have been
expressing their disappointment. The tabloids have turned their fury onto
the prime minister.
So Mr Major is on the run. Nothing he has tried so far has worked. A dogged
and super-patriotic speech at the Conservative conference was derided for
its absence of passages on the economy. A one-point cut in interest rates
last Friday was quickly seen for what it was: an attempt to buy off Tory
backbenchers who were supporting the miners. An emergency meeting of heads
of EC governments in Birmingham on the same day was thus overshadowed. It
was subsequently exposed as a mere PR exercise.
Now the prime minister is discovering, in a most painful and dramatic way,
the true meaning of a parliamentary majority of 21. This is the second
lowest Conservative majority since the war - only Churchill's 16 in 1951 was
lower. Labour governments have struggled and nearly died on majorities of
four (October 1974), five (1964), and six (1950) but Mrs Margaret Thatcher's
great strength was bolstered by a majority of 44 in 1979, 144 in 1983 and
101 in 1987 - although the latter did not save her.
A low majority gives strength to dissident backbenchers; only a prime
minister willing to dare them to precipitate an election can hope to outface
them. Dissidence spreads when the voters are unhappy, as they certainly are
at present. Yet there is no threat of an election, let alone a Labour
victory. The Labour party is caught between hypocritical outrage at the
closures (Labour governments have been champion pit-closers) and a dangerous
complacency about its continuing need to reform even now, while the Tories
are in turmoil. As to Mr Major's hold on office - well, just for a while
yesterday he had the 1922 Committee of backbenchers eating out of his hands.
Only a backbench revolt greater than anything seen in the past few weeks
could oblige him to resign. None is yet in sight.
What is much more likely to happen is that the government will continue to
be harassed by events. Mr Heseltine was made to sweat in the Commons
yesterday. He is not yet out of danger. Neither he nor Mr Major can be
certain that throwing in a few hundred million pounds extra and imposing a
moratorium on 21 pit closures will quell the unrest. Even putting in Lord
Peter Walker to supervise may not be enough. The disquiet over the coal
mines will rumble on, possibly as destructively for the government as the
poll tax was for Mrs Thatcher. The cabinet will keep running from crisis to
crisis. There will be no respite until, by accident or design, the recession
begins to end.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12571</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Observer: Advocate
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
You can't fool a Yorkshireman. A church in Bradford is currently displaying
a big garish poster warning its parishioners: 'Despite devaluation - the
wages of sin remain the same.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12572</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Observer: Berlin exeat
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
One has to commend Britain's diplomatic corps on its timing. Just in time
for the Queen's visit to Berlin today, the British embassy is downgrading
the importance of its Berlin outpost. It has announced that it intends to
stop issuing visas and passports from its Berlin office from the start of
November.
In future all applications will be handled by the British consulate-general
in Dusseldorf, who resides 460km from Berlin as the crow flies. Somehow that
does not conform with the official German position that Berlin is to become
the working capital of Germany within the next five to seven years.
It sounds more as though the Foreign Office is convinced, along with a good
many German politicians in the Rhineland, that parliament and the German
government will remain in Bonn until well into the next decade. Dusseldorf
is only 70 km down the Rhine from Bonn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12573</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Observer: Nun so lucky
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A nun, who has lived for 54 years under a vow of poverty, has proved that
the meek do, just occasionally, inherit the earth. Sister Josephine Contris,
71, a member of the Sisters of St. Francis order in San Francisco, initially
won a Dollars 40,000 prize in a local lottery.
Given the choice of taking the money or participating in the state lottery's
televised Big Spin game show, she consulted her fellow sisters. 'Go for it.
Don't just take the Dollars 40,000,' was their advice. She did, and won
Dollars 1m.
Contris says she will give the money to her order with a request that it be
used to support a retirement home in Santa Maria.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12574</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Observer: All aboard
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
There is a curious appropriateness to the rumour that Alan Clements is to be
the next chairman of Trafalgar House. Clements, an ex-corporate bureaucrat
from ICI, is an archetypal nice chap. But since he retired from ICI at the
end of 1989, his every move has precipitated boardroom mayhem.
He joined Granada as a non-executive director, and the chief executive was
deposed. He joined the paper-maker David S Smith and the chief executive
unexpectedly stepped down. He joined Brent Walker and George Walker was
booted out and the company is being investigated by the Serious Fraud
Office. He joined Mirror Group and Robert Maxwell fell into the sea. It
sounds like Sir Nigel Broackes will be lucky to get out in one piece.
Given this sort of career it is hard to see how Clements can kick up a stink
about Hongkong Land's understandable wish to add two of its men to the
Trafalgar House board, in the absence of any other fresh faces. Rodney Leach
is a seasoned corporate financier, and Sir Charles Powell has impressive
political connections. Both are worthy additions to a group of non-executive
directors who badly need strengthening.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12575</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Observer: Safe haven
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The American University of Beirut, a favourite target for kidnappers, is
topping up its staff again. The university, from where US hostages Joseph
Cicippio and Tom Sutherland were snatched and where Brian Keenan once
worked, is looking for a director of internal audit and deputy comptroller
to shore up its depleted administration.
However, in a bid to reduce staff turnover the advert stipulates that only
non-US passport holders will be considered. Meanwhile, the university's
director of personnel, who knows a thing or two about the dangers of living
in the Middle East, will vet applications from the safety of an office on
New York's Third Avenue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12576</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Observer: Bark before bitten
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Given Britain's delicate political condition at the moment, Observer's pulse
beat a little faster on news that The Sun, Britain's best selling newspaper,
was launching 'a major contribution' to the country's democratic process.
Could it be the launch of an 0898 hotline where its readers could vote on
whether the PM was a goner? Better still why not upstage its rival Daily
Star, which yesterday suggested that ex-BP boss Sir Peter Walters should
chair a national government, with The Sun's own national reconstruction
plan?
In the event, The Sun's Politicians Complaints Commission is not even its
own idea. Patsy Chapman, who is editor of the News of the World and
admittedly from the same stable as The Sun, first suggested it in The
Guardian in July.
However, The Sun has adapted Ms Chapman's plan and instead of having a code
of conduct drawn up by MPs themselves has set up its own 10-point of code of
practice for politicians. This includes the famous Chamfort maxim: 'In great
affairs men show themselves as they wish to be seen; in small things they
show themselves as they are.'
War hero Major General Ken Perkins, who is married to Churchill's
grand-daughter and has been a military adviser to The Sun, will chair the
new body. He will have a board of 'commonsense' people, including a taxi
driver, a solicitor and an unemployed steelworker, to vet complaints and
help him rule when MPs are letting the side down.
Its deliberations will be entirely independent of The Sun and other
newspapers are welcome to join. True, The Sun will pick up the tab for the
first year and the initiative has all the hallmarks of yet another of Sun
editor Kelvin Mackenzie's publicity stunts.
Even so it would be wrong to ignore it completely. When there is concern
about press invasion of privacy, The Sun intends to show politicians that it
can still bite back.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12577</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Letter: Stealing the Gatt initiative
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Dr ALAN G HALLSWORTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The current round of General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade
negotiations has slipped from the news. But one imagines that the state of
play will probably involve US complaints that a 'level playing field' is
being spoiled by French farming subsidies. The US would probably prefer to
see an end to unfair distortions with the French coming into line with
international norms.
The US could steal the initiative as a way out of this impasse were it to
create a 'level playing field' by removing one of its own unfair
distortions. This could be done charging its industrial and domestic users a
price for gasoline that is in line with international norms (shall we say
Dollars 3 a US gallon?). I am sure that following this modest gesture, all
parties would be absolutely desperate to trade internationally on equal
terms]
Alan G Hallsworth,
deputy director,
SIRC,
University of Portsmouth,
Buckingham Building,
Lion Terrace,
Portsmouth PO1 3HE
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12578</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Letter: Observance is of the essence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ADAM FERGUSSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, You reported that, in order to enhance subsidiarity, the European
Commission wants to 'devolve much responsibility for implementing EC law to
member states' ('Brussels drafts plan to end EC power struggle', October
13).
That might be popular among some of them but would be an idiotic policy. In
the post-1992 internal market, universal confidence that everyone is fully
observing the common rules will be of the essence. Self-policing won't
achieve it - on the contrary.
Although snooping can never be popular for those being snooped on (perhaps
that is why Brussels is anxious to divest itself of that duty), increased,
vigorous and efficient activity by the Commission's independent inspectors,
backed by the Court of Justice as required, is likely alone to provide the
roots of mutual trust. Otherwise, as Juvenal once put it, quis custodiet
ipsos custodes?
Adam Fergusson,
15 Warwick Gardens,
London W14 8PH
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12579</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Letter: Mines - private sector alternative, figures
'misleading', efficient but too costly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Prof D R MYDDELTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Adam Smith said very good grapes could be raised in Scotland, and very
good wine too could be made of them. But he pointed out that equally good
wine could imported much more cheaply from foreign countries.
British miners, aided by heavy capital investment, may be very efficient at
extracting coal. But British coal producers have been protected for far too
long from competition from much cheaper foreign imports. Tax-payers and
energy users can no longer afford it.
D R Myddelton,
Cranfield School of Management,
Cranfield, Bedford MK43 0AL
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12580</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Letter: Mines - private sector alternative, figures
'misleading', efficient but too costly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ANDREW GLYN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, You reported ('The UK Economy: PM 'regrets anguish' of unemployed',
October 17) Mr Major's statement, in relation to coal closures, that 'stocks
are increasing by more than 1m tonnes every month, and as a result of that
we have been spending Pounds 100m a month of taxpayers' money to keep the
pits open'. This latter figure has been used repeatedly by Mr Heseltine as
his 'unanswerable case' for the closures. What does it mean?
The 31 pits' operating loss over the last year totalled some Pounds 9m
(figures for individual pits are given in my report, The Economic Costs of
the Pit Closure Programme). The government's figure for subsidy, some 100
times larger, must be the total costs of production of these pits (roughly
2.5m tonnes a month at Pounds 40 a tonne). For this to represent taxpayers'
subsidy it would have to be the case that the coal they produce was
valueless.
The prime minister says that stocks are increasing by more than 1m tonnes a
month; indeed in the three months April-July total coal stocks rose by more
than 1.5m tonnes a month (Energy Trends, September 1992, table 6). But there
is a strong seasonal element in this, shown by a rise over the whole year to
July of just over 0.5m tonnes a month. That this represents something like
the underlying rate is confirmed by BC's own stock-building (that is,
excluding the much more seasonally sensitive stocks at power stations etc)
of 0.6m tonnes a month over the five months to end-September. This
represents only one quarter of the output of the 31 threatened pits. So
three-quarters of their output has up till now found a market at the going
BC price.
Nor is the part of the output of the 31 pits which has been stockpiled
valueless. Around half of the stockpiling can be attributed to rising net
imports of coal (some 300,000 tonnes a month higher in the second quarter of
1992 than a year earlier), and there is a case for valuing additions to
stocks at the world price (say Pounds 30 a tonne). Such a valuation of
stocks would only imply a loss for (and thus subsidy to) the pits under
threat of around Pounds 9m a month. Even if the government's statement is
referring to the financing of the whole value of the stock-building (in
which case it should be made clear that it does not mean subsidising
operating losses) then the figure would be some Pounds 25m a month.
It is widely accepted that the economic effects of pit closure have to be
assessed by balancing any operating subsidy involved against the exchequer
costs of closures - some Pounds 110m a month in the first year (including
redundancy payments) and Pounds 50m on a continuing basis (unemployment
benefit, lost taxation, etc). But the main point here is that the government
has produced only totally misleading figures for the current financial
position of the pits to justify its policy.
Andrew Glyn,
fellow and tutor
in economics,
Corpus Christi College,
Oxford
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12581</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Letter: Mines - private sector alternative, figures
'misleading', efficient but too costly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr SIMON HUGHES MP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The fast-moving events in the current political controversy concerning
coal mine closures were well explained in your article answering typical
questions about the issue. ('The costs of closure', October 17). However,
the article failed to highlight one interesting aspect: that some private
mining companies have shown an interest in taking on several of the
collieries listed for closure by British Coal.
British Coal claims that the pits scheduled for closure cannot be mined
profitably, but several independent mining companies, such as Wales-based
Ryan, clearly disagree. British Coal should have its monopoly power to grant
licences to private operators removed from it immediately. This would allow
private companies to take on collieries such as Markham, Wearmouth and
Hatfield, which have healthy balance sheets and viable coal stocks. In
particular, the Department of Trade and Industry should provide seed-corn
capital to encourage management and employee buy-outs.
The UK coal industry is clearly in a secular decline but British Coal's
current plans are the industrial equivalent of cutting off one's own nose to
spite one's face. If BC cannot run the mines then it should allow others to
take over that role.
John Major's government has a chance to show its support for enterprise and
initiative by giving miners and managers a chance to run their own pits
instead of spending Pounds 1bn plus on throwing whole neighbourhoods on to
the dole.
Simon Hughes,
Liberal Democrat
natural resources spokesperson,
House of Commons,
Westminster SW1A 0AA
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12582</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Small rally for sterling
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
STERLING bounced back from the lows of the day after the government
announced it was to postpone the closure of most of the 31 coal pits
previously earmarked for shut down.
But the rally was short lived and the pound closed over 2 1/2 pfennigs lower
on the day at DM2.4200 as investors remained nervous about the UK's
political and economic outlook.
'I think the seriousness of the economic situation and the deteriorating
political backdrop have undermined sentiment towards the pound,' said Mr
Neil MacKinnon, chief economist at Citibank.
The announcement by Mr Michael Heseltine, the trade and industry secretary,
that only ten pits were to close was greeted scornfully by foreign exchange
traders.
'The government can't even do a U-turn properly,' said one. 'I can see no
reason for wanting to buy sterling.'
The outlook for the currency looks bleak. Traders say they expect further
rate cuts as the government reacts to pressure to boost economic activity,
regardless of the implications for inflation.
The next big hurdle for the government will be tomorrow's debate on the
future of the coal industry. Traders will be watching closely, unconvinced
that yesterday's climb down healed the rifts in the Conservative party.
The pound also drifted lower against the dollar. It closed in London at
Dollars 1.6320, 2 1/2 cents down on the day.
Sentiment towards the dollar continued to improve cautiously in London
yesterday although the currency struggled to build on Friday's gains against
the D-Mark.
The dollar failed to break through the DM1.49 level, closing in London at
DM1.4835, not quite a pfennig higher on the day. Dealers expect the currency
to trade within the DM1.45 to DM1.50 range between now and the presidential
election on November 3.
A victory by Bill Clinton appears to have been discounted by the markets and
most expect it to strengthen after the election when, if the economy starts
to recover, the Federal Reserve will be less likely to cut its discount
rate.
'The dollar's long term outlook is one of increasing strength,' said Mr Eric
Fishwick, analyst at IBJ International in London.
In New York the dollar opened firmer against most currencies, but had its
biggest gains against the pound.
Rumours that currencies still in the European exchange rate mechanism would
realign this weekend, when the European Community's monetary committee meets
in Berlin, abated when the state secretary at the German finance ministry
ruled one out. The speculation had centred on a devaluation of the Spanish
peseta which closed in European trading at 70.45 per D-Mark compared with
Friday's close of 71.39.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 41
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12583</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Money Markets: Interbank rates ease
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Interbank rates eased to discount further base rate cuts after the
government's partial U-turn on the decision to close 31 coal pits failed to
quash market expectations of further monetary easing.
Gloomy weekend press reports about the British economy and unease after
Friday's one point cut in base rates meant the market moved to discount
further rate cuts in the morning, before Mr Michael Heseltine, the trade and
industry secretary, said only ten pits would be closed.
Dealers said the vacuum in government economic policy was making it
difficult to take decisions. 'All the market knows is that if things do get
worse, the government will simply cut rates,' said one senior analyst. 'The
market isn't going to trust the government on anything it says, let alone on
inflation.
'The government is going for the easy money option,' said Mr John Holmes at
Bankers Trust. 'I think the general gloom of the weekend press has made the
market more bullish about further interest rate cuts.'
The sterling futures market continued to discount base rate cuts by the end
of the year. The December contract closed at 92.77 compared with Friday's
close of 92.63.
'Short sterling is discounting lower rates again to be ahead of the game. We
are looking at 7.5 per cent in January and 7 per cent by March,' said Mr
Stephen Scott of Kleinwort Benson.
On the cash market the three month interbank rate hovered just above 8 per
cent for most of the morning easing slightly after the Bank provided Pounds
1.5bn of liquidity in the early round. It closed at 8 per cent on the
offered side. The one year rate for cash eased to 7 15/16 on the offered
side from Friday's close of 8 1/8 per cent.
The day's shortage was Pounds 2.15bn. The Bank of England removed more than
half in the morning, with a Pounds 1.32m repurchase agreement at 7 15/16 per
cent. It also operated in bands 1 and 2 at the new rate of 7 7/8 per cent.
The Bank provided late assistance of around Pounds 200m.
German call money held steady at just below 9 per cent as the market awaited
signs from the Bundesbank at this week's tender for securities repo funds.
Most dealers expected the Bundesbank to continue to offer liquidity at a
fixed rate of 8.9 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 41
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12584</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / The Week In Luxembourg: Court clarifies rules on company
transfer taxes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRICK COURT CHAMBERS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Court of Justice last week clarified the circumstances in which
related company profit transfers are liable to tax.
The first case involved a contract between two German companies with the
same majority shareholder to transfer profits from one to the other. The
local German tax office attempted to tax a transfer on the basis that it was
not a simple inter-company transaction but a payment by the majority
shareholder to the recipient company. Such payments are taxable under German
law.
The question of whether profit transfers between two companies controlled by
the same shareholder were taxable was referred to the European Court of
Justice.
The Court ruled that under Community law transfers which increased company
assets were liable to capital taxes even if the company's authorised capital
was not increased. The transfer was therefore taxable.
However the court said that if the recipient had held shares in the donor
company then the transfer would have been deemed a dividend payment and not
subject to capital taxes.
The second case involved the transfer of certain branch offices to a new
company. The transfers were made by a shareholder in the new company.
Community provisions stated that a tax of only 0.50 per cent could be levied
on branch transfers. The local German tax office thought this rate was too
low for branches which were not independent and distinct from their main
companies.
The Court ruled that in order to benefit from the 0.50 per cent tax rate, a
branch had to have sufficient assets and personnel to carry out its
particular activity on its own.
Cases C-49/91, Weber Haus GmbH &amp; Co KG v Finanzamt Freiburg-Land, and
C-50/91, Commerz-Credit-Bank AG - Europartner v Finanzamt Saarbrucken, ECJ
1CH, 13 October, 1992.
Fishing quota applications fail
THE European Court of Justice has rejected claims for annulment of Community
measures setting fishing quotas around Greenland, Norway, Sweden and the
Faroe Islands in four actions brought by Spain and Portugal.
Under Community law the individual fishing quotas of EC countries are
intended to ensure relative stability for their fishing industries. The
quotas are meant to take into account traditional fishing activities in the
member countries, regional needs associated with fishing and the loss of
fishing opportunities in third country waters.
The relevant quotas for the member states were initially set in 1983 and
have not been changed since. Spain and Portugal were not included in the
determination of quotas on their accession to the Community in 1986.
Their claims were based on two general points: the principle of relative
stability had been incorrectly applied; and the measures were
discriminatory.
The Court dealt with both points on the basis of the principle of 'acquis
communautaire'. In effect, the court said that as there were no amending
provisions in their acts of accession, Community law as it then stood
applied to Spain and Portugal. The 1983 determination of quotas was
therefore valid.
The Court pointed out that Spain and Portugal found themselves in the same
position as other members states who had not yet joined the Community when
the quotas were set.
Joined Cases C-63/90 and 67/90, Portugal and Spain v Council; Case C-70/90,
Spain v Council; C-71/90, Spain v Council; C-73/90, Spain v Council, ECJ FC,
13 October, 1992.
Italian aid scheme not subject to Community rules
AN Italian law allowing reductions in registration fees on purchases of
agricultural land by farmers does not fall within the scope of Community
measures relating to increased efficiency in the agricultural sector.
Case C-162/91, Societa Tenuta il Bosco v Ministero delle Finanze dello
Stato, ECJ 2CH, 15 October, 1992.
Dutch hormone measures valid
NATIONAL rules forbidding the purchase, possession, holding or sale in
Holland of animals containing traces of various hormonal substances have
been upheld by the European Court of Justice.
In spite of the fact that Community provisions only prohibit the
administration of hormones to cattle or the slaughtering and selling of such
animals for human consumption, the court said the wider effect of national
laws did not make them incompatible with EC law.
The Dutch measures were effective in attaining the objective set down by the
Community rules. However, the court emphasised that national measures should
not go beyond the relevant community measures.
Case C-143/91, Leendert Van der Tas, ECJ 2CH, 8 October, 1992.
Greek import licence decision invalid
THE European Commission brought proceedings against Greece for breach of its
obligations under EC import rules. Greece had refused to grant licences for
the import of matches from Sweden and Bulgaria.
The Commission had granted Greece permission to apply national surveillance
measures to imports of Swedish matches. But the Court said that was no
justification for the imposition of quantitative restrictions on Swedish
matches.
The Court also ruled that by failing to respond in detail to questions put
by the Commission, Greece was in breach of its Rome Treaty obligations.
Case C-65/91, Commission v Greece, ECJ FC, 14 October, 1992.
Italy's failure to follow ECJ rulings
THE Commission brought a successful action against Italy for failing to take
measures within the relevant time limits to implement rulings of the
European Court relating to the implementation of EC tax measures. The Court
reiterated that its rulings should be complied with in as short a time as
possible.
Case C-262/91, Commission v Italy, ECJ FC, 14 October 1992.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12585</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / People: Berrill is latest departure from Henderson
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Robin Berrill, 33, a main board director of fund mangers Henderson
Administration and architect of its show jumping sponsorship policy,
resigned yesterday less than a week after the company announced it intended
to acquire Touche Remnant, the investment trust manager.
Berrill, whose responsibilities included the marketing of investment trusts
and Personal Equity Plans, quit after Henderson's chairman failed to
reassure him about his future there. Touche Remnant's chief executive, Paul
Manduca, has expertise in a similar area and is expected to assume at least
some of those duties when the two firms merge.
Indeed, Henderson was said to have informally approached Manduca about a job
some months back but was unable to agree a suitable package. Berrill is
believed to have left with a handshake worth roughly Pounds 100,000.
Berrill is the latest in a string of departures from Henderson which is
struggling to overcome the haemorrhage of pension fund clients after its
particularly poor investment performance in 1987 and 1988.
Recent pension fund performance has been above average but moves to
strengthen management internally by bringing in fresh faces have not all sat
well with the existing team, industry insiders say.
Earlier this year, Henderson brought in Ian Buckley from Sun Life to head
its investment division - a move believed to have prompted the departure of
Robin Hindle-Fisher to Phillips &amp; Drew Fund Management.
Meanwhile, the remaining question is the future of Henderson'sponsorship of
show jumping, a sport with a declining number of corporate patrons.
Henderson said yesterday that the company's investment in the sport is
'substantially less' than the Pounds 500,000 reported but it will be
reviewed at year end. 'We are very happy with our sponsorship so far' says
Henderson.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12586</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Blockbuster diversifies into
music
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT and RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BLOCKBUSTER, the expan-sion-minded US video rental chain which owns the
Cityvision group in the UK, yesterday combined news of a move into the music
retailing business via a Dollars 185m purchase of two store chains with a
third-quarter profits increase of 50.9 per cent after-tax.
Blockbuster, based in Florida, said it was buying the Sound Warehouse and
Music Plus retail operations from companies controlled by Shamrock Holdings
of California.
Shamrock is the acquisitive investment firm controlled by Mr Roy E. Disney,
one of the Walt Disney descendants.
The two chains take in 236 stores and are described as being 'amongst the
largest specialty retailers of prerecorded music in the US'.
The purchase is being made through a mixture of cash and shares, and
Blockbuster said yesterday that it anticipated issuing around 5m new shares
to fund the deal.
Mr Wayne Huizenga, Blockbuster's chairman, claimed the relatively large size
of the stores being acquired would allow Blockbuster to add 'complementary
entertainment products' - a first step in developing 'our entertainment
store of the future'.
On the profits front, Blockbuster said that third-quarter earnings after tax
were Dollars 41.3m, compared with Dollars 27.4m a year earlier. Sales were
24 per cent higher overall at Dollars 283.7m, and earnings per share
increased from 39 cents to 50 cents.
Some of the growth reflects Blockbuster's heady expansion, and sales on a
same-store basis increased more modestly.
Blockbuster stripped out the Summer Olympics and political convention
periods - when, presumably, video usage was disrupted - and said that
underlying same-store revenues rose by 7 per cent, year-on-year, in the
third quarter.
Cox Enterprises, the Atlanta-based media group which is underwriting the
Pounds 36m investment costs of UK Gold, the new satellite television
channel, is looking at the possibility of a wide range of investments in
Britain, writes Raymond Snoddy.
Cox, with turnover of Dollars 2.23bn last year, is making the UK its first
base in plans for European expansion. The company says it is looking at
cable television ventures in the UK and considering other media investments.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12587</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: CRA makes Mt Kare sale offer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRUCE JACQUES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CRA, the Australian mining company, has offered to sell its 51 per cent
stake in the troubled Mount Kare alluvial gold mine in Papua New Guinea.
Mr Mark Rayner, the CRA executive responsible for Papua New Guinea (PNG),
confirmed yesterday that he had made the sale offer last week in discussions
with Mr Masket Iangalio, PNG's mining and petroleum minister.
Mr Rayner said CRA effectively had two conditions on any mine handover to
PNG. One was that the sale would only be made to the rightful land owners
and the other was that CRA retained secure exploration title to Mt Kare's
hard rock mineral resource.
CRA reportedly plans to offer participation in any hard rock exploration
programme at Mt Kare to partners in the country's Porgera gold consortium.
CRA's sale offer has come amid an intensified power struggle between more
than 6,000 groups of competing land owners at Mt Kare. But reports of the
offer in the Australian press on Monday brought a stinging response last
night from Mr Paias Wingti, PNG prime minister.
Mr Wingti accused 'vested interests' of starting a media campaign aimed at
diverting his government from a review of 'iniquitous agreements' over the
country's mineral resources.
'The activities of one or two of the major Australian-based interests here
now in Papua New Guinea in seeking to divide or disadvantage our people over
resource projects amount to a threat to our sovereignty,' Mr Wingti said.
'CRA and Placer should be comfortable in this country as long as they have a
long-term commitment and are not here to rip profits out quickly and leave
just as quickly,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12588</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Nigerian bank is declared
insolvent
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LAGOS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NATIONAL Bank of Nigeria (NBN), the country's oldest indigenous bank, is
insolvent and needs about N2bn (Dollars 102m) to stay alive, Reuter reports
from Lagos.
The Nigerian Deposit Insurance Corporation, an independent guarantee fund
covering bank failures, said yesterday: 'It is completely insolvent. We have
given the owners a task force report.'
Banking sources do not expect the cash to be found and believe NBN, owned by
four southern states, will close.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12589</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Arnotts advises against
Campbell's stake offer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARNOTTS, the Australian biscuit-maker, yesterday said the ADollars
8.80-a-share bid by Campbell Soup to increase its holding from 32.9 to 50.1
per cent, was too low, Reuter reports from Sydney.
Mr Bill Purdy, Arnotts chairman, said: 'It does not reflect the substantial
premiums paid in recent years for food companies by major international
groups, nor does it reflect adequately Arnotts pre-eminent market position,
strong brands, fine products and potential,'
He advised shareholders to take no action over the offer.
The bid values Arnotts at ADollars 1.2bn (Dollars 850m). Its shares closed
at a sharp premium to the offer price at ADollars 9.15, up 5 cents from
Friday's close.
Mr Purdy said Arnotts had yet to receive formal offer documents but the
initial view of its advisers was that the bid was too low. He said Arnotts
was the world's seventh-largest biscuit company and had the technology and
strategy to build its products in Asia.
'Clearly, Arnotts shareholders are entitled to an offer price which reflects
this potential,' Mr Purdy said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12590</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Difficult environment constrains
Holdains
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SHARP deterioration in the business climate in the second half hampered
earnings growth at Holdains, the paper and packaging company in South
Africa's Malbak group, in the year to August 31.
Although turnover rose by 19 per cent to R2.32bn (Dollars 811m) from
R1.95bn, the squeeze on margins saw operating profits rise by only 12 per
cent, to R193m from R173m. Part of this improvement was attributable to the
consolidation of Carlton Paper Corporation's results for the first time.
Attributable earnings were 3 per cent higher at R84.8m compared with R82m,
but a rise in the number of shares in issue saw earnings per share fall to
349 cents from 358 cents. The dividend was maintained at 121 cents a share.
Mr Ian Willis, chairman, said that, on a directly comparable basis, turnover
had risen but operating profits had fallen due to reduced margins. He said
the group had improved market share in some sectors despite a tough
environment.
The group, for the first time, disclosed divisional contributions to
performance. The largest contributor was Kohler, the paper packaging arm,
with a 36 per cent contribution to operating profits.
Mr Willis did not offer a profits forecast, noting only that economic
conditions were not expected to improve and 'demand for the group's products
will remain depressed.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12591</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Sentrachem scores 15% earnings
rise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LOWER finance charges helped Sentrachem, one of South Africa's largest
chemical groups, record a 15 per cent rise in earnings for the year to
August.
It achieved the advance despite trading conditions described by Mr John Job,
managing director, as 'the worst in the group's history'. He said the group
had profited from focusing on its core businesses and maintaining strict
operational discipline.
Turnover rose by 6.9 per cent to R2.43bn (Dollars 849m) from R2.27bn, and
operating profits advanced by 5.9 per cent to R226.5m from R213.9m.
Lower capital expenditure and improved asset management saw net finance
charges drop by 23.3 per cent to R81.4m from R106.1m. This was sufficient to
offset a 60 per cent increase in tax to R48.3m from R30.2m, and lift
attributable earnings to R71.6m from R62.1m.
The dividend was lifted to 20 cents a share from 18 cents, on a rise in
earnings to 62 cents a share from 53.8 cents.
Mr Job said all divisions had compensated for the weak domestic market
through exports, which accounted for 11 per cent of turn-over.
He added that, while no upturn in economic conditions seemed likely in the
short term, he expected the group to maintain earnings in the year ahead.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12592</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: News Corp says debt plans will
not affect strategy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRUCE JACQUES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEWS Corp, the Australian-based international media group, said yesterday
that the cut in its public offering of senior debt securities to USDollars
850m from USDollars 1bn, announced last week, would not impact on its
overall financial strategy including a recent global offering of 40m shares.
'The net proceeds to the company of the debt and equity offering will be not
less than USDollars 1.5bn,' News Corp said. 'The company intends to use all
of the proceeds of the equity and debt offerings, together with the net
proceeds of the USDollars 185m sale of the San Antonio Express News, to
repay bank debt.'
It added that with completion of the offerings it 'expects to refinance its
bank obligations, to extend maturities and reduce its costs of borrowings.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12593</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Cummins underlines return to
profitability
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CUMMINS Engine, the world's biggest independent manufacturer of diesel
engines, yesterday underscored its return to profitability by turning in
third-quarter net income of Dollars 17.6m, or 90 cents a share, including a
one-time gain of Dollars 3.6m.
A year earlier, Cummins suffered a net loss of Dollars 11.8m, or 94 cents.
Sales advanced 6 per cent in the latest quarter to Dollars 903.6m from
Dollars 850.9m.
Cummins' balance sheet has improved steadily this year, thanks to its
cost-cutting efforts and to a revival in key markets.
For the first nine months, net income was Dollars 48.6m, or Dollars 2.60, on
sales of Dollars 2.73bn, compared with a net loss of Dollars 11.8m, or
Dollars 1.20, on sales of Dollars 2.54bn in the same period of 1991.
Mr Henry Schacht, chairman, said: 'The company's third-quarter results were
achieved despite economic uncertainty and seasonal shutdowns by our major
customers.' Earnings had benefit-ed from cost-cutting, he added.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12594</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Minister urges EC to liberalise telecoms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR EDWARD LEIGH, trade and industry minister, yesterday called for the
liberalisation of the European telecommunications market on the UK model.
Mr Leigh told the European Cable 92 conference in London that the future lay
in changing the regulatory regime which had grown up over the past 100
years. New technology allowed market entrants to flourish.
'However efficient and well regulated a monopoly may be, it will be subject
to pressures, either within the organisation, or from government which will
pull in a different direction from the priorities it should be serving - the
customers' priorities,' Mr Leigh said.
He added that when the UK started liberalisation in 1981 there were warnings
about the impact of the universal service being threatened by competition
which would concentrate on the most lucrative areas of the market. This had
not happened.
According to a recent study, Mr Leigh said, the telecommunications market in
the EC could quadruple in size between 1990 and 2010 to some Pounds 270bn.
But this would only happen 'if the Community market was subject to orderly
liberalisation and cost-effective flexible tariffs'.
He said UK operators with experience of liberalisation were among the most
enthusiastic advocates of competition in Europe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12595</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Memo reveals plan to thwart BNL inquiry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US Department of Justice sought to thwart congressional investigations
of the Banca Nazionale del Lavoro (BNL) Iraqi loans scandal two years ago,
according to an internal memorandum from the department made public in
Congress yesterday.
The September 1990 memo was prepared to brief Mr Dick Thornburgh, then the
US attorney-general, before he telephoned Mr Henry Gonzalez, the House
banking committte chairman who has spearheaded congressional inquiries into
the BNL affair.
The memo states: 'Our best attempt to thwart any further congressional
inquiry by the House banking committee into this case is to have you contact
Chairman Gonzalez directly.'
Mr Gonzalez, a Texas Democrat, charged last night that the Justice
Department had worked 'systematically' to prevent his probe of the Dollars
5bn (Pounds 2.9bn) of illegal Iraqi loans made by BNL's Atlanta branch. He
disclosed yesterday that in 1990 he had refused to discuss the BNL case with
Mr Thornburgh and went ahead with his investigation anyway.
The House banking committee chairman also accused yesterday Mr William Barr,
the current attorney-general who is a close aide to President George Bush,
of withholding hundreds of documents from his investigation. He called for
Mr Barr to resign over his handling of the BNL affair.
Mr Gonzalez also released Justice Department documents which appear to show
that Mr Joe Whitley, the top US prosecutor in Atlanta, had been involved in
the management of the BNL case even though he had supposedly disqualified
himself in 1990 because of a conflict of interest.
The Justice Department declined to comment last night.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12596</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / Broker sees green over lost shares
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DOCUMENTS potentially worth more than Pounds 30m disappeared from a
Birmingham stockbroker's office on Friday and nobody knows if they were
stolen or accidentally put out with the rubbish.
The missing papers were letters of allotment destined for investors who
bought shares in the Pounds 61.7m flotation of Trinity Holdings - which,
ironically, builds chassis for dustcarts as well as Dennis fire engines and
buses.
The few hundred letters, which covered 25m shares, were delivered by a
security company to the office of stockbroker Albert E. Sharp early on
Friday morning, before the receptionist arrived.
Someone signed for them, but the box of letters was not there when
executives looked for it later.
Such letters can normally be used to deal in shares until formal share
certificates are printed.
They have to be sent to shareholders before dealings in the shares can
begin, and their disappearance could have delayed yesterday's start to the
company's Stock Exchange career.
But anyone trying to deal in the missing letters will be easily caught.
When their absence was discovered, Sharp and Baring Brothers, Trinity's
merchant bank, quickly arranged for new letters to be printed on green,
rather than white, paper.
These were posted on Saturday and dealings began yesterday as planned. The
shares closed at 129p, a comfortable premium to the 120p issue price.
It has yet to be decided who will pay for the second print run.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12597</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Niche paper profits continue to flow -
Scapa's low City profile and overseas expansion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BOLGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AMID ALL the current despondency about manufacturing, some companies
continue to thrive in profitable, if obscure, niches.
The Blackburn-based Scapa Group, which supplies technical products and
services to the paper industry, is a good example of a company which is one
of only a handful of international companies in its field, yet is little
known in the City.
A telling reason for both the success and low public profile is the scale of
its overseas activities. The group's 6,500 employees work in 48
manufacturing companies, located in 15 countries, with fewer than half based
in the UK.
Papermaking involves the forming, pressing and drying of wood pulp. Scapa
makes the engineered fabrics and roll coverings which hold the paper
throughout this process. Since even shareholders might not be clear what
that means, the group's latest annual report has a large illustration of a
papermaking machine, highlighting all the parts which Scapa can equip.
Scapa, which last year made pre-tax profits of Pounds 44.7m on turnover of
Pounds 300m, has seen its steady record of earnings growth checked as the
paper industry has passed through the trough of recession.
However, it has increased market share and continued to improve its products
as structural changes in the industry have favoured larger companies. The
surviving paper makers use fewer suppliers to service bigger machines,
requir-ing greater technical input.
Only three international companies supply all parts of the paper-making
machine, Albany International, the private US company which is market
leader, BTR, the industrial conglomerate, and Scapa.
Consolidation in the paper industry has led to more competitive buying by
paper makers, squeezing suppliers' margins. However, analysts believe that
by matching the manufacturing concentration suppliers will gain greater
efficiency and that margins are likely to improve in the long-term.
Profits from the roll covering business have suffered from the recent
scarcity of new machines. But the consumption of engineered fabrics is
likely to grow with the increased use of recycled paper and as machine
speeds reach their performance limits.
Scapa has been very successful at building greenfield manufacturing plants,
particularly in the US, where it followed the paper industry south.
About 60 per cent of operating profit originates in the US, making it
sensitive to exchange rate movements. The group estimates that for every
cent the dollar appreciates against sterling, pre-tax profits increase by
Pounds 150,000. To a lesser extent it also benefits from selling more
UK-manufactured output in the US.
Mr Bill Goodall, chairman, said he was struck during the recent sterling
crisis how almost all attention seemed to focus on the sterling/D-Mark
exchange rate. 'I cannot understand why no-one mentioned the dollar. The US
is still our biggest export earner, yet both Tory and Labour politicians
don't seem well informed on this.'
The consolidation of the paper industry is being speeded by takeovers and
mergers, a trend illustrated by Scapa's Pounds 27.3m purchase last year of
Scandiafelt, a Swedish competitors.
Mr Goodall said the purchase had increased market share and not just in
Scandinavia. 'Powerful Swedish paper companies had bought their way into
Germany, and owning Scandia takes us with them.'
South-east Asia offers long-term growth opportunities for the paper
industry. Scapa has no immediate plans to establish manufacturing plants
there, although Mr Goodall said it would no doubt happen eventually.
Because customers are widely spread, with different needs, south-east Asia
is supplied by exports from Europe and North America. The high-value nature
of the goods makes freight charges relatively insignificant.
Analysts are less keen on Scapa's 'other industries' businesses, which
account for 40 per cent of sales but only 20 per cent of operating profits.
These are mainly UK-based and have suffered from the impact of the
recession.
Mr David Dunn, finance director, conceded that the industrial materials
division serving 'other industries' enjoyed lower margins, but stressed that
it offered a much more rapid return on capital than the investment-hungry
paper businesses.
The industrial materials division has been extensively rationalised to focus
on filtration technology and industrial tapes. Although Scapa accepted that
its efforts would be mainly concerned with servicing the paper industry, Mr
Goodall believed the other areas offered good long-term growth prospects.
Scapa's strong market position has not been achieved cheaply. In the
document accompanying its Pounds 55.6m rights issue last year, the group
said it had invested Pounds 171m in the businesses since the previous fund
raising in 1985. Of this, a third was spent on acquisitions, one third on
replacement capital and the rest on new technology or greenfield sites.
Scapa recently assured the City that it would take 'no major leap into the
unknown' to develop the industrial products division. Such an assurance was
probably unnecessary from a group which embodies the qualities which are
supposedly so rare in British manufacturing - a willingness to look
long-term and invest heavily.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12598</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: MY poised to seek acquisitions after sharp
jump to Pounds 2m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MY HOLDINGS, the packaging company, is heading for the acquisition trail
following a sharp rise in pre-tax profits from Pounds 547,000 to Pounds
2.02m for the year ended August 31.
The group, which is 86.5 per cent controlled by Malbak, the South African
packaging company, achieved the increase on sales Pounds 1.4m lower at
Pounds 34.3m. However, turnover in 1991 included Pounds 3.74m in sales from
currently discontinued businesses.
Mr John Monks, chief executive, said the company aimed to increase its range
of packaging products through acquisition. A deal would be effected either
through borrowings or for paper, he said.
The company is believed to be in discussions with three possible targets.
Malbak has repeatedly let it be known that it would be willing to dilute its
stake substantially.
At last night's share price of 38p, up 3p on the day, MY has a market value
of about Pounds 24m.
The company, which has experienced several years of restructuring since
Malbak moved in, cut debt from Pounds 5.4m to Pounds 700,000. That factor,
and lower interest charges, left debt repayments significantly lower at
Pounds 401,000 (Pounds 1.2m).
Mr Monks said the debt reduction had been achieved through tight control of
working capital, a reduction in stocks and debtor days, and general
efficiencies which included cutting lead times for raw materials. 'We are
now operating on a true just in time, not a just in case, principle' he
said.
The steepest rise in profits came in the Sharp subsidiary, which makes
blister packs for industrial use. Sales and profits increased by 20 per
cent.
The corrugated packaging division was steady, helped by lower paper costs at
the beginning of the year. However, these were beginning to increase again,
Mr Monks said.
The moulded packaging division, manufacturing plastic cushions for products
such as hi-fi's, suffered a 10 per cent decline in sales. Nevertheless,
market share and profits were marginally ahead.
Earnings per share expanded from 1.66p to 3.41p, and the total dividend is
doubled to 1p with a final of 0.75p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12599</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: BT begins move into European broadcasting
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Telecommunications has made its first permanent move into the
continental European broadcast market through a joint venture with AKK, a
German broadcast services company.
BT will now be able to compete with Deutsche Telekom for the business of
broadcasters wanting satellite links from Germany. As a result of
telecommunications deregulation BT has been able to obtain satellite
licences in Germany, France and the Netherlands.
Mr Steve Maine, BT's director of Visual and Broadcast Services, said the
deal was significant 'because it signals the first of a series of
initiatives which will see BT expanding its operations throughout the rest
of the world.
BT has already stationed a fixed satellite aerial at AKK's headquarters in
Ludwigshafen.
In addition to linking broadcasters in Germany with dedicated satellite
capacity on systems such as Intelsat or Eutelsat, BT hopes to apply its
expertise in areas of conventional broadcasting.
'Our ultimate goal is to capture some 10 per cent of the German broadcast
market,' Mr Maine said.
Having started in Germany BT hopes to have a much broader pan-European
presence by the end of next year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12600</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Value and Income net assets at 74.7p
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value per share at Value and Income Trust stood at 74.7p at
September 30 against 81p a year earlier and 70.6p at the March year end.
Net revenue for the six months fell from Pounds 804,000 to Pounds 790,000
and earnings per share were 1.87p (1.82p). An interim dividend of 1.8p
(1.62p) is declared and a final of 1.8p (1.62p) is proposed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12601</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Ldn &amp; Strathclyde asset value down
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
At August 31 net asset value per share of London &amp; Strathclyde Trust stood
at 191.7p, compared with 246.3p a year earlier.
Revenue totalled Pounds 1.71m (Pounds 1.77m) and earnings per share were
unchanged at 5.74p.
The final dividend is 4.25p for a same-again total of 5.75p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12602</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Regal moves to gain sounder footing
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Regal Hotel announced a capital reconstruction, a voluntary arrangement and
a rights issue to raise Pounds 800,000 together with results for the 1991
year and interims for the subsequent period to July 12 1992.
The rights issue - 15 new shares of   1/4 p for each existing 2p share at
1/2 p - will represent 86.7 per cent of the enlarged capital. The voluntary
arrangement will see creditors offered 10 per cent of their agreed claims in
new shares.
Pre-tax losses last year were sharply reduced to Pounds 844,000 (Pounds
11.7m) and losses per share from 109.99p to 7.85p. Results for the later
period revealed a pre-tax deficit of Pounds 663,000 (Pounds 2.18m); losses
emerged at 6.2p (20.43p) per share.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12603</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Tharsis boosted by rentals income
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
In the first half of 1992 Tharsis made a pre-tax profit of Pounds 150,000,
compared with Pounds 16,000. Most of the income came from rentals of offices
and land.
The interim dividend is cut from 3p to 2p, costing Pounds 52,000 (Pounds
78,000). That followed omission of the previous final.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12604</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Lowland Investment net assets decline
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value per share of the Lowland Investment Company declined by 5
per cent, from 211.2p to 200.8p, over the year to end-September .
Earnings per share were 8.75p (8.73p). A final dividend of 5.5p makes an
8.5p (8.1p) total.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12605</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Losses at Gieves rise to Pounds 530,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
INTERIM LOSSES at Gieves Group, which is concentrating on its core
retailing, large print and audio book publishing activities, rose from
Pounds 467,000 to Pounds 530,000 pre-tax.
Turnover for the six months to July 31 amounted to Pounds 10.7m (Pounds
24.3m), reflecting disposals.
Losses at the Milan store totalled Pounds 195,000 (Pounds 283,000) and were
taken above the line.
Losses per share were 3.5p (3.3p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12606</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: MY poised to seek acquisitions after sharp
jump to Pounds 2m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MY HOLDINGS, the packaging company, is heading for the acquisition trail
following a sharp rise in pre-tax profits from Pounds 547,000 to Pounds
2.02m for the year ended August 31.
The group, which is 86.5 per cent controlled by Malbak, the South African
packaging company, achieved the increase on sales Pounds 1.4m lower at
Pounds 34.3m. However, turnover in 1991 included Pounds 3.74m in sales from
currently discontinued businesses.
Mr John Monks, chief executive, said the company aimed to increase its range
of packaging products through acquisition. A deal would be effected either
through borrowings or for paper, he said.
The company is believed to be in discussions with three possible targets.
Malbak has repeatedly let it be known that it would be willing to dilute its
stake substantially.
At last night's share price of 38p, up 3p on the day, MY has a market value
of about Pounds 16m.
The company, which has experienced several years of restructuring since
Malbak moved in, cut debt from Pounds 5.4m to Pounds 700,000. That factor,
and lower interest charges, left debt repayments significantly lower at
Pounds 401,000 (Pounds 1.2m).
Mr Monks said the debt reduction had been achieved through tight control of
working capital, a reduction in stocks and debtor days, and general
efficiencies which included cutting lead times for raw materials. 'We are
now operating on a true just in time, not a just in case, principle' he
said.
The steepest rise in profits came in the Sharp subsidiary, which makes
blister packs for industrial use. Sales and profits increased by 20 per
cent.
The corrugated packaging division was steady, helped by lower paper costs at
the beginning of the year. However, these were beginning to increase again,
Mr Monks said.
The moulded packaging division, manufacturing plastic cushions for products
such as hi-fi's, suffered a 10 per cent decline in sales. Nevertheless,
market share and profits were marginally ahead.
Earnings per share expanded from 1.66p to 3.41p, and the total dividend is
doubled to 1p with a final of 0.75p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12607</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Exceptional costs leave Baltic Pounds 3m in
the red
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BALTIC, the leasing and hire purchase group, incurred a loss before tax of
Pounds 2.73m for the half year to June 30. That compared with profits of
Pounds 5.62m previously.
The interim dividend is cut from 1.83p to 0.5p. The shares fell 28p to 56p.
The deficit was struck after taking account of an exceptional charge of
Pounds 5.5m to cover losses resulting from the withdrawal from construction
equipment leasing and aircraft financing.
Before exceptionals, halved profits of Pounds 2.8m mainly reflected a Pounds
2.3m charge to cover bad debts - including a Pounds 600,000 increase in
general provisions. Turnover fell to Pounds 19.5m (Pounds 22m).
Mr Harry Hyman, finance director, said: 'There is a never ending tide of
corporate insolvency. There is no light at the end of the tunnel. In fact,
things are getting worse as more and more people are experiencing financial
difficulty.'
The group withdrew from leasing construction equipment after a number of
manufacturers, which had given guarantees over the leasing of equipment,
folded. Mr Hyman said its 10 aircraft on lease had been repossessed and some
had already been sold. 'The market for aircraft leasing has fallen away', he
added.
A provision was also made for the anticipated losses arising from
manufacturing companies which had been unable to honour personal guarantees
given by their directors.
Fully diluted losses were 6.5p (earnings of 8.1p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12608</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Henry Boot bucks trend with advance to
Pounds 2.2m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HENRY BOOT &amp; Sons, the Sheffield-based construction and property group,
continued to buck the sector trend with a 7 per cent increase in interim
profits despite lower turnover and squeezed margins.
Pre-tax profits rose to Pounds 2.21m (Pounds 2.07m) in the six months to
June 30 on turnover down 14 per cent to Pounds 51.1m (Pounds 59.2m).
Mr David Boot, chairman, said construction activities had benefited from
latent claim settlements but were continuing to feel combined effects of
reduced enquiry levels and exceptionally competitive margins.
Difficult trading conditions also extended to the plant hire side which
experienced 'an unparalleled number of bad debts, reduced utilisation and
fiercely competitive hire rates.'
However, housebuilding operations 'continued to hold their own in the first
six months,' despite high interest and mortgage rates and unemployment
uncertainties.
Mr Boot said property investment and development activities have 'of
necessity had to be curtailed,' although the group 'continued to make some
further progress' in planning consents, rental growth and in its joint
venture activities in Kirklees, Bridlington and Hull.
Earnings per share rose from 5.1p to 5.7p and the interim dividend is
increased to 1.6p (1.5p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12609</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Heron banks postpone meeting
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A MEETING of banks which lent to Heron, Mr Gerald Ronson's property group,
has been postponed from today until October 29.
The meeting will consider proposals to be put to banks and bondholders owed
more than Pounds 1.3bn by the group, which has been hit by the fall in
property values.
The delay by the banks in holding the meeting was said to be caused by the
need to finalise the proposals and make adjustment to take account of 'a
number of external factors', including interest rate and currency movements.
The group's 11 bonds are all denominated in currencies other than sterling.
The fall in the value of the pound has meant a rise in the sterling value of
the bonds from Pounds 450m when talks started in the spring to nearly Pounds
600m now.
Bondholders say that Heron's banks refused to provide the funds to hedge the
foreign exchange risk on the bonds. They say that bondholders, many of whom
are individual investors, should not be expected to bear that risk.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12610</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Interest in investor relations increasing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARTIN, Financial Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COMPANIES WHICH take an active interest in investor relations typically have
a couple of executives working on the subject, spending a budget of between
Pounds 50,000 and Pounds 500,000 a year, according to a survey carried out
for the Investor Relations Society.
The survey, covering 140 mid-sized and large companies, which are members of
the society, is due to be published tomorrow. It shows that active investor
relations is a relatively new practice for British companies. A little less
than half the companies surveyed say they have been actively involved in the
field for less than five years.
Though interest in investor relations has been rising, the bulk of non-staff
spending goes on traditional activities. Some 37 per cent of companies'
investor relations budgets go on annual, interim or quarterly reports; 12
per cent on meetings with stockbrokers; 9 per cent on annual meetings, and 8
per cent on investor relations consultants.
Overall, 85 per cent of the budget is spent reaching UK investors, though
the very largest companies spend a quarter of their investor relations
budgets overseas.
Some 54 per cent have budgets of less than Pounds 250,000 a year and two
thirds of the investor relations executives questioned have other
responsibilities, such as finance, a company secretary's duties, or
corporate communications.
Investor Relations in the UK, survey by Business Planning and Research
International, published by Investor Relations Society, 28 Neal St, London
WC2H 9PS. Members: Pounds 65, non-members: Pounds 90.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12611</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8AD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Finsbury Trust assets decline
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value per share of the Finsbury Trust slipped from 119p to 101.55p
over the 12 months to September 30.
After-tax revenue for the six months to end-September improved to Pounds
485,000 (Pounds 430,000), equal to earnings of 1.99p (1.76p) per share.
The interim dividend is held at 1.2p. The trust said, however, that should
earnings remain strong in the coming months it would 'have the opportunity
at year-end to declare an improved final' - 1.8p was paid previously.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12612</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Tottenham Hotspur produces Pounds 773,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Tottenham Hotspur, the north London football club, yesterday announced a
special interim dividend of 3p and reported profits of Pounds 773,000 for
the three months to August 31.
There are no comparative figures - which are for the parent company only -
as the quarterly results were prepared solely for the special interim.
Last year, the parent reported a loss of Pounds 122,000 for the 12 months to
May 31. The special dividend was made possible by the transfer from the
share premium account.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12613</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Receiver for North West Growers
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
This summer's glut of tomatoes, which has already caused the Dutch to bury
1m boxes of the fruit, has now resulted in the failure of North West
Growers, one of the largest UK producers.
Along with Marathon Fresh Foods, a sister company which packs and markets
fresh salad vegetables, it has been put in the hands of Mr Mike Seery, the
receiver from KPMG Peat Marwick.
North West and Marathon, both of Southport, Lancashire, had a combined
turnover of Pounds 3m and debts of more than Pounds 2m. Established in 1970,
North West invested Pounds 800,000 in a new five-acre site in 1988 to make
it the largest tomato grower in the north-west.
It is hoped the businesses will be sold as going concerns. To that end, the
53 full-time and 48 part-time staff have been retained.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12614</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Mansfield Brewery expansion
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MANSFIELD Brewery is buying 31 social clubs, mainly in Derbyshire and
Yorkshire, from Courage. Terms of the deal were not disclosed.
The clubs have a total membership of more than 50,000 people. They will be
given new tenancy agreements, including a right to buy at a designated time.
Mr Richard Chadburn, Mansfield's operations and personnel director, said
that he expected about half the clubs would eventually take advantage of the
provision. 'They will then switch from being tenants to become free-trade
customers,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12615</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Quadrant loses Pounds 4.83m as shipping
deal turns sour
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
QUADRANT, the photographic and video equipment company, yesterday announced
heavy interim losses stemming from a shipping investment designed to shelter
capital gains liabilities but which turned sour.
In the six months to August 31 pre-tax losses were Pounds 4.83m after
exceptional charges of Pounds 3.61m, a downturn from a profit of Pounds
940,000. No dividend is declared, against 1.65p, after losses per share of
16.85p (earnings 2.04p). The shares fell 2p to 20p.
The company's problems started with the purchase last year of two liquid
petroleum gas carriers from Beckworth, which is controlled by Mr Robert
Brothers, a Hong Kong businessman.
It wanted to shelter Pounds 6.2m of capital gains liability due on the sale
of a telecommunications subsidiary in 1989. In part consideration for the
purchase of the carriers, Beckworth took a 16 per cent stake in Quadrant,
which has since risen to 18.46 per cent.
But the carriers lost money because of a downturn in the LPG transport
market. Beckworth had guaranteed to make good any shortfall in revenues from
the carriers but ran into financial difficulty, failed to meet its
obligations and now owes Quadrant over Pounds 1m.
Quadrant has agreed to buy back and cancel Beckworth's shareholding at 23
3/4 p a share, the mid-market price last Monday, to raise Pounds 1.15m. It
will then sell the carriers, complete with Pounds 3.7m of sheltered capital
gains liability, to Andreas Shipping, a Greek ship management company, for
Pounds 1.
If the ships operate profitably, Quadrant is entitled to further payments of
up to Dollars 1.75m (Pounds 1m).
The transactions depend on shareholders' approval and Beckworth's banks
lifting certain charges now in place over the Quadrant shareholding.
Mr Andrew Douglas, chief executive of Quadrant, said the transactions would
remove Pounds 4.2m of capital gains liability and leave Quadrant with only
Pounds 700,000 of unsheltered liabilities.
This charge was provided for as an extraordinary item in the interim
results, along with losses of Pounds 7.5m on the write down in value of the
ships. As a result, loss attributable to shareholders came to Pounds 13m
(profit Pounds 556,000).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12616</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Master takes Maxwell's chess and bridge
side
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LATE Mr Robert Maxwell liked to think of himself as a 'strong ' chess
player and there was always a chess set in his suite in his London
headquarters.
'There is no evidence to suggest that Maxwell actually was a strong player
or that he played in any tournaments,' said Mr Malcolm Pein, international
chess master and director of Chess and Bridge, which yesterday took over the
business and assets of Maxwell Macmillan Chess and Bridge.
There may be doubts about Robert Maxwell's strength as a player but less
about his enthusiasm for the game. In 1990, through The European newspaper,
he sponsored a section of the World Chess championships in New York. And
when Pergamon was sold to Elsevier last year Maxwell kept the chess and
bridge publishing businesses.
Mr Pein said it had taken most of the year since Mr Maxwell's death to prise
the businesses, which include Chess Monthly and Bridge Monthly from the
administrators to the Maxwell empire.
'Price Waterhouse took months and months to come up with any information
about the company,' said Mr Pein.
Even when the new company had reached agreement to buy the business from
Price Waterhouse, administrator to the public Maxwell companies they then
ran into trouble with Arthur Andersen, administrator to the private Maxwell
businesses.
Mr Pein said the new company wanted to use and pay for the premises of
Maxwell Macmillan Chess and Bridge - prefabricated buildings in the village
of Wheatley, Oxfordshire - until they found permanent premises. However, he
said that Arthur Andersen wanted two years back rent.
Despite the year of difficulties, Chess and Bridge is now set up in new
premises in Euston Road, London. The company said it had the largest
collection of chess and bridge books and products in the UK.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12617</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / UK Company News: Vardon opens at small premium
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES IN Vardon, the leisure attractions group formed by Mr David Hudd and
Mr Nicholas Irens, began trading yesterday at a small premium to their 45p
placement price.
In thin trading, the shares opened at 50p before slipping back to end the
day at 47 1/2 p valuing the group, which owns the London and York Dungeons
and eight Sea Life centres, at Pounds 23.3m.
The group was formed in March when it acquired the Dungeons for Pounds 5.6m
from Kunick, the nursing homes and amusement machines group, after Mr Hudd,
chairman, and Mr Irens, chief executive, joined the board of Winchmore,
restructured the company and changed its name.
Last month Vardon bought Sea Life Centres for Pounds 9.9m in cash and stock,
and announced plans for the share placement and listing, to help fund the
acquisition. The placement of 23m shares, including 11.9m on behalf of Sea
Life's previous owners, was handled by Morgan Grenfell, the merchant bank.
Last month the group reported interim pre-tax profits of Pounds 337,000 on
turnover of Pounds 639,000 for the 27 weeks to July 5, and is forecasting
annual pre-tax profits of Pounds 2.3m with earnings per share of 4p and a
final dividend of 0.5p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12618</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Capital Cities/ABC rises 17%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CAPITAL Cities/ABC, the US television and newspapers group that controls the
ABC Television network, said third-quarter net profit rose to Dollars
62.16m, up from Dollars 53.96m a year ago, writes Alan Friedman.
Earnings per share were Dollars 3.74, an increase of 17 per cent on the
Dollars 3.21 recorded in the third quarter of 1991.
Net revenues were effectively unchanged at Dollars 1.22bn.
Many of the group's operations continue to be adversely affected by the US
economy. Broadcasting revenues for the quarter were flat at Dollars 944.2m
while operating income from broadcasting fell to Dollars 89.3m from Dollars
97.3m a year ago.
Publishing revenues were 3 per cent better at Dollars 271m, while operating
profits from this division rose to Dollars 36.2m from Dollars 31.7m.
For the first nine months, Capital Cities/ABC had total net profits of
Dollars 251.4m, a 5 per cent rise on the Dollars 240.3m of the same period
last year. The results included a gain on the sale of its interest in a
German television network, which was partly offset by losses on the disposal
of commercial property in New York City and asset write-downs.
The group's share price tumbled Dollars 7 5/8 to Dollars 422 1/4.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12619</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Publishing division boosts Time
Warner results
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TIME WARNER, the leading US media and entertainment group, yesterday
unveiled a solid advance in its third-quarter operating earnings, but
incurred a Dollars 152m loss after the payment of dividends on preferred
stock.
The stock was issued at the time of the 1989 merger of Time and Warner.
The company chose to highlight its third-quarter net profit of Dollars 6m,
which compares with a Dollars 62m net loss a year ago. But Time Warner's
need to continue paying special preferred stock dividends resulted in the
ultimate Dollars 152m loss, or 41 cents a share, although this has been
reduced from the Dollars 211m loss or 66 cents of a year ago.
Operating profits were Dollars 303m, up from Dollars 218m in the same period
last year, while total revenues were Dollars 3.2bn, up from Dollars 2.9bn.
Mr Gerald Levin, co-chief executive, said despite continued sluggishness in
the world economy, Time Warner had posted 'three straight quarters in which
all five of our divisions showed increases in their results'.
Fourth-quarter results are likely to benefit from a worldwide book, record
and video campaign on behalf of the new, sexually explicit products being
launched by Madonna, the pop star.
The publishing division achieved Dollars 64m of operating income before
depreciation and amortisation, compared with only Dollars 1m a year ago. The
music division earned Dollars 122m on the same basis, compared with Dollars
116m.
Filmed entertainment was almost unchanged at Dollars 121m, against Dollars
120m, while the Home Box Office (HBO) cable programming business earned
Dollars 54m, up from Dollars 47m. The cable operating division earned
Dollars 250m, against Dollars 221m.
Time Warner's operating income for the first nine months of 1992 was Dollars
926m, up from Dollars 752m. Net profits were Dollars 18m, compared with a
Dollars 144m loss in the same period last year.
The group's loss after paying dividends on preferred stock was Dollars 449m
in the first nine months, down from Dollars 585m.
On Wall Street, Time Warner's share price closed Dollars 1 1/4 higher at
Dollars 24.
McGraw-Hill, the media and financial services company, lifted third-quarter
net earnings by 11 per cent to Dollars 61.1m. Revenues were 8.8 per cent
higher at Dollars 532.7m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12620</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Production gains lift American
Barrick
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AMERICAN Barrick, the Canadian gold producer which last year had abortive
merger talks with Newmont Mining, yesterday reported after-tax profits of
Dollars 49.5m in the three months to end-September. This compared with
Dollars 28.2m in the same period a year earlier.
Revenues were up from Dollars 92.4m to Dollars 143.5m, while earnings per
share increased from 20 cents to 35 cents.
American Barrick has now reported after-tax profits of Dollars 109.4m in the
first nine months of 1992, against Dollars 68.4m in the same period of 1991.
The company said gold production totalled 838,711 ounces in the nine-month
period of 1992. This represents a substantial increase on the 595,524 ounces
seen in the same months of 1991, and was attributed to a 66 per cent
increase in production at the Goldstrike Mine in Nevada.
American Barrick also said it had realised an average price of Dollars 426
an ounce for its gold sales this year, compared with the Comex average gold
price of Dollars 346 - reflecting the company's hedging programme.
It predicted that it should meet its 1992 production target of 1.2m ounces,
with fourth-quarter results improving further.
The shares rose Dollars 5/8 to Dollars 30 5/8.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12621</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Unisys extends rally with sharp
third-quarter upturn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
UNISYS, the US computer manufacturer, reported its fourth consecutive
quarter of profitability, raising confidence that the once seriously
troubled company was making a turnround.
Unisys debt burden has been reduced to Dollars 2bn, the lowest level since
the formation of the company in 1986.
Net income for the third quarter was Dollars 68.3m, or 23 cents a share,
compared with a net loss of Dollars 75.8m, or 66 cents, last year. Revenue
was up 5 per cent to Dollars 2.07bn, from Dollars 1.97bn.
Tax-loss carry forwards contributed 6 cents a share to third-quarter net
earnings.
Growth in commercial information systems and services revenue was partly
offset by a slight decline in revenues from Paramax, Unisys defence
subsidiary, the company said.
'Despite economic uncertainty, we are confident that our record over the
past 12 months of sustained profitability is a solid foundation for 1993,'
said Mr James Unruh, chairman and chief executive.
As projected by the company, total revenue for 1992 will be down from 1991.
'However, we are confident that we will meet or exceed all of our financial
goals for 1992.'
During the quarter, Unisys began paying down the arrears on its preferred
stock dividends.
Nine-month net income was Dollars 222m, or 79 cents a share, including 16
cents from tax benefits. This compared with a net loss of Dollars 1.47bn, or
Dollars 9.69 a share, last year when the company took restructuring charges
of Dollars 1.2bn.
Revenue for the nine months was Dollars 6.17bn, against Dollars 6.23bn a
year ago.
Intel's fifth generation of microprocessor chips, to be launched early next
year, will carry a new name. The company has registered the name 'Pentium'
as a trademark to prevent competitors using the same name.
Intel's current products are called the 386 and the 486, following a
numbering convention the company has developed over several years.
'The natural course would be to call this chip the 586,' said Mr Andrew S.
Grove, Intel president and chief executive.
But Intel lost a legal battle with rival Advanced Micro Devices last year to
protect its numbering system. 'That means that any company might call any
chip a 586, even if it doesn't measure up to the real thing.'
Pentium will be the 'brains' of the next generation of personal computers.
'It represents the next advance in performance - running software two to
three times faster than today's 486 PCs,' said Mr Grove.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-12622</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CJTB8ADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921020
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 OCT 92 / International Company News: Chrysler gives its image a new
shine - Martin Dickson detects an upbeat mood at the No 3 US carmaker
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NEW car models bear the code-name LH, and cruel wits have been calling
them Chrysler's Last Hope. But when the mid-sized sedans are formally
launched this week they will mark a big improvement in the fortunes of
America's third-biggest automobile group and an upbeat finale for Mr Lee
Iacocca, Chrysler's retiring chairman.
For the LH range, which will be sold under the names Chrysler Concorde,
Dodge Intrepid and Eagle Vision, has won rave reviews from the US motoring
press for its sleek, original design and extremely roomy interiors. 'The
Second Coming of Chrysler,' trumpeted Automobile Magazine.
It is not yet certain that motorists will be equally enthusiastic, but the
early signs are promising - as well they need to be. The LH is
financially-stretched Chrysler's most important launch in years and will
give a much-needed lift to its tired car line-up.
It will be 1993 before the range has an appreciable impact on the profit and
loss account, but the positive psychological effect has been much more
immediate - both within the company and on Wall Street, where Chrysler's
shares have doubled in value over the past year.
And the LH models form only one plank in a multi-year roll out of new
Chrysler vehicles. This started last spring with a top-of-the range Jeep,
which is selling well, and will end in 1995 with a revamped mini-van.
Chrysler pioneered mini-vans in the 1980s and still holds almost 50 per cent
cent of the US market, despite formidable competition.
The upbeat mood is a sharp contrast to two years ago, when Mr Iacocca, the
man who masterminded the company's escape from near bankruptcy at the start
of the 1980s, was under fire for diversifying into non-automotive businesses
(since sold off) and failing to develop quickly a new model range to replace
Chrysler's aged K car series.
The result was that Chrysler entered the recession with a geriatric range of
cars, losing market share, and without the big, profitable European
operations which bolstered larger rivals Ford and General Motors. Jeremiahs
said it might have to merge with a larger rival, though year-long talks with
Fiat of Italy came to nothing.
However, adversity bred ingenuity. Chrysler saw the recession coming before
its rivals, built up a Dollars 4bn reserve of cash through asset disposals,
cut Dollars 3bn off running costs and spent heavily on the development of
vital new models like the LH.
Its assembly plant productivity is much improved: it now takes Chrysler 3.76
workers to assemble a vehicle, much better than GM's 4.55 but still behind
Ford, with 3.01, according to a report from consultancy Harbour &amp; Associates
It has also radically changed the way it develops cars, adopting a much more
Japanese approach: It has forged much closer links with parts suppliers and
has set up in-house teams which bring together people from different
disciplines, such as design and engineering, to cut costs and quicken lead
times. Some analysts argue the result is a model for the US industry.
However, development spending and recession have severely strained
Chrysler's balance sheet and it remains in delicate financial health, though
here, too, the recent signs have all been positive.
Last month, Moody's, the credit information agency, raised the company's
debt rating for the first time in six years (though the borrowings still
have 'junk' status), after Chrysler completed a vital but tricky Dollars
6.8bn loan roll-over for its vehicle financing arm. The company is also
expected to report solid third-quarter profits today, in contrast to losses
at GM and Ford.
Mr Robert Eaton, who will take over as chairman in January from Mr Iacocca,
recently told the Financial Times that Chrysler's recently-completed
business plan foresees capital spending of Dollars 17.3bn over the next five
years 'and we are in a very good position to carry that out, even if the (US
economic) recovery is far more anaemic than any we have ever had'.
He says that over the next few years the company should be able to boost its
share of the US car and light truck market from 13 per cent to 15 per cent.
He rejects the suggestion that Chrysler may eventually need to merge with
another auto manufacturer: 'I believe a company of around 2m units (roughly
Chrysler's vehicle output) can be a viable stand-alone company.'
Mr Eaton, 52, was named last spring to succeed Mr Iacocca. The choice was a
surprise since Chrysler, after an intense internal power struggle, went
outside the group to pluck him from the European presidency of General
Motors, a company he had been with since 1963.
A down-to-earth engineer, he has a reputation as a manufacturing and quality
expert, with an eye for detail and an ability to foster team-building.
Mr Iacocca, arguably the best-known industrialist in America, will be a hard
act to follow - though he will stay on part-time for at least a year as head
of the board's important executive committee.
The delicacy of the transition was underlined in August when Mr Kirk
Kerkorian, the Californian who is Chrysler's largest single investor,
demanded a meeting with company executives to express concern about the
reduced role of Mr Iacocca, with whom he is friendly. Mr Kerkorian seemed to
be mollified after meeting Mr Eaton for the first time. 'In hindsight, I
probably should have met him earlier,' says the new chairman.
However, the incident has prompted speculation that Mr Iacocca might try to
continue exerting authority, though both he and a relaxed Mr Eaton dismiss
the idea.
For years Mr Iacocca has been Chrysler's most effective salesman, appearing
in countless television advertisements to plug his company's products. His
final campaign has just got under way, and has him lavishing praise on the
LH range, with claims its design will transform the way Americans look at
cars.
The market place will ultimately decide that, but at least Mr Iacocca is
going out with a bang, and not the whimper which once seemed possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
